Authors
Andrew Hicks
Number of Reviews
264

Title
Review for Smoke (1995)
        Let me tell you, SMOKE gets in your eyes. I don't know what 
that means, but I imagine at least two-thirds of the movie reviewers on 
the planet made that connection in their SMOKE review, so I had to 
take the opportunity too... SMOKE isn't about smoking, although the 
one thing all its characters have in common is an affinity for inhaling 
poison into their lungs. Harvey Keitel plays the owner of a cigar / 
cigarette store, with various plots and subplots connected to patrons 
like author Paul Benjamin (William Hurt) and an ex-girlfriend (?).
        Hurt's story begins as a 17-year-old black kid named Rashid 
(or Thomas or Paul) pushes him out of the way of an oncoming truck, 
saving his life. Hurt insists on retribution and, upon learning Rashid is 
running from some tough guys, lets him stay at his place for a few 
days. This has all the makings of a "Fresh Prince of Brooklyn" sitcom 
(or an underground porno flick), but instead leads to another subplot, 
where Rashid finally locates his real father, who befriends him without 
knowing his true identity (millionaire Bruce Wayne). Keitel, 
meanwhile, is told of a daughter he never knew he never knew, a 
pregnant, 18-year-old crack addict (Ashley Judd). She pleads him to 
talk sense into Ashley, so she'll mend her crazy ways and stop 
recording all that crappy country music.
        These subplots eventually collide in a few ways, with Keitel 
sharing a truly compelling Christmas story with Hurt and Rashid 
working at the cigar store. I find it hard to believe, even in a movie, 
that any black teenager would hang out with fifty-year-old white guys. 
That has about the same statistical probability as Newt Gingrich and 
Bill Clinton teaming up to cruise for chicks at a topless bar. Then 
again, several Washington insiders have told me that's happened on 
more than one occasion, so what do I know? But I do know this -- 
SMOKE is a masterpiece in plot and dialogue. It may be a low-budget, 
low-action movie, but it's definitely worth watching.
        An aside -- SMOKE almost threw a monkey wrench into my 
Keitel Postulate, which states that Harvey Keitel only plays cops and 
criminals in the movies. Here, he seems to be neither, but notice how 
one of the plot points involves his illegal smuggling of Cuban cigars 
into the country. That's criminal activity, my friend, and it once again 
saves my Keitel Postulate from being thrown out the window.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Monty Python's The Meaning of Life (1983)
        THE MEANING OF LIFE stands in this reviewer's opinion 
as the best of the three Python films, a collection of sketches tracing 
the journey and meaning behind this life we all lead. Pythonites 
John Cleese, Graham Chapman, Terry Gilliam, Eric Idle, Terry 
Jones and Michael Palin once again play multiple roles, male 
and female, beginning with a birth sequence and continuing 
into a family with at least fifty children.
        We find out why they have fifty children during an 
elaborate production number detailing the Catholic view of sperm 
as sacred. (Isn't it though?) We also find out what else Catholics 
hold sacred in the next sequence, with Father Cleese teaching a 
class all about sex. He goes far beyond the biological details the 
rest of us were subjected to in high school, favoring instead a 
demonstration with his wife. In the grand tradition of school, 
though, even this doesn't interest the kids, who continue staring 
into space, passing notes and falling asleep while Cleese gets it 
on with his wife... For those of you who still harbor any doubt, 
this movie is rated R.
        We continue through the journey with sequences handling 
the meaning of war, middle age and later death itself, in which the 
Grim Reaper claims the lives of six dinner party guests and takes 
them to heaven. Apparently, we will all be subjected to an eternity 
of lounge singers doing production numbers about Christmas. 
(Before the Monty Python troop told us differently, this scenario 
was known as hell.) Then there's the most memorable portion of 
the film, where the world's fattest man comes to dine and regurgitate 
in a restaurant. How fondly I remember the day we filmed that 
scene.
        Preceding the movie itself is a short film about a small, 
family-run accounting firm that's been taken over by faceless 
bureaucrats. But they're taking it back, by force. Though this piece 
doesn't star any of the Python troupe, it definitely fits in with the 
rest of THE MEANING OF LIFE, and is later reprised in the feature 
presentation itself. As with LIFE OF BRIAN, this movie isn't for the 
easily-offended, but for those of us with strong stomachs (and I've 
definitely exercised mine enough over the years), it's mostly a very 
funny movie. Sure, it has its misses too, but so does any work 
attempting comedy. This review, for example...
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Psycho (1960)
        No movie critic worth his fat wouldn't give this Alfred 
Hitchcock masterpiece a four-star rating. I appreciated it even more 
after seeing the three sequels (look down for reviews of those). I 
just wish I hadn't known every little secret of this movie's plot before 
seeing it. I can only imagine how much I would have liked PSYCHO 
without knowing beforehand the details about Norman Bates and 
his mother.
        And if you haven't seen PSYCHO yet, forget about being 
surprised when you find out Norman's been dressing up as his dead 
mother and committing the murders himself. Hey, someone ruins it 
for me, I ruin it for someone else.
        The set-up: A beautiful (by 1960 standards) secretary is 
entrusted with taking $40,000 to the bank. She bypasses the bank 
and heads home instead, where she packs and skips town. The guilt 
gets to her, though, and when night falls, she makes one final (fatal) 
mistake--checking into the Bates Motel. Shoot, even I wouldn't 
check into a motel with an outdoor sign reading "Color TV, Heated 
Pool, Round-the-Clock Stabbings."
        Norman's mom is a little jealous of this beautiful woman 
stealing Norman's attention, so once she hits the shower, mama 
comes down with a kife and... well, wouldn't want to give _too_ 
much away. Needless to say, the shower scene is one of the most 
memorable in cinematic history, even more memorable than the fat, 
vomiting guy in MONTY PYTHON'S THE MEANING OF LIFE.
And don't forget the three lackluster sequels...
PSYCHO II (1983) **1/2
        That psycho Norman Bates (Anthony Perkins) is back 
again, fresh out of the asylum in this, the first of three sequels to 
the 1960 Hitchcock classic. Bates is given a job in a diner as the 
cook's assistant (You've gotta be crazy to work in a diner!), where 
he meets an attractive young waitress with no place to stay. Say, I 
do believe I can recommend a place. Why not the Bates Motel? Yes, 
Norman takes the girl back to his old digs, but changes his mind 
when he finds the manager has turned the Bates into a dive for 
fornicating druggies. Norman protests, saying he won't stand for 
such immorality. Why, he remembers the good old days, when the 
Bates Motel was a place for peeping toms to watch women taking 
showers and later stab them to death.
        After firing the manager, Norman and the waitress head 
up to the ramshackle Bates mansion, which now has no trace of 
"mother." Norman tries hard to be sane, but how can he when he 
keeps getting notes and phone calls from mommy dearest? As the 
girl stays a few more nights (they're platonically shacked-up, you 
might say), Norman begins to relapse. Soon, the old hotel manager 
turns up dead and guess who they point the finger at. The man 
dressed up as an old woman carrying on both sides of a 
conversation with his mother? No, the waitress.
        PSYCHO II is by no means on the same level as the 
original (God rest its soul), but it's better than most horror movies 
with a Roman numeral II in the title, including the second Friday 
the 13th, Halloween, Texas Chainsaw Massacre, 
Nightmare on Elm Street and CHILD'S PLAY movies. 
Still, Norman Bates has to be the wimpiest horror movie killer 
ever.
PSYCHO III (1986) *1/2
        What's that sound I hear? Oh, that's just Alfred Hitchcock 
turning over in his grave. Yes, Norman Bates is up to his old (yawn) 
tricks again. He's been exonerated for all that went on in the second 
PSYCHO and is trying to make an honest living in the motel 
business. But he's set off again by a woman, this time a guilty 
ex-nun (the best-looking nun I've ever seen) who bears a striking 
resemblance to Norman's first shower victim from the original 
PSYCHO.
        Also along for the ride this time are Norman's rude new 
assistant manager, a reporter digging up history on Bates and a 
group of partying co-eds (no 80's horror movie would be complete 
without them). As with any horror movie series, the PSYCHO films 
have outlived their usefulness. There's only so long we can watch a 
man dress up as his mother and carve people up with a butcher knife 
before we get bored.
PSYCHO IV: THE BEGINNING (1990) **1/2
        This one, a low-budget made-for-TV effort, is actually an 
improvement over the strictly blood-and-guts mentality of the third 
movie. Part IV provides an origin for Norman Bates (Anthony 
Perkins), with most of the movie centered around Bates' call to a 
radio talk show (yes, there still is such a thing as a radio show), the 
subject, of course, being men who have killed their mothers (and, 
naturally, bad sequels to classic movies).
        Through flashbacks we learn Norman's mother was kind of 
weird, not to mention overbearing, with little Norman. Though the 
relationship was never sexual (There is a part where Mrs. Bates 
makes Norman take off his clothes and get in bed with her... but that 
doesn't mean anything), there was an abnormal level of affection 
with those two, so when Mother brings home a boyfriend and heads 
straight for the motel room with the peephole, young Norman 
decides something has to be done -- and fast.
        Hey there, Norm, you can't solve all of life's problems with 
sharp knives. There are also machine guns and hand grenades to 
think about.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Billy Bathgate (1991)
        Dustin Hoffman is undoubtedly one of the best actors of the 
past thirty years, but even the best stars appear in mediocre films at 
times. I'd compare Hoffman's role in this movie to Al Pacino in CITY 
HALL. His performance is decent even though he's relegated to a 
supporting role and the movie is mostly boring. Another similarity 
between the two films is that both focus on a young man who looks up 
to the veteran actor as an idol. Pacino was the mayor that the deputy 
mayor (John Cusack) looked up to in CITY HALL and Hoffman is the 
mob lord that Billy Bathgate (Loren Dean) idolizes.
        Bathgate realizes that, in Great Depression America, his only 
real chance for monetary success is in the organized crime game, 
which he enters after Dutch Schultz (Hoffman) notices him juggling 
four balls at once (and, yes, he is fully clothed at the time). Suddenly 
he's able to give out dollar bills to his friends and family, with the 
admonition to, "Go out and buy yourself something nice." BILLY 
BATHGATE is about as cliche-ridden as a movie in this genre can be. I 
was waiting for the phrase "dirty copper" to come into play somewhere 
along the line.
        The plot has Schultz distracted by his upcoming court trial for 
tax evasion. Bathgate has to look after the mobster's girlfriend (Nicole 
Kidman) in the meantime. Kidman plays a married woman who is just 
coming out of an affair with a double-crossing mobster (Bruce Willis) 
who's now making love to the ocean floor. Bathgate becomes her third 
extramarital conquest, after he teaches her the secret of juggling balls. 
This time, that does have a sexual connotation. To put it another way, 
it's Prohibition but he's slipping her a longneck anyway.
        BILLY BATHGATE was a box office bomb for a reason. It's 
just not a good movie. Besides being poorly paced and thinly plotted, 
the ending still doesn't resolve much. You're almost as surprised to see 
the credits roll as you are relieved that the movie's over. Even big stars 
make mistakes sometimes. It's just too bad these three didn't learn 
their lesson after BILLY BATHGATE. Hoffman went on to do the 
bland HERO, Kidman starred in the boring Irish epic FAR AND 
AWAY and Willis, well, does the name HUDSON HAWK ring a 
bell?
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Shadows and Fog (1992)
        Woody Allen is the man. We all know that. But he's not 
the man in SHADOWS AND FOG, which is probably overall the 
worst film he's ever made. Not that it isn't worth watching or doesn't 
have its moments, because it does. Allen has done a terrific job here 
of creating the visual style of the great black-and-white crime 
movies of the past, where a town would take on a different identity 
in the dead of night after all the responsible people went to bed, 
changing into a frightening, claustrophobic place you don't want 
to encounter alone.
        The citizens now have a personification for the 
metaphorical fears of loneliness and the dark -- a strangler on 
the loose. It's the whole Jack the Ripper thing without the English 
accents. Set in the 1920's, SHADOWS AND FOG opens with a 
silhouette of the strangler doing his work on the latest victim and 
cuts to Allen's house, where an angry mob ready to take justice 
into their own hands demands that he join them in hunting down 
the killer. Allen, of course, doesn't want to go, counting himself 
one of the responsible people who should be sleeping at such a 
late hour.
        But he does put his clothes on and step out into the street, 
making his way to the doctor's office. Donald Pleasance makes a 
great three-minute contribution to the movie as someone who is 
constantly around cadavers and is fascinated with death, a journey 
he makes a few minutes later as he becomes the strangler's next 
victim. Funny how the guy could survive five HALLOWEEN 
movies with Michael Myers but along comes one lousy strangler 
and -- POW! -- lights out.
        Speaking of people who make great three-minute 
contributions (and I'm not talking about Woody's sex life here), 
the big draw of SHADOWS AND FOG is its incredible all-star cast. 
Mia Farrow and John Malkovich play lovers who are in town with 
the circus. Farrow storms out into the night upon walking in on 
Malkovich and Madonna doing a nude vogue and is offered free 
board by hooker Lily Tomlin at the local whorehouse. Farrow 
accepts, of course. It's nothing new to her. She's been living with 
Woody for ten years.
        The movie turns into STEEL MAGNOLIAS for five minutes 
as Mia and the girls chat about life and love to a constantly rotating 
camera, the highlight of the conversation being when one of the 
prostitutes asks her what she does at the circus and Mia says she's 
a sword swallower. The hooker replies, "No kidding. That's my 
specialty too." This brothel includes den mother Kathy Bates and 
her #1 whore Jodie Foster, along with a young customer (John 
Cusack) who wants something that isn't on the menu -- Mia. The 
price for a helping of Farrow, we learn, is $700, which Cusack is 
more than willing to pay.
        Mia eventually ends up wandering the streets with Woody 
for an hour, while a couple minor subplots develop. In the end, the 
strangler situation isn't even resolved. Woody padded the movie 
(which is still only 86 minutes long) with a bunch of needless 
comedic and dramatic scenes but didn't think to write an ending for 
the central plot. The visual world he created is great, as are the 
many stars, but in the end, there's no substance and very few laughs. 
It's like wax fruit. It looks great and you think you're getting the real 
thing until you actually take a bite out of it. Once again, I'm not 
talking about Woody's sex life...
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Clockers (1995)
        Spike Lee strikes again, with another story of trouble in the 
hood. CLOCKERS shows us the influence older people have on young 
people and why innocent people sometimes take the rap for people 
they love. In this case, responsible brother Victor confesses to a 
murder his brother, Strike (don't ask about the name--my guess is his 
parents were big fans of either bowling or baseball), actually 
committed. It's a long story (about two hours and ten minutes worth), 
but Strike was following orders from his boss Rodney, who got 
absolutely no respect from the victim.
        Strike is a clocker. No, he doesn't manufacture timepieces, he 
does something infinitely more illegal, selling crack. (It's a shame 
people throw their lives away raising money for their crack addiction 
when they can get it free by watching "NYPD Blue." One of life's 
better-kept secrets, I guess.) Strike isn't just protected by his brother, 
he also has an older cop named Andre looking out for him. 
Apparently, the two of them were once good friends, until the 
dangerously lethal world of drug dealing lured Strike into its 
menacing claws, as revealed by this line of dialogue--while Strike is 
riding in Andre's cop car, handcuffed:
        STRIKE: These cuffs is tight.
        ANDRE: You and me used to be tight.
        Yes, it sounds every bit as corny in the movie as it does on 
paper, but I can forgive the occasional lapse in good drama the same 
way I can forgive the speech every character eventually gives, from 
clockers Strike and Rodney to cops Andre and Harvey Keitel, who 
plays the homicide detective convinced Victor is covering up for his 
brother. Keitel and John Turturro, who is mostly kept in the 
background as Keitel's partner, are the token white guys in the movie.
        Making matters worse, Strike takes a liking to a child named 
Tyrone, who looks up to the drug dealer as a hero. Strike casually 
shows Tyrone how to handle a gun and cut cocaine properly, 
remembering of course to tell Tyrone not to do those things himself 
because drugs and violence are bad. Needless to say, the hasty 
disclaimers contradicting the long monologues that precede them are 
ineffective, and soon Tyrone is imitating his older friend, with tragic 
results. The message is that, if little kids see grownups doing 
something that looks cool, they'll emulate it, no matter how many 
times adults half-heartedly tell them it's not good for them. I can 
honestly say that's the reason I started eating tubs of cake frosting at 
such an early age.
        CLOCKERS is a compelling, dramatic story from a talented 
man who seems to reinvent his directorial style with each new movie. 
(The only thing all Spike Lee movies have in common is overuse of 
the F-word... "fiddy.") This time, visually, it looks like a cross between 
MTV and "Cops." Thematically, the message of CLOCKERS is as 
important as any other Lee movie, and he once again paints a picture 
of a world where cops can give young black men body cavity searches 
in daytime at the park. I think I've seen this portrayal somewhere 
before, perhaps in an adult movie I saw at midnight in a hotel room. 
That's a different story...
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Hudsucker Proxy, The (1994)
     I've never reprinted reader mail in a review before, but there's 
a first time for everything. A guy by the name of Brad Nash from the 
University of Michigan once e-mailed me with the comment, "I was 
just wondering why you have so blatantly chosen to ignore the films of 
the Coen brothers, i.e. BARTON FINK, THE HUDSUCKER PROXY, 
MILLER'S CROSSING and especially BLOOD SIMPLE. All great 
movies."
     Well, I didn't want to say this before, but yes, I have blatantly 
chosen to ignore the movies of Ethan and Joel Coen. It's all a 
conspiracy, you see, started by a Coen-hater who paid me an 
undisclosed sum not to review the above four movies, because it's 
obvious every time I review a movie, thousands of people instantly run 
out and watch it. By not reviewing these movies, I am ensuring the 
failure of the Coen brothers in Hollywood. And I would have gotten 
away with it too if it wasn't for that meddling Brad.
     Actually, I was blissfully ignorant of this issue until Brad's 
comment. I had no intention of excluding the Coen brothers from my 
little orgy of hilarity. And I've seen BARTON FINK, it was just a year 
or two before I started doing movie reviews. My feeble memory was 
too hazy on that particular film to construct a review. I do know I liked 
it, if that's any consolation. I was going to watch THE HUDSUCKER 
PROXY on Cinemax last summer, but it was bumped at the last minute 
for the premiere showing of the adult movie parody of FORREST 
GUMP, entitled TORRID HUMP. ("Life is like a woman's naked 
chest. You can have everything you want if you'll just take hold of it.") 
I'd go see MILLER'S CROSSING, but I have about twelve other 
gangster movies from the early 90's to get to first. BLOOD SIMPLE 
I've never even heard of.
     So there's your answer, Mr. Nash, for God and the rest of the 
world to see. And I think you should know it's because of you I rented 
THE HUDSUCKER PROXY (a strange title probably thought up by the 
same guy who gave the band Toad the Wet Sprocket their name). 
Unfortunately, I took up so much space replying to that comment I 
now have to do a condensed review.
     The movie's set in 1958, with Tim Robbins working in the 
mailroom of the Hudsucker corporation with plans to move up in life, 
through the aid of an idea he's drawn up--a circle ("You know, for 
kids"). He does move up, straight to the office of president, after the 
current president jumps to his death and the board members (headed 
by Paul Newman) decide to put an imbecile in his place to deplete 
value of company stock so they can buy it cheap. If they'd waited about 
30 years, they could have hired Dan Quayle for the job, but Robbins 
was the best they could do on short notice.
     At first, the plan works, and one reporter (Jennifer Jason-
Leigh) writes scathing newspaper articles about Robbins' inefficiency 
while masquerading as his secretary. But everything changes (nothing 
looks the same through the eyes of love) when Robbins' circular 
invention--which the board members feel sure to fail--becomes the 
hottest fad item in the country. That invention's name? The hula hoop. 
Geez, now I sound like Casey Kasem. And now we're up to our request 
and dedication. It comes to us from a woman in Sioux Falls, Iowa, 
who writes, "Dear Casey, my infant child died, my husband left me, I 
got laid off, my parents refuse to speak to me and I'm being evicted 
from my apartment next week. So could you please play 'The Future's 
So Bright I Gotta Wear Shades'?"
     That's the peak of a good movie that falls from grace toward 
the end, when silliness dominates and all shreds of believability are 
removed. Still, THE HUDSUCKER PROXY is a stylish and mostly 
entertaining movie. Leigh is especially fun to watch, her role as an 
acid-tongued, independent yet lonely woman seemingly lifted from 
various movies of the 50's.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America for over 1/50th of a century!

Title
Review for Judgment Night (1993)
        This is one of those movies that's not all good, all bad or 
all mediocre, it just trades off between the three. There are parts in 
JUDGMENT NIGHT that achieve real tension, real action and real 
dialogue, almost equally matched by the scenes that don't. I don't 
know if there's another movie I've reviewed that I have on tape, have 
watched multiple times and love the cast of but still don't really like. 
Maybe JOHNNY DANGEROUSLY and AIRPLANE 2: THE SEQUEL, 
but those are comedies.
        JUDGEMENT NIGHT is an action flick built around the 
mistrust between economic classes and the common fear of being 
surrounded by people but still being completely without help. It also 
features another common fear -- Emilio Estevez. If you've read some 
of my other reviews, you know I never considered him one of the best 
of the '80s, which prompted one person to e-mail me with the 
question, "Do you have a problem with Emilio Estevez, or just his 
films?"
        No, I don't have a problem with him, although from the way 
he's disappeared from the movie scene, Hollywood seems to. He's not a 
terrific actor but he's likeable, even if he did usually pick weak scripts. 
It's only in JUDGMENT NIGHT that he's called on to carry a movie 
almost entirely by himself and, I have to say, as an action hero, he's 
not. He kind of walks through the movie, and it's only by time that 
JUDGMENT NIGHT is now better viewed as an ensemble work rather 
than an Estevez vehicle.
        Estevez, as the ex-wild guy now domesticated, is the main 
character, but his three friends are much more interesting. There's 
Cuba Gooding Jr. who, as written, is just generic and ambiguous (and 
probably his only performance where race isn't mentioned at all), but 
his own charisma lights up the movie. Jeremy Piven is the unlikable 
friend, the superficial wheeler-dealer who thinks he can get what he 
wants, and Stephen Dorff plays Estevez's younger brother with 
impulsivity control problems. None of the characters are terribly 
original, but in all four cases, the actors provide the appeal.
        This goes double for the movie's villain, played by Denis 
Leary. In other hands, the character would have been a run-of-the-mill 
action movie villain. Here, it's a run-of-the-mill action movie villain 
played by Denis Leary, which means a lot of sarcastic rants. He comes 
off as a disgruntled, gun-wielding stand-up comic and, although it 
makes him and his gang bangers (including the House of Pain guy) 
seem much less threatening, it makes the movie that much more 
watchable. This is why, and Hollywood executives should take note of 
this, Leary is always better as the likeable heavy than as the unlikeable 
protagonist. That's one of the reasons TWO IF BY SEA sucked so hard.
        The premise is a simple one -- the four friends are soft, 
middle-class twentysomethings who head into the city for a boxing 
match and end up in a horrible neighborhood, watching Leary pop 
Michael de Lorenzo. Leary chases them for the next 80 minutes or so, 
through four long set pieces. First is the railyard, followed by the 
housing project, the sewer system and the empty department store. 
All of this is fairly routine and predictable, and that's why I almost 
hate this movie, but every time you're reading to hit the fast forward 
button, one of these actors will do something to remind you they're the 
ones getting the big bucks. That's why I almost like this movie.
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving The World For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Mission: Impossible (1996)
        Your mission, should you choose to accept it, is to spend 
nearly two hours of your life on the umpteenth TV-show remake of 
the past few years, featuring over-the-top dramatic acting, an intrusive 
musical score, a slow and incoherent plot, generic espionage retreads 
and few-and-far-between action sequences that pale in comparison 
with more recent, better movies. I accepted the mission but found it 
impossible to enjoy.
        Tom Cruise makes his foray into action films in MISSION: 
IMPOSSIBLE, a foray he shouldn't have made. He plays Ethan Hunt, 
a spy for IMF (Impossible Missions Force, not I'm an MF), who is 
disavowed from the organization toward the beginning of the film, 
after his team of agents (including Emilio Estevez) is killed in action. 
You'll soon wish Cruise went down with his ship, though, because 
what follows the opening action sequences is over half-an-hour of 
bad drama, most of which involves Cruise coming across French spy 
Claire, played by Emmanuelle Beart. She may be famous in France but 
not America. And MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE won't be the crossover 
vehicle to do it because, even though she's stunningly beautiful, 
she can't act to save her anorexic life.
        Cruise adds her to his new team, which also includes 
Marsellus Wallace and The Professional (Ving Rhames and Jean 
Reno), for his independent mission of rescuing a computerized list 
containing the names of all the major secret agents of the world. (I'll 
trade you a James Bond rookie card for two Hunts and a Professional.) 
There's more to the plot, of course, but to tell you the truth, I didn't 
know what the hell was going on half the time. MISSION: 
IMPOSSIBLE is apparently too plot-driven to stop and explain 
the plot. And no, I won't stop to explain that last sentence.
        MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE is a failure as far as action films go. 
The most successful ones in the past few years (the DIE HARD and 
LETHAL WEAPON trilogies, for starters) have had a sense of humor 
about the fact that the stunts are so far-fetched, but MISSION: 
IMPOSSIBLE begs to be taken seriously. There is no comic relief 
to the film at all except scenes that play in an inadvertently funny 
way because they're so serious.
        Emmanuelle can't act and Cruise shouts most of his lines 
("THEY'RE ALL DEAD!") while Danny Elfman's thundering score 
brings back memories of the worst melodramas of the 40's and 50's, 
movies in which the orchestras almost drowned out the dialogue. 
So I guess it's a good thing Cruise yells all the time. And Elfman, I 
love you man, your music is great, but it's best left with grandiose, 
Gothic films like BATMAN and EDWARD SCISSORHANDS. To 
Elfman's credit, though, without his score, the only thing left 
would be the eight reprises of the overplayed "Mission: 
Impossible" theme. Might as well have thrown Mancini's "Peter 
Gunn" theme in there too. I don't think I've heard that enough 
million times in movies.
        Ultimately, it boils down to the fact that we've seen all this 
before. The only two action scenes (out of five) of any interest are 
ones that seem like they were outtakes from other movies. The scene 
in which Cruise and Reno break into an office using state-of-the-art 
technology was exciting, yes, but it might as well have been Robert 
Redford and the whole SNEAKERS crew. And the overly far-fetched 
climax on a train might as well have come from a James Bond 
movie... or any of the others from Indiana Jones to UNDER SEIGE 2 
to feature people climbing on moving trains. If you're remaking a TV 
show, you've already got one foot in the originality grave, but when 
you steal action sequences too, your movie ends up six feet under.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Langoliers, The (1995) (TV)
     For a horror movie, CARRIE sure isn't very scary.  Hey, that
rhymes!  It seems more like a drama to me than a horror film.  And that
Sissy Space k is really weird looking.  Are we really supposed to
believe that a seventeen-year-old girl with fully developed breasts
would just now be getting her first period?  Hey, I was in sex
education class.  Stephen King can't fool me!
     But King does have an incredible imagination, as we find out in
the scene at the prom, when the movie turns exciting for about ten
minutes.  Once she gets that bucket of pig's blood dropped on her
head, you can just say good-bye to John Travolta and his cute little
girlfriend!
     One of the myriad Stephen King-based movies in the "C" category
(CHRISTINE, CHILDREN OF THE CORN, CARRIE, CREEPSHOW 1 and 2, CUJO,
etc.), CAT'S EYE consists of three unrelated vignettes linked together
by a tabby cat out to save an innocent Drew Barrymore, who tells the
cat at the beginning of the movie that she's in trouble.  I'll say,
she's a slut and a drug addict.
     The cat sets off on its journey while we watch the first vignette,
with James Woods as a troubled smoker who goes to "Quitter's Inc.,"
from a story in King's NIGHT SHIFT collection, which is presently
gathering dust in my garage.  Quitters Inc. is an organization for
smokers who want to quit the habit, headed up by aging comedian Alan
King.  Their methods are unconventional, to say the least--a relapse
calls for the electrocution of a close family member (the same reason I
gave up Nutri-System).  One of the movie's funniest moments comes when
the cat is subjected to a mild voltage dose as a demonstration.  So
I'm a sick guy, okay?  Rest assured no cats were electrocuted in the
making of this movie.
     Segment 2 features Robert "Airplane" Hays as a tennis pro
involved with a mobster's wife.  The mob guy captures him and offers
him a wager he can't refuse--his life, $20,000 and the mobster's
wife--if Hays walks around "The Ledge" of his penthouse.  This one's
also from the NIGHT SHIFT collection (still gathering dust in my
garage).
     The cat finally reaches Barrymore by the final segment, where
she is being terrorized every night by a six-inch troll (no sick jokes,
please).  A fairly original piece (not found in the NIGHT SHIFT
collection--Have I mentioned the dust in my garage?), but as always,
the parents are the disbelieving stereotypes who blame the troll's
damage on the cat.
     If ever you see this movie listed in the TV guide, at least
watch the first segment ("Quitter's Inc."), which is extremely amusing
and doesn't contain the usual Stephen King weirdness.  The rest of
Cat's Eye is relatively weird less, but is also bland compared to
"Quitter's Inc." This movie is in the middle, quality-wise of King's
other vignette compilation movies, not as good as CREEPSHOW, but
better than CREEPSHOW 2.
     You'd think between horror novel great Stephen "Carrie" King and
horror movie great John "Halloween" Carpenter, that they could come u p
with a good horror movie, but this sure isn't it.  The only thing this
movie's got that's even remotely interesting is the indestructible car,
but we don't get very much car-killing action.  Instead, we see
thirty-year-old actors portraying teenagers with one thing on their
minds--something they spend a lot of the movie talking about
explicitly.  I can't imagine much of this movie would remain in the
censored TV version.
     Christine's a car with a past.  Several people in the past
twenty years have died in or around the car.  This doesn't stop Arnie,
a hopeless nerd at the beginning of the movie, from buying it from the
same old fart that would scare Macaulay Culkin half to death seven
years later in HOME ALONE.  After a little body work, Christine is as
good as new.  In fact, she's an immortal car.  We never learn why
Christine is alive ... and indestructible, but do you remember that TV
show from the 60's, "My Mother the Car"?
     Despite Christine's imminent compaction at the end of the
movie, the door is left open for a sequel.  Thank God they never made
one!
     What the heck?  An entertaining Stephen King movie?!  Can it be?
Why, yes it can.  In CREEPSHOW, King takes a new approach to horror...
demented comedy.  Along with Director George Romero's (a household
name, right?) weird comic book-style approach, CREEPSHOW could only
have sprung out of the twisted mind of Stephen King.
     CREEPSHOW contains five unrelated vignettes.  The first, and
weakest, is an incoherent piece about a dead guy who comes back on
Father's Day and keeps asking everyone "Where's my cake?"  See what I
mean?  The movie picks up from there, with King himself starring in the
story of a redneck farmer who stumbles upon a meteor that contains
concentrated MiracleGro, and soon everything he owns--including
himself--sprouts foliage.  The third chapter stars Leslie Nielson as
the demented husband of Ted Danson's mistress, who buries his wife and
Danson in the sand to be carried away with the tide.  Part IV concerns
a giant crate that contains ????.  And the final vignette follows
the saga of a millionaire who hates bugs.  As you can guess, he soon
finds him self fending off an onslaught of roaches.
     So let me tell you, this movie's a good blend of comedy and
horror.  But let me also caution you that Stephen King's writing
pleases millions, but his acting pleases few.
     Another Stephen King journey into the world of the macabre and
mediocre.  I thought the original CREEPSHOW was entertaining and
original, but this one just ain't happenin'. "We've just received word,
there are some bad horror movies going around the theaters.  As always,
we advise you to stay away from these movies, but it's your trip."
     The first CREEPSHOW had five segments, three of which were
unpredictable and fun to watch.  This one has three segments, plus an
ongoing animated sequence featuring Billy, the avid "Creepshow" comic
book reader.  The word "sucks" doesn't even begin to apply.
     The only truly interesting piece is the first, "Old Chief
Woodenhead," with George Kennedy of the "Naked Gun" series as a kind old
store owner who is robbed and murdered by a young Native American gone
astray.  Chief Woodenhead, the wooden statue outside the store, takes
on a life of his own to exact revenge on the backslidding redskin and
his accomplices.  Good, but too drawn out.
     The second episode, "The Raft" (from the SKELETON CREW
collection), has four young pot-smoking co-eds sailing the lake on an
abandoned raft.  Wherever they sail, they are followed by a giant oil
slick that eats them one by one.  I don't make this stuff up, I only
summarize it.
     Finally, "The Hitchhiker" episode shows us an adulterous woman
who hit-and-run's a hitchhiker, who gosh darn it, just won't die.  He
keeps coming back to haunt her.  Making this and the other two stories
as half-hour TV episodes and leaving out all the cartoon junk with
Billy would have been a whole lot better.
     Exactly how many Stephen King novels have they made into a
movie?!  I'm sure you could count them all on two hands--if they each
had thirty fingers!  This one, however, ranks in the top ten, being
slightly better than CHRISTINE and GRAVEYARD SHIFT, due to its use of
a huge, hulking St. Bernard that attacks a mother and child.  But for
the first forty-five minutes, we get the horror of the average family
with their not-so-average problems.
     The kid's afraid of monsters under the bed and in the closet, the
mom's guilty about her affair with the "local stud," and the dad's in
major trouble because his ad campaign for a popular cereal occurred at
the same time the cereal sent hundreds of innocent people to the
hospital.  As all this is happening, Cujo the dog is growing more and
more vicious.  For some reason we never learn, the family's problems
turn the dog into a raving, maniacal hound from Hell, but since it's a
Stephen King movie, we just take it for granted that something
supernatural or telepathic is going on.
     Cujo had the potential to go beyond the somewhat insulting
two-and-a-half star rating, but the entire last half of the movie is
just the mom and kid trapped in a broken car miles from nowhere as Cujo
lurks menacingly outside.  While in real life, watching two people
trapped in a car while being attacked by a huge dog would be
entertaining, in a movie it's kind of boring.
     I know Stephen King sued the makers of THE LAWNMOWER MAN because
they took one of his short stories and turned it into a truly awful
movie and, after watching GRAVEYARD SHIFT, I wonder why he didn't take
the producer and director of this movie to court as well.  It's a
terrible movie about a small town textile factory overrun by rats .
Several workers of the graveyard shift have already been murdered in
freak "accidents" arranged by the head rat.  The head rat is some sort
of mutant that has grown from a few inches to seven feet tall.  As a
group of workers embark on a mission to clean out the factory's
basement, they find themselves being picked off one by one by this huge
mutant rat from the sewers.  It came from raw sewage!  As a matter of
fact, so did this movie.
     My personal favorite from the Stephen King cinema collection, a
made- for-TV effort that, even though it's over three hours long, never
bores you for a second. (Well, maybe during the last half of the
closing credits, but that's not important.)
     The small town of Derry, Maine experiences some strange goings-on
(killings, maimings, the usual King stuff) every thirty years like
clockwork (You could set your calendar by it.), but the only people who
realize it are seven kids, "The Losers' Club" (and, yes, I have been
formally invited to join), who in 1960 all receive hallucinogenic
visits from Pennywise the Evil Clown (played by Bill Clinton--excuse
me--Tim Curry), who personifies the supernatural force behind the
deaths.  The kids band together to destroy It in the sewer and
succeed, promising to return to Derry if It ever does.
     Guess what, It does thirty years later (like clockwork--you could
have set your calendar by it) and faithful resident Tim Reid (Venus
Flytrap from "WKRP in Cincinnati") calls up the other six, including
Harry Anderson (Judge Stone from "Night Court") and John Ritter (Jack
from "Three's Company").  Are made-for-TV horror movies the last stop
for aging sitcom stars or what?
     The first half of IT tells the story of the seven kids through
flashbacks, as their adult counterparts get the phone calls and
remember the traumas of the past.  The second half has the adults
returning to Derry to relive the evil of the past and fight It again.
As Harry Anderson says, "You can forget calling me up when I'm seventy
to fight this thing."
     It has none of the gore of the typical King movie, but it's
just as frightening--if not more so.  Maybe because the three-hour
running time allows plenty of chances for us to get to know and care
about the characters.  Can't we all identify with the loser-type who
is rejected and stalked by his peers and finds his deepest and darkest
fears coming true?  Well, I can, okay?!
     The latest of the Stephen King stories-turned-movies-of-the-week,
this one a straight adaptation of the 250-page novella from FOUR PAST
MIDNIGHT.  See, I read the story, I know what I'm talking about.  And,
given the circumstances (a four-hour TV mini-series), The Langoliers is
the best movie it could have possibly been.  A two-and-a-half star
rating for a low-budget TV-movie is comparable to a three-and-a-half
star rating for a big-name theatrical Hollywood blockbuster.  Many of
the Stephen King novels have been drastically altered the page to the
screen, and many suffer in the process, but rest assured THE LANGOLIERS
doesn't stray at all.  You could almost read along while watching the
movie.
     About thirty minutes into a plane flight, ten passengers awaken to
find everyone else has disappeared, including the pilot and co-pilot.
All that's left of the vanished passengers are watches, dental
fillings, surgical pins, etc.  Luckily, the main character just
happens to be a pilot, so he and the other nine continue their course
across the country, noticing the complete absence of life and power
below them.  I won't get into the detailed plot summary this time, but
the explanation for everyone's disappearance is the old
rip-in-the-fabric-of-time science-fiction premise.  It sounds trite,
but THE LANGOLIERS manages to stay original and cliche-free for three
hours, without ever succumbing to boredom.
     Stephen King tried his hand at acting in CREEPSHOW, with
disastrous results.  That's nothing compared to his title of
screenwriter and director of this turkey.  He says he set out
deliberately to make a stupid horror movie.  Hey, there's nothing I
like more than mindless violence (unless it's mindless sex), but you
need a sense of humor about it.  King plunges into this movie with a
completely serious approach, a tragedy in dialogue and acting.
     I read the short story this movie is based on, "Trucks" from
the NIGHT SHIF collection (still gathering dust in my garage) and
liked it.  I thought no way the movie could be as stupid as everyone
said--then I saw the movie.  Sometimes everyone is right.  No Stephen
King story has the embarrassing cliches of dialogue contained in
MAXIMUM OVERDRIVE.  It would be more suited to a poorly dubbed 50's
monster movie, or a parody thereof.
     Surprisingly enough, the premise is original and interesting:
Machines suddenly have a mind of their own and rebel against their
human owners.  Too bad the typewriter Stephen King wrote the MAXIMUM
OVERDRIVE screenplay on didn't hurl itself out the window.  The movie
is centered around a truckstop, where several country bumpkins are
trapped inside by a group of big rigs patrolling outside.
     King has no excuse this time.  Other stories of his have been
butchered on the way from the page to the screen.  King may not have
had any control over that.  This time we wrote the screenplay and
directed--and it's the worst King movie ever made, even worse than
GRAVEYARD SHIFT.  I've said it before and I'll say it again--Stephen
King should stick to writing and leave t he movies to the
professionals.
     This Rob Reiner-directed film ranks among the best of the Stephen
King movie adaptations.  This one I have read the book on, and let me
tell you, the two are nothing alike.  It's as if two people were given
the same basic premise and were told to let their imaginations from
there, which is probably not that far off from what happened.
     The same basic premise--best-selling fiction writer Paul
Sheldon (James Caan) has a near-fatal accident during a blizzard and is
rescued by ex-nurse Annie Wilkes (Kathy Bates), who he finds out is
his "#1 fan." He also finds out she's not quite right mentally once she
reads his latest manuscript, which contains too many "dirty birdie"
cuss words, and forces him to burn the only copy.  She later reads his
latest book, the last in a series of romance novels featuring Misery
Chastain, who is killed off at the novel's conclusion.  It turns out
Annie loves fictional Misery almost as much as Paul hates the
character.  She demands he resurrect her.  Paul, bedridden and trapped
alone with the crazy woman, must literally (literarily) write for his
life.
     That's what the two have in common.  The differences are too
numerous to mention.  Most notably, we find out Annie is crazy and
violent around page 20 of the book, while this information doesn't
surface until the second half of the movie.  Still, I'd recommend the
movie over the book (but if you have the yearning to take in both, go
right ahead--don't let my petty recommendations stop your fun), for
Kathy Bates' absolutely fabulous (isn't that a TV show?) performance.
     And if you're in the market for parodies, check out Comedy
Central (home of "Absolutely Fabulous") for airings of the "Saturday
Night Live" episode with "Misery II," featuring Roseanna as Dana
Carvey's #1 fan, who can't believe he's killed off the Church Lady.
>From those nostalgic days when "Saturday Night Live" was actually
funny.
     The first made-for-TV Stephen King effort, which was originally
broadcast when I was one year old--and I probably would have liked it
better then.  Now it just seems boring ... and the video version has
almost an hour cut out from the original miniseries.
     David Soul of "Starsky and Hutch" fame (aren't you glad the
'SALEM'S LOT producers made sure to get a really big star for the lead
role?) plays a writer (It's always a writer in those Stephen King
stories) who goes back to his hometown, Jerusalem's Lot in Maine (it's
always Maine) to write a horror novel (it's always ... forget it), when
he stumbles upon some strange goings-on going on.  More specifically,
an old house and its strange owner.  Is that specific enough for you?
Fine, I'll just come right out and say it--The town is inhabited by
vampires.  Don't pay the money to rent this movie, because all you'll
find out is that everyone in this movie is a vampire.  Sorry, I don't
usually give away the plots of movies like that, but I just haven't
been the same since that freaky bat bit me on the neck.
THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION (1994) ***1/2
     It's hard to believe the same guy who wrote MAXIMUM OVERDRIVE and
GRAVEYARD SHIFT is also responsible for this dramatic, moving story of
an unjustly accused convict.  The author, of course, is venerable
horror novelist Stephen King (from the DIFFERENT SEASONS collection)
and, while it is by no means a horror story, it does contain several
elements of the macabre.  THE SHAWSHANK REDEMPTION is the best movie
based on a King story, though it's not my favorite (IT receives that
honor.  There is a difference between "favorite" and "best," but don't
ask me to explain it), and is very true to the original novella, which
I did read.  It's not gathering dust in my gar age like NIGHT SHIFT; I
checked it out of the library.  Yes, there are still such things as
libraries.
     The two-and-a-half hour running time allows for a significant
amount of details and characters to be added to the foundation of the
novella.  Andy Dufresne (Tim Robbins), a rich banker, is convicted of
murder (he's innocent, of course, but a series of unfortunate
coincidences incriminate him) and sent to Shawshank prison, where he is
tortured and raped (that makes two nominees for Best Picture in 1994
with anal rape scenes) by the "sisters" (no offense, Elton).
     He soon becomes friends with Morgan Freeman, the man who can "get
you things" and serves as the narrator from King's novella.  Andy also
becomes the warden's pet, as he is the only inmate who can offer
investment advice and money laundering expertise, and soon is doing
taxes for every guard in the prison.  All the while, there's a dark,
under lying tension, as Andy finds proof of his innocence in the form
of a young, uneducated inmate, and we find out how a man can become
"institutionalized" to the point where he can't survive on the
outside.
     Stephen King can write more than just horror.  Shawshank is an
intelligent human drama that plays on the emotions without ever
succumbing to sappiness (King is way above being sappy).  I proudly
give it my wholehearted endorsement.  Geez, you'd think this was a
letter of recommendation instead of a movie review.
     I've got this thing about horror movies--I usually don't like them
unless the words Friday and 13th are in the title.  Actually, this
one's not too bad.  Forget the fact that it's almost two-and-a-half
hours long, doesn't make any sense, and only two people die during the
whole movie.  So why do I like it?  I haven't really figured that part
out yet.  I think most of it has to do with Jack Nicholson's portrayal
of a writer gone insane.  Even without his nine-iron, Jack's still
really scary.  Of course, I've been scared by the Pillsbury dough boy
before, so don't take my word for it.
     This movie is based on a Stephen King novel, but for some odd
reason, the director removed all the parts that explain what's going
on, so the movie doesn't make a whole lot of sense to me.  But don't
take my word for it.  It was hard for me to follow the plot of ERNEST
GOES TO JAIL, too.
     Another fairly entertaining slasher movie based on a Stephen King
book.  This one's about a small town terrorized by a werewolf (I hear
it's based on a true story...) and the kid in a wheelchair who must
stop it.  And, as with many other horror movies, we see the "evil
preacher" stereotype as well as a whole lot of graphic violence.
     I tell you, only in the 80's would they have disembodied heads
fly through the air aimlessly.  But it's a pretty good movie, with no
sex or nudity, a plus to parents like mine who couldn't care less about
bloody heads but go nuts whenever anyone starts holding hands
on-screen.

Title
Review for Pallbearer, The (1996)
     Here's to you Mrs. Robinson... One of everybody's "Friends,"
David Schwimmer, stars in this dull retread of THE GRADUATE. He's
definitely no Dustin Hoffman, and he can't carry a movie either. The
supporting cast -- Gwenyth Paltrow, Barbara Hershey and the
always-underused Michael Rapaport -- do their best, but a ship with
Schwimmer as skipper will always sink whether the cargo is talented or
not. Add in some bad writing and direction that can't tell if it wants to
be bold or conventional and you're ready to bury THE PALLBEARER six feet
under. 
     Now that I've thoroughly trashed the movie, I'll recount the main
plot to you -- a young man has an affair first with a much-older woman,
then realizes it's a younger woman he wants to spend time with. The main
difference is that Paltrow isn't Hershey's daughter, not to mention that
Hershey is actually looking good, unlike Anne Bancroft in THE GRADUATE
(sorry, Mel). I know Hershey's had plastic surgery out the wazoo, but if
any twentyish guy was asked to "console" her in the manner she
suggests, I don't imagine he'd offer too many objections. 
     But even if it isn't a direct plot-lift from the 1967 Hoffman
classic, they steal enough from another film to be guilty of
double-plagiarism. Here's how the movie begins -- a group of old friends
get together over the death of a friend and then proceed to bond over a
period of several days. It's the Generation X version of THE BIG CHILL 
and again, there's only difference. This time, the dead guy isn't Kevin
Costner but some guy none of the friends can seem to remember. But
Hershey, the greiving mother, tells Schwimmer that as the best friend of
the departed, he should be the one to read the eulogy. 
     Can you see the situation comedy ramifications of such a thing?
Poor Ross doesn't even remember this guy and he has to deliver a
eulogy about him. He looks in his old yearbook and all he can find on the
dead guy is that he was in the chess club. So he's pretty much screwed,
and without any help from Monica, Chandler, Rachel, Joey and Phoebe.
I have to mention the other five "Friends" because Schwimmer is
completely annoying without any of them to counteract his whining. That
show has gone downhill too but looks like classic comedy next to this
dead comedy. 
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Over 750 detailed reviews with a comedic flair.

Title
Review for Long Kiss Goodnight, The (1996)
        THE LONG KISS GOODNIGHT plays like a two-hour 
comic book, with tongue-in-cheek dialogue, caricatures instead of 
characters and more violations of the laws of physics than the Big 
Bang theory... No, I don't want hate mail from scientifically-minded 
people out there, so if you didn't like that "Big Bang theory" 
reference, just change it to "creationism" and everyone will be 
happy.
        Davis plays a conservative school teacher in a small town. 
She's got a daughter and a decent boyfriend, but there's only one 
problem. She doesn't remember anything from her life before eight 
years ago. No childhood memories, no teenage memories, nothing 
prior to 1988. She's hired private detectives to dig up dirt on her 
past, but has so far discovered nothing. Until one night, when she 
hits a deer and runs off the road. She starts having weird dreams 
and finds her mood changing every once in awhile.
        That's when Samuel L. Jackson, the lowest-rent P.I. she 
hired, finds an old postcard with her handwriting on it, announcing 
her engagement. When Jackson is bringing this information over to 
Davis' house, someone else is already at her house, trying to kill her. 
She discovers she somehow knows how to fight, and kicks the guy's 
butt while her meek boyfriend watches.
        Davis and Jackson head off the next day to track down the 
address on the postcard, eventually finding out Davis used to be an 
assassin working for a secret government organization. She slowly 
regains her old personality as more and more people try to kill her 
and she continues to send them to their graves. The transformation 
is complete when she cuts most of her hair off and dyes the rest 
platinum blonde. Then she sings "Heart of Glass."
        The conspiracy to murder her, predictably, stems from the 
same organization that she used to work for. It also involves a bomb 
somehow and Davis' kid gets trapped in a tractor-trailer. Along the 
way, Davis and Jackson outrun fire, jump out a window and land in 
an icy pond, and survive explosions and electrocution. None of it is 
believable, particularly Davis as Tank Girl.
        THE LONG KISS GOODNIGHT at least has a sense of 
humor itself, Jackson's character in particular. Without Jackson, 
who is quintessentially cool no matter what movie he's in, this 
movie would have been damn near unbearable. This movie is only 
for those people who like cliched, cartoonish action movies that 
have no bearing whatsoever on the real world. There are good 
movies that fall into that category, but as far as this one goes, you 
can kiss it goodnight.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for Usual Suspects, The (1995)
        No matter what you suspect, this isn't your usual action 
thriller. THE USUAL SUSPECTS is an intelligent crime mystery story 
from up-and-coming director Bryan Singer. It's one of those movies 
that, after everything is revealed rapid-fire at the end, you immediately 
want to rewind and watch again because earlier scenes take on a new 
light. Plot twists a-go-go are what you get here -- I gave up trying to 
figure out the mystery of Keyser Soze after awhile and just sat back 
and waited for them to reveal it to me.
        Keyser Soze is a name you'll hear at least a hundred times if 
you watch THE USUAL SUSPECTS and for good reason. It's not only 
the name of the mysterious (and possibly even mythical) crime boss in 
the movie, it also sums up the movie -- "Keyser Soze" in Latin means 
"an intelligent crime mystery story from up-and-coming director 
Bryan Singer." Or maybe I shouldn't have bought a foreign-language 
dictionary from the same company that makes those 99-cent 
encyclopedias sold in supermarkets.
        At the movie's opening, a group of known criminals are 
brought in for a police lineup, including McManus (Stephen Baldwin), 
Keaton (Gabriel Byrne), Fenster (Benicio Del Toro), Buckney (Kevin 
Pollack) and Verbal (Kevin Spacey, winner of the Best Supporting 
Actor Academy Award{SYMBOL 153 \f "Times New Roman" \s 10 \h} for his performance in the movie). Verbal is 
so-named because he frequently rambles on about anything or nothing. 
He also earns his name as the movie's narrator, spouting memorable 
lines like "The greatest trick the devil ever pulled was convincing the 
world he didn't exist" (although, obviously, he does exist -- What else 
could explain Kris Kross having a comeback in 1996?) while being 
interrogated by police detective Chazz Palminteri (any actor with 
multiple Z's in their name is okay in my book).
        We see the story unfold as Spacey retells it. The five felons, 
upon being released from the lineup, get their revenge on the police by 
exposing a corrupt taxi service -- whereby elite criminals pay to be 
smuggled through town in cop cars -- and stealing all the money and 
drugs in the car. It's a definite case of male bonding for the five 
criminals, who later find out they were brought together by the unseen 
Keyser Soze, who sends a minion to them with an offer they can't 
refuse. Namely, they have to destroy Soze's main competitors in 
organized crime by infiltrating a ship, shooting a bunch of people, 
burning all the drugs and stealing $91 million cash.
        Spacey does a terrific job of bringing his seemingly 
unintelligent "cripple" character to life and Baldwin, Byrne, 
Palminteri and the rest make for a good supporting cast. THE USUAL 
SUSPECTS is one of those movies that deftly mixes scenes of violence 
and explosions with an underlying sense of mystery and suspense, 
keeping the viewer guessing until the very end -- and then still leaving 
a few details open for scrutiny and discussion. I suppose all that would 
be cleared up if I really had rewound the movie and watched it again 
instead of changing the channel and wondering in disbelief what the 
hell Kris Kross was doing on MTV. A different mystery, I guess, 
which may turn into a _murder_ mystery if that video ever comes on 
again...
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Drunks (1997)
        Made in 1995 but not released until 1997, DRUNKS is an 
ultra-low budget indie adaptation of a play. It comes from the BMG 
Independent film distribution company, which as far as I know, is the 
only film distribution company where you can make 11 movies for 
the price of one, with nothing more to buy ever. The lack of action, 
movement and anything else catering to short attention spans will 
most likely drive most viewers to drink, but the intense acting, from 
people you've actually heard of, no less, keeps DRUNKS interesting.
        DRUNKS is basically a 90-minute advertisement for 
Alcoholic's Anonymous, splitting its scenes between an ongoing 
AA meeting which turns into a series of monologues by its members, 
each trying to outdo the others for sheer dramatics, and the saga of 
Richard Lewis. The venerable "neurotic Jew" comic (whom I've 
always considered a eighth-rate Woody Allen -- all a matter of 
opinion, I guess) plays one of the recovering drunks, two years off 
the sauce, who finally gives in to his desires and ends up drinking 
bourbon, scotch and beer, and not just one like the song says.
        The meeting starts as planned, sure, with Lewis being 
prompted against his will to give an inspirational talk. He tells his 
life story -- heavy drinker by high school, met a woman, fell in love 
with her, she wouldn't marry him unless he went into rehab, he did, 
she died, now he's bitter and questioning everything -- then 
disappears from the meeting while the others start in with their 
stories. They try to milk suspense from the "Will Richard drink?" 
question, but it was obvious to me (and now to you, as I neatly give it 
away) that he would have to. Otherwise, where's your plot?
        The Lewis plot should be the most interesting half, but it 
isn't. All the scenes of him struggling with the bottle, trying to hook 
up with his old junkie girlfriend and wandering through the city 
streets drunk just didn't do it for me. What I enjoyed a lot more were 
the AA testimonials, which would have worked very well in play 
form. Screw Richard Lewis, I can just see that group of people 
trapped on one stage for an hour and a half, trading stories. The 
writer obviously spent plenty of time in this setting. That's the way 
to do it -- turn your alcohol problem into a halfway decent movie.
        I do have to admit, Lewis was good in his dramatic role. 
He did a lot better when he was actually giving his life story as part of 
the group than when he left it. I'm telling you, they should have just 
stuck with the drunks. People like Dianne Wiest, Faye Dunaway and 
indie queen Parker Posey do great here, along with others I didn't 
recognize. The unknowns were even more convincing than the 
established actors, and I'd pay them their dues if I didn't have to go 
back through the movie, write their character names down and wait 
for the credits. You know who you are and you know you're good. 
Too bad no one saw DRUNKS. It's just depressing enough to make 
you hit the bottle.
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving The World For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Bull Durham (1988)
        "Baseball is my religion," Susan Sarandon announces at the 
beginning of BULL DURHAM. And apparently, her form of 
communion is torrid sex with one minor league baseball player a year. 
The movie follows the minor league Durham Bulls (whoever named 
the movie was apparently cixelsyd... excuse me, dyslexic), more 
specifically, Sarandon's two prospects for the gigolo position. The first 
prospect is young Tim Robbins, the impulsive pitcher who "f*cks like 
he pitches." (At 95 miles an hour?) The other prospect is aging catcher 
Kevin Costner, who has been busted down to A-ball from the big 
leagues.
        Touch choice, eh? The elimination round comes as 
Sarandon invites them both back to her place -- and wouldn't 
_that_ be the threesome from hell! Costner storms out after learning what the arrangement is all about, leaving Sarandon to tie Robbins to 
her bed and read poetry to him all night. You see, it's not all sex, she 
also teaches her young charges the rules and secrets of life. They 
acquire the essential knowledge of life through wild, animal sex, 
which leads to the obvious question -- why don't the state 
universities offer this kind of program?!
        Costner is assigned by the team manager to do much the 
same thing with Robbins in a non-sexual way. So, over the course of 
the movie, Robbins hones his talent into major league-quality pitching 
with advice from Costner and Sarandon. According to BULL 
DURHAM, the way to succeed in baseball is to wear garter belts under 
your uniform and learn to breathe through your eyelids like the Mayan 
Indians. You didn't hear it from me, but that's also the key to 
succeeding in the movie-reviewing business.
        BULL DURHAM has an intriguing premise, mixing 
America's two favorite pastimes, and follows through with it for the 
first half of the movie, but gets off track around the five-inning mark, 
when Robbins gets on a winning streak and decided to quit slipping 
Sarandon the screwball every night, a duty we all know Costner will 
take up sooner or later. He does, of course, in a sex scene none of us 
ever wanted to see. Still, the film has its moments, comedic and 
dramatic, and is worth watching for its big-league talent. No 
rookies here, baby.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for L.A. Confidential (1997)
        As of today, October 6, 1997, L.A. CONFIDENTIAL is the 
best film I've seen in a theater this year. By far. I've gotten so used to 
formula hash like EXCESS BAGGAGE and SPEED 2 that when an 
intelligent, suspenseful, absorbing action drama like this comes along, 
I feel privileged. So often when I take the time and money to go to a 
theater, I lose IQ points on the drivel that is tossed at me. That's not to 
say there isn't highly entertaining drivel out there; it's just much better 
to see something original and unpredictable that makes you think but 
never bores you.
        L.A. CONFIDENTIAL, a noirish film adapted from the James 
Ellroy novel, is one of those movies it seems impossible not to like. 
>From its very opening, it sucks you in and never cuts corners. Set in 
the 1950s, L.A. CONFIDENTIAL paints a portrait of a corrupt police 
department (nice to know LAPD has been corrupt for _decades_, isn't 
it?) whose sense of brotherhood and greed overrides any real sense of 
justice, although all the lies and evidence planting are done in the 
name of justice. The police captain (James Cromwell) explains this to 
an ambitious sergeant (Guy Pearce) just before he is faced with the 
decision of whether to rat on some of his fellow officers.
        On Christmas Eve, a few Mexican immigrants are hauled into 
the station. Some officers, buzzing from the spiked eggnog, decide to 
whip the hell out of them. (This always occurs on the eleventh day of 
Christmas, by the way.) Pearce is the only objector and the only one 
willing to testify, the only officer in the entire precinct who wants to be 
an honest cop. Russell Crowe plays his polar opposite, an all-muscle-
and-no-brain cop who loves to administer brutal justice to wife beaters. 
Crowe turns down Cromwell's request to testify against his partner, 
who is to be used as the fall guy for the Yuletide Immigrant Bashing 
party.
        The partner gets suspended, then he gets killed. Bad day. 
Pearce gets to the scene of the crime first and is put on the 
investigation, while Crowe begins to orchestrate an extracurricular 
revenge investigation. Pearce arrests three black men who were seen in 
the area with the guns, but it's obvious the case doesn't end there (and, 
again, it's nice to know LAPD has framed black men for _decades_). 
It involves a few of the movie's colorful non-police characters.
        There's a millionaire (David Strathairn) who makes some of 
his profit pimping hookers who have been surgically altered to 
resemble Hollywood starlets. Kim Basinger plays the Veronica Lake 
look-alike (the Lake-alike, you might call her) whom Crowe falls for, 
and Danny DeVito takes his weasel persona to new heights as the 
publisher of Hush-Hush, a rag that prints lurid crime stories. DeVito 
is tipped off to these crime exclusives by one of the officers (Kevin 
Spacey).
        To reveal anything more would spoil some of the fun, since 
at least half of L.A. CONFIDENTIAL's appeal lies in the intricacies of 
the crime story. The direction, from Curtis Hanson (taking a break 
from his "MMMBop" world tour), is stylish and colorful, in grand '50s 
style, and the acting is wonderful from all sides. The people you know 
will be great -- Spacey, Basinger, DeVito -- are, but the movie belongs 
to the two complicated cops, played by Pearce and Russell. I loved 
everything about this movie.
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at:
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving the World for Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Lethal Weapon 4 (1998)
        I don't know if there's ever been any fourth installment of a 
movie series that's been truly worth watching (um, BATMAN AND 
ROBIN?), and from the beginning it's obvious that LETHAL WEAPON 4 
won't improve upon its predecessors. It's a disappointment, too, 
because the first three movies in the series were good, sometimes great 
action comedies. This one only reinforces the theory that two decent 
sequels is all anyone can hope for, which doesn't bode well for the DIE 
HARD 4 that will no doubt be forced upon us in the years to come.
        That's not to say LETHAL WEAPON 4 isn't fun at times. 
Watching cops Riggs (Mel Gibson) and Murtaugh (Danny Glover) in 
action again, even if they're starting to look a little old for this kind of 
movie, is like hanging out with old friends after a long absence. It's 
good to see them again, but things aren't the way they were.
        In essence, this movie is little more than a reunion of LETHAL 
WEAPON characters. There's the loudmouth accountant-turned-P.I. (Joe 
Pesci) and the sexy karate chick (Rene Russo, also well into her forties 
now), and the familiar Murtaugh family. The movie ends in a series of 
nostalgic photo album shots from this and earlier LETHAL WEAPON 
movies, so at least it knows the main thing going for it is the 
familiarity of moviegoers.
        About the only thing new in LETHAL WEAPON 4 is Chris Rock, 
as Chris Rock. He plays Butters, a detective secretly married to 
Murtaugh's daughter. A lot of the movie's comic relief scenes revolve 
around Butters kissing up to his unknowing father-in-law, who thinks 
he's coming on to him. So there's that inevitable sitcom standby, where 
one person's confession is completely misinterpreted by the other 
person, leaving a knowing audience to chuckle. It goes back to the "I 
Love Lucy" days, and is about as recycled as Pesci's "they f*ck you 
with the cell phone" speech.
        Some of it is funny, though. I forgave some of the reused 
elements just because I loved the characters, which I think was the 
filmmakers' aim. And the movie is still pretty good because the action 
is more or less original. The traditional Opening Scene That Has 
Nothing To Do With The Plot has a psycho with a flamethrower and a 
machine gun out on a city street, torching and shooting everything in 
sight. The difference with part four is that the two leads don't seem to 
take any of the unrealistic action seriously, which spoils any illusion of 
danger. The solution to the torch guy is to have Murtaugh undress and 
flap his arms like a chicken to distract the guy, which may actually be 
too silly for a Leslie Nielson movie.
        The rest of the plot isn't much more serious. There's the 
FATHER OF THE BRIDE II gimmick of dual pregnancies, this time with 
Murtaugh's daughter ("Pleasee let the father be black") and Russo, still 
shacked up with Gibson but without marriage on the mind. The morals 
of these action movie heroes, I tell you... The crime side of things 
involves some Chinese gangsters (headed by badass fighter Jet Li, 
whose maiden name was Ski) who are smuggling illegal aliens in at 
$35,000 a head and are printing up some counterfeit money to buy 
the criminal Four Fathers. Or something like that; forgive me for not 
having a press kit to explain all these convoluted plots to me.
        Rest assured any pause for dialogue is just a momentary lull 
of action. And since LETHAL WEAPON 4's strong suit is its action, it's a 
good thing there's plenty of it. Like I said, the characters don't take it 
seriously, so there's no chance we will. Everyone's a lot more glib here 
than in the other movies in the series, and that's usually not a good 
thing. Think of how smug everyone was in HUDSON HAWK and you can 
imagine how good a LETHAL WEAPON 5 would probably be.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for Bulworth (1998)
        I didn't care what this movie was about; as soon as I heard it 
featured 61-year-old Warren Beatty rapping, I knew I had to see it. 
Little did I know BULWORTH would be the best political satire of the 
decade and a key moment in Beatty's career. Yes, it's even better than 
DICK TRACY (yes, that's sarcasm) and it nails on the head some of 
America's biggest problems, besides the fact that it can produce a 
61-year-old white rapper. No one escapes Beatty's so-liberal-it's-
socialist attack, not the Democrats or Republicans, not the insurance 
companies or the media and not the minorities for which Beatty tries 
to speak.
        Beatty plays Jay Bulworth, a U.S. senator facing reelection. 
He takes payoffs and contributions from all the right people and 
ignores all the wrong ones, living the perfect politician's lie with his 
wife (Christine Baranski) and teenage daughter. Watching his latest 
shiny TV ads, he finally gets sick of it all and arranges to have himself 
killed, making sure to bargain with an insurance lobbyist to take out a 
$10 million policy on himself. Then he writes a 130-page mission 
statement and gets fired from the agency, and only Cuba Gooding Jr. 
will stay with him. I may have some of the plot confused at this point, 
but bear with me.
        At the next morning's campaign stop at a black church in Los 
Angeles, Bulworth scraps the scripted speech to field questions from 
the audience. Among other things, he tells them the Democratic party 
isn't loyal to black voters because they have no financial clout and that 
politicians just tell them what they want to hear. Bulworth's top 
advisor (Oliver Platt) pulls the fire alarm before he can stick any more 
feet in his mouth, and they're off to the next stop, where Bulworth 
further insults a group of Jewish filmmakers. It's an interesting 
campaign strategy, although not one that's worked for Buchanan or 
David Duke.
        It's in fleeing from the angry moguls that he acquires his new 
posse, a trio of African-American ladies spearheaded by Nina (Halle 
Berry). Bulworth spends that night hanging at an inner-city nightclub 
where he smokes blunts, dances until dawn, starts rapping casual 
conversations and eventually takes his turn at the twin turntables. It all 
prepares him for the fundraiser breakfast the next morning, where he 
once again scraps his scheduled speech, this time rapping out a new 
one that attacks politics and the power structure.
        The interesting thing is, after Platt and the other campaign 
people freak out, the public laps it all up like a contented kitty cat. 
And Bulworth doesn't want to die anymore, so he has to try to get the 
hit called off. This subplot is more convention than innovation, and 
distracts from the movie's real message. Fortunately, there's not much 
screentime devoted to the assassination plot; instead we see Bulworth 
in Nina's neighborhood, dealing with her large family and the local 
druglord (Don Cheadle, going from BOOGIE NIGHTS porn star to 
drug dealing gangsta).
        BULWORTH has a lot of hilarious moments, but there's a 
message, and it's not one a lot of people want to hear because it puts 
America in a pretty sad state of affairs. I saw this with about six other 
white people in a mid-Missouri outlet mall, and most of them didn't 
like it. As they were exiting and complaining, the theater manager 
actually apologized for the movie for making them think about more 
than the usual action-packed thrills and romance. Yet he shows 
GODZILLA with a clean conscience. More than anything, that sums up 
what is wrong with our country right now.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for Speed 2: Cruise Control (1997)
        I don't know if action movies have gotten worse in general 
or if I've just seen too many of them to appreciate the reworkings of 
the same cliches. SPEED 2 is an action sequel that pales completely 
in comparison to the original. This one is part POSEIDON 
ADVENTURE and part UNDER SEIGE. Very few parts are worth 
watching, due mainly to the fact that director Jan De Bont's creation 
reminds me less of the first SPEED and more of his follow-up 
TWISTER. There is no intelligence to the script -- no interesting 
characters, original plot and only a few clever lines of dialogue. 
And here, there are no tornadoes to cover that up.
        The action this time is centered around a cruise ship. 
Sandra Bullock, almost as annoying here as she was in TWO IF BY 
SEA, is on vacation with her boyfriend (Jason Patric). He's a hero 
cop who's always running off to save the world, as we learn in the 
movie's prologue. The first time we got Keanu Reeves and Jeff 
Daniels defusing a bomb; this time, it's a motorcycle chase with 
Patric's stunt double while Bullock flunks her driver's test. 
Disgruntled DMV employee Tim Conway plays the comic foil for 
the woman driver, in a case of DORF NEEDS A PAYCHECK.
        Anyway, back to the cruise -- everything goes normally for 
a few scenes as we meet the cast of one-note disaster characters. 
There's the deaf child in peril, the charasmatic black man, a few fat 
people, even a female singer (one of many POSEIDON ADENTURE 
flashbacks). And there's the oddball who brings not one but two 
laptop computers onboard. In the Information Age, that spells 
trouble. Yep, he's some kind of computer programmer / hacker, 
and also one of those mad bomber types.
        Played by a very miscast Willem Dafoe, the villain is 
motivated by no more than simple revenge. He designed the ship's 
computer system and they fired him when he turned crazy. Bad idea, 
because he's back and he's got a bathtub full of leeches. The leeches 
provide that "Boy, he's nuts!" moment that's a steady staple of these 
movies. Dafoe takes over the ship's controls and has the ship 
evacuated. All the passengers get off except for that core group of 
idiots who end up either cheating death or dying by the end of the 
film.
        Two of the remaining passengers are, of course, Patric and 
Bullock. In the extremely-long hour or so that follows, there are 
explosions, floods, a rescue from a falling lifeboat, a boat chase, a 
scene where Patric almost gets sucked into the ship's propeller, the 
ship almost crashes into an oil tanker, etc. etc. etc. There's even a 
POSEIDON moment where Patric is in rising flood waters with the 
charasmatic black man and has to dive down, holding his breath. 
Where's underwater swimming champion Shelley Winters when you 
need her? The only interesting sequence is when the cruise ship 
actually crashes through an island town and destroys everything in 
sight, like a scene from TWISTER. I kept looking for a flying cow, 
but never managed to see one. Again I ask, where's Shelley Winters 
when you need her? 
        The original SPEED, which was original and managed to 
mix thrilling action with good characters and dialogue, is a hard act 
to follow. It seems like De Bont didn't even try to make a good 
movie. He just figured if he used enough rapid cuts of the stock 
action sequences, the rest of the movie would write itself. People 
who have seen enough action movies know exactly what's coming. 
With SPEED, if the bus went under 50 miles an hour, it would blow. 
With SPEED 2, if your IQ is over 50, it will blow.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Slumber Party Massacre, The (1982)
        Not quite as good as THE TEXAS CHAINSAW MASSACRE 
but not quite as awful as SILENT NIGHT DEADLY NIGHT, 
SLUMBER PARTY MASSACRE is still toward the bottom of the 
barrel of slasher entertainment. It's the one with the driller killer, a 
guy who was convicted of killing five people and has just broken 
out of jail, on the same night some debs are planning a slumber 
party that will be "just like old times." It's going to be just like old 
times for the driller killer too, whose first victim is a pretty phone 
repairman, who gets it after turning down a couple shaggy-haired 
dorks.
        The shaggy-haired dorks figure prominently in the plot 
(if you can call it that) of SLUMBER PARTY MASSACRE as they 
peek in the window of the girls at their slumber party. These are 
the braless girls who change their shirts in the middle of the night 
with the shades up for no reason: Needless Boob Shot #2. The first 
one comes earlier in the movie, as the girls shower after gym class, 
after which the killer sticks around to claim his second victim with 
the drill again. After the fourth or fifth drilling, it gets way too 
tedious.
        Back at the slumber party, we get a couple really stupid 
scares when a man sneaks down the stairs, only to reveal himself 
as the next-door neighbor, checking in on the girls. This same guy 
lurks in the garage later as one of the girls comes out to make sure 
it's closed (just one of many hardly-believable contrivances to get 
people out of the house) and of course the girl doesn't even wonder 
why the overly-concerned neighbor is hiding in her garage. By the 
time the nosy neighbor becomes the third victim, we're more than 
ready for him to pull into that great garage in the sky.
        The movie progresses more slowly than most horror 
movies (despite only lasting 77 minutes), with supposed scares 
(the cat jumps out of the closet, etc.) and non-gory murders at all 
the usual places, while two sisters left home alone next door wonder 
why the lights have gone out in the next house and there are girls 
screaming. The people in this movie are far less intelligent than the 
usual slasher movie characters; one boy wears a shirt with the 
number ten emblazoned across his chest and you wonder why 
he'd advertise his I.Q. like that.
        I don't have to tell you to stay away from SLUMBER 
PARTY MASSACRE, a movie which induces slumber for most of 
its viewers. Although its writer and director were both women, the 
female characters are never anything more than giggling idiots who 
don't even think to take the drill away from the killer after knocking 
him down. The killer himself is a fool with no motivation to be 
hacking up a bunch of teenagers, his only dialogue coming at 
the end, when he starts telling the remaining victims, "I love 
you," over and over. But no one has ever said that about this 
movie.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for For Your Eyes Only (1981)
        This is probably the only Roger Moore-James Bond movie 
that effectively mixes action with substance. The next film, 
OCTOPUSSY, would try for the same effect but not quite succeed. 
Most of that comes courtesy of Bond's female sidekick, Melina, who 
looks like a pretty version of Alanis Morissette. She's out for revenge 
on the man who killed her parents, and packs a mean crossbow to 
accomplish it. She crosses paths with Bond, who is tracking the 
location of a transmitter.
        Bond meets two crime bosses, one of which has to be the 
killer's boss. It turns out to be the guy masquerading as an Olympic ice 
skater's sponsor. The skater, a pretty young thing, seems to be the first 
willing female Bond has ever turned down. There she is, lying naked 
on his bed as he walks in, but he won't take her up on her request 
because she's too young. (He's got standards so high he apparently 
won't date anyone who's age isn't in the double digits. Good for you, 
James!) He offers her an ice cream instead of his human popsicle.
        The Winter Olympics motif makes for some interesting 
chases. Not only is thre the obligatory ski chase and a fight on a 
hockey rink, but this time there's a chase on the bobsled run. At least 
they didn't throw in a luge run and some ice dancing. The climax has 
a little more class, as Bond and Melina (wielding her crossbow) 
converge on the villain's monastery hideout. Influenced by such a 
sacred place, Bond decides at the end of the movie that he's going to 
become a monk.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Apollo 13 (1995)
        This is a brilliant piece of filmmaking. The directorial style 
shown by Ron Howard comes a long way from the hooker/corpse 
comedy NIGHT SHIFT and deftly mixes new footage with old 
newsreel shots and computer-animated effects. And the performances 
from Tom Hanks, Kevin Bacon (in his best acting job since the 
original FIRDAY THE 13TH -- that's a joke, by the way), Gary Sinise, 
Ed Harris and the rest are great.
        So why's it only a three-star movie here? Well, it's in the 
same boat as QUIZ SHOW for me--a movie dramatization based on a 
true-life event from the distant past (distant meaning before I was 
born). It's good drama, but it has no personal meaning for me. I'm only 
17 years old. Now if it was based on an earth-shattering event from my 
lifetime, say the Gulf War or the tragic transition of "Saturday Night 
Live" from funny to godawful, I might be able to drum up some 
emotion. But for now, I see APOLLO 13 as a compelling yet flawed movie.
        For starters, the first thirty or more minutes of the film are 
way too boring and unnecessary. Do we really need to see the homelife 
of the astronauts and their three months of training and preparation 
for the Apollo 13 mission? No, just tell us they're astronauts and get 
to the actual flight. It's this early, expendable stuff I don't like. It's 
supposed to make us get to know and care for the characters, but what 
it does is make us get sick of them toward the end, when the movie's 
running long, and hope they'll get sucked into the vacuum of space so 
the movie will be over.
        If you're somehow ignorant of the movie's plot, Hanks, Bacon 
and some other guy are astronauts on a routine moon mission fraught 
with tragedy. (I think that was the first time in my life I ever used the 
word "fraught.") It's based on the actual week in 1969 when the nation 
held its breath for our Apollo 13 astronauts, stuck in space after a 
freak explosion screwed up their controls. The odds are infinitessimal 
that they'll make it back to earth alive, so each step of the journey is 
milked for all the suspense it can get. Then, when they finally do make 
it past that individual obstacle, a new obstacle arises to take it's place, 
obstacle after obstacle until the end of the movie.
        Forgive the skimpy plot summary, but everyone's already seen 
this movie. I, in fact, was the second-to-last person in America to see 
it. So if the other guy's out there, e-mail me and I'll send you a longer 
summary. Plus I'm writing this at two in the morning, which also 
explains the lapses in coherency from time to time. But don't allow my 
three paragraphs of criticism to keep you from seeing a good movie. 
I'm in a unique position as a movie reviewer who's too young to fully 
appreciate the historical context of some movies. Now, if they'd make 
that docudrama tracing the decline of "Saturday Night Live" I was 
talking about...

Title
Review for Edge, The (1997)
        Just as the men-lost-in-the-woods genre seemed to fizzle out, 
along comes THE EDGE, a fresh, clever film written by fresh, clever 
David Mamet. His screenplay combines elements of his action movies 
like Homicide with his dialogue-driven plays on film like GLENGARRY 
GLEN ROSS, not a combination I would have forseen as successful. 
A lot of what makes THE EDGE work lies in the performances of its 
two leads -- Anthony Hopkins and Alec Baldwin.
        Hopkins plays a billionaire who accompanies his model wife 
(model Elle Macpherson) and some others to the wilds of Alaska for 
an exotic photo shoot. Early on, two important details are cleverly 
established -- Hopkins has a super-human level of book smarts never 
put to practical use and Baldwin is jealous of Hopkins, in particular 
his choice of a spouse.
        The next day, Elle is decked out in Indian garb for a photo 
shoot that needs a male model. Baldwin, the photographer, is 
determined to find a man for this shoot and happens upon a portrait 
of a buff native. The owner points them in the direction of this guy 
and four of them take off in Hopkins' private plane to find him. The 
trip is not a success; the plane goes down and the pilot dies. The three 
who are left, Hopkins, Baldwin and his assistant (Harold Perrineau) 
are stranded in the middle of nowhere, with no chance of rescue in 
the foreseeable future.
        It all could have turned into SWISS FAMILY HOPKINS right 
about this point, but THE EDGE continues its level of brooding 
brilliance through all of Hopkins' chances to test out everything he's 
read. Mamet isn't subtle with foreshadowing, having Hopkins reading 
"Lost in the Woods" a few minutes before he steps on the plane and 
asking Baldwin, "How are you planning to kill me?" just before the 
plane goes down, but the movie is way above the expected plot twists.
        From the preview, I thought the whole movie would be 
Baldwin stalking Hopkins in the woods, but THE EDGE keeps us 
guessing about the Baldwin angle until the last half-hour or so. It's 
man vs. nature until then, with the three stranded men scavenging for 
survival and fighting the enormous "Bart the Bear," who should have 
been the fourth-billed star in the movie. On paper, all of this seems 
like cliche, but even the bear fights are tense and pulsing with 
intelligence.
        Hopkins is always good, but after seeing THE EDGE , it 
seems impossible that his character in THE EDGE could have been 
done justice by anyone else. Baldwin's character could have been 
played by a million other actors, yeah, but he does a good job here, 
and reminded me that he can be effective when he has the writing to 
back him up. In stuff like THE JUROR, he was at the mercy of his 
material, but in anything Mamet-related (GLENGARRY GLEN ROSS), 
he is terrific. And it's interesting casting him here as a man with a 
killer jealousy for someone else's wife; as Kim Basinger's husband, 
Baldwin has probably been called "lucky stiff" by a million beer-
swilling blue collar workers.
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Stripes (1981)
        The Army comedy genre has never turned out a truly 
good movie (if you don't count Neil Simon's BILOXI BLUES). 
Year after year, more predictably cliched military movies come 
out -- most recently SGT. BILKO -- and none of them ever manage 
to be anything more than a rehash of the last. I thought STRIPES 
would be different. With Ivan Reitman as director, Bill Murray as 
star and Harold Ramis as co-star and co-screenwriter, it seemed 
like it would be GHOSTBUSTERS in the Army. Instead, it was a 
bunch of unfunny crap in the Army.
        Murray, about as funny and sophisticated here as he 
was in MEATBALLS, plays a loser cab driver who sees the Army 
as his only chance for success, and convinces his friend Ramis to 
enlist with him. So he does, and we get the obligatory drill sergeant 
from hell, head-shaving and marching/singing sequences, more 
mind-numbingly stale here than ever. The characters are even less 
original, ranging from underachieving slob John Candy to 
incompetent captain John Larroquette.
        All the big name stars in STRIPES (and even Larroquette) 
fall victim to the lame, rehashed material and are never really 
likeable, Murray in particular. He only gets a few decent lines in, 
although those barely-funny one liners pale in comparison to the 
hilarious Peter Venkman character he played three years later in 
GHOSTBUSTERS. He was even better in CADDYSHACK, for 
crying out loud.
        As with a lot of the late 70's / early 80's comedies, STRIPES 
is a completely juvenile movie only a child would like but is so sex-
obsessed no child should be able to watch it. I'm sure it seems funny 
on paper to have Candy pay over $400 to mud wrestle five beautiful 
women, but while watching it all that was coming out of my mouth 
was the admonition "Dear God!" every few seconds.
        STRIPES isn't the playful kind of sex comedy, either. Most 
of the time it seems downright misogynistic, as when Larroquette 
uses his telescope to peer into the women's showers or Murray lifts 
a female M.P. onto the stove and, with an I-know-what-you-like 
look on his face, says he's going to give her the "Aunt Jemima 
treatment," which means shoving a spatula under her butt 
repeatedly. You don't want to stick around as the scene 
progresses and he uses an ice cream scoop on her genital 
region. "I'm not enjoying this," the woman protests. My 
sentiments exactly.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Dazed and Confused (1993)
        I wasn't alive in 1976, I've never been high or drunk in my 
life and I have a high I.Q. So why would I like DAZED AND 
CONFUSED? I'm not quite sure, but I did. Maybe it's because deep 
inside me, beneath the layers of contempt for the brain-dead, give-
peace-a-chance potheads running around the dorm with their double-
capacity brass water-bongs, I secretly want to experience the party life. 
Who knows, I might be missing out on something by not smoking 
joints and downing pitchers of beer on the weekends. I'm probably not, 
of course, but it's always possible that there's a reason people drink and 
drug themselves to excess.
        But the most probable reason I liked DAZED AND 
CONFUSED--it was a fun movie to watch. Sure, films like 
SCHINDLER'S LIST and GLORY are brilliantly-mad, but can you have 
fun watching them? Not unless you're incredibly sadistic. With 
DAZED AND CONFUSED, you actually get a sympathetic buzz as the 
characters toke themselves silly on the screen. Amid the scores of 
movies over the years that have painted a portrait of teenage life, too 
many of them are angst-ridden, depressing movies about the 
pointlessness of life. This one is all innocent, illegal fun.
        It also portrays the novelty of teenage life more accurately 
than most other teen nostalgia movies, at least my observations of 
teenage life. I've never actually considered myself "one of them," but I 
know exactly how the teen mind operates and what they do for fun, 
even if I'm absolutely nothing like them. And DAZED AND 
CONFUSED captures the "Have fun now before it's too late" mentality 
better than, say, THE BREAKFAST CLUB, which goes out of its way 
to show that teens from all walks of life have serious problems. I 
personally don't worry about the future, I'm not depressed, I don't feel 
the pressure to fit in, so how could I indentify with that movie? No, 
I've never done the things the DAZED AND CONFUSED characters 
do, but their outlook suits mine more fully, even if I do have a 
responsibility they don't.
        DAZED AND CONFUSED follows a group of high schoolers 
on the last day of school in 1976. (One liberated woman teacher tells 
them, "Remember as you're bombarded with all this bicentennial crap 
this summer that what you're really celebrating is the fact that a bunch 
of white, aristocratic, slave-owning males didn't want to pay their 
taxes.") As next year's seniors, they get to participate in the time-
honored ritual of hazing the incoming freshman. While the girls do all 
sorts of embarrassing activities, the guys get their asses repeatedly 
paddled. One boy in particular is singled out after his older sister 
pleads with the seniors to "go easy on him."
        The afternoon hazing ritual takes a back seat to the night's 
party activities, which comprise most of the movie. Proving teen life 
hasn't come along all that much since the 50's, most of the kids drive 
around the town aimlessly before some guys finally take the initiative 
to bring a couple dozen kegs of beer to a hillside water tower. The plot 
is naturally thin to accentuate the relative pointlessness of the party 
routine, with the movie instead focusing on the characters, who seem 
at the beginning of the movie to be your average mindless potheads. 
We find as the movie progresses that they all have distinctive human 
qualities.
        DAZED AND CONFUSED is, in effect, a coming-of-age 
movie for some of its characters, the "take it easy on him" boy in 
particular, who is accepted into the older boys' group after his ass is 
pummeled. In one night, he gets drunk, high and laid. If that's not a 
journey worthy of any epic poem's tragic hero, I don't know what is. 
Still, the movie isn't big on drama or long soliloquies, with the 
characters undergoing what are, for the most part, subtle changes 
amidst the celebration. It's not necessarily a funny movie, either. Even 
though I enjoyed the movie all the way through, I only laughed a few 
times. It was more fun than funny. I liked the movie, but I don't plan 
on indulging in any drugs or alcohol in the near future. So much for 
the assertion that entertainment affects people... I have to go kill my 
mom now. Slayer told me to.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Barb Wire (1996)
        Actually, I'm fairly sure the experience of having my flesh 
torn and mutilated by barbed wire would have been more positive than 
watching this movie. "Baywatch" babe Pamela Anderson Lee proves 
once and for all that she should keep her Double-D's on the small 
screen. At least there you don't have to pay to see her cleavage. 
And for those viewers out there who would only lay down money 
for this movie in hopes of seeing Pam topless, hate to burst your 
bubble, but there are no full-fledged nude scenes in BARB WIRE. 
        You wouldn't be reading this review right now if I had known 
that fact going in. I can't go back in time and reverse my mistake, but I 
can warn other horny teenage boys out there. They do tease us a 
few times with scenes where you almost see her topless but if she 
is nude, it's so quick you can't even tell for sure whether you're 
seeing her Andersons or not. A nipple hallucination sort of 
thing.
        BARB WIRE was adapted from a comic book, interesting 
because Pamela is probably the only woman who looks like a comic 
book character in real life, even wearing low-cut leather to do office 
work (businesswoman bondage wear) and having unreal body 
proportions. Yes, like the Mona Lisa, Pamela Anderson is a 
man-made beauty, probably in more senses than one. 
        She is a definite beauty, though, and looking at her is never 
an unpleasant experience. You'd just think the woman who began her 
career as a Playboy playmate wouldn't have any reservations about 
appearing nude in the movie, because it's obvious she wasn't pulling 
a Sharon Stone and trying to make people pay attention to her acting 
skills. I mean, she shows off more cleavage here than a jeweler's 
convention.
        The movie is set in the year 2017, "the worst year of my 
life," Pam says. ("The worst movie of the year," I say.) America is 
going through a second Civil War and Pamela is a nightclub owner 
in the only free city in the nation (Silicone Valley, I think). She also 
hires herself out as a bounty hunter when the price is right, posing 
as first a stripper and later as a prostitute.
        But don't call her "babe." She hates that, and reminds us of 
that fact way too many times. Imagine, a woman who does a trapeze 
strip tease in a bar while having a hose sprayed on her being referred 
to in such a sexist, demeaning term. A liberated woman like Pamela 
Anderson shouldn't have to hear words like "babe" during a strip 
tease, especially since that movie about the talking pig was such a 
success.
        The plot (ha-ha) revolves around a pair of contact lenses 
that allow their wearer to pass through the Congressional Directorate's 
retina scanners. In the words of one of the characters, they're "more 
than meets the eye." Reminds me of the "Transformers" cartoon, 
and I sure wished the movie could somehow be transformed into 
something decent, but that never happened. No, the movie just 
continued on its path of lame action scenes starring Pamela 
Van-Damme, big-busted kickboxer, and her resistance accomplices, 
ex-boyfriend Axel (Tamuera Morrison) and Cora (Victoria Rowell). 
Thank God they didn't name her Cora Reef. One bad character 
name is more than enough.
        Pamela originally doesn't take sides, giving some speech 
about she's only loyal to the money they pay her, but she changes 
her mind once the Congressional Bastards kill her blind brother, Jack 
Noseworthy of Bon Jovi "Always" video fame. I still don't know if 
BARB WIRE is a step up or step down for Noseworthy, but he 
definitely is nose worthy (even if he isn't sponge worthy). Pam gets 
ready to avenge his death by grabbing up an armful of semi-automatic 
weapons and strapping an ammunitions belt to her chest. It's not 
Rambo... it's Bimbo!
        Mark my words, BARB WIRE will be all over the Cinemax 
network in a year. It's got all the elements of the direct-to-video 
releases featured on HBO's bastard cousin, the cable channel I'd 
never watch if it didn't somehow come free. It's got the non-titillating 
scenes of voyeurism, laughable flashbacks, bad dialogue and action 
cliches out the wazzoo. There's even a narrator at the beginning 
setting up the movie's premise while the words scroll up the screen. 
Someone needs to tell Pamela the Wookie this ain't STAR WARS.
        If you've seen any action flick of the past fifteen years, 
you'll recognize plenty of lifted elements. BARB WIRE has the 
obligatory trucks flipping over, car crashes, explosions, broken 
glass and slow-motion shots of bodies falling hundreds of feet to 
their death. This is one of those automatic-pilot movies anyone 
could write or direct. BARB WIRE has only two things going for it... 
and I think you know what those two things are.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Do the Right Thing (1989)
        Spike Lee made an incredible movie here, but it's also one of 
the most uncomfortable viewing experiences I've ever had--and that 
includes the episode of "Golden Girls" where Estelle Getty gets a pap 
smear. DO THE RIGHT THING is a shocking commentary on race 
relations, a movie you can't watch without a strong opinion on one 
side or the other. Luckily, Spike didn't take sides in his presentation of 
the story, even if all the characters are stereotyped. The blacks are 
angry troublemakes who hate people of every other race and use the 
f-word in every sentence. The whites are angry troublemakers who 
hate people of every other race and use the f-word in every sentence. 
The Hispanics... You get the picture, I'm sure.
        Lee assumes that beneath a thin veneer of courtesy, every 
American harbors hate for other races that will break out with the 
slightest provocation. Black characters make fun of the way Orientals 
talk but are made fun of by whites for their addiction to the word 
"motherf---er" and the substitution of the word "fiddy" for its more 
Caucasian counterpart "fifty." The cops in the movie are hateful 
bastards who use unnecessary brutality, taking the Rodney King 
treatment to its worst extreme right in front of the neighborhood 
blacks.
        There are only a few well-thought-out characters in the 
movie, like Danny Aiello, an Italian who owns a pizza parlor that was 
there before the neighborhood was colorized. Now he's one of two 
non-black families in the neighborhood, but unlike the Korean 
convenience store owner across the street, is accepted by everyone. 
Spike Lee, one of the other decent characters, is his delivery boy, who 
manages to remain friends with his people and Aiello's.
        The movie takes awhile to reach its shocking climax. The 
first hour moves at a leisurely pace, focusing on a day in the life of the 
Brooklyn neighborhood, the hottest day of the year in fact. During that 
time we meet the neighborhood's residents--Aiello and his two sons, 
one racist and one non (luckily, the pizza parlor has seating for both 
types), Lee and his siblings, Lee's hyper Hispanic girlfriend (played 
by--take a wild guess--Rosie Perez), the racist black who organizes a 
protest of Aiello's pizza parlor because the people on his "Wall of 
Fame" are exclusively Italian guys, no blacks in the lot, the big guy 
who walks around with a tacky boombox, three old guys who sit 
outside and gossip the day away, another old guy who drinks the day 
away and a retarded guy who bugs Lee by trying to sell them pictures 
of Martin Luther King and Malcolm X. (Lee would be so inspired by 
the picture he bought that he would go on to make a really long movie 
about it.)
        Most of the characters are interesting but, for one reason or 
another, seemed abrasive and obnoxious to me. They're the kind of 
people you want to slap some sense into... and considering the movie's 
outcome, they'd take well to violence. If you've seen the movie, you 
realize the irony of the title, because hardly any of the characters ever 
say or do the right thing and are too one-note to sympathize with. The 
only exceptions are Lee, Aiello and the old drunk.
        The climax almost arises out of nowhere. You can tell while 
watching the movie that the racial tension, personified well by the 
depictions of intense heat (although I could have done without the 
scene where Spike rubs an ice cube on Rosie's nipples), would result in 
some manifestation of violence. Still, once it finally happens, you wish 
it didn't. You wish you could sit the characters down and tell them 
they don't have to act like idiots, always saying and doing the wrong 
thing. There's another way to deal with life's problems, through 
intelligence and negotiation. And that, ladies and gentlemen, is doing 
the right thing.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Jingle All the Way (1996)
        I admit it. I thought Arnold Schwarzenegger had a knack for 
comedy when he made TWINS and TRUE LIES. Watching him in JINGLE 
ALL THE WAY, I wondered why anyone ever thought he could carry such 
a lame movie targeted at susceptible kids. It was one thing to scare the 
crap out of kids with the PG-13 KINDERGARTEN COP, but parents who let 
small children see this movie will have to explain themes of violence, 
alcohol consumption, burglary, racism and child molestation. And you 
know they'll burst out in tears when Arnold punches one of Santa's 
elves. He later decks a reindeer. Hey, man, why don't you just kick the 
Easter Bunny in the nuts while you're at it?
        JINGLE ALL THE WAY is formula crap that follows the If 
Someone Falls On His Ass, It Must Be Funny school of thought. 
Arnold, Sinbad and Phil Hartman crash to the ground more times in 
this movie than a Special Olympics hockey team, and the movie 
dredges up more cliche and less believability with each successive 
scene. What can you expect from a movie whose entire premise is that 
two parents can't find a rare toy on Christmas Eve, and will do 
anything to get one?
        Arnold is, of course, one of the parents, a crack salesman who 
is never there for his son. He races from the office to his son's karate 
game, only to find out he missed it. And his kid distrusts him because 
he's never around. (Gee, we haven't seen THAT in a movie before.) 
Arnold the Absentee Father becomes convinced that the only way to 
buy back his son's affection is to get him a Turboman doll, which his 
wife (Rita Wilson, who will never be the breadwinner of the Hanks 
household choosing roles like this) told him to get weeks ago. So 
Arnold sets out to find a Turboman, which turns out to be more rare 
than the Tickle Me Elmo was when JINGLE ALL THE WAY came out.
        Let me back up for a minute here -- Arnold's kid is totally 
obsessed with this Turboman character, which is unhealthy beyond 
belief. Watches the show, eats the cereal, sleeps on the freakin' 
Turboman sheets. I'd try to discourage any further obsession myself, 
lest any kid seeing this movie think it's a wonderful thing to con your 
dad into racing out to buy you any toy you want. But nooooo, the 
climax of JINGLE ALL THE WAY has Arnold dressed up as Turboman 
in a parade, exonerating himself of all wrongdoing in the eyes of wife 
and son, who don't recognize him until the last minute.
        This is a sad movie all the way through, but it only gets worse 
after the opening scenes of Arnold and mailman Sinbad stampeding 
through a store, racing off to the mall and hooking up with a Santa 
(Jim Belushi) who runs a bootleg toy factory. Most painful to watch is 
a scene at a radio station, where Sinbad holds off the cops with a letter 
bomb after beating up the deejay (an embarrassed Martin Mull) who 
said he was giving away a Turboman doll.
        Capitalism has produced some pretty evil things (Chia pets), 
but this ode to excess and violent consumerism is one of the most 
shameful. Never mind the subplot with perfect neighbor Phil Hartman 
trying to seduce Wilson while Arnold is off shopping ("Your cookies 
are incredible"), it's the main plot of the movie that sends the message 
that it's okay to do whatever it takes to get your hands on what you 
want. Maybe that's what Christmas is like at the Schwarzenegger 
house, but not at mine.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for My Best Friend's Wedding (1997)
        Julia Roberts made the world love her back in 1990 with 
PRETTY WOMAN, but since then she's been in eight consecutive 
bad movies. DYING YOUNG, MARY REILLY and I LOVE 
TROUBLE hardly rank in the annals of filmed entertainment. It was 
only at the end of 1996 in Woody Allen's EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE 
YOU that she seemed like America's sweetheart once again. But no 
one besides me watches Woody Allen movies anymore; it's going to 
take a far inferior, watered-down romantic comedy to return her to 
public graces again.
        My guess is, MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING will be 
Julia's big comeback vehicle. She's got her big permed hair and lips 
fuller than ever, but even more important, she looks happy again. 
No mad Doctor Jekyll to deal with this time, just a wedding to break 
up. She's on a romantic mission that involves chicanery and 
deception, and the breaking up of a happy couple, but because she's 
Julia Roberts with her gracious beauty and awkward charm, we love 
her character anyway.
        Julia plays a food critic for a newspaper, probably the only 
anorexic food critic ever (although she can recommend the best 
lettuce leaf and Tic Tac in the city), who has been as of yet 
unsuccessful in her quest for a man. The two most important men in 
her life are her Stallone-faced best friend and her gay editor. It's an 
implausible movie -- I mean, how could any man spend time around 
Julia Roberts and still be gay? -- but still a mildly appealing 
diversion with cast of beautiful people on both sides of the fence.
        The best friend is played by not-so-young gun Dermot 
Mulroney, who was once involved with Julia but now plans to marry 
Cameron Diaz. Good choice. Diaz plays an eternally-perky college 
student who immediately tries to make Julia into her best friend as 
well. Julia instantly hates her, of course, which provides the 
interesting scene where Julia makes Cameron sing in a karaoke bar 
and she's so off-key that everyone loves her. Off-key isn't always 
bad; Alanis sold 12 million albums.
        Yes, the marriage setup is an excuse for Julia to be rude, 
manipulative, sneaky and just plain mean once she realizes she's in 
love with Mulroney herself. Like I said, we love every second of it, 
because seeing Julia in the not-so-innocent roles brings the most 
comedic reward. She's got that innocent yet worldwise quality that 
made her a charming hooker in PRETTY WOMAN, and it still works 
here. It would have been better to stick with the premise and break 
convention, but the ending is completely sappy and predictable.
        It's the sap and predictability that keeps MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING from being more than pretty good. The 
writing follows the track we'd expect, giving us a handful of truly 
funny jokes and only a couple memorable scenes like the "Say a 
Prayer" sing-along sequence in the restaurant. The rest of the time it 
relies too heavily on Roberts to fall off the bed, accidentally rip her 
dress, knock things over, and so on. We love you, Julia, but your 
name isn't Lucy.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Nixon (1995)
        With NIXON, Oliver Stone's three-hour follow-up to JFK, 
one more president is crossed off the list of epic biopics. I don't 
know about you, but I can hardly wait for TAFT. Until then, 
however, we've got this piece of work, starring Anthony Hopkins 
as Richard Nixon. Hopkins contributes an amazing performance, 
painting Nixon as a man almost as paranoid and conspiracy-minded 
as Stone himself. Hopkins sounds a lot like Nixon, but his visual 
appearance is a bizarre meld between how he normally looks and 
the famous Nixon jowls and hairline.
        NIXON covers pretty much the whole life of the disgraced 
President, beginning with the bungled Watergate break-in and 
flashing back to his first Presidential campaign (including a 
re-enactment of the famous TV debate with Kennedy), his football 
days and even early home life. We discover Mama Nixon (Mary 
Steenburgen) talked in the King James English of thee's and thou's, 
while Papa Nixon's solution for everything was to beat his kids 
with a belt. With an upbringing like this, it's no wonder Nixon 
has conversations with the Lincoln Memorial.
        In a massive epic worthy of Tricky Dick himself, Stone 
traces a seemingly failed career, two presidential administrations 
and a near-impeachment in the visual style he's become famous 
for, mixing odd camera angles and switching between black-and-
white and color. It's not as innovative or effective here as in JFK 
but also not as annoying or overdone as in NATURAL BORN 
KILLERS. Stone makes it known upfront that he's taken liberties 
with history in telling the story, but mixes in enough real news 
clips and celebrity look-alikes (including Henry Kissinger and 
Mao-Tse Tung) to make it seem convincing.
        Joan Allen does particular justice to the role of Pat Nixon, 
longsuffering wife of a crazed man who never calls her anything but 
"Buddy" and keeps promising a happy marriage at the next stage of 
his career, until finally they both reach the top and things are worse 
than ever. Ed Harris (as Howard Hunt), Bob Hoskins (shedding his 
English accent and donning a French maid uniform for the role of 
J. Edgar Hoover), David Paymer (Ron Zeigler) and Ed Harris (E. 
Howard Hunt) are also standouts in assuming the roles of real-life 
Nixon associates. NIXON is the movie that proves Oliver Stone 
should stick to long, surreal biographies of American presidents 
rather than Generation X slasher satire.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Eraser (1996)
        We remember the toned-down Arnold Schwarzenegger of 
the early 90's, a kinder, gentler man who wouldn't blow people away 
with machine guns anymore. In KINDERGARTEN COP the most 
violent he got was when he beat up on a man who beat his kid ("You 
hit de kid, I hit you"). In TERMINATOR 2 he was forbidden to kill 
anyone so he blew their knee caps off instead. In THE LAST 
ACTION HERO he murdered his lines as usual but no people. The 
crowd-pleasing TRUE LIES was violent but it was a parody of the kind 
of movies Schwarzenegger starred in during the 80's. It took him six 
years to return to a movie with a real old-fashioned, automatic 
weapon body count.
        And that movie is ERASER, where Arnold plays Federal 
Marshal John Kruger, witness protector extraordinaire. His charge 
this time around is a defense contractor employee (Vanessa 
Williams) who has agreed to testify against her company's 
misappropriations of funds and weapons. ("I didn't know treason 
was in the corporate strategy," she announces to her boss.) All 
the evidence she needs is on a CD-ROM disc she carries with her 
through the duration of the movie. At first, she doesn't think she 
needs to go into hiding, but a late-night assault on her home 
convinces her to change her identity.
        Luckily, Arnold is right there, disguised as a buff delivery 
boy, to save her from the bad guys, who have a new weapon that 
shoots electromagnetic pulses at "just under the speed of light." 
Of course, we can still see the pulses flying toward their targets, 
so I'd estimate Vanessa's "just under" comment to mean about 
185,000 miles per second under the speed of light. But authenticity 
isn't important in a movie like this as long as we can see the pulses 
knocking their victims back through the wall.
        Arnold brings Vanessa to a Chinatown apartment, where 
she burns all her forms of identification. "There goes all that I am," 
she laments, to his stone-faced reply, "What you are is in here 
[gesturing to the heart region] and they can't take that from you." I 
was worried at that point that the sense of humor Arnold has always 
had in his movies had completely gone to hell, but those fears were 
shattered a half-hour later when he shot an alligator in the zoo and 
quipped, "You're luggage!" (I didn't say Arnold had a _good_ 
sense of humor, just a sense of humor.)
        "I suppose we won't see each other again," Vanessa says. 
"Not if all goes well," Arnold responds. And of course it doesn't. 
Arnold and Vanessa are reunited at the zoo not twenty minutes later, 
after he shoots the alligator and she shoots a corrupt marshal 
because he doesn't know the "secret handshake." We know by this 
point that most of the marshals are corrupt, including Arnold's boss 
(James Caan), who is in the process of selling millions of dollars in 
weapons to the Russian mafia, to "usher in a new era of world 
terrorism." Caan makes a good psycho villian and we all know 
Arnold makes a good wisecracking action hero.
        After narrowly escaping death by Caan, Arnold jumps out 
of a plane, pulling a GOLDENEYE (and breaking the laws of 
physics) by free-falling faster than his parachute pack and opening 
it just in time, in just one of ERASER's blockbuster action sequences. 
Another one comes shortly thereafter, as Arnold and Vanessa break 
into her company to view the evidence on her magic disc. It's 
reminiscent of another 1996 summer movie, MISSION: 
IMPOSSIBLE, only much more inventive and entertaining.
        The same could be said of the entire movie in comparison 
to MISSION: IMPOSSIBLE. That movie only had three action 
sequences amid a sea of unintelligible plot, whereas ERASER has 
almost wall-to-wall action and a plot Arnold himself could follow. It 
also has some genuinely funny scenes, unlike the straight-faced 
seriousness of Tom Cruise's action foray. After Arnold falls out of 
the sky during the parachute scene and lands atop a junkyard car, 
he gets up, brushes himself off and asks, "Where am I?" A little girl, 
in awe, replies, "Earth. Welcome."
        While we're comparing ERASER with the other action 
films currently in release, I should point out that it's as good as 
or better than THE ROCK. Like that movie it mixes light-hearted 
humor with brutal violence. And Vanessa Williams is certainly a 
better sidekick to look at than the ape-like Nicholas Cage. Williams 
even does a decent job of acting, although all that's required of her 
is nervousness at the beginning, distress in the middle and loving 
admiration of Arnold at the end. It doesn't have an incredible 
amount of originality and its attempts at seriousness are met with 
as many laughs as the comic relief scenes, but ERASER is a 
constantly entertaining no-brainer that provides two hours of 
escape from the oppressive heat and boredom of summer.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for 2 Days in the Valley (1996)
     Ever since PULP FICTION, there's been a flood of hip crime-story
imitators, none of which have managed to be as intelligent or compelling
as Quentin Tarantino's original. 2 DAYS IN THE VALLEY is mildly
entertaining on its own, though, with a cast that includes Danny Aiello,
Jeff Daniels, Teri "Lois" Hatcher and Eric Stoltz. It's got a good Miramax
feel to it even though it came from HBO, who must have decided it was
good enough to bypass pay cable and go straight to theaters. 
     The movie seems a mess at the beginning, with three or four
subplots that don't seem to be going anywhere. On one hand you've got
Aiello and James Spader (who is a dead ringer for kid in the hall Dave
Foley here) as two criminals listening in on a sleeping Teri Hatcher. As
her ex-husband wakes her up and tries to win her back, Spader and
Aiello come inside, shove a hypodermic into Hatcher's panty-clad butt
(bet there was quite a fight over which one got to perform the injection)
and kill the husband. 
     Cut to Stoltz, who is getting a massage from a beautiful Asian
woman who offers to massage something else. Stoltz decides not to and
gets back in Daniels' car, where we find out they're two cops planning to
bust the parlor for prostitution. Stoltz changes his mind after realizing
the woman is nice enough, and Daniels changes his mind when a bloody Teri
Hatcher comes running into the path of his car. 
     So those two paths have intersected, while we see a suicidal
writer / director (played by writer / director Paul Mazursky) whose only
goal is to give away his dog before he kills himself. Around the same
time, Spader decides to double-cross Aiello. He shoots him and gets in
model Charlize Theron's car as his own car blows sky-high. But surprise,
surprise, Aiello was wearing a bulletproof vest and got out of the car in
time. 
     He ends up in the nearby mansion of eccentric British art collector
Peter Horton and his underappreciated assistant, Glenn Headly. Horton's
character is defined by two things -- overall English snootiness and
having to pass a kidney stone -- so he's not really essential to the film,
although Headly is always fun to watch. Meanwhile, Mazursky is in a
cemetery and runs into Marsha Mason, who actually liked one of his
movies. She gives him a ride, but first has to visit her brother-in-law,
who coincidentally turns out to be Horton. 
     That's more paths crossed, and all the paths eventually come
together, as Spader comes after Aiello and Stoltz tries to solve the case.
2 DAYS IN THE VALLEY has a brain to it, but not nearly as much
entertainment value or clever dialogue as Tarantino's masterpiece, the
film by which all imitators are measured. It will go down in history for
its five-minute catfight between Hatcher and Theron, the stuff 14-year-old
boy fantasies are made of. 
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Over 750 detailed reviews with a comedic flair.

Title
Review for Young Guns (1988)
        Young guys with guns, that's what you get in YOUNG 
GUNS , the 1988 western starring "six of today's hottest stars." 
Today, the magnificent six -- Emilio Estevez, Kiefer Sutherland, 
Charlie Sheen, Lou Diamond Phillips, Casey Siemasko (?) and 
Dermot Mulroney -- are nowhere to be seen, with the exception 
of Mulroney, who co-starred in last year's thriller COPYCAT. In 
YOUNG GUNS, they play a bunch of renegade cowboys who are 
hired to protect a British guy's property as "regulators." Any 
gangsta rap fans out there will recognize the multiple lines of 
dialogue that were eventually sampled in Warren G.'s 1994 hit 
"Regulate." Yes, this movie has left behind quite a legacy, hasn't 
it?
        Estevez plays the charasmatic leader of the group, Billy 
the Kid (ever heard of him?), who vows to wage war against Jack 
"Yummy" Palance's crime ring, who outnumber them by about a 
hundred. The movie works in several gunfights amid the laughable 
dramatic scenes, as Emilio the Kid faces dissent from Sheen the 
Preacher, Kiefer the Mature Lover and Lou the Mestizo Heathen. 
Eventually, they all become outlaws and are stalked by Palance's 
boys and American cavalry troops, leading to the final showdown, 
a gunfight that seems to last almost twenty minutes.
        If you like movies that function merely as excuses for 
people to shoot off guns for long periods at a time, YOUNG GUNS 
is probably the movie for you. You'll also have to overlook some 
seriously boring dramatic scenes, the most inadvertently hilarious 
of which is a dramatic speech by Lou the Mestizo Heathen, who 
recounts the injustices of Americans to his "people," all of whom 
except for him are dead. "I had to watch them bash in the heads of 
my little sisters with their bootheels because they didn't want to 
waste bullets!" At least you didn't have to watch YOUNG GUNS 
and waste two hours of your life.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for In the Company of Men (1997)
        As moviegoers, we've become accustomed to certain rules -- 
bad behavior is punished, the good guy gets the girl in the end and 
everyone is happy. Very few movies dare break the formula and fewer 
still flip the bird to everything we'd expect in a movie. IN THE 
COMPANY OF MEN does, presenting a protagonist who announces 
his evil plan toward the beginning of the film, carries it out over the 
next hour or so and then gets away with it in the end. It is not a 
feel-good movie.
        The protagonist, Chad (Aaron Eckhart), is a corporate 
employee sent to another city for six weeks on a project. During a 
night of drinking, he convinces his associate and friend Howard 
(Matt Malloy) to play a game with him. It will grant them both the 
satisfaction of getting back at the opposite sex for all the cruel 
breakups, indecipherable behavior and never picking up a check. 
What they will do is romance the same woman for six weeks, bombard 
her with attention and affection, then pull the rug out from under her 
and retreat to their hometown, confidence fully regained.
        The plan reeks of pure, heartless evil, which Chad 
personifies. His social exchanges are all governed by a falsity and 
ass-kissing most people can't seem to see through, including Howard, 
when he agrees to the plan. Chad picks a shy office assistant named 
Christine (Stacy Edwards) because she's deaf and desperate; we can 
sense this woman's insecurity right off, in the self-conscious way she 
wears headphones to disguise her hearing. She needs a good man, but 
falls hard for the wrong one.
        Howard, meanwhile, begins his part of the game and takes 
her out a few times. It's clear before too long that he's taken the 
predictable romantic comedy road -- intending to scam her but falling 
in love for real. A studio movie would have had Howard punch out 
Chad, to cheers from the audience, and embrace Christine as some 
upbeat pop song played over the end credits. IN THE COMPANY OF 
MEN is no studio movie, and develops very differently. The Hollywood 
ending would have been more enjoyable, but false, and for once the 
filmmakers' refusal to compromise has brought us a far more 
fascinating film.
        This is definitely a high-quality, well-thought-out film, 
but that's what keeps me from loving it. It's too depressing; there's 
absolutely no satisfaction to be had here. What we do get is 
characterization that rings painfully true to life -- we all know people 
like Chad who play everyone for their own cruel purposes. Consider, 
for example, what he makes his intern do. And we all know gullible 
people like Howard, who obviously doesn't want to participate in the 
scheme until he is talked into it by his "friend," and Christine, who 
becomes a victim because someone else has been hurt in the past. 
As written and directed by Neil LaBute, IN THE COMPANY OF MEN 
is the ultimate anti-date movie.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Almost 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for She's Gotta Have It (1986)
        "What exactly does the 'it' refer to?" my mom asked in an 
accusatory tone when I brought the SHE'S GOTTA HAVE IT video 
home. "Commitment," I replied, to get her off my back, but that 
couldn't be further from the truth. The 'it' in SHE'S GOTTA HAVE 
IT is S-E-X, a topic Spike Lee usually puts on the back burner in 
favor of his usual favorite topic: race. But in his debut film, 
directed with labored shots in artsy black-and-white (and one 
brief color sequence), race is a barely-mentioned factor in a story 
of relationships. Of course there are no white people in the movie -- 
you know if Lee could have possibly been able to film the movie in 
just black instead of black-and-white to make a metaphorical point, 
he would have.
        Nona Darling (a made-up name if I've ever heard one) 
is a successful woman in her 20's who is juggling purely physical 
relationships with three men who want more. There's average 
working man Jamie, rich conceited oreo Greer and immature 
pint-sized Mars (Lee himself, naturally). She sees them as parts 
of one big, well-rounded man and doesn't want to choose between 
them or settle down with any one of them. In her words, she's got 
a job and an apartment and doesn't want someone leeching off of 
her, little Mars in particular because, as Dr. Ruth has pointed out, 
one can never have a fully satisying relationship with anyone 
named after a planet (sorry, Jupiter).
        SHE'S GOTTA HAVE IT isn't like most other Spike Lee 
films. Besides the absence of white (people) and color (film), nearly 
all the characters are likeable (except Greer, who actually uses the 
phrase, "The minute you get fat, I'm leaving you"), even Nona's 
friend Opal, one of those devastatingly beautiful Hollywood 
lesbians who tries to pull all of their friends into the web of 
experimentation. That storyline is never resolved, but then neither 
is the overall one, which keeps in the tradition of a woman who 
wants the bellboy but doesn't want him carrying any emotional 
baggage.
        Overall, there's not too much meaning in the movie and 
it's about as believable as the Ace of Base "All that she wants is 
another baby" song. We know 95% of men in the world would 
jump at the chance to get the sex without the commitment, but 
what percentage of women out there would want a similar 
arrangement? And how many of those would actually want to 
see Spike Lee pantsless? I guess it's all part of the Hollywood 
lesbians believability package.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Donnie Brasco (1997)
     More than 20 years ago, Al Pacino gained his fame by starring in
the first two GODFATHER films. Now he's returned to those roots by
playing a thoroughly exhausted, much less successful Mafia man. Donnie
BRASCO, though, follows in the feet of Pacino's 1996 role in CITY HALL by
giving the lead to a younger, less experienced man in the field. In CITY
HALL it was John Cusack; here, it's Johnny Depp, who works his way
into Pacino's existence by telling Pacino the $8,000 diamond ring he just
bought is a fake. 
     Depp slowly earns Pacino's confidence as we learn he's really an
undercover FBI agent out to break up the Mafia ring. It would seem
contrived if they didn't tell us at the beginning that it's based on a
true story. From here, the movie can only go in three directions -- either
Depp sticks to his mission and all works out, the mobsters find out he's
an FBI agent and some other agent has to come in and rescue him, or
Depp gets Patti Hearst syndrome and begins to fraternize with the enemy
for real. 
     We get a mixture of options one and three. Depp starts to use the
f-word more than usual and say "Forget about it!" in different tones to
mean different things. One subplot focuses on this transformation as it
relates to Depp and his family. His wife is sick of never seeing him or
knowing what assignment he's working on and has several non-productive
fights with him. This plotline falls by the wayside toward the last reel,
though. 
     The main appeal of the film are the Mafia men themselves. Pacino
is great as a tired, washed-up gangster who's been in the business 30
years and still hasn't gotten anywhere. Bruno Kirby and Michael
Madsen, as the leader, aren't given much to do here, but exemplify the
fact that this crime ring is pretty small time. These underachievers are
so unlucky at their game that, when they finally get a successful gambling
party going, I was actually upset that the cops broke it up. 
     Because the criminals evoke this strange kind of sympathy, there
are no real antagonists in DONNIE BRASCO, only conflicts. Depp grows
attached to Pacino and realizes that if the other guys find out he's an
FBI man, Pacino will get whacked before he can say "Forget about it!" At
the same time, Depp is torn between his job and his wife and, on the same
token, his job and his attachment to the Mafia game. None of these are
resolved in a cinematic way, probably because nothing ever is in real
life. We never have soundtracks in our heads either. 
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Over 750 detailed reviews with a comedic flair.

Title
Review for Sgt. Bilko (1996)
        I have to admit that, despite all the endless hours I've spent 
watching sitcom reruns on cable, I've never seen an episode of "Sgt. 
Bilko." It's probably better that I haven't, though, because I'm sure this 
movie pales in comparison. Still, I've seen every episode of "Saturday 
Night Live" and enjoy the work of the three "SNL" stars who carry the 
SGT. BILKO movie -- Steve Martin, Dan Aykroyd and Phil Hartman. 
It's still no guarantee that the name of those three on a movie marquee 
means an entertaining film experience. I need only cite the titles A 
SIMPLE TWIST OF FATE, DOCTOR DETROIT and HOW I GOT 
INTO COLLEGE for evidence of that.
        Martin plays the one-note Bilko character, a money-obsessed 
finagler who secretly runs gambling and laundering operations on the 
barracks. Aykroyd plays the one-note general character, who manages 
to overlook the rampant corruption due to Bilko's profuse ass-kissing. 
Hartman plays the one-note bastard character who is out for revenge 
against Bilko. The plot basically has Hartman trying to trip up Bilko, 
with Bilko continually outwitting him.
        That includes having Bilko's platoon audited by two 
accountant dorks (including fellow "SNL" alum Chris Rock), Hartman 
and Aykroyd popping in for a surprise inspection at the worst possible 
time, Hartman trying to romance Bilko's longsuffering fiance (Glenn 
Headly) and a bunch of crap involving the $70 million hovertank the 
Bilko platoon was supposed to be building. The lone voice of dissent 
amidst the Bilko platoon amid all this criminal activity is a new recruit 
who is actually serious about defending American liberty. Rest assured 
by the end of the movie he too will abandon that antiquated notion and 
begin living off government money like the rest of the platoon. Yeah, a 
real happy ending.
        SGT. BILKO isn't a decent comeback vehicle for Martin or 
Aykroyd, who both give mediocre, walk-through performances, but at 
least Hartman shows talent amid the ninety minutes of mindless 
entertainment, most of which is contrived and unoriginal. The movie 
does have its share of laughs, though, and is fun to watch most of the 
time. Even so, I'm about ready for the Army Comedy genre to die out. 
In this day and age, it comes off as lame and unnecessary, kind of like 
the real Army. (No flame mail on that one, please, militarists.)
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for That Thing You Do! (1996)
        Tom Hanks is one of Hollywood's few genuine success 
stories, an actor the public continues to love even after turkeys like 
Bonfire of the Vanities, Turner and Hooch and Joe 
vs. the Volcano. His preformances are subtle and low-key, yet 
he's won two Oscars. It's his everyman, Jimmy Stewart-like appeal 
that is responsible for his success and makes you like him whether 
he's a gay man with AIDS or an idiot with a heart of gold.
        If this affable, charming personality of his could be 
personified as a movie, THAT THING YOU DO would be it, no great 
coincidence considering Hanks scripted and directed it himself. 
The movie is likeable, mild entertainment that makes you smile 
more than laugh and never offends, like Hanks himself. It is a 
nostalgic story of a fictional 60's band, the Wonders, and their 
rise and fall from stardom. The story is predictable and pretty much 
writes itself, but Hanks should still be congratulated for stumbling 
upon a topic of interest and fascination and coordinating it in an 
entertaining way.
        As THAT THING YOU DO begins, the band's drummer 
(Corey from "My Two Dads" in his first acting gig of the 90's) has 
broken his arm and their friend Guy (Tom Everett Scott) is called in 
as a replacement for their show in a talent competition. At the show, 
Guy speeds up the tempo of lead singer Jimmy's (Johnathon 
Schaech) ballad "That Thing You Do" to match the dance pop 
sound of the Beatles. Suddenly, it's the latest teen sensation and 
the band is playing a local bar / pizza parlor.
        The road to fame continues as they record a single on 
some church equipment, get a manager who works out of a camper 
and play a Pittsburgh rock show. That's when they hit the big time 
and trade off their old manager for a slick Hollywood version, 
played by Hanks. His small role in the movie is the only thing that 
reminds us we're watching a big-time Hollywood movie. The rest is 
acted out by people we've never heard of like Scott, Schaech, Steve 
Zahn and Ethan Embry as "The Bass Player." Liv Tyler, playing 
Jimmy's girlfriend, is the only other link back to Hollywood. Liv 
doesn't do too much in the movie, but she is definitely getting 
more beautiful with each movie she appears in.
        There are a lot of scenes on the way to fame that are more 
cute than funny, the most effective of which is the scene when the 
band members hear "That Thing You Do" on the radio for the first 
time. Liv is mailing some letters when she hears it and begins 
screaming and jumping up and down. She breaks into a run, 
heading for the department store Guy works in, and meets another 
band member on the way. By the time they reach the store, two 
other band members pull up in a car and jump out. Hanks handled 
the whole scene incredibly, capturing the mixture of triumph and 
joy a moment like this would bring a band.
        He handles the last part of the movie with much less skill. 
By the time everything falls apart, we know it's going to fall apart 
and we pretty much know how it's going to fall apart. The Wonders 
seem to be an Americanized one-hit version of the Beatles so we 
know it's only a matter of time before Liv Ono inadvertently breaks 
them up. But it's a fun ride while it lasts, and a definite strong 
showing for Hanks in his directorial debut. Even the song, "That 
Thing You Do," which we hear played eight or nine times 
throughout the course of the movie, is catchy and fun.
        THAT THING YOU DO doesn't have the big laughs or 
thrills of the usual Hollywood movie machine products, nor does 
it have the drama or vision of a low-budget arthouse movie. It will 
probably be a big hit anyway, though, because it has the same 
innocent, family-friendly quality Hanks himself has been bringing 
us for years, even if his role in the movie is small. The Guy 
character, though, is obviously patterned after Hanks, with the 
same personality and many of the same mannerisms. It's no 
coincidence that his name is Guy -- he's the plain old average 
guy we know and love.

Title
Review for Goldfinger (1964)
        Here it is, the best James Bond movie out there, with 
DIAMONDS ARE FOREVER coming in a close second. It just makes 
me wonder why all the Sean Connery movies in the series couldn't be 
like this. The first two weren't (DR. NO and FROM RUSSIA WITH 
LOVE) and the two after this certainly weren't (THUNDERBALL and 
YOU ONLY LIVE TWICE). The formula that's utilized in all the 
other 007 films--death traps, chases, explosions, intriguing villains 
with plans for world conquest, girls, girls, girls--click together 
especially well here, making it the standout episode of the series.
        Goldfinger is certainly an intriguing villain. He's a roly-poly 
fat guy on the surface who has millions in gold bullion yet gets off on 
conning people for relatively small amounts. In the beginning of the 
movie, he has his secretary watch a card game through binoculars and 
tell him over a radio transmitter what cards the other man is holding. 
Bond thwarts that racket and later takes Goldfinger for five thousand 
pounds by utilizing some trickery of his own to win a game of golf. 
Goldfinger gets him back by capturing Bond halfway through the 
movie and taking him back to his hideout, where he tells him all about 
his plan to loot the gold reserve at Fort Knox. That's always the single 
biggest mistake of Bond villains--the inability to keep their damn 
mouths shut.
        Bond remains in captivity for the second half of the movie, 
mingling with other memorable villains on the Goldfinger compound 
as he repeatedly tries to escape. There's Oddjob, a beefy Korean who 
never talks, choosing instead to express himself through decapitating 
people by using his tophat as a frisbee. And, of course, there's Pussy 
Galore (That phrase, incidentally, also represents James Bond's main 
goal in life.), a sexy airplane pilot who is probably the only woman 
who has the balls (Wait a minute, you can't say someone named Pussy 
has balls. Let's change that to "guts.") to resist Bond's advances. He 
soon changes her mind, though, by forcing himself on her and making 
her his third conquest of the movie. Could the 60's have been a more 
groovy decade?
        GOLDFINGER takes the already-worn Bond formula to new 
levels. The death trap where a laser is advancing toward Bond's crotch 
(the Vasectomy of DEATH!) is one of the most tense scenes in the 
series, as is the movie's climax, involving Bond, an atomic bomb and a 
pair of handcuffs (which just happened to be left over from Bond's date 
the night before). While other 007 movies utilizing these elements 
have come off looking campy and ridiculous, this one works almost all 
the time. Well, there is a scene in the movie where planes drop nerve 
gas on an entire army and they all fall over simultaneously, but you 
have to give the director credit for trying.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Moonraker (1979)
        They were going to pit James Bond against an evil 
groundskeeper and call the movie LEAFRAKER, but then they 
realized if they put Bond on a space shuttle they could call it 
MOONRAKER instead. It's silly at times, but it is entertaining, and 
how could I give a bad review to the only movie in the series in which 
Bond has zero-gravity sex? Interestingly enough, the escapade is 
broadcast to the leaders of the free world (pay-per-view, of course). 
"What is he doing?!" The head of NASA shrieks, to Q's quick reply, "I 
believe he's attempting re-entry."
        Bond gets not three but four women in the sack here, 
including a scientist from NASA he teams up with to investigate the 
disappearance of a space shuttle. He goes from Venice to Rio De 
Janeiro, with 7-foot-tall, indestructible metal-mouth villain Jaws (who 
also popped up in THE SPY WHO LOVED ME) following. They find 
in Rio that an evil businessman has been sending the shuttles into 
space to form a master race space colony (Adolf enters the space age). 
Satellites containing nerve gas are sent to destroy the earth's 
population. Not a bad idea, but I'd personally extinguish the human 
race by showing them life-sized nude pictures of Bea Arthur.
        The planets are all aligned here, so to speak. The chases are 
edge-of-your-seat entertainment (pure movie magic!), including two 
boat chases, and the death traps are clever, with Jaws being at the 
helm of most of those. The climax on the space station is also good 
stuff. MOONRAKER is an all-around entertaining movie, with that 
zero-gravity sex thrown in to boot.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Jumanji (1995)
        While I was watching this video, my mom walked into the 
room to get something. She looked at the screen and asked, 
"JUMANJI?" I replied, "No thanks, I just ate." I have no idea what 
that's supposed to mean, of course, but it sounded nice enough. 
And so did this movie, from the pictures and copy on the back of the 
box. But when I actually watched JUMANJI, I found out it was far 
from perfect. Jumanji is some kind of magic board game (not the 
one where you take turns stacking blocks until they fall over -- that's 
Jenga, soon to be a major motion picture) that lures children into 
rolling the dice, by which point the only way to rid yourself of the 
game's consequences is to finish.
        Alan digs up the game outside his dad's shoe factory and 
plays it one night his friend Sarah. It turns out when you roll the 
dice a really bad poem comes up on the board. That's torture enough, 
but after Sarah rolls, a couple hundred bats fly out. Alan rolls and 
gets sucked into the game. Sarah runs away, screaming, and spends 
the next twenty-six years of her lvince 
herself the event never happened.
        Then, in 1995, two kids who have just moved into the 
mansion with their Aunt Lilith (Bebe Neuwirth, who could probably 
help Sarah with the therapy) discover the magic of Jumanji. Judy 
(Kirsten Dunst) rolls and three giant mosquitoes attack them. Peter 
rolls and a bunch of computer-animated monkeys materialize to 
destroy their kitchen. The kids then find out the rule about 
having to finish the game and are therefore forced to continue 
playing.
        On the next roll, out comes a lion. Next comes Alan himself 
(Robin Williams), now a fully-grown savage with a long beard and a 
bushier mane than the lion. But he isn't homefree yet, he still has to 
finish the game he started back in 1969, along with psychic friend 
Sarah (Bonnie Hunt). That's when the real fun begins, as the game 
spits out an English bounty hunter, a stampede, a monsoon 
and -- worst of all -- a card reading "Go Directly to Jail; Do Not 
Pass Go, Do Not Collect $200." That Uncle Pennybags is a 
bastard, ain't he?
        JUMANJI is a fairly decent action film weighted down by a 
few key factors. First of all, Robin Williams shows none of his usual 
manic charisma, playing with laughable seriousness the role of 
someone trapped in a board game for over a quarter of a century. 
Second, the special effects are just so damn fake-looking. In a 
movie like this, as in JURASSIC PARK or TWISTER, the effects 
are the main draw. Computer animation hasn't been this obvious 
since that "Money For Nothing" video.
        Finally, the ending is a complete sell-out. They spend at least 
fifteen minutes trying to establish the happiest possible ending to the 
game, one which involves time travel and knowledge of the future. If 
the BACK TO THE FUTURE trilogy has taught us anything, it's that 
changing past events screws up the future, and the glaring 
obviousness of the JUMANJI ending raises hundreds more 
questions about the outcome of its characters than it answers. 
I guess it's my fault for actually _thinking_ during the movie.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for One Fine Day (1996)
        There are movies that are sweet and there are movies that 
go way beyond sweet to the point of saccharine. And saccharine 
causes cancer in some people. So be aware that because I had a 
mostly positive viewing experience with ONE FINE DAY doesn't 
mean you'll be able to tolerate its sickening sucrose. I have a higher 
level of sugar tolerance than most even though my family has a 
history of diabetes.
        ONE FINE DAY covers a day and night in the life of two 
struggling, divorced parents, played by George Clooney and 
Michelle Pfeiffer. Clooney is an immature newspaper columnist who 
wakes up one morning to find he's got custody of his six-year-old 
daughter for the week. He's the type that feeds his kid Tic-Tacs and 
Smores and routinely forgets to do certain key things. One of the key 
things he's supposed to do on this fine day is call Pfeiffer and tell her 
his daughter doesn't need a ride to school after all. And of course he 
forgets.
        That means Pfeiffer and her six-year-old son, in the same 
class as Clooney's daughter, end up late for school and miss the big 
field trip. They show up at the same time Clooney does, and the 
sparks fly, in that cute, flirtatious movie way. Clooney and Pfeiffer 
share a cab back into the city, complaining about each other into 
their respective cell phones, and begin their hectic workdays with 
children en tow. Rest assured their paths will cross many a time 
until eventually they realize they're madly in love with each other.
        Yes, there is a plot in there somewhere. Pfeiffer has to show 
a presentation to some clients at 2:00 and must race across town to 
fix the scale model her kid was responsible for breaking, and 
Clooney has to track down an interview before 5:00. And somehow 
they switched cell phones by mistake. Little contrivances like these 
add up for Clooney and Pfeiffer and they have to humble their 
stubborn pride and admit they need each other's help.
        This movie would be excrutiating if not for a few details, 
like the fact that the script actually does contain a lot of laughs, 
minor and big, and that Clooney and Pfeiffer do have a weird kind 
of chemistry. The concept of George Clooney as a romantic lead 
wouldn't have occurred to me in a thousand years -- it's about as 
ridiculous as having him play Batman -- but he doesn't do a bad 
job at it. Now if he'd only get rid of that damn haircut...
        Michelle Pfeiffer was well-cast as the harrowed control 
freak who tries to juggle all those balls on her own, and the two kids 
are personifications of the word "cute." It does go on for way too 
long, but ONE FINE DAY makes for a good date movie (not that 
_I'd_ know about such things) and a not-half-bad teenybopper chick 
flick. I don't fall into either of those categories, at least not on a 
surface level, but still found the movie pleasantly entertaining.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for Jason Goes to Hell: The Final Friday (1993)
IF IT'S FRIDAY, IF IT'S THE 13TH, IT MUST BE FRIDAY THE 13TH
     What do decapitated teenagers, machetes and hockey masks all have
in common?  Easy, they're all prominently featured in the "Friday the
13th" films, those classic horror movies of the 80's we all know and
love like a part of us (say, a severed arm or leg).  What other movie
can you name offhand that was deep and meaningful enough to spawn eight
sequels?  GONE WITH THE WIND?  Hardly.  CITIZEN KANE?  Jason could rip
that proverbial rosebud to shreds with his bare hands.  No, the "Friday
the 13th" movies are clearly what celluloid was created for, with their
poignant dialogue ("John?  ...John is that you?  ...John? ...John?
AAAAAAAHHHH!!!"), creative death scenes and of course, the enigmatic
killer Jason.
     Supposedly drowned in Crystal Lake at the tender age of seven,
Jason Voorhees lurked in the depths of the lake for twenty years, until
he felt the time was right to begin murdering teenage campers.  By the
end of FRIDAY THE 13TH PART VIII, JASON TAKES MANHATTAN, the total body
count was 83 (according to a reference in FRIDAY THE 13TH PART IX).
Never mind that the series would have us believe Jason lived in the
lake for fifteen years and didn't age, yet in the second movie, five
years later, he was an adult.  That just proves that the "Friday the
13th" movies are too deep for any of our finite minds to understand.
     The first 13th movie was released in the Reagan election year of
1980.  Of course, in that one, Jason isn't the one doing the killing,
it's his mean ol' mama (played by Betsy Palmer) out for revenge.  You
see, the reason Jason drowned at summer camp was because the counselors
were too busy with ... uh ... other things to help.  So fifteen years
later, when someone tries to re-open the camp, Mrs. Voorhees decides
to celebrate by killing the new counselors.  The first movie doesn't
give us Jason but it does give us plenty of gore, including a spear
through the chest, axe in the forehead and an excellent decapitation
effect at the end.  Watch for that, unless, of course, you're seeing
the movie on TV.  In that case, forget seeing any of the decapitations,
axe-murders, maimings, gougings, stranglings, beatings and knifings.
     The first movie was successful enough that the next year, through
the scientific miracle of cloning, the producers were able to make a
sequel that looks exactly like the original, with only a few minor
variations.  This time, Jason himself takes up the family hatchet,
passed on to him from his beheaded mother, and slays some horny teenage
camp counselors himself.  No, it doesn't take place at Camp Crystal
Lake (or Camp Blood, as the townsfolk often affectionately refer to it)
again.  The senseless killings occur at the camp across the lake,
which--and correct me if I'm wrong--is never given a name during the
movie.  It's five years after the last series of brutal camp murders
and no one has heard from Jason since.
     Suddenly, on FRIDAY THE 13TH (PART 2), the killing starts up
again.  It seems Jason is out for a little revenge for his mother's
dismemberment, which we relive at the beginning of this movie.  In
fact, the first hour of this sequel replays the last half hour of the
first movie--in slow motion!  Then, in horror movie tradition, the
teenage girls are stalked, in a script obviously written by a teenage
boy.  Take, for instance, this sample dialogue:
     TEENAGE GIRL: Oh my God!  I'm being chased by a madman in a hockey
mask with a hatchet!  Whatever will I do?  ... I know, I'll take off all
my clothes and go skinny-dipping!
     Yes, this is your typical horny teenager movie, with ample sex and
violence.  Rest assured that I didn't see any of the sex, as my mom was
standing by with the remote control, ready to zap anything she deemed
unsuitable.  All in all, I got to see about ten minutes of the movie.
But I did manage to see some pretty gruesome stuff.  For example, some
guy in a wheelchair with a machete implanted across his face.  Ouch!
He might need more than one Band-Aid to take care of that cut!
     The second movie also attracted movie goers across the country who
enjoy the intellectually-stimulating scenes of sex and violence.  At
this point the producers could have released a third movie that was an
exact rehash of the first two with nothing to add to the legend, but
they decided to go one step further and make a sequel that was an exact
rehash, blah, blah, blah, and was also in 3-D.  FRIDAY THE 13TH PART 3
had all the usual 3-D gags (baseball bats and yo-yo's shoved in the
screen) in its theatrical showing (both days of it), but when it was
released on home video, somebody forgot to throw in the 3-D glasses.
So when you watch the video, you see constant inane 3-D gimmicks, like
someone's eyeball flying into the camera, but since you don't have the
glasses, you have to let your imagination do all the work.
     At least FRIDAY THE 13TH PART 3 isn't set at summer camp again.
This time the killings occur in a cabin and barn in the woods.  We meet
the eight victims, who have no names, just the usual horror movie
stereotypes.  There are two horny ones, two chain pot-smokers, two
normal ones, a fat joker with a huge afro (who is constantly faking his
gory death trying to scare his friends so when he actually does walk in
with his throat slit, no one cares), and the poor girl who is dragged
along as the fat joker's date.  As usual, only one girl (it's always
one girl) is left alive by the end of the movie, and she is
relentlessly stalked for the last half hour.
     FRIDAY THE 13TH PART 3 is the first one to have Jason's trademark
hockey mask (in the last Friday the 13th, he had a pillowcase or
gunnysack or something tied around his head to conceal his disfigured
face).  He gets the mask from the fat joker, who was trying to scare
his date with it.
     And of course they couldn't let the saga end with FRIDAY THE 13TH
PART 3.  Too many people would commit suicide when faced with the
prospect of no more "Friday the 13th" movies, so in 1984 FRIDAY THE
13TH--THE FINAL CHAPTER was rushed out.  Yeah, right!  And I guess
FRIDAY THE 13TH PART V is THE FINAL CHAPTER: FRIDAY THE 13TH PART 2.
Without a doubt, THE FINAL CHAPTER is the worst "Friday the 13th" movie
in the whole series.  The usual innovative, creative ways of murdering
teenagers are discarded in favor of the more traditional
blood-and-guts.  It's not entertaining gore like in the first three
movies, it's just disgusting.
     At the onset, Jason's body is being taken to the morgue.  Of
course, it doesn't stay there for long.  Jason revives somehow, with
his hockey mask still on and without the axe wound which chopped up the
mask at the end of FRIDAY THE 13TH PART 3.  He immediately sends a
couple hospital employees to the morgue themselves, if you know what I
mean, with the aid of a hacksaw and scalpel.  He then goes back to the
woods near ol' Crystal Lake, where a group of the horniest teenagers
anyone's ever seen have moved into a rented cabin.  Rest assured that
most of them will be moving out real soon ... in body bags!  And, when I
say horny, I mean horny.  What is this, a horror movie or a soft-core
porn flick?  My mom fast-forwarded through at least half of the movie.
     Despite the appearance of three people I'd actually heard of
(Crispin Glover--George McFly from BACK TO THE FUTURE; Bruce
Mahler--Fackler from POLICE ACADEMY 1, 3 and 6; and future teen idol
Corey Feldman.  I didn't say they were famous, I just said I'd heard of
them.), the movie still stank like last year's milk.  And yes, Jason
does die at the end of the movie--*again*, but take a look at the title
of FRIDAY THE 13TH PART VI.  Five additional sequels may clue you in to
the fact that Jason and Michael Meyers (from the Halloween flicks) have
drunk the same immortality potion.
     As predicted, the suicide rate did go up in 1984 once movie-goers
took THE FINAL CHAPTER's title literally, finding there was nothing
left to live for. "If Jason dies, I die," one poor lad's suicide note
read.  The folks at Paramount held a conference and decided lives were
too precious to let the series just end.  After all, if the "Friday the
13th" dry spell had gone on any longer, the nation would have a
full-scale riot on its hands.  So out came FRIDAY THE 13TH PART V: A
NEW BEGINNING in 1985 and the nation began to thrive once again.
     In FRIDAY THE 13TH PART V, the massacre is at a halfway house in
the woods, with some teenage mental patients and troublemakers.  (Is
Jason ever going to get out of the woods?!)  This time someone beats
Jason to the first murder.  A homicidal punk that happens to be
chopping wood misses once and ends up hacking a poor fat kid to death
with the axe.  This bloody murder inspires Jason to kill the rest of
the patients himself and one by one he hacks each of them into tiny
bite-size pieces.  As bad as these movies are, you have to admit that
they've completely redefined the fine art of gore.  For instance, in
FRIDAY THE 13TH PART V, we see someone killed by having a lit motorist
flare rammed down his throat, plus Jason uses an interesting device on
one kid that cracks his skull as it is tightened.  What's next?
Alka-Seltzer tablets on the eyeballs?
     You won't believe this, but there are actually three people left
alive by the end of the movie and only one is a girl.  The other two
are a white guy and that Dudley kid from "Diff'rent Strokes." Gary
Coleman may have been in this movie too, but he's too short for me to
tell.  What I do know is the youth of America were glad to have their
13th movies back once again, even if it looked like the series was to
take a turn for the worse after FRIDAY THE 13TH PART V.  If you've seen
FRIDAY THE 13TH PART V you know that it wasn't really Jason murdering
in that one, but a copycat killer (someone who made copies by day and
killed cats by night).  And if you haven't seen FRIDAY THE 13TH PART V,
your life will be destroyed by your knowledge of that immense secret
before seeing the movie.
     The people wouldn't stand for a Jason imposter and they let
Paramount know it. 20,000 people turned out to picket on a fateful day
back in 1985.  The angry protesters held signs reading "Bring Jason
Back" and "Ve Vant Voorhees" (a touching sentiment from a German 13th
fan).  Paramount decided to bring back the original Jason for FRIDAY
THE 13TH PART VI: JASON LIVES, which came out in 1986.
     If you can hang in there through the first few scenes, you'll
discover that FRIDAY THE 13TH PART VI is actually a pretty entertaining
movie.  Tommy Jarvis, the same kid who killed Jason last time, goes to
the cemetery to dig up Jason's bones just to "make sure" he's really
dead.  He makes sure, all right, when Jason comes back to life and
murders Tommy's friend.  Tommy goes to the cops with the terrible news,
but--as in every single horror movie since the beginning of time--they
don't believe him and lock him up.
     Of course, the sheriff's beautiful daughter lets him out and the
two of them go back to Camp Crystal Lake to stop the masked menace.
Yes, those geniuses have opened the camp again, but they changed the
name from Crystal Lake to Forest Green.  This doesn't fool Jason.  He
hacks up the poor counselors and terrorizes the young campers, as well
as taking care of a few War Game hunters (you know, the ones who go
into the woods and stalk each other with paint guns).  The movie's best
moment comes when one of the hunters shoots Jason with the paint gun.
Jason looks down at the paint splatter in amusement--then rips the
guy's arm off!  Maybe I just have a weird sense of humor...
     In fact, the theme of this movie seems to be "Severed Body Parts"
(hey, wasn't that last year's prom theme?) and that's exactly what we
get.  In addition to the aforementioned arm, Jason also takes off a few
heads.  He should really be more careful.  He might hurt someone!
     Everything was back on track, but none of the screen writers
contracted by Paramount could think up an original idea for the seventh
chapter in the "Friday the 13th" saga.  So they decided to rip off
Stephen King.  The official subtitle of FRIDAY THE 13TH PART VII is THE
NEW BLOOD, but we insiders like to call it JASON VS. CARRIE.  The main
character is a telekinetic girl named Tina who presents Jason with his
greatest challenge to date.  Not that anything can stop him.  In FRIDAY
THE 13TH PART VII, he is shot, blown up and basically brutalized by the
girl's levitated projectiles.
     We find out Tina inadvertently caused her father's death as a
young girl and has been institutionalized ever since.  She's checked
into a cabin near Crystal Lake for a weekend of heavy therapy with her
doctor and mom.  She goes down to the lake alone and focuses all her
mental powers on the lake, in an attempt to raise her drowned father
from the dead.  She ends up reviving a well-rested Jason instead.
Oops.  But it was a simple mistake.  After all, her father was a hockey
player.  And, as would be expected, no one believes her tall tales
about the man in the mask.
     Most of the murders in FRIDAY THE 13TH PART VII are just your
basic routine hackings, but a few are noteworthy, even to a fine
connoisseur of "Friday the 13th" movies like me.  For instance, Jason
attacks a woman zipped up in a sleeping bag.  He picks her up, feet
first, and swings the head of the bag into a tree.  Ha ha ha!  ...
Well, I guess you just had to be there.  Another one that caught my eye
amid the mindless choppings was Jason ramming a sharp object (either a
meat thermometer or a small lawn sprinkler) into a girl's eye.  And yet
another has Jason chasing a woman through the woods with a long-handled
electric buzz saw with an even longer cord!
     The gratuitous two-and-a-half star rating is due to Jason's
showdown at the end with Tina.  Even though we all know none of her
mental attacks will harm Jason in the least, it's still fun to watch
him get hit with the flying nails and other manifestations
come-to-life.
     The "Friday the 13th" producers had finally hit their stride.  And
for FRIDAY THE 13TH PART VIII they decided to film a screenplay that
was original, amusing and suspenseful.  But they were determined to
work around those things and make a movie for the 13th fans.  And in
1988 we got Jason Takes Manhattan.  I never thought I'd give three
stars to a "Friday the 13th" movie, much less one with so many numerals
in the title, but FRIDAY THE 13TH PART VIII is several breaths of fresh
air over the tired 13th concept of campers in the woods.  Jason
actually does get out of the woods this time, as he decides to go to
New York for some sun, fun and axe murders--the three ingredients for a
successful vacation.
     Contrary to the title, most of the movie doesn't take place in New
York, but on a cruise ship filled with high schoolers on a senior trip
to New York, many of whom won't be returning on the trip back.  Jason
stows away on board, utilizing some of the luxury liner's best
features.  For example, he takes one of the red-hot rocks in the ship's
sauna and sears an unsuspecting teen.  Believe me, it looks a lot worse
than it sounds.
     Three of the teens (plus two teachers) manage to escape the
deranged Jason and make it to New York safely on a lifeboat.  Bad
news:  So does Jason.  The Manhattan setting provides some of the best
moments in the whole "Friday the 13th" series.  A few examples:
     --Jason going nine rounds with an aspiring young boxer, who 
challenges him to "give me your best hit." Jason knocks the guy's head 
off.  The decapitated head turns up later on the dashboard of a police 
car.  Boy, and I thought fuzzy dice were tacky...
     --Jason kicks over a street gang's stereo.  The gang's about to jump 
him when his raises his hockey mask, showing them what's 
underneath.  They decide to leave him alone.
     --Jason riding the subway, where he completely fits in with the 
other New Yorkers.
     --Jason looks up in bewilderment as he sees a giant hockey mask 
on a billboard.
     What I'd really love to see is a cross between JASON TAKES
MANHATTAN and HOME ALONE 2: LOST IN NEW YORK, with Jason stalking
Macaulay Culkin.  Instead, four years later, the ninth and final entry
in the series was released, JASON GOES TO HELL.  Silly me.  I actually
thought Jason might be dead after that swim he took in the toxic waste
at the end of FRIDAY THE 13TH PART VIII.  Nope, he's alive and well,
face reconstructed and in perfect health after a rejuvenating trip to
Dick Clark's plastic surgeon.
     And he's somehow made it back to his old house at Crystal Lake,
where he's up to his old tricks, as we see at the beginning, when a
teenage girl just happens to walk in to the empty house, take off all
her clothes and take a bath in the abandoned Voorhees house.  They
always say none of the things that happen in the "Friday the 13th"
movies ever come from real-life experiences.  This scene proves them
wrong.  As a matter of fact, I know a lot of girls that routinely bathe
in abandoned houses.  Of course, they've all seen Elvis and been
abducted by UFO's, too.
     Actually, it turns out the nude bathing girl is a plant, designed
to lead Jason into the woods, where he is gunned down and blown up by
the SWAT team.  That's the last we see of Jason for an hour and twenty
minutes.  After that, we get a ridiculously contrived story-line about
Jason's spirit possessing about half the people in Crystal Lake, as he
attempts over and over again to kill his sister and niece.  You know a
horror movie's in trouble, plot-wise, when it stoops to stealing the
plot from other really bad horror movies, in this case Halloween II, 4
and 5, not to mention the worked-to-death plot about being able to
inhabit the form of anyone he chooses.
     It's definitely not a movie for true "Friday the 13th" fans.  I
should know, since, after all, I'm a member of the official "Friday the
13th" Fan Club, complete with limited edition cubic zirconium hockey
mask pin and the series of commemorative plates depicting the best
murders in the 13th series (I particularly like to eat my meals off the
one that has Jason ramming a lit motorist flare down an unfortunate
teenager's throat).
     Speaking of creative murders, this movie couldn't be more lacking
in that category.  We don't get 3-D darts (from FRIDAY THE 13TH PART
III) or motorist flares (featured prominently in FRIDAY THE 13TH PART
V), we just get routine hackings, like in THE FINAL CHAPTER, FRIDAY THE
13TH PART IV.  This movie's almost as bad as THE FINAL CHAPTER, making
it the second-worst movie in the 13th series.  JASON GOES TO HELL is
even worse than the 3-D one!  Hopefully, Jason won't be coming back to
life yet again for FRIDAY THE 13TH PART X.  And I mean that!
     After this overview of all nine Friday movies, I'm sure you
statisticians are looking for something a little more practical than
mere star ratings.  And for you and anyone who's stuck at home on
Friday night and wants to watch people being murdered on a TV screen
instead of just looking out the window and watching people get killed
(like I can in my neighborhood), I have put together a best-to-worst
ranking for the movies. 8, 7, 1, 6, 2, 3, 5, 9, 4.  If you don't give a
damn about watching bad horror movies, then just use those as lucky
lotto numbers.
     Still others may wonder while watching the movies what criterion
the writers have established for the characters, deciding who gets to
be the lucky girl that survives the massacre and get the best of
Jason.  It's hard to say exactly, but I can certainly tell you what
behaviors are sure to get you killed in a "Friday the 13th" movie.
Smoking pot, drinking beer, sleeping with someone, insulting the main
character, talking about how absurd it is to think Jason is still
alive, ranting and raving about how Camp Crystal Lake has "a death
curse," playing a practical joke on one of the other characters, taking
a crap in an outhouse (FRIDAY THE 13TH PART V only), taking a shower or
spying on someone skinny-dipping or taking a shower will all get you a
one-way ticket to the afterlife.
     When all other movies are long since forgotten, the "Friday the
13th" movies will live on.  No time capsule on 20th century
civilization would be complete without them.  And don't you dare think
the "Friday the 13th" canon is complete.  In coming years you'll see
FRIDAY THE 13TH PARTS X, XI and MCMLXXXVIII hit a postage-stamp-sized
screen at the nearest mall quasiplex.  And remember--if the calendar
says it's Friday the 13th, the power just went out and there's a burly
man in a hockey mask standing over you with a machete in hand, don't
say I didn't warn you...

Title
Review for Lost World: Jurassic Park, The (1997)
        THE LOST WORLD is one of those rare movies we all go to 
see because we think we have to. There are one or two of these every 
year, and each one seems a bigger `event' than the last one. These 
movies aren't really any better than most of the other ones we line 
up to see, but for these  and God knows why  we'll stand in line 
twice as long and take cramped seats in crowded theaters. THE 
LOST WORLD is the only sequel to an event movie that's been a 
bigger event than the original. And, as usual, none of us know why.
        This is Steven Spielberg's first film since Schindler's List. 
>From looking at it, he must have taken a nice three-year vacation, 
because he certainly wasn't throwing all that work into THE LOST 
WORLD. By now, Spielberg and the audience know how these 
action sequels go. The returning characters know they're dooming 
themselves to more near-death experiences for no good reason, but 
they go anyway. Kind of like all of us lining up to see the movies 
themselves.
        Lost in the LOST WORLD casting this time around are Sam 
Neill, Laura Dern and Samuel L. Jackson. The only ones to return 
are Jeff Goldblum, Richard Attenborough and those two bratty kids. 
Luckily, the last three are limited to a cameo appearances at the 
beginning and end. Attenborough's purpose in the sequel is the 
same  he has to be the idiot who sends humans into the dinosaurs' 
natural environment. This time, he's converted `from capitalist to 
naturalist,' interested only in the welfare of the surviving dinosaurs.
        The original JURASSIC PARK island has been destroyed, 
but naturally there is a `Site B' island not mentioned in the first 
movie. Lots and lots of computer-generated dinosaurs, and 
Attenborough wants to send a team of experts in there to endorse the 
habitat, or else his board of directors will wrestle control away from 
him. You see, things are already going wrong on the hidden island. 
A little girl was attacked by a group of tiny dinosaurs. She lived, of 
course. Little girls don't die in these movies.
        He wants Goldblum to be one of the four to go onto the 
island, but of course Goldblum resists, remembering the T-Rex 
attack the last time he listened to Attenborough. I was wondering 
just how stupid he'd have to be to agree to set foot on another 
dino-infested island, when a convenient plot device was thrown in. 
Goldblum's paleontologist girlfriend (Julianne Moore) is already on 
the island, jumping at the chance to study real live extinct dinosaurs. 
So he has to go protect her personally.
        Goldblum heads to the island in a camouflage Mercedes 
with a photographer and some other guy. It's a bad sign that we 
have no idea about this third guy  bad for him, anyway. It means he 
becomes dino-meat before the end of the first hour. There's also a 
stowaway; Goldblum's young daughter hides in the equipment 
trailer, eager for a chance to bond with Dad. God knows there's no 
better way to get close to your parents than running from 
velociraptors together.
        And, in another Michael Crichton plot twist left over from 
TWISTER, there's a rival team of experts in the picture, but these 
guys aren't good because they're only interesting in harnessing the 
dinosaurs for physical profit. That means lots of victims for the 
dinosaurs. One of them, heaven forbid, has come for the sole 
purpose of killing a Tyrannosaurus. It's the ultimate macho hunting 
expedition for him and, sure, this is pathetic, but are we really 
supposed to hate him for capturing a baby T-Rex and using it as bait 
for the adult? I mean, come on, Tyrannosaurs aren't choir boys; 
they're deadly killers. They ate that lawyer in the first movie.
        Things move pretty slowly for the first hour or so, like the 
original JURASSIC PARK, although the slow parts of the first film 
were interesting because they explained the processes for bringing 
dinosaurs back to life. It was educational; I was able to resurrect a 
stegosaurus in my backyard the very next week. This time we have a 
little bickering between Goldblum and Moore and Goldblum and the 
daughter.
        It's bad filler, and the action scenes aren't a whole lot 
better. There's a tired 20-minute scene with two T-Rexes trying to 
push the trailer (with Goldblum, Moore and the photographer 
inside) over a cliff. In grand action flick tradition, the trailer hangs 
precariously for a few minutes while the three of them almost fall 
out of it, then the three hang from a rope for a few minutes and 
almost fall from that. A whole eighth of the movie is wasted on this 
one tired sequence.
        THE LOST WORLD can't match JURASSIC PARK for 
sheer action. The entire last half of the first movie was devoted to 
non-stop action scenes with the dinosaurs and other threats, most of 
which were genuinely thrilling. This time, some of the stuff seems 
like a parody of the original. One need only watch the scene with 
Goldblum's daughter defeating a velociraptor through a gymnastic 
act on a bar to know what I'm talking about.
        The novelty of dinosaurs in the modern-day world has worn 
off since the last movie; now we need something one step further. 
What we get from Spielberg is an inferior retread of the first movie, 
minus most of the characters. It's mostly second-rate, including a 
climax in which one of the Tyrannosaurs gets loose in modern-day 
San Diego. Nothing we haven't seen in 30 Godzilla movies. Let's 
just hope Spielberg's next project isn't a sequel to SCHINDLER'S 
LOST, although he could use the same slogan as THE LOST 
WORLD: `something has survived.'
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Can't Hardly Wait (1998)
        Either all the critics are wrong or I'm wrong, but I liked CAN'T 
HARDLY WAIT. They say it rips off other teen party movies like SAY 
ANYTHING, SIXTEEN CANDLES, DAZED AND CONFUSED and FAST TIMES AT 
RIDGEMONT HIGH, all of which I liked. I say that's because all these 
movies are based in part on the screenwriters' high school experiences, 
and let's face it, every high school is pretty much the same. They say 
the characters are all one-note stereotypes. I say so are at least two-
thirds of teenagers, or at least they behave in stereotypes because they 
think that's how they're supposed to act.
        I will admit, there's not a lot of intelligence or originality in 
CAN'T HARDLY WAIT, but it's the kind of movie that gets into your psyche 
and makes you laugh all over again at the same old stuff, root for the 
same good characters and hate the same bad characters. And it may 
even make you wish you could go back to that big graduation party all 
over again. Hell, I turned down the invitation to my big graduation 
party, so movies like this and college parties are all I've got.
        The main character is Preston (Ethan Embry, formerly of 
EMPIRE RECORDS), the soft-spoken writer type who's carried through 
high school an obsession with Amanda (Jennifer Love Hewitt, the 
victim of a lot of obsessions right about now), the prom queen who's 
just been dumped by boyfriend Mike (Peter Facinelli, a dumbed-down 
Tom Cruise), the football quarterback who's now trying to convince all 
his jock friends to dump their girlfriends and join him for a summer of 
commitment-free sex with a string of babes.
        Rounding out the ensemble are Denise (Lauren Ambrose), the 
independent thinker no one remembers; Kenny (Seth Green), the 
white kid who talks ghetto and wears goggles as a fashion statement; 
and William (Charlie Korsmo), the nerd who's been picked on all 
through high school and now wants revenge on Mike. He enters the 
all-night keg party while his geek friends wait on the roof, debating 
"Star Wars" and "The X-Files," and showing each other their 
retainers.
        CAN'T HARDLY WAIT is filled with cheap, predictable humor like 
that, but somehow I liked it, and I liked the characters, especially 
Denise and Kenny, who end up locked in a bathroom for most of the 
movie. There are some real groaner moments, most of them coming 
when the movie tries to be serious (and having a stripper Jenna 
Elfman as the instrument of redemption just plain doesn't work), but 
for what it is, it's a good movie.
        You can listen to all the grownup critics if you want, but I've 
got a level head on my shoulders (thumbs-up to THE TRUMAN SHOW, 
thumbs-down to GODZILLA) and I personally think CAN'T HARDLY WAIT 
is worth ticket price just to see a drunken Korsmo, the Kid from DICK 
TRACY, singing "Paradise City" and ripping his shirt off while all the 
popular girls drool over him. It just proves that the best moments in 
teen movies aren't about the stuff we know will happen but the stuff we 
wish would happen.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for Fair Game (1995)
        This is the movie that could single-handedly bring "Mystery 
Science Theater 3000" out of cancellation. It's one of those movies 
that's so bad it's absolutely hilarious, due in no small part to its big 
star, supermodel Cindy Crawford. If you only remember one thing 
about FAIR GAME, it should be that it singlehandedly proves 
Crawford should stick to the Sports Illustrated swimsuit issues. If you 
thought Kathy Ireland was laughable in ALIEN FROM L.A., you'll 
change your mind when you see FAIR GAME. Ireland would win 
handfuls of Oscars if this was her only competition.
        In a real casting coup, Crawford plays a super-intelligent 
lawyer (in a jogging bra, of course). We all know this is a stretch, the 
only legal opinion Crawford has ever put forth being that she favors 
the death penalty for anyone who wears white after Labor Day. 
Nonetheless, someone out there thought she'd make a good lawyer, but 
we're reminded of her true function in the movie when she takes two 
showers in a period of twenty minutes. And for you horny teenage boys 
out there, you actually get to see her topless for two seconds in the 
dark... Come to think of it, that may have been a body double. Cindy 
Crawford isn't black, is she?
        Like I said, Crawford is a lawyer with a bunch of Russians 
after her. Billy Baldwin (or is it Stephen? Alec? Adam? Kim 
Basinger?) is the police detective who has to save her life, time after 
time, chase after chase, explosion after explosion. There's absolutely 
nothing original about this movie. It's every cop show of the 70's 
mixed with every action thriller of the 80's and every technology-
exploitation movie of the 90's. Three decades of crap all in one place, 
driven further into the ground by Crawford's complete lack of acting 
talent. And it's all completely predictable. You know the mistakes 
Baldwin and Crawford are going to make before they make them, you 
know when the "sexual tension" will finally end up in them 
consummating the relationship, you know when the villains will 
capture Crawford so Baldwin has to rescue her in the climax and you 
know the movie's going to suck from the first scene.
        The plot isn't really explained until the end. All we know is 
these Russians have every detail about Crawford in their computer. In 
the words of one of the villains, "We even know what size pantyhose 
she wears." (Yeah, you and every 14-year-old boy in America.) He 
goes on to add, "We know more about her than she does." (_That_ I 
find very easy to believe.) I hope you enjoyed those two sample 
dialogue quotes, because I wrote down plenty of other bad ones 
("If it weren't for me, you'd still be pulling bananas out of your ass in 
Cuba!") because, you see, FAIR GAME is not only a showcase for 
recycled action cliches and terrible acting, but also some seriously bad 
dialogue.
        It all adds up to a really terrible movie that made me laugh in 
plenty of places I wasn't supposed to and grimace in places I was 
supposed to laugh. One more thing FAIR GAME has against it is some 
awful comic relief. Would you laugh at a scene where Crawford 
tortures a computer nerd with double entendres like "I'm very 
interested in _hard_ware" and other crap about playing with his 
joystick? I wouldn't, but not because I'm a computer nerd. It's just not 
funny. Crawford's only contribution to the Information Age are a few 
GIF files floating around with her head on a nude Traci Lords' body... 
or was it Jack Lord's body?
        I'll leave you with the final line of dialogue in the movie. The 
boat with all the Russians has just blown up and Baldwin and 
Crawford are floating on a life raft. Crawford says woodenly, "That 
was my client's boat you just blew up. I'm filing a lawsuit against you. 
You're in big trouble," or something to that effect, and Baldwin replies 
smugly, "What do I have to do to get out of it?" They of course begin 
making out and the credits roll. I'm not going to talk about how stupid 
the line is or how, if they'd really wanted to go for a bad closing line 
they would have had Baldwin say, "You think I could settle out of 
court?" but I will tell you that, if anyone ever suggests you watch 
FAIR GAME with him or her, you quote the final line of the movie to 
that person: "What do I have to do to get out of it?"
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America for over 1/50th of a century!

Title
Review for House of Wax (1953)
        You always take a certain amount of risk when deciding to 
watch really old movies, even ones that are supposed to be classics. 
HOUSE OF WAX stars one of my favorite actors of the past, the late 
Vincent Price, who always lends a hilariously macabre feel to anything 
he appears in, from horror classics like THE TINGLER to token 
appearances in more recent efforts like EDWARD SCISSORHANDS 
and Michael Jackson's "Thriller" video. (MIKE: I'm not like other 
guys, but I do _like_ other guys.) Hell, he even cracked me up as 
Egghead (the heretofore uncredited predecessor of the Coneheads) on 
the 60's "Batman" show. And he's good in HOUSE OF WAX too.
        The problem with this movie is that even though Price's 
performance is excellent as usual, the movie itself just isn't very 
entertaining. It's one of those movies that's only 90 minutes long but is 
still padded with needless and boring material. In HOUSE OF WAX, 
Price gives two extended tours of his wax museum that serve no better 
purpose than filling space. Another sequence shows two characters 
exchanging a brief conversation while watching women dance at a 
vaudeville show. After their fifteen seconds of dialogue, we see the 
entire dance number for no reason. And yet another waste of time is a 
sequence on the opening day of Price's museum, when a barker with 
two ball-and-paddle toys tries to attract customers. It may be an 
entertaining scene but it serves no purpose.
        Price plays a wax sculptor whose investment partner burns 
down his museum while he's in it to collect the insurance money. Price 
is presumed dead but later resurfaces, opening a new wax museum, 
while a series of murders and subsequent body-stealings from the 
morgue begins. The weird part is every time a body disappears, a 
spitting image of the person pops up in Price's wax museum. One 
woman puts two and two together about the same time Price tells her 
she would make the perfect Marie Antoinette for a display he's about 
to make. Uh-oh!
        You might think going to all the trouble to kill a person, steal 
his body from the morgue, drag him back to the museum, dip him in 
wax and then put him on display is morbid and time-consuming but 
it's still a hell of a lot easier than carving the statues yourself, believe 
me. I had been carving a statue of Kurt Cobain for three weeks before I 
realized I could just steal his corpse. Then again, his head may not be 
in the best possible condition for display.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Rainmaker, The (1997)
        THE RAINMAKER carries on the tradition of transforming 
John Grisham novels into big screen blockbusters. This one, though, 
leans less toward the early Grisham action thrillers like THE FIRM 
and THE PELICAN BRIEF and more toward the courtroom drama 
of A TIME TO KILL and THE CHAMBER. It's about a young, white-
bread lawyer who overcomes the odds and scores a victory for the 
less fortunate, and it's preachy as hell. However, with director 
Francis Ford Coppola at the helm of a large, likeable cast, THE 
RAINMAKER refuses to sink under the weight and predictability of 
the storyline.
        Matt Damon is the hero this time around, just out of law 
school and cramming for the bar exam. He takes a job with a shyster 
(Mickey Rourke) who sets his lawyers up on a commission basis and 
sends them out to chase ambulances. Damon learns the ropes from 
an older, wiser, unlicensed associate (Danny DeVito) and gets his 
first clients, an old lady changing her will (Teresa Wright) and a 
not-as-old lady (Mary Kay Place) whose son is dying of leukemia.
        Just as Rourke gets nailed by the FBI and Damon passes the 
bar, he and DeVito partner up to form their own unholy alliance. 
Claire Danes comes along at about the same time, as a young 
woman whose husband put her in the hospital. Hers is the 
predictable subplot that will haunt the movie until the end, as 
Damon falls in love with her, she leaves him and they decide to go 
back and get her stuff. I assume this sidebar was trimmed greatly 
from the novel, but in the Cliffs Notes version THE RAINMAKER 
movie affords us, we see enough to know this is the same old Wife-
Beater Gets His plotline with no new twists.
        It's the Corporate America Gets Theirs plotline that most of 
THE RAINMAKER is concerned with. The leukemia kid bites the 
dust and the family sues the insurance company for wrongful death. 
The company denied their claim eight times, so he missed his 
treatment. There are plenty of courtroom scenes, much less 
sophisticated than we're used to, where young Damon has to orient 
himself to court procedures and fight off the high-paid insurance 
company attorney team (led by a sneering Jon Voight). It's never in 
doubt what the eventual outcome will be and which surprise witness 
will bring it.
        As I've maintained these last four paragraphs, the plot is 
weak, and the constant sermonizing against both the legal 
profession and the e-e-e-evil insurance companies only makes the 
movie less appealing, but thankfully, the actors trapped in this story 
bring their own charm. There's a lot more humor than you might 
expect, particularly from DeVito and the two judges in the case 
(Dean Stockwell and Danny Glover), so the movie is worth 
watching, but on the whole, it's a low-rent A TIME TO KILL.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America for more than 1/25th of a century!

Title
Review for Batman & Robin (1997)
        I'm as big a fan of the Batman franchise as any, but I think 
it's time for a mercy killing. BATMAN & ROBIN is easily the worst 
of the four recent BATMAN films. It's about on the level of the 1966 
BATMAN movie; and that's no compliment. The '60s Batman was 
taken as an abomination of comic book purity, but it was at least 
funny and well-written at times. Akiva Goldsman's script for 
BATMAN & ROBIN would probably earn him a D+ in a ninth grade 
creative writing class.
        The dialogue is a long string of horrible puns and cliches, 
and the serious parts are even worse. The core of a good movie is 
good writing, and rotten writing lies at the heart of a bad movie. The 
art direction here is about the same as BATMAN FOREVER, even 
using the same black light costuming and computer-generated 
swooping graphics of Gotham City. The movie looks great but still 
sucks because core is crap. You can dress a turd up in a nice little 
baby bonnet, but it's still a turd.
        Nothing remains the same from movie to movie in the 
BATMAN films. Different costumes, different villians, different 
Batmobile, even a different Batman. In one of those casting 
decisions I'll never understand, they picked George "ER" Clooney 
for BATMAN & ROBIN. He was passable in FROM DUSK TILL 
DAWN, but he does nothing here to distinguish himself as Batman. 
He's neither good nor bad nor memorable, but then again, it doesn't 
really matter who's under the mask as long as it's a slim, dark-haired 
white guy. It could be Howard Stern or John Bon Jovi for all we 
care.
        It's always the villains that distinguish BATMAN films, 
from Jack Nicholson's Joker to Michelle Pfeiffer's Catwoman. 
Casting Arnold Schwarzenegger as Mr. Freeze seemed like a good 
idea until I actually saw him in costume. Head shaved, painted silver 
from head to toe in foreboding Tron armor that glows in the dark. 
The bad writing is spread all around, but Freeze is the only 
character who delivers 100 percent rotten lines, from "The iceman 
cometh!" to "Forecast: cool!" They make comic book dialogue 
balloons seem like they were written by Hemingway.
        The rest of the cast is more or less adequate, although we 
can never get over the garbage that's coming out of their mouths. 
Returning actors Chris O'Donnell as Robin, Michael Gough as 
Alfred and Pat Hingle as Commissioner Gordon all step right back 
into the roles they've filled before, and cameo players with five or 10 
lines each, like Elle MacPherson as Bruce Wayne's steady girlfriend 
and Vivica A. Fox as Freeze's lusty henchwoman (FOX: I'm hot for 
you. FREEZE: I'm cold for you.) liven things up a little.
        Then there are the two leading babes -- Uma Thurman and 
Alicia Silverstone. Thurman plays comic book creation Poison Ivy, a 
character irresistable to men who is similar to Carolyn "Morticia" 
Jones as Marsha, Queen of Diamonds in the "Batman" TV show. 
She's beguiling as always, even with green plant eyebrows, but her 
character is written as a retread of Catwoman in BATMAN 
RETURNS. Both had origins as hard workers who stumbled upon 
their evil bosses' secrets and then the bosses tried to kill them. 
Catwoman was brought back by cats, now Poison Ivy is revived by 
nature itself.
        Silverstone, who already seems past her prime, is Batgirl, 
whose origin is a retread of Robin's. Like O'Donnell in the last 
movie, she comes to stay at Wayne Manor after her parents are 
killed (I don't think people are allowed into Wayne Manor unless 
their parents are dead), stumbles upon Wayne's secret and decides 
she wants to fight crime too. There's even a repeat of the scene 
where Robin goes out by himself to battle a gang of neon thugs, 
then ends up being bailed by Batman. Here, it's Batgirl who does the 
fighting and Robin who does the bailing.
        Just about everything in BATMAN & ROBIN borrows from 
past films. Mr. Freeze's origin story is similar to Two-Face's. Both 
did good for their fellow man -- Freeze as a scientist trying to find 
the cure for his wife's disease (This is the second time in three years 
Schwarzenegger has been uncredible as a scientist.) and Face as a 
district attorney -- and went awry after an on-the-job accident. 
Freeze falls into a vat of freezing solution and somehow survives, 
although his appearance is greatly altered. In that respect, he might 
as well be the Joker.
        The two villains eventually pair up, just like Penguin and 
Catwoman in BATMAN RETURNS and Riddler and Two-Face in 
BATMAN FOREVER. Villains in Gotham City have to pair up 
sooner or later, and this time there's a third super-villain. It's Poison 
Ivy's henchman Bane, a grunting bohemoth who is created out of 
some kind of super plant solution. In the comic book, Bane was the 
ultra-intelligent villain who put Bruce Wayne out of commission; 
here, he's dumbed down to make Schwarzenegger's character seem 
like his IQ is above 100.
        The plot is pretty shoestring here. Freeze wants to freeze 
the city; Poison Ivy wants to kill Batman and Robin. There's not 
much else to it -- a fourth of the movie is pure, convoluted action, 
another fourth is origin scenes, a third fourth is criminal activity and 
the last part is trouble in the Wayne household. Alfred's dying, and 
they draw it out as much as they possibly can, so that eventually we 
want to kill the old guy ourselves. Then there's Batman and Robin 
fighting amongst themselves over Poison Ivy and how Batman 
always has to be right. The height of this pathetic dramatic 
exchange is Robin's line, "I'm sick of the Batsignal, I want a 
Robin-signal!"
        BATMAN & ROBIN is on the elementary level as far as 
writing goes. Schumacher has taken the worst elements of 
surrealism and bad dialogue in BATMAN FOREVER and run with 
them. Nothing is the least bit believable anymore, from the opening 
stratosphere fight with Freeze on. There's a fifth BATMAN script 
finished, but if it has the name Akiva Goldsman on it, I doubt many 
people would tune in tomorrow. Same bad writing, same plot 
cliches.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Jing cha gu shi IV: Jian dan ren wu (1996)
        The commercials announce, "Jackie Chan fights for 
America..." Yeah, even though Jackie Chan's never been to 
America and this movie was made in Hong Kong. FIRST STRIKE 
is an accurate title for this movie, which isn't nearly as good as 
RUMBLE IN THE BRONX. Two more movies like this and he may 
indeed strike out in America. I saw this one the week after its 
release and there were only twenty people in the theater. METRO, 
which opened the same day as FIRST STRIKE, was packed. 
Moviegoers in this hemisphere apparently prefer people who 
speak their language.
        Jackie Chan movies are like porno movies. There's one 
attraction and everyone knows what it is, but you have to sit 
through a bunch of poorly-written dialogue and bad acting to get 
to the good stuff. It's a good thing Chan is a master at what he 
does. The action sequences in his movies are always amazing, 
more so because all the stunts are real -- no blue screens and 
no stuntmen. The actors are the stuntmen, and they do a much 
better job with the stunts than the acting.
        The plot this time is a continuation of the POLICE STORY 
series (which previously brought us the English-dubbed SUPERCOP), 
with Chan working for the Hong Kong government to follow a 
woman to the Ukraine. Her brother has a nuclear device and 
everyone wants it, including the new KGB, not nearly as cagey 
as before. Midway through the movie, Chan's own organization 
turns on him and he has no one to turn to when framed for the 
murder.
        The plot is always convoluted in these movies, and 
always a mere accessory to set up the action, so forgive me if 
I screwed up the details. All you need to know is Chan's the 
good guy and everyone he fights with is the bad guy. As 
always, there's a beautiful Asian woman to protect, only this 
time the woman doesn't get into the act by doing any of the 
action herself. As an employee of UnderWater World (the 
sister theme park of Under Dances With Wolves), she does 
provide the setting for the movie's climactic fight sequence.
        There are four main action sequences in the movie. 
The first comes in the Ukraine with a combination snowmobile / 
snowboard chase that ends with Chan falling from a helicopter 
into an icy river. Next is the Australia scene in which Chan 
is on vacation and two burly men visit his hotel room, followed 
shortly by Chan fending off a school of black belts with a table 
and a step ladder (the best scene in the movie) and the climax 
at UnderWater World, involving sharks, stingrays and a bunch 
of bad guys in wetsuits.
        It's like a real-life James Bond movie because Chan 
and everyone else is doing everything onscreen with no special 
effects. Every Jackie Chan action sequence is eye-popping; 
it's the rest of the movie that seems unbearable. What the 
world needs is an all-action Chan movie with no plot -- a 
greatest hits package, maybe. I mean, my God, the man's 
starred in at least twenty movies. That would improve his 
standing with American audiences, because we all know Chan 
could beat up Arnold, Stallone, Van Damme and the rest using 
only two fingers on his left hand.

Title
Review for Beach, The (2000)
Normally, I try to avoid pitting novels and their film adaptations against
each other. Side-by-side comparisons are inevitable, of course, but
when i read the book and then go right out to see the movie, whether
each is good or not, I can't help noticing the subtle differences. The
things that were cut, the things that were changed, the things that
now make far less sense because of the other things that were cut and
changed.
I was about 40 pages from the end of Alex Garland's novel THE BEACH
when I saw the big-screen version. Like many adaptations, the
intricacies of the original story were cannibalized, simplified or
straight-up ignored in the movie. The substitute? Vague, steamy sex.
Sex that was only contemplated or not mentioned at all in the book now
becomes necessary because this is a Leonardo DiCaprio vehicle, and
that means the female element will be coming to see it. I guess director
Danny Boyle (Trainspotting) thinks the female element likes its
cinematic sex vague, steamy and seemingly out of left-field.
So, completely gone in the movie version are most of the moments of
human politics and wry humor. The voice of the narrator in this movie
isn't the one from the book -- it's Leo's, obviously, but the words aren't
usually even the same. They're dumbed-down, less clever, mostly
humorless and designed to fit in with the overall lack of subtlety in
DiCaprio's performance. He probably considers the early outbursts of his
character (absent from the book version) to be foreshadowing, but to
me they spoil most elements of nuance or surprise that should come
later on.
You want an example of a movie that perfectly captured the essence of
its source book? Look at the David Fincher-directed Fight Club. It
crackled with the kinetic energy of the book, condensing ideas instead
of simplifying, finding ways to show rather than tell or eliminate. Boyle
buries the narrative by moving from Point A to B to C, and so on. The
reasons why don't make much sense to newcomers. Motivation from
these characters? As far as the movie is concerned, the whimsy and
boredom on their faces are all the motivation that can be explained
within the given running time.
That's not to say THE BEACH is entirely bad; it's a fairly well-botched
adaptation job that manages to bring to life the sequestered, Eden-like
world of the book. I mentioned Fight Club because the opening of The
Beach almost reminded me of it. Leo's character is a world traveler out
on his own -- that's about all the background we get -- who is just now
touching down in Bangkok in search of thrills. While an edgy techno
score plays, Leo throws back a shot of snake blood while the assembled
group of Thais looks on, impressed with his American angst.
At the two-bit hotel he's staying in, walls so thin they don't even reach
the ceiling, Leo overhears the incoherent ramblings of a drunken
Scotsman (Robert Carlyle, who feels no pain and can push himself
longer and harder than any normal man). He's rambling about some
idyllic beach society that's hidden away from the eyes of modern man.
And he even has a map to the place, which he leaves for Leo to find
after he (i.e. the drunken Scot) slashes his wrists in the dead of night.
On a whim, Leo decides to strike out for this beach. On another whim --
a steamy, vague whim -- he asks the neighbors (Guillaume Canet and
Staffan Kihlbom, the French couple he could hear through the walls) to
go with him. And, no questions asked, no deliberation shown, they head
for the island, which is located on designated Marine Park land. That
means they have to swim from the next island over, and after Canet
and Kihlbom play a practical joke on him, we see just how volatile the
movie protagonist can get.
The movie shows us the island in all its tour-book beauty, as well as the
obstacle course travelers have to go through to arrive at THE BEACH. In
particular, the enormous waterfall and field of pot, carefully tended to
by the Thai drug dealers who occupy half the island. (Idyllic hippies and
Thai druglords sharing an island -- sounds like a bad, neo-"Gilligan's
Island" sitcom premise, doesn't it?)
Naturally, the politics of this secret society ("a full-scale community of
travelers not just passing through but actually living here") are toned
way down in the movie version. There's no real exploration of the work
details, no Tet festival, no food poisoning, and the "Jed" character (one
of the book's best) is missing entirely. What we do have are Keaty
(Paterson Joseph), the black Briton the Leo character bonds with, and
Sal (Tilda Swinton), the somewhat volatile unofficial leader of THE BEACH
group. This being DiCaprio country, the absence of plot politics is
compensated with an abundance of vague soap steam, most notably an
underwater, "phosphorescence" love scene.
THE BEACH was called the first mainstream Generation-X novel, but the
movie has been stripped of any such context, save the sampling of
Apocalypse Now moments and surreal Sega-game vision toward the
end. Now it's in Hollywood hands, which means the most profound idea
expressed is the paradox of trying to create an ideal paradise in a
frighteningly unideal world. These travelers want to hop from place to
place, experiencing thrills, but only as long as it comes with the
illusion
of uncharted territory. Too many other travelers there, and the original
people come to resent it. Rifts are created. Problems arise. (Oh, and
there's the Fight Club-familiar notion that ours is a generation raised in
unsatisfying, ungodly technological nightmare, and that there's no sane
way for us to cope.)
The ending is also of the "less complicated, more Hollywood" ideology.
We're denied the (ironically) much more cinematic shock-value ending of
the book, although I'm betting the MPAA wouldn't have been too keen
on that. Anyway, like I was saying, the reason I don't normally read
books before watching and reviewing their movie counterparts is
because of the nitpicky comparisons that result. This time, though, the
differences are enormous and noticeable and really distract from the
experience.
On a superficial level, I enjoyed the cinematography in THE BEACH, and
the virtual unknowns in the cast all hold their own with Leo. (You have
to wonder why DiCaprio is the only person anyone's heard of in The
Beach. Was there only $20 million in the casting budget to begin with?)
Even the cannibalized plot has some merit -- i.e. not all the book's
nuances are missing here -- but overall I'd definitely say this movie has
only the illusion of uncharted territory.
http://students.missouri.edu/~ahicks/movies.html

Title
Review for Breakdown (1997)
        BREAKDOWN is a typical reality-breaking action flick, but 
it isn't marketed as such. The slogan for BREAKDOWN is "It could 
happen to you." Conceivably, I guess, I could end up hanging under 
the spare tire holder of an 18-wheeler doing 70 on the highway, but 
I probably have a better chance of marrying Strom Thurmond. For 
the first half-hour, BREAKDOWN is completely believable and 
utterly compelling, but takes a turn toward the absurd once Kurt 
Russell drives his Jeep off a cliff and ends up floating it down a set 
of river rapids.
        The set-up is a good one. Russell and his wife (Kathleen 
Quinlan) are on a cross-country trip, in the middle of a desert 
highway. They almost run into a redneck pickup truck, then are 
accosted by the selfsame rednecks at the nearest gas station. 
Plausible in real life -- them rednecks is rude. Then the new car 
breaks down on the side of the highway and a trucker (J.T. Walsh) 
stops to help them. Russell has Quinlan accept a ride with Walsh to 
a diner up the road, where she can call a tow truck. Also plausible.
        After awhile, Russell realizes what's wrong with the Jeep 
and fixes it. Then comes the interesting part. He reaches the diner 
and no one has seen or heard of his wife. Russell's panic button goes 
off as a million possibilities cross his mind. We assume the 
possibilities are crossing his mind, at least, because Russell isn't the 
most versatile actor in the world. It's all still plausible as Russell 
races up and down the highway and soon spots the bigrig that 
picked up his wife.
        Walsh denies ever having seen his wife, and the town 
sheriff is no help in believing one's story over the other. I was 
wondering at this point just what kind of intelligent explanation 
they'd have for Quinlan's disappearance, and how Russell could find 
her again in a believable, roundabout way. To say the people 
involved in BREAKDOWN took the easy way out is a huge 
understatement. Instead of giving us some massive conspiracy 
theory, it turns out it was a kidnapping and the redneck captors want 
only $90,000. It's THE VANISHING meets DELIVERANCE meets 
DIE HARD.
        BREAKDOWN is one of the smallest-scale action movies of 
recent years, one that doesn't even deserve summer release status 
next to the likes of Schwarzenegger and Willis. Still, it's a decent 
warmup for summer once you get over the fact that the movie, 
which seems original at the beginning, is just another story about an 
unlikely hero who has to kill bad guys and escape death to rescue 
someone close to him. In the world of crazy action movies, there's 
no room for character development and no time to stop and make 
sense of what we see onscreen. The BREAKDOWN people use that 
to their advantage.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Joe's Apartment (1996)
        See if this makes sense to you. MTV, the network that has 
given the current generation of teenagers a short attention span and 
craving for sex and violence, makes a non-violent, non-sexual movie 
out of something that was originally two minutes long. It is -- to 
quote the Green Day video they've been playing all summer -- a 
walking contradiction.
        JOE'S APARTMENT, a low-budget, low-plot, low-
intelligence and even lower comedy level movie, is based on a 
very short film that has been airing on MTV since about 1993. In 
that film, a young man brought his pretty young date up to his place 
and was about to score when a couple hundred talking cockroaches 
fell out of the chandelier and down the woman's dress. It was a 
decent one joke, two minute piece of entertainment.
        Now comes the ninety minute version, where we get 
Joe's life story. He's just out of college and trying to find a cheap 
apartment in New York City. Some old woman dies right in front 
of him and he decides to move into her apartment, but the punk 
landlords want him out, beginning a few rounds of lowbrow 
harrassment. Also wanting him out of the apartment is a transvestite 
senator who has bought out the leases of every surrounding 
building, Joe being the only thing keeping him from building a 
giant prison on the property.
        So Joe moves in and finds out he has a few thousand 
roommates, a bunch of talking cockroaches who also sing and 
dance on occasion. He reacts in surprise, digust, etc. but they 
like him so much he eventually accepts life with 40,000 talking 
insects. And he meets a woman named Lily who wants to make 
the delapidated neighborhood into one big garden for the kids 
to play in before getting shot. Joe, of course, falls in love instantly 
and -- wouldn't you know it? -- she turns out to be the senator's 
daughter.
        The plot is right out of a hundred other comedies with 
slightly unique premises driven into the ground. The idea of an 
apartment inhabited by talking cockroaches has potential but never 
goes anywhere because the writing is lame and the plot so stale and 
transparent, not to mention the fact that the Joe character is just 
plain annoying. JOE'S APARTMENT alternates between petty 
conflicts with the hoodlum landlords and scenes of Joe trying to 
find a job or impress Lily. None of it is any good and the only 
times the movie elevates itself past awful and up to the level of 
pretty bad are when the cockroaches do their three song-and-
dance numbers.
        MTV should have realized what they were getting into 
when they decided to inflate something to almost fifty times its 
original length and anyone who went to see this should have known 
better. JOE'S APARTMENT is ridiculously bad, unfunny beyond 
belief. It gets the one-star rating on the strength of two short 
sequences -- the song-and-dance number where the cockroaches 
swim in the toilet and the final sequence, where everything turns 
out happy and the cockroaches turn the apartment into a charismatic 
church, complete with pipe organs and a crippled cockroach who is 
healed by faith. Unfortunately, this crippled little movie is never 
healed by faith or anything else.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Modern Times (1936)
        Not so modern, actually, but in the more than sixty years 
that have passed since MODERN TIMES was released, it has 
remained one of the indisputably hilarious classics of the early 
Hollywood era. Charlie Chaplin, the king of the silent film, made 
his last full-blown silent feature here, playing a hard-luck working 
class hero. MODERN TIMES flows effortlessly from set-up to 
set-up, setting a standard for physical comedy that has been 
seldom approached since, Woody Allen's BANANAS and 
SLEEPER almost being exceptions.
        Chaplin satirizes the world of corporate bureacracy and 
economic depression, playing an assembly line employee whose 
job is to screw nuts onto the parts as they go by. This provides 
instant opportunities for humor as Chaplin tries to keep pace with 
a speeded-up conveyor belt (in a sequence that undoubtedly 
inspired the famous "I Love Lucy" chocolate factory episode) 
and later goes becomes mentally unstable and starts screwing 
everything that moves (in a sequence that undoubtedly inspired 
Ted Kennedy).
        The movie shifts as Chaplin is carted off to an institution, 
is released and later sent to jail after accidentally setting off a 
workers' demonstration by picking up a red flag that fell off a truck 
and waving it in the air for the owner to see, thus attracting the 
workers who thought he was praising the virtues of Marxism and 
causing the authorities to see him as a Red. This kind of mistaken 
identity humor has been retooled over and over again these past 
six decades in movies and sitcoms but has never seemed so fresh 
and funny as it does here.
        MODERN TIMES, besides being one of the quintessential 
film comedies and a thinly-veiled critique of capitalism, also has 
some poignant romance moments as Chaplin meets a beautiful 
orphan girl (Paulette Goddard) and the two fall quickly in love, 
longing for a house to move into. Chaplin tries to find work to 
save up for the house, first as a night watchman in a department 
store and later as a singing waiter (who forgets the lyrics and has 
to instead sing a hilarious nonsense song).
        The whole movie is a wonderful experience, and it's even 
more amazing that such a piece of entertainment was constructed 
with no dialogue. But that Charlie Chaplin was a comedic genius, 
even if he did have the same moustache as Hitler. Aside from 
scripting, directing and starring in MODERN TIMES, he also wrote 
the famous song "Smile" for this film, half a century before Michael 
Jackson got his gloves on it for his effeminate cover version on the 
HIStory album. So the man has inspired not only the face of modern 
comedy but a certain corner of pop music as well, although I doubt 
that moustache of his will ever come back in style.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Terror Train (1980)
        There were four movies that earned Jamie Lee Curtis the title 
of "scream queen" in the early '80s. Two of them were HALLOWEEN 
movies, but the other two -- PROM NIGHT and TERROR TRAIN -- were the 
uninspired knockoffs that came directly after the success of HALLOWEEN. 
The same "God, I'm scared, there's some guy in a mask coming after 
me" routine she did in John Carpenter's classic, Jamie Lee copies here, 
with none of the urgency or suspense.
        TERROR TRAIN takes place on (where else?) a train, charted by 
some pre-med students finishing their first four years of higher 
education. Most of them won't make it to med school, though, and it's 
obvious from the foreshadowing done when the conductor complains, 
"I wish to hell they'd put a radio on that train." The conductor 
character probably has the most lines of anyone, even Jamie Lee. From 
the beginning, he's talking his head off (He tells one of his co-workers 
"Think on this -- when's the last time someone built a shopping mall 
next to a train station?" as if it makes any kind of sense) and it only 
gets better as he engages himself in an argument about the benefits of 
railroad over recreational vehicles. Of course, the loudmouth 
conductor is the first person to find a bloody body, which is then gone 
when he brings a skeptical trainman back to view it.
        I forgot to mention the prologue. It's a party three years 
earlier, with the same group of students. Two of them play a trick on a 
geeky frat pledge, promising him he's going to get laid. They send 
Jamie Lee up to stand behind the bed and talk to the geek as he comes 
in, noticing a form on the bed. She says, "Kiss me, Kenny," and he 
kisses the body on the bed, which happens to be a cadaver. ("Oh my 
God, they killed Kenny! You bastards!") It's a sick trick, and one 
Jamie Lee wasn't let in on. She still hasn't forgiven the guy as they 
board the terror train ("You asshole, you can't have a good time 
without hurting somebody!").
        The killing starts before the train even leaves the station. 
Since it's New Year's, everyone's wearing disguises (a convenient plot 
device we've seen before), and someone stabs the guy in the Groucho 
mask when no one's looking. At least one of the characters says it's a 
Groucho mask; when the killer dons it and steps aboard, it looks like 
Gene Shalit who, by the way, would make a great killer in a slasher 
movie. Speaking of weird-looking dorks who still persist on the 
entertainment scene, one of TERROR TRAIN's most famous gimmicks is 
the appearance of David Copperfield "as The Magician," who regails 
those aboard with illusions set to disco music. Then there's his greatest 
trick -- getting laid with hair that looks like that.
        For all its attempts at visual style and substance, TERROR TRAIN 
is more Lionel than Amtrak, more PROM NIGHT than HALLOWEEN, and 
nothing really worth watching. Only die-hard fans of Jamie Lee Curtis 
and David Copperfield (if he truly has any fans) should even attempt 
to watch it. And it makes me wonder if a horror movie set in an RV 
could be much worse. I mean, when was the last time someone built a 
shopping mall next to a train station, anyway? TERROR TRAIN is 
definitely the cinematic equivalent of a sleeper car.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for Running Man, The (1987)
        Somewhere along the line, Arnold Schwarzenegger actually 
developed a passable acting technique, but THE RUNNING MAN 
comes before that time. His wooden performance is just one of the 
reasons this movie will never be more than a mediocre movie 
experience for people who don't have the sense of humor to 
appreciate just how dismal the 80's action formula was working 
by this point in Arnold's career. This movie, like the far superior 
TERMINATOR and TOTAL RECALL, provides a science-fiction 
backdrop for the mindless violence, in a more extreme, futuristic 
version of "American Gladiators."
        In the year 2019, we read at the beginning, America has 
become a police state where the only thing citizens care about is 
television. And the most popular game show is "The Running 
Man," where convict contestants are promised great prizes if 
they can escape the "stalkers," bohemoths like Subzero (the 
hockey killer), Buzzsaw (the chainsaw biker), Dynamo (the 
operatic electrocutioner) and Fireball (blaxploitation star Jim 
Brown with a flame thrower).
        Schwarzenegger is the only contestant to ever offer the 
stalkers a serious challenge, and he is of course an innocent man 
fighting for his freedom. The savage media has edited a newsreel 
video of Schwarzenegger in such a way that it frames him. It's up 
to Arnold to fight for his life against the stalkers so he can draw 
attention to the deceptions of the media (because, obviously, 
savage violence is the only way to bring about truth). We all know 
the Reverend Wildmon would be twice as successful in his crusade 
against TV violence if he'd put on a lyrca jumpsuit and kick some 
Gladiator butt.
        Adapted from a Richard Bachman (a.k.a. Stephen King) 
book, THE RUNNING MAN at least has a sense of humor about 
itself, making game show host Richard Dawson into a celebrity. 
As for the serious parts, well, they don't seem so serious anymore. 
Pretty much the entire movie is laughable at this point, and it's safe 
to say the best place to preach about people's lives being influenced 
by what they see on TV is not a violent Arnold Schwarzenegger 
movie.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Babysitter, The (1995)
     I'm really starting to wonder about Alicia Silverstone.  Sure, she
is one of the most beautiful creatures on God's green earth (second
only to that Movie Critic at LARGE guy), but when it comes to choosing
what movies she stars in, she always strikes out.  The Crush was a
slow-moving, predictable piece of fluff.  Hideaway was a horrific novel
adaptation Alicia had only a minor role in.  CLUELESS was an annoying,
unfunny waste of time.  And people have e-mailed me too, saying
CLUELESS is a good movie and that I'm the only one who doesn't like
it.  One girl said if I'd seen the movie with "an open mind," I would
have enjoyed it.  Nothing could be further from the truth.  I went into
the theater expecting to love the movie.  The preview looked good and of
course I'm crazymadinlove with Alicia, but the movie was a bunch of bad
jokes coming from whiny, unlikable characters.  Almost everyone I saw
the movie with felt the same way.  When we were walking out of the
theater, one guy (and it wasn't me) yelled out, "That was the worst
f$in' movie I've ever seen" and the rest of us had to laugh in
agreement.
     So last night I walked into the video store and saw Alicia's
pretty face on the cover of some made-for-video thriller called The
Babysitter.  I knew it would be bad but some inner compulsion I'll
probably never understand made me rent it anyway.  What I got was 90
minutes of regret--the worst Alicia Silverstone movie ever.  And you
already know from the last paragraph what the competition is like.
     Where to begin in criticizing this movie? The plot is a thin shred
that moves slower than a glacier, the writing could have been done (and
for all we know it was) by a ten year old, Alicia is the star and she's
still wasted in a movie that has no appeal whatsoever.  There is zero
humor, zero suspense, zero drama and zero action, until the last ten
minutes, when the story is needlessly and pointlessly concluded with a
violent sequence.  Zero plus zero plus zero plus zero equals zero.  So
why does this movie get one star out of me? Well, Alicia spends twenty
minutes of the movie in the bathtub.  And if it wasn't bubble bath, The
Babysitter would have instantly joined the ranks of our other four-
star features, but you settle for what you can get.
     Alicia plays a babysitter who's spending Friday night looking
after two kids whose parents are out getting drunk at a cocktail
party.  And of course anyone as beautiful as Alicia automatically
spends their Friday nights at home (at least that Movie Critic at LARGE
guy does).  As the movie trods along, we discover she's not only the
mostly-silent star of the movie but also the object of every male
character's fantasies (and probably every male viewer's too).  The
drunken father thinks she's just the thing to recapture his lost youth,
her boyfriend lets his imagination run wild while spying on Alicia from
outside, even the prepubescent boy looks in on Alicia through the
bathroom keyhole while she's taking her bubble bath.  They even throw
in the middle aged wife's fantasies about a male counterpart at the
party.  Not that any of us asked or ever even thought about seeing this
200+ pound woman in a black silk teddy.
     At least none of the sex fanatasies ever leave the realm of the
PG-rated.  In fact, I could imagine THE BABYSITTER becoming a Cinemax
late-night staple if not for the fact that there's absolutely no nudity
in it.  So you can't call it a sex flick.  I've already pointed out
that it can't fall under drama, comedy, thriller or action, so what do
you classify THE BABYSITTER as?  Bad.

Title
Review for High School High (1996)
        Even though it seems more parody movies are being 
released than ever, the well is quickly drying up. The last truly 
good one was the second HOT SHOTS movie back in 1993, and 
that judgment is certainly debatable. The thing is, with the old style 
parody films, they still seemed like actual movies. You go to the 
theater to see SPY HARD or DON'T BE A MENACE and come out 
thinking you dreamed the entire thing. That's just how bizarre the 
parody movies have gotten. Or maybe I've consumed too much 
Canola oil.
        HIGH SCHOOL HIGH is Jon Lovitz's first starring role, 
which is the funniest thing about the movie. Lovitz was bad enough 
in TRAPPED IN PARADISE, and there he had Nicolas Cage and 
Dana Carvey to fall back on. Here, he co-stars with Tia Carrere and 
Mekhi Phifer. Yes, that's a real name, not a random series of typed 
letters. If you're interested, this is what a random series of typed 
letters looks like: Mekhi Phifer. Damn.
        DANGEROUS MINDS was pretty laughable, but HIGH 
SCHOOL HIGH as an offshoot of that is infinitely whackier. 
Annoyingly wacky, actually, with so many strained punchlines 
and predictable gags that we're screaming at the top of our lungs, 
"Where's Leslie Nielson?!" Lovitz doesn't fit into the joke-a-second 
parody mold because the protagonists in these movies aren't 
supposed to know what's happening is funny or anything less than 
normal. Lovitz spouts more lame wisecracks here than a Catskills 
comic.
        The genre parodied this time is the inspirational high 
school drama, about an ambitious, idealistic teacher who comes into 
the inner-city school and teaches a bunch of underpriveliged kids to 
love all things school-related. These kinds of movies have been 
around forever, from the days of TO SIR, WITH LOVE on. It's ripe 
for parody but doesn't deserve the treatment it gets here, especially 
with Lovitz at the helm. What can you say about a movie whose 
greatest laugh comes when its main character tries to have sex with 
a cat?
        Lovitz is, of course, the teacher who quits a promising job 
at a prominent college to teach at Marion Barry High, probaby the 
most redundant three words ever. In his first ten minutes there, he 
gets his car stolen, finds himself in the middle of a gang fight and 
gets on the bad side of the principal. He also meets Tia and Mekhi -- 
Tia the administrative assistant he soon falls in love with and Mekhi 
the most popular student in the class, the one the others look up to, 
kind of like Enrico in DANGEROUS MINDS.
        The plot is secondary to the endless stream of sight and 
sound gags. Lovitz has the D.J. at the school dance play "Rhinestone 
Cowboy," a baseball bat gets caught in somebody's afro, Lovitz 
accidentally unravels the principal's dress, miniature police cars race 
around the parts in somebody's corn rows, Lovitz engages in a game 
of chicken with two other students, Lovitz tries to have sex with a 
cat, etc.
        Some of it is funny, mostly the same stuff they put in the 
HIGH SCHOOL HIGH trailer. If you've seen that, you've seen what's 
good about this movie, which just proves David Zucker needs his 
brother Jerry and Jim Abrahams to keep him from churning out crap 
like this.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for Species (1995)
        The original title of this one was ATTACK OF THE HORNY 
SUPERMODEL FROM BEYOND, but the director changed it to 
SPECIES when he realized a title like that would doom the film to 
years of USA Up All Nite airings. Still, the horny alien supermodel is 
the main attraction of the movie, despite the top-billing of 
SCHINDLER'S LIST star Ben Kingsley. It's probably the only time in 
film history that bad science fiction has been given the Oscar-quality 
treatment. Of course, in movies of this genre, good acting is the last 
thing we want or expect. We need the bad acting as much as the 
obligatory shots of slimy, pulsing cocoons and drawn-out climaxes in 
the sewer, both of which are featured in SPECIES.
        The acting, in fact, seems to be the only part of the movie that 
makes it seem like an actual movie, not just some showcase for cheesy 
effects and a foreign model to take her top off at the drop of a 
spacecraft. Natasha Henstridge makes her movie debut as half-
supermodel, half-alien. She escapes government surveillance to begin 
a cross-country flesh rampage in an attempt to breed. Yes, she's 
horny--and dangerous. Called in by the government to hunt her down 
are a couple scientists, a hitman (Michael Madsen) and a guy with 
some unspecified psychic power (Forest Whitaker). Good idea. Read 
her palm to death.
        Although the plot dictates that Henstridge be naked half the 
time in her ongoing attempts to conceive a child, most of the time her 
pods (so to speak) are strategically covered, so don't rent the movie if 
all you want is a peek of flesh. Besides that, there's a certain degree of 
repulsion when Henstridge changes back and forth between 
supermodel and grotesque alien. Thankfully, all the nude scenes are of 
the model and not the alien, though some science-fiction nerds would 
undoubtedly be turned on by the nude alien as well.
        SPECIES is for the most part entertaining, if you overlook 
some of the ridiculous plot points and ineffective scenes of 
manufactured tension (i.e. the one where the two scientists are locked 
in the lab room with the growing alien). The climax scene is boring 
and unoriginal, but the rest of the movie is interesting and made 
watchable by the performances from Kingsley, Whitaker and the rest, 
including beautiful yet mostly silent Henstridge. And those gratuitous 
pod shots don't hurt either.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for In & Out (1997)
        It's taking awhile, but slowly the comedy genre of straight 
actors playing gay guys is going mainstream. What began with 
outrageous dragfests like TO WONG FOO, THANKS FOR 
EVERYTHING, JULIE NEWMAR and THE BIRDCAGE has given 
way to more realistic, traditional morality-threatening films like 
IN & OUT. The beauty of IN & OUT, in its message of toleration and 
individuality, is that it can still be enjoyed by the most homophobic 
hetero men because it's just plain funny.
        Frank Oz, who ten years ago brought us DIRTY ROTTEN 
SCOUNDRELS, directs from a script by Paul Rudnick. A lot of times, 
IN & OUT is just as merciless on pop culture as the Rudnick-penned 
ADDAMS FAMILY VALUES, with the same quota of intelligent one-
liners. It's a good foundation for a movie that is full of extraordinarily 
likeable people -- I loved seeing Joan Cusack, Tom Selleck, Bob 
Newhart and Debbie Reynolds all make me laugh in one movie.
        The leading man here is Kevin Kline, who has exuded 
smarmy masculinity in comedies like A FISH CALLED WANDA and 
FRENCH KISS. The best word to describe his IN & OUT character is 
"prissy." He is an English teacher, absolutely nuts about sonnets and 
Streisand. He wears neatly-tailored suits, rides to school on a bike 
rather than destroy the environment and can't resist dancing no matter 
how hard he tries. It's not as if these are innately bad things, just not 
commonly accepted macho behavior.
        Still, everyone thinks this is all right because Kline is 
engaged to Cusack and has been for the past three years. They haven't 
consummated the relationship, so we sense Kline's "heterosexuality" 
may never have been lab tested. And when the school's most famous 
actor alumnus (Matt Dillon) wins an Oscar (for a hilariously bad turn 
as a gay military officer), dedicating his performance to Kline with the 
words "and he's gay!" all small town hell breaks loose.
        It turns into a media circus, with every conceivable question 
thrown at Kline ("Do you know Ellen?"). Things get unstable. 
Principal Newhart, still stammering as much as ever, makes it clear 
that Kline's job is in jeopardy if what Dillon said is true. Kline's 
parents (Reynolds and Wilford Brimley) begin to come undone. 
Reynolds, almost continuing her MOTHER performance, can't 
imagine going to her grave without throwing a wedding for her son, 
and Brimley... well, old Wilford don't want no fruit for a kid because, 
remember, Quaker Oats are "the right thing to do," not men.
        Selleck, sans moustache and Hawaiian shirt, is the most 
aggressive TV journalist out to make Kline's life hell, and we soon 
find out why. He's very, very gay and he's digging for more than just 
the scoop. Yeah, he's got the hots for Kev, but Kline is in denial and 
Cusack's life would lie in ruins without this wedding. Her situation, 
losing a lot of weight to net a man so she'll have some self esteem, 
deserves almost as much sympathy as Kline's search for a sexual 
identity.
        IN & OUT draws a huge laugh quotient from a still-
controversial premise, and directs it in such a way that it still turns 
into a happy, idyllic ending with a mate for everyone and a MR. 
HOLLAND'S OPUS testimonial climax. Even the villain figures, like 
Newhart and Dillon's insensitive, anorexic model girlfriend (Shalom 
Harlow), are likeable, and boogie with everyone else in the closing 
sequence.
        There's an entirely different genre of serious-as-hell gay 
dramas that focus on the real struggles of the homosexual community, 
but it's this fun fluff that draws the big names and the big bucks at the 
box office. IN & OUT is no exception.
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at:
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving the World for Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Thunderball (1965)
        This James Bond movie will forever be known as the 
underwater one, as it takes whatever interest or fascination anyone 
ever had with scuba diving and crashes it off a cliff, with overkill as 
the driver. This was Sean Connery's fourth appearance as 007, a sad 
follow-up to GOLDFINGER, but not quite as sad as the fifth Bond 
movie, YOU ONLY LIVE TWICE.
        The plot this time has SPECTRE stealing two atomic bombs 
from a crashed NATO plane. So that's overlong underwater sequence 
#1, when the evil scuba divers retrieve the bombs from the ocean floor. 
When SPECTRE demands a huge ransom from the U.S. and England, 
Bond is sent to investigate. He stumbles upon a Frenchman with an 
oceanside house, complete with shark pool and giant yacht. So here 
comes overlong underwater sequence #2, as Bond investigates the 
underside of the yacht and surrounding areas, shortly before a group of 
henchmen/frogmen attack him. There are only so many times you can 
watch someone get his scuba mask ripped off before it becomes 
tiresome.
        The main problem with THUNDERBALL is that such a 
significant chunk of it takes place underwater. Besides the two 
previously-mentioned overlong underwater sequences, #3 occurs when 
Bond finds and investigates the crashed plane, with #4 being the 
climactic underwater fight scene, where dozens of casualties occur on 
both sides. And as usual, Bond gets laid by three different women, 
though to my knowledge, this is the only time he's ever made love on 
the ocean floor (no jellyfish jokes, please). So he's now a member of 
the Mile Below Club. "I hope we didn't disturb the fish," he remarks to 
the lady afterwards. Okay, _now_ you can make your jellyfish jokes.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Red Rock West (1992)
        The only gimmick this movie has going for it is that it has 
more twists and turns than the Coney Island Cyclone. In RED 
ROCK WEST, the movie never moves in one direction for long, 
and you discover something new about each of the characters 
every few minutes that puts a complete spin on everything. It's 
musical chairs without the one person having to sit out after every 
round. No, everybody participates in everything here, and there 
are plot twists on a basis regular enough you could set your watch 
to it.
        At the beginning of the movie, Nicholas Cage, having just 
driven more than a thousand miles for a job he was immediately 
fired from, walks into a bar and is immediately offered a job by the 
owner (J.T. Walsh), who mistakes him for someone else. Cage 
expects some kind of busboy or bartender position but instead 
becomes Head Hitman as the owner gives him five thousand in 
cash and a gun, with instructions to kill his wife. Cage doesn't feel 
himself in a position to refuse, but soon finds himself warning the 
wife (Lara Flynn Boyle) of what's coming. The wife immediately 
turns around and gives him ten thousand to kill her husband.
        Cage soon comes to the conclusion that he is better off 
taking the money and running, but on his way out of town, he hits 
a pedestrain and has to turn around and take the guy to the hospital. 
(He may accept money for killing people, but that doesn't make him 
any less humanitarian.) At the hospital, he meets the town sheriff, 
who also owns the town bar. The sheriff is understandibly mad that 
his hitman was about to skip town, and takes him out to the woods, 
where he tries to hunt Cage down. But Cage makes it to a nearby 
road, where he is picked up by a visiting cowboy (Dennis Hopper), 
who is driving into town on business.
        The cowboy learns he and Cage are both ex-Marines and 
insists on buying a Cage a drink. So where do they go? J.T.'s bar, of 
course, where Hopper tells the bartender he needs to see the owner 
about a job he's late for. Cage puts one and one together and realizes 
Hopper is the hitman, which is about the same time J.T. walks in. It 
may seem like I've given the movie's entire plot away, but this all 
happens in the first twenty minutes. The back of the video box tells 
that much.
        RED ROCK WEST keeps the same pace for the next eighty 
minutes, through countless other twists and surprising character 
revelations, until it all ends in a graveyard where half a million 
dollars is buried. This is a decent action thriller, but it takes on a 
camp value with the overacting and unrelenting plot twists. You 
can't take the movie seriously for a second even though it seems like 
it wants to be. And after about an hour of endless manipulation on 
behalf of the writers, it gets completely tiresome.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Deep Impact (1998)
        There's a 1,000-foot tidal wave at the end of DEEP IMPACT. I'd 
say it pretty accurately represents the towering flood of the last two 
years worth of disaster movies, which are getting more Irwin Allen-
esque with every release. The early wave of this revival, while just as 
cheesy and laughable, at least knew to include thrills every five to ten 
minutes. DEEP IMPACT tries to disguise itself as a human drama, with 
endless filler comprised of disaster prevention plans the country keeps 
taking.
        The repeating cycle is as follows -- the president (Morgan 
Freeman) will go on TV and tell the country that there's a remote 
chance a comet will strike the earth, but that the nation's crack 
scientists and astronauts have some brilliant plan to stop the problem. 
Then we get to see the plan in action, in some sequence utterly lacking 
suspense. The mission will barely fail, and Freeman will tell the 
country that the comet is still headed toward Earth, and there's a 
remote chance it will strike, but that the nation's crack scientists and 
astronauts have some brilliant plan to stop the problem.
        It goes on and on throughout the movie, but every time 
Freeman goes on TV, we know his plan is going to fail. How do we 
know this? Because we've seen the TV ads for DEEP IMPACT, ads that 
feature Freeman telling the nation that "the comet is still headed right 
for us" and show disaster shots of the comet striking Earth and the 
giant tidal wave spreading. Ladies and gentlemen, that is the movie. 
Successful disaster movies have the main disaster toward the 
beginning and more little disasters that follow, but DEEP IMPACT saves 
its one disaster for the end and discloses all in its 30-second TV spots.
        Television is what's wrong with DEEP IMPACT. The main 
character, played by Tea Leoni, is a low-level broadcast journalist for 
MSNBC (and that's the mere tip of the product-placement iceberg) 
who stumbles upon a huge government conspiracy. She thinks it's an 
instance of an ex-Secretary of Something or Other (James Cromwell) 
resigning because of a mistress, and that maybe he took the fall for the 
president in the same area. When she goes nosing around Cromwell, 
he begs her to keep it under wraps. "I know you're just a reporter, but 
you used to be a human being."
        She figures out what's really going on after getting roughed 
up by some FBI men and doing an Internet search, where all good 
journalists learn the difference between a mistress and an extinction-
level comet. Upon a top-secret meeting with President Freeman, Leoni 
agrees to keep the story under wraps until the president can hold a 
press conference, at which she gets to ask the first question. And 
everyone knows, if you get to ask the first question, baby you're a star.
        Leoni ends up in the anchor chair, broadcasting every step of 
the comet's collision course with Earth. And I'm sure it's comforting 
for her to know that, even though the world's ending in a matter of 
months, she's a cable news personality. So there she is, narrating the 
six-astronaut mission to blow the comet up. Such personalities as 
Robert Duvall, Jon Favreau and Blair Underwood cash their paychecks 
and go through the motions of this dragged-out process.
        But as anyone who's seen the commercials knows, the 
astronauts fail. They only end up breaking the comet into two pieces, 
which means even more destruction to the Earth. Yeah, thanks, 
NASA. That's when Freeman has to come on TV for the last time and 
say goodbye to all the people who aren't picked to live in the Missouri 
cave site for two years. They even have animals, two by two, ready to 
climb into the cave. If the focus had been on people living inside these 
caves after the world had been destroyed, DEEP IMPACT could have 
been a far more interesting movie.
        Instead we watch as a lovestruck Elijah Wood defies all odds 
to chase down his young wife, while people pack the highways out of 
town. The reasoning is, of course, that if a comet is going to strike, 
they might as well be out in some scenic rural location. And, 
amusingly, the highway is spotted with people in U-Haul trucks. I'm 
sure it's comforting to know that, even though the world's ending in a 
matter of minutes, the U-Haul people are doing the most business of 
their lives.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for Take the Money and Run (1969)
        It's the Woody and Clyde story in Woody Allen's first 
outing as writer, director and star. In this mock documentary 
satirizing the crime films of the 30's (and of course 1967's BONNIE 
AND CLYDE), Woody plays the most inept criminal on the planet, 
the kind of guy who robs a bank by giving the teller a letter reading, 
"I am pointing a gun at you." But the teller thinks it says "gub" and 
calls over another teller to get a second opinion. Finally Woody is 
sent to the manager's office because the teller can't hand out money 
without written authorization. By the time Woody realizes what's 
going on, the cops are there.
        That's the kind of movie TAKE THE MONEY AND RUN is, 
so wacky it's surreal. A lot of the other early Allen films had that 
kind of feel to them, movies like BANANAS and SLEEPER. Those 
were both twice as funny as TAKE THE MONEY AND RUN, which 
has at least one failed gag for every successful one. The movie 
begins with an early biography of Allen's character, explaining 
that he took up a life of crime to pay for cello lessons.
        There's a shot of Woody playing the cello in a marching 
band -- sitting in a chair and playing for a few seconds, then 
running to catch up with the rest of the band and sitting back in 
his chair (one of the gags that works) -- followed by a comment 
from his embarrassed parents, so embarrassed that they are wearing 
Groucho moustaches to disguise themselves (one that doesn't) 
that Woody didn't know how to play the cello at all. He blew into 
it (works). The movie alternates between the ones that are funny 
and that aren't while always being watchable.
        So he's carted off to jail, something he narrowly avoided 
a few years back. (You've heard of the women-in-prison movie 
genre -- here's the Woody-in-prison movie.) As always, there are 
opportunities aplenty for jokes, both verbal and visual, mixed 
together expertly like only he can. One minute Woody's telling 
the prison psychiatrist an ink blot looks like "two elephants making 
love... to a men's glee club" and the next he's escaping prison using 
a bar of soap carved into a gun, until it starts raining and his gun 
turns into soap suds.
        It wouldn't be a Woody Allen movie if he didn't work 
romance in somehow. Woody meets a girl (Janet Margolin) on a 
park bench and narrates, "After fifteen minutes I was completely 
in love with her. And after thirty I had completely given up the idea 
of stealing her purse." If only we could all experience such bliss, 
but even Woody has problems when he ends up in jail again, on 
a chain gang this time. The man is a genius for manufacturing 
premises that lead to a variety of joke-producing situations, 
although this movie has its share of classic moments, that 
genius isn't as fully developed in TAKE THE MONEY AND 
RUN as his comedies of the early 70's.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Vacation (1983)
National Lampoon's Vacation (1983) *** (out of four)
        For my money (and I don't have much now... but I will. I 
will! Ha Ha Ha!!! ...Sorry, I was having another mad scientist episode. 
Won't happen again.) this is the best of the NATIONAL LAMPOON 
movies (yes, even better than the Corey Haim-Corey Feldman team-up 
LAST RESORT), the best Chevy Chase movie and the best in the 
travelogue genre. VACATION is h-i-l-a-r-i-o-u-s (that spells "funny") 
and also features a skinny-dipping scene with Christie Brinkley.
        Chase plays bumbling family-man Clark W. Griswold, who 
has planned out a cross-country vacation to Walley World (a Disney 
World knock-off, to be sure). But once they get on the open road, the 
Griswold family finds out everything that can go wrong will (Murphy 
Brown's law, right?). Their hubcaps are stolen in East St. Louis (Good 
thing they didn't stop off at McCluer High School), they get lost in the 
desert, their redneck relatives have them take nasty old Aunt Edna 
with them, Aunt Edna dies in the car. Or was that my family's summer 
road trip of 1992? Either way, VACATION is a definitive 80's comedy 
you should definitely take a look at (or you could watch it).
National Lampoon's European Vacation (1985) *1/2
        This is the worst of the VACATION movies, though it wasn't 
as bad this time around as I remembered it. It is incredibly mediocre, 
though, with very few laughs. Chase's trademark bumbling becomes 
more annoying than amusing here, and the casting choices for the two 
kids in this movie seem particularly bad. Sure, there was no way to 
effectively replace Anothony Michael-Hall, who had moved on to 
bigger and better things (if you don't count JOHNNY BE GOOD) since 
his 1983 role as Russ in the first VACATION, but could they have 
found a worse replacement for the daughter, Audrey, than the 
repulsive porker who appears in this sequel? I don't mean to be 
insensitive, but what point is there in casting an overweight teenager 
for a role as a girl obsessed with staying thin, other than flat-out irony 
(which is never even hinted at through the course of the movie)?
        The Griswolds win an all-expenses-paid vacation to Europe 
(a European vacation, you could say) on the game show "Pig in a 
Poke" (perhaps another subtle reference to the fat daughter?) and, as 
we've seen so many times before, everything goes wrong. Only this 
time it's not funny.
National Lampoon's Christmas Vacation (1989) ***
        The VACATION crew redeems themselves here after the 
dreadful EUROPEAN VACATION with a movie that's actually funny. 
And maybe I like this one more because they recast the kids yet again, 
which brings up an interesting point. In VACATION (1983), Russ, the 
male son, looked about fifteen while Audrey, the female son--er, 
daughter--looked twelve. Then, in EUROPEAN VACATION (1985), 
Russ looked thirteen while Audrey looked fifteen. Now, in 
CHRISTMAS VACATION (1989), Russ looks eleven and Audrey looks 
fifteen. What are we to make of a family whose daughter has stopped 
aging and son has had his aging process reversed? I just don't know. I 
don't have the answer to that question. I only printed this in the hopes 
that maybe one day somebody would read this review and explain the 
mystery of the VACATION kids to me so I can sleep again.
        This is the only VACATION movie that isn't a travelogue. 
Instead, every relative in the Griswold family gathers at Clark's 
(Chevy Chase) house for Christmas and--as always--pandemonium 
ensues. Thankfully, this sequel is well-written and funny, very much 
unlike EUROPEAN VACATION, and includes every Christmas 
scenario imaginable, including Chase hanging 5,000 lights outside his 
house and the cat getting electrocuted by the Christmas tree. It's good 
in December, sure, but I watched it in May and still enjoyed it. See if 
you can say _that_ about IT'S A WONDERFUL LIFE. Well, maybe you 
can, but try saying it three times fast.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Men in Black (1997)
        Last year at this time, the number-one box office attraction 
was INDEPENDENCE DAY, featuring a wise-cracking Will Smith 
battling aliens. This year at this time, the number-one box office 
attraction is MEN IN BLACK, featuring a wise-cracking Will Smith 
battling aliens. History repeats itself. I repeat myself. Both movies 
are effects-driven action romps that play much better in a packed 
multiplex on a huge screen. The flaws, I'm sure, shine through a lot 
brighter if you're home by yourself watching it on your 13" Sony.
        The plot of MEN IN BLACK is simplified to an almost 
Corky-like point -- funded by but independent from the U.S. 
government is a super-secret organization that tracks and controls 
extra-terrestrial activity. A group of Armani-suit-clad men in black 
carry out the peaceful and violent tasks of the organization, although 
for plot purposes, we only see the violent ones.
        Tommy Lee Jones, pretty much reprising his character in 
THE FUGITIVE, is the no-nonsense veteran of alien battle. Will 
Smith, absolutely reprising his ID4 character, is the young, cocksure 
cop recruited by Jones toward the beginning, after Jones sees him 
chase down an alien on foot. Smith doesn't know it's an alien, of 
course, and once he finds out his memory of it is erased by Jones 
with a gizmo that comes in handy for anyone with something to 
cover up. Clinton would never have been sued by Paula Jones if he 
had one.
        Smith and Jones are out to track down an insect alien 
inhabiting Vincent D'Onofrio's human body. The alien is after some 
diamonds that turn up on a dead alien body attended to by kinky 
morgue worker Linda Fiorentino. She's in the movie, as always, to 
add a little sex appeal, although her flirtatious scenes with Smith 
mostly fall flat. It's her unsurprising but still interesting turn as the 
film's third hero that elevates her from being just another movie 
sexpot.
        Rick Baker, hot off his plumper work in THE NUTTY 
PROFESSOR, does the alien effects here. A lot of them are 
standard-issue "creature" aliens, like the oversized beatle that serves 
as the movie's villain. There are weird-looking but harmless Cantina 
band types and a few nice touches, like the talking pug that steals a 
scene about halfway through the movie. The effects aren't 
groundbreaking, or really even that special, but they do help keep 
the movie entertaining.
        The best thing about MEN IN BLACK is the men in black -- 
Smith and Jones. They have so much fun with their roles that we 
have fun watching them. The movie also has enough constant 
one-liners that it seems more comedy at times than action, like a 
modern-day GHOSTBUSTERS. The downside to it all, and this is 
what separates it from the far-superior and far-funnier 
GHOSTBUSTERS, is it's incredibly low-brow. For every funny line 
there's a lame one, and the plot is transparent. If you have a brain, 
leave it at the door or under the seat, because it will only get in the 
way of your fun. If you don't have a brain, you can't read this 
anyway.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Truth About Cats & Dogs, The (1996)
        Do you want to know the truth about cats and dogs? Do 
you? Well, as this movie shows us, they make good companions but 
pale in comparison to the joy and fulfillment romantic relationships 
can bring. Unfortunately, there's a giant roadblock set up in our 
culture that only certain people can get through while the rest 
of us mill around outside, feeling sorry for ourselves. A Checkpoint 
Beautiful kind of thing, and Janeane Garafolo's character Abby relates 
to it well.
        Like a certain oversized teenage movie critic, she is 
intelligent and has a great sense of humor but strikes out with the 
opposite sex because she sees herself as physically unattractive, and 
the men seem to be backing her up on that. Meanwhile, her gorgeous 
neighbor Nora (Uma Thurman... Uma being the only woman's name 
worse than Nora) attracts men like flies. As Abby tells her, "You burp 
and they think it's cute. You barf and they line up to hold your hair 
back." But Nora's down on herself for being too shallow and 
superficial. We all have our prwhen a man calls in to veterinarian 
Abby's talk radio show wanting to know how to get the roller skates 
off his basset hound. (Oh come on, any idiot knows how to handle 
that problem!) He likes her personality and professional demeanor 
and asks to meet her in person. Abby, though, knows her body 
doesn't match her personality and that she probably won't have a 
chance with him once he sees her. So she gives him Nora's body 
description and stands him up.
        Nora happens to be in the studio the next day when the 
dog man comes by and Abby asks her for a big favor. She goes along 
with the masquerade and the three of them head out for a night of fun, 
Abby assuming the role of a goat cheese farmer named Donna. The 
dog man finds out even though this girl is beautiful, she's not quite 
as intellectual or confident about herself in person, but he doesn't 
suspect anything, realizing he's not living in a "Three's Company" 
episode.
        The charade continues, with Abby furthering the 
relationship over the phone (including a decidedly unnecessary 
phone sex/masturbation sequence) and Nora furthering it in person, 
while eventually finding herself attracted to the dog man. Like 
SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE, this comedy/romance is predictable 
all the way through, but we care enough about the characters 
that we root them on and will the romance to blossom.
        THE TRUTH ABOUT CATS AND DOGS isn't quite as 
entertaining as I was expecting it to be, but it handles well a 
theme I could identify with. The thing is, I find Janeane Garafolo 
rather attractive. She's no Uma but I'm sure in real life she'd have 
no problems attracting men. I, on the other hand, couldn't attract 
a man to save my life... and am rather proud of that fact.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Birdcage, The (1996)
        Elton John has a new favorite movie. This homosexual 
transvestite farce isn't one of my personal favorites, though, and not 
because of the flamboyant gayness aspect either. THE BIRDCAGE is 
only sporadically funny, with too many jokes and scenes that just 
don't work and not enough of the ones that do to balance it out. 
The key phrase for what would improve this movie is tighter 
editing, but obviously there's nothing tight in THE BIRDCAGE.
        Robin Williams, looking too much like Kevin Kline with a 
moustache, plays the owner of a nightclub where people go to see 
men dress up as women and lip synch old disco songs (eerily 
reminiscent of my seventeenth birthday party). The featured 
performer is Robin's longtime companion, Albert (Nathan Lane), 
who I have to say makes the ugliest woman ever. Lane contributes 
the most hilarious performance of the movie by reinforcing every 
gay stereotype in existence. I guess it's only politically correct to 
make stereotypical gay jokes if the people making the jokes are 
gay themselves.
        The conflict arises as Robin'sis 
wedding to a woman (oh, the horror). Worse, she's the daughter 
of conservative senator Gene Hackman, co-founder of a Moral 
Majority-type organization. And still worse, they're all driving 
down for dinner with Mr. and Mr. Williams. Still worse yet, the 
daughter has told Hackman and his wife (Dianne Weist) that her 
fiancee's parents are your average businessman-housewife combo, 
something any upstanding Republican senator's daughter can be 
proud to marry into.
        So Williams gives in to his son and agrees to redecorate the 
house. The anatomically-correct nude sculptures have to go. And so 
does Albert, until he convinces Williams that he can play the role of a 
straight uncle. It's obvious he can't, though, during one of the funniest 
scenes in the movie, which also has Williams trying to teach him to 
act "like a real man," complete with crotch-grabbing, spitting, football 
conversations and repititions of the phrase "f---in' A!" And in the role 
of Williams' wife, the mother of his child (and the only woman he ever 
slept with), Christine Baranski from "Cybill."
        The entire last third of THE BIRDCAGE features the actual 
dinner between Hackman and Williams' families, which complicates 
itshen Baranski gets caught in traffic, Albert decides to play the 
role of his career and a group of tabloid journalists gather outside to 
get pictures of Hackman's meeting with a gay couple. Like the rest of 
the film, it does have some genuine laughs as well as tedious scenes 
that just don't work and should have been cut. THE BIRDCAGE is, 
at its current length of two hours, a mixed bag of entertainment with 
great actors doing great things some of the time and mediocre things 
the rest of the time. At an hour-and-a-half it would be a genuinely 
good comedy because we all know length does matter.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Let It Be (1970)
        "Let it Be" is exactly what they should have done with the 
miles and miles of film documenting the worst Beatles album since 
Beatles For Sale. This film is a chore even for a die-hard Beatles fan 
like me who owns every CD from Revolver on. I'd hate to think of 
the viewing experience that awaits someone who doesn't consider 
him or herself a fan. Most Beatles fans probably won't even like this 
movie, you'd probably have to be a Beatles fanatic. I'm somewhere 
in between those two distinctions, I guess you could call me a 
Beatles fanat.
        That means hold the band in high enough esteem to love 
most of the album tracks that never receive radio airplay, but I don't 
love them enough to track down every bootleg and outtake in the 
band's history. That's a fanatic, and a fanatic would probably be 
interested in Let it Be simply because it offers a lot of rehearsal and 
live versions of every song on the Let it Be album and a few from 
Abbey Road. It's painful for me to see unpolished rehearsal versions 
of such great songs as "Get Back," "Maxwell's Silver Hammer," and 
"Across the Universe," though.
        For someone who's not familiar with these songs, hearing 
such trashed versions will give off a bad impression. I'm sure more 
than one person, upon hearing the performances in this film and/or 
the Anthology albums, has thought, "This is the greatest band in 
rock and roll history?!" When you're used to the perfect album 
version of a song, hearing take two or three isn't the same. This 
movie sent me running for my Abbey Road and Let it Be CD's.
        The first 45 minutes of LET IT BE is precisely that -- studio 
run-throughs of about 20 songs, some of which never made it onto 
any album. For the person interested in outtakes and rehearsals, this 
should prove fascinating, although it's interesting to note that, as 
with the alternate versions on the Anthology albums, a lot of these 
songs are edited down or not presented in their entirety. You'd think 
that someone who's actually interested in hearing this stuff would 
get pissed at not being able to hear it all.
        The rest of us are left during this opening half of the movie 
to ponder such things. There are a few interesting moments for the 
middle-of-the-road Beatles fanat like myself, like learning George 
Harrison pretty much wrote "Octopus's Garden" for Ringo Starr, 
hearing certain band members complain to each other about other 
band members, and seeing Yoko Ono penetrate every aspect of the 
band without ever saying a word. LET IT BE also got me wondering 
why Paul McCartney had time to write all those brilliant songs but 
couldn't find a few minutes each day to shave. Things that make 
you go hmmm, right?
        After the rehearsals come a few "music video" type 
performances of "Two of Us," "Let it Be" and "The Long and 
Winding Road," followed by the famous rooftop concert at their 
Abbey Road studio. Things pick up from there, as we get passable 
versions of "The One After 909," "Dig a Pony," "Don't Let Me 
Down," "I've Got a Feeling" and "Get Back" twice before those 
stuffy bobbies come up and make them quit. You were wondering 
who broke up The Beatles? It was those damn bobbies!
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for Everyone Says I Love You (1996)
        With his twenty-ninth film, Woody Allen proves again that he 
can be successful in nearly any genre he tries. EVERYONE SAYS I 
LOVE YOU is Woody's first musical, a magical and romantic movie 
that manages to be bitingly funny and warm-hearted at the same time. 
Allen, who is 60 years old, is still just as entertaining now as he was 
at any point in his career, maybe more so because the movies he 
makes no longer focus on him but make him one player in a large 
ensemble cast.
        The plot centers around one large, well-to-do family. Alan 
Alda plays Goldie Hawn's second husband, with Natalie Portman as 
their teenage daughter and Lukas Haas the conservative son in an 
otherwise liberal family. Woody is Hawn's first husband, their 
daughters Natasha Lyonne and Drew Barrymore serving as 
reminders of the love they once had.
        Edward Norton plays Barrymore's boyfriend, who sings "Just 
You Just Me" to her in the film's opening scene, and later plants an 
engagement ring in her dessert as a romantic surprise. He gets a 
surprise of his own as she unknowingly eats the ring, which leads to 
a long song-and-dance scene in a hospital in which even a man in a 
full-body cast breaks into song. This scene is indicative of the film's 
delightful balance between parody and tribute to the elaborate, long-
gone musicals of the past.
        Allen plays an author who lives in Paris and has had little 
luck with love, until he sees Julia Roberts walk by. This turns out to 
be an amazing coincidence, because Lyonne has listened in on many 
of Roberts' therapy sessions and knows every little detail about her. 
Armed with this knowledge, Woody personifies her desires and 
fantasies and has no choice but to fall in love with him. And because 
he wrote the script.
        Meanwhile, bleeding heart liberal Hawn has crusaded for the 
release of convict Tim Roth, who comes over for dinner and manages 
to steal Barrymore's heart with his uncouth ways, while Portman and 
her best friend Gaby Hoffman both fall in love with the same boy. All 
these characters have their romantic difficulties, and they all get to 
sing "I'm Through With Love" at one time or another.
        Every character in EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU, at one time 
or another, bursts into song. The most intriguing thing about this is 
that Allen had all the actors except Barrymore do their own singing. 
Hawn and Norton turn out to be surprisingly good, while the rest 
are at least adequate. None of them sound especially professional, 
but dubbing everyone with professional vocals would have rung 
false and destroyed the film's sense of ambition that makes you feel 
like, when strong emotions hit, anyone will sing in public.
        There are a lot of very funny lines and situations in 
EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU, as in any good Woody Allen film, 
but this one manages to be a lot more optimistic and touching than 
most of his movies. The scene in which Allen dances with Hawn on 
the banks of the Seine exudes more romantic warmth and poignancy 
than any other moment in any one of his movies. Maybe he's finally 
found happiness with his adopted daughter.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for Empire of the Ants (1977)
        In the vast realm of bad 70's horror movies involving the 
nature kingdom on the rampage, EMPIRE OF THE ANTS is the 
queen of the colony. This adaptation of the H.G. "Orson" Welles 
story starts out like your typical Discovery channel nature film, 
with shots of ants doing their business while the voiceover narrator 
explains how organized and intelligent they are, and that the queen 
ant controls the colony through a substance known as pheremone. 
Lest we be too concerned with possible foreshadowing, the 
narrator reminds us that pheremone is "business better left 
to the ants."
        Cut to the opening credits, during which an evil 
corporation dumps barrels of radioactive waste on an island. One 
barrel breaks open and your stock yellow ooze comes pouring out 
as a line of ants marches by. Meanwhile, Dynasty Joan Collins 
meets an ensemble cast of terrible actors for a boat ride (a three 
hour tour, a three hour tour) to her island, where she tries to 
unload worthless real-estate on a group of potential buyers.
        There's the old couple, the gigolo in a leisure suit, 
the depressed drunk in a leisure suit, the beautiful blonde, the 
soft-spoken brunette and her boyfriend, the washout career woman, Joan's rented boat captain and her male assistant who, Joan says, 
is "so good in the sack that it almost justifies the excessive salary 
I have to pay you." That line of dialogue sets the tone for a movie 
full of awful Ed Wood-quality lines. I don't usually take notes 
during a movie, but EMPIRE OF THE ANTS had so much quotable 
bad dialogue that I knew I'd forget it all if I didn't write it down. 
Ninety minutes and two notebook pages later, here I am writing 
the review.
        The group mingles for awhile as Joan tries to decide which 
ones are actually interested in buying and which ones are just there 
for the free food and liquor. First, the leisure-suit gigolo tries to hit 
on the beautiful blonde, who tells him, "I thought you were one of 
those macho types whose brains fall out every time he unzips his 
fly." He shoots back, "What is this, group therapy?" and you can 
tell he's mad because his oversized shirt collars are flaring. Then the 
washout woman hits on the depressed drunk, who tells her, "I'm a 
bad investment." The whole time, the ants are lurking in the woods 
watching through their compound eyes (which the camera lets us 
look through several hundred times) while a ripoff of the JAWS 
theme plays in the background.
        Joan leads them all on a tram tour of the island, extolling 
the features of the land, when they come across the dead body of 
one of the workers. Everyone screams for awhile before the drunk 
decides to take charge and remembers two of the buyers were left 
behind on the last tram stop. He asks, "Who will go out there with 
me?" and looks around at the men. "No, not me," says the old guy. 
"I'm an old man. We only came because it was free. We take these 
tours all the time. Nothing like this ever happened, though." Even 
at the cost of a life, Joan is still happy to have weeded out two of 
the moochers.
        The drunk and the beautiful blonde run off into the woods 
while Joan and the others drive the tram at double speed (all of ten 
miles an hour) to the shore. By this point the ants have built a 
makeshift bridge to the boat and are crawling along it. "What the 
hell are they?!" someone yells as the captain swims out to his boat, 
where even with an axe, he can't stand up to a pair of sharp ant 
fangs. The boat explodes and the ants scatter.
        The remaining victims build a fire on the beach, realizing 
that will keep the ants away for awhile. But the gigolo reminds 
them, "They're waiting. They're out there waiting until the fire dies. 
Can't you hear them?!" Meanwhile, the old woman cries out, "All 
we wanted was to enjoy what was left of our life. Is that bad?" as 
if the whole incident was their punishment for sneaking onto a free 
boat tour. Cue the thunderstorm (watch for the animated rain) to 
put their fire out. Cue squeaky "ant" sound effects.
        Someone comes up with the brilliant idea that they run to 
the other side of the island, where a canoe is waiting, and they take 
off. Of course, they run into a few ants along the way and end up 
separated. The old people wait in a shed until the storm stops. When 
they finally emerge, the old man announces, "I told you we'd be safe 
now," right before thirty giant ants close in on them. The merciful 
EMPIRE OF THE ANTS director cuts away before the old people 
get gored.
        Everyone else makes it to the boat, where the characters 
continue bitching at each other. Joan insists she's still the boss and 
tells the captain to row in one direction. He invites her to take over 
the rowing duties, she says, "Very funny," although I'm not sure if 
she's referring to his comment or the movie in general. At the 
urging of the gigolo, they end up taking the wrong fork in the river 
and being surrounded by ants. As the washout career woman chides 
him about his lackluster navigational skills (not to mention his 
lackluster acting skills), Joan's assistant reassures the gigolo that, 
"We're all on edge; we say things we don't mean." The gigolo's reply 
is, "Tell that bitch, don't tell me."
        They set foot on land as the ants open a path for them. 
"They're herding us like cattle!" the blonde yells, minutes before the 
ants fall back and they stumble upon civilization. They go straight to 
the cops, alerting them to be on the lookout for "giant ants -- big as 
you are." The captain adds, "These things are vicious as hell!" The 
redneck sheriff takes the news surprisingly well, pledging, "Any 
ants come this way, we'll take care of them!" In the background, 
the mayor of the town is talking about their sugar refinery, subtle 
foreshadowing at its finest.
        But the foreshadowing isn't subtle for long. When the 
island victims realize the cops aren't going to do anything about 
the ants, they steal a car and try to break down a road block. After 
the two-minute "Dukes of Hazzard" chase, they crash into a muddy 
marsh and are apprehended. As the cops are driving them back to 
the city, they pass the sugar refinery. The blonde finally has a 
hunch, saying there's "something funny" about the place. Gee, I 
know it's tough to make the connection between giant ants and a 
giant pile of sugar, but give the audience a little credit for seeing it 
coming.
        Sure enough, the cops stop at the sugar refinery and take 
the prisoners on an impromptu tour, remarking, "There's enough 
sugar in there to feed an army," which is particularly admirable 
considering most army meals consist of a giant bowl of sugar. No 
sooner has he gotten that out when in come the army ants. Chaos 
ensues as the prisoners are ushered into another room, where the 
giant queen ant resides. Saith the sheriff, "Isn't she beautiful? 
She's fantastic... We must obey. We have no choice. She makes 
us do it."
        As the dramatic conclusion comes upon us, a line of 
townspeople are ushered into a booth one by one, where the queen 
ant farts a pheremone fog and they breath it, turning into obedient 
ant servants. Joan is brought to the front of the line, and she comes 
out in a daze, announcing, "Don't you see? We mustn't disobey 
them, we must take care of them!" Not you too, Joan! Finally, the 
captain, the blonde, career gal and the assistant get loose and run 
out of the refinery.
        Just outside happens to be a tanker truck labelled 
"Flammable!" An idea pops into the captain's head, which you 
can probably guess. Remember, ants don't like fire. They probably 
don't like EMPIRE OF THE ANTS too much either, although if you 
have a sense of humor, you'll probably love it. Knowing that Joan 
and Company were trying to make a serious thriller makes this 
four-star bad movie (zero stars on the regular scale) all the more 
hilarious. But if you don't have a sense of humor, this movie is 
probably business better left to the ants.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Quick and the Dead, The (1995)
        THE QUICK AND THE DEAD is a western starring Sharon 
Stone and Gene Hackman. Should've been called THE NUDE AND 
THE OLD. That last sentence, of course, is an example of the dangers 
of insensitive stereotyping, because we now know Stone actually 
can carry a film without taking her shirt off and Hackman, of course, 
has always been able to carry films fully-clothed (thankfully). This 
movie is a decent showcase for both of them as well as WHAT'S 
EATING GILBERT GRAPE star Leonardo DeCaprio.
        What the movie isn't a decent showcase for is good directing. 
Every "high noon" cliche in the book is brought out for THE QUICK 
AND THE DEAD, including rapid-fire closeups of all the characters 
and recurring shots of the town clock. (I'm also sure I saw a 
tumbleweed blow by on more than one occasion.) The writing 
also isn't the best, as when tough cowboy -- make that 
cowperson -- Sharon Stone arrives in town and is hit on by 
a tough guy:
        And we get to laugh at the ludicrous dialogue. Another 
area of fault is the plot. The nature of the premise dictates a thin, 
predictable plot. Even the "twist"of the ending you can see riding 
into town a mile away. The plot has a group of gunfighters entering 
a contest, where people square off in gunfighting competitions one 
by one, until only one is left alive to collect the $123,456 prize. We 
know from the get-go who the last two contestants will be, and 
even who the last four will be. Still, THE QUICK AND THE DEAD 
for the most part contains original entertainment from time-tested 
(and tit-tested) Hollywood performers.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Jing cha gu shi III: Chao ji jing cha (1992)
        Jackie Chan has been making action movies for almost 
twenty years, but the Western world has only recently begun to 
notice him. Earlier this year came RUMBLE IN THE BRONX, 
which made Schwarzenegger look like a blue-screen amateur. 
Chan did all his own stunts in a movie that cleverly orchestrated 
a lot of them, from the fights instituting pinball machines and 
shopping carts to jumps from bridges onto boats. It would have 
been incredibly hard to top the sheer action in RUMBLE IN THE 
BRONX, so what did the SUPERCOP people do? They went for 
comedy.
        No, really. There are three credited writers for SUPERCOP, 
each of which probably contributed one laugh to the movie for its 
comic scenes, which mostly look awkward and pathetic. I'm 
wondering if the past forty years worth of American sitcoms 
have made it over to Hong Kong yet. If so, they know about the 
age-old setup where someone is pretending to be someone else and 
has to identify relatives in pictures and make up memories about his 
fake identity. It's not that funny here but serves only as chainlinks in 
the action fence. Unfortunately, the action fence in SUPERCOP isn't 
as tall or intricate as in RUMBLE IN THE BRONX, and so has to 
stand up on its own.
        Chan plays a Hong Kong detective who is assigned to 
go undercover in China as a drug-busting supercop. First comes 
the scene where Chan meets his superior, who turns out to be an 
attractive (in an Asian sort of way) woman, then comes the scene 
in which Chan must impress a roomful of trained Chinese cops and 
army soldiers. In the predictable comic style we've seen in our forty 
years of sitcoms, he at first acts embarrassed and reluctant, then 
lets the guy kick his butt a little bit and finally just cuts loose and 
whoops some ass.
        With that out of the way, Chan gets down to business, 
posing as a prisoner. He helps a felon break out of a chain gang 
in one long, martial arts-ridden scene and earns the guy's trust while 
saving his life over and over again. Chan eventually gets taken to 
the big boss, his female superior en tow posing as his sister. She 
comes aboard after a scene in which Chan and some felons visit 
his "family," which consists of all undercover cops and actors, 
including a man dressed up as his senile, nearly-blind mother. All 
of this is supposed to be funny and some of it actually is because 
it's so unknowingly cliched.
        The last thirty minutes of the movie contains the non-stop 
action climax, involving a train, a helicopter and a lot of violent 
fights. None of this is anything new but it's rendered exciting by 
the fact that there are no stuntmen or blue screens. Like RUMBLE 
IN THE BRONX, there is a collection of outtakes during the credits 
that show some of the lesser-executed takes of some of the stunts, 
as when people fell off of moving cars onto the highway or the 
motorcycle jump missed the train entirely.
        There's nothing fake about the action scenes in a Chan 
movie. The actors really are jumping motorcycles on the top of 
trains and hanging precariously from helicopter ladders. That fact 
alone redeems the terrible dialogue, recycled comedy and techno 
versions of "Stayin' Alive" on the soundtrack. And if there had 
been more action to offset the other slow-moving scenes, it would 
have been a good movie instead of just a pretty-good one. RUMBLE 
IN THE BRONX had far more action scenes and was far better, but 
SUPERCOP is still an exciting movie at least part of the time.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Michael (1996)
        Hopefully, MICHAEL will be the last nail in the angel-
obsession coffin. In the last couple years we've been overrun with 
the angel theme in the media. "Touched By an Angel," THE 
PREACHER'S WIFE, there was even a TV special where incidences 
of angels helping people in dangerous situations were re-enacted 
by bad actors. I'm still wondering why they didn't just get William 
Shatner to do voiceovers and call it "Rescue 777."
        The religious folk have been talking about how wonderful 
this angel revival is, apparently realizing that there's almost zero 
correlation between movie angels and Biblical angels. Nowhere is 
this polarization more concrete than in Nora Ephron's MICHAEL, 
in which the title character, who the Bible says threw Satan out of 
heaven, smokes, drinks, eats like a pig and beds down with multiple 
women. This kind of behavior isn't justified in any Bible not written 
by Anton LeVay, but I guess John Travolta doesn't care because 
it's not his religion to begin with. If he had to play a boozing, 
promiscuous L. Ron Hubbard, he'd probably feel differently.
        Travolta, of course, plays Michael, a slovenly New Age 
angel who quotes not John and Paul, the disciples, but John and 
Paul, the Beatles, with a love-is-all-you-need message. His mission 
on Earth involves match-making tabloid writers William Hurt and 
Andie MacDowell, who get a letter from an old women in Iowa 
(Jean "Edith Bunker" Stapleton) claiming she has an angel living 
in her house. Hurt, MacDowell, Robert Pastorelli and his cute dog 
cross several states to get the story, which they figure will probably 
win them the tabloid equivalent of the Pulitzer Prize.
        Michael's first appearance in the movie sets the tone for 
everything that follows. He wanders down the stairs, wearing 
nothing but a pair of boxers, his giant dirty wings flapping. 
Cigarette in mouth, he scratches himself, grabs a beer from the 
refrigerator and heads back upstairs. Travolta said in one of his 
myriad television interviews promoting MICHAEL that people who 
don't buy the entrance probably won't buy the rest of the movie. 
He was right; I didn't buy either.
        It's not just the fact that this is one of God's right-hand 
men having premarital sex with Teri Garr, it's also never clear why 
Michael would think the way he does. These movie angels live in 
a perfect heaven with the Creator of the universe Himself, but their 
main goal throughout eternity is to find ways to get back to Earth. 
With Denzel Washington's character in THE PREACHER'S WIFE, 
it made more sense because he was once a human. Michael's an 
archangel, though; he's never lived down here and therefore would 
have no reason to continually want to leave heaven to experience 
the pleasures of a flawed earth.
        One more thing I didn't buy -- this movie assumes the Bible 
is true. Michael says he wrote Psalm 85 and when Stapleton quotes 
from Revelation, he verifies it. But is this the same Bible that makes 
it perfectly clear that God hates sin? Fornication, drunkenness, 
gluttony, those are pillar sins. That God would let this winged angel 
come down from heaven every hundred years or so to do this stuff 
doesn't seem plausible.
        We're probably not supposed to think about the movie's 
theology, though. We're just supposed to sit back and let MICHAEL 
entertain us. Unfortunately, everything about the movie is just as 
muddled as its characterization of angels. The plot is thin and 
predictable. The tabloid writers drive Michael back to Chicago and, 
along the way, he does all sorts of human things and helps Hurt 
and MacDowell fall in love. There aren't very many laughs and the 
drama is forced and laughable.
        Travolta and everyone else do a decent job acting, but 
the fault here lies in the script. This movie was probably sold to the 
studio on the basis of, "Hey, we've got John Travolta as an angel in 
a romantic comedy that's going to open on Christmas Day." None of 
the executives had to read the script to realize the very concept 
would make money, but they should have realized Ephron's mix of 
dark themes and storybook romance would make for a bizarre 
combination. MICHAEL could have used a little divine intervention.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for You Only Live Twice (1967)
        The James Bond films starring Sean Connery are usually 
among the best of the entire seventeen-film series, but this one is an 
embarrassment to the 007 legend, if such a thing is possible. It doesn't 
just border on self-parody, it dives headfirst into it, with stronger than 
usual doses of objectification of women and ethnic stereotype. Just 
when I thought the series was making strides for tolerance (I actually 
saw a black guy in THUNDERBALL, or was it just my imagination?), 
we get lines like, "In Japan, men come first, women come second," to 
which Bond replies, "I think I'll retire here." Of course, five seconds 
later he's being massaged by a bikini-clad Japanese concubine and five 
minutes later he's getting laid by one of the same. ("The things I do for 
Mother England.")
        YOU ONLY LIVE TWICE (Whew, what a relief. I get to live 
twice. Here I thought maybe I should stop lying on my ass all day 
watching movies. Now I've seen the light.) is set entirely in Japan, 
with Bond teaming up with a Japanese agent named Tiger. 
SPECTRE's Blofeld is planning to get America and the Soviet Union 
to declare war on each other by sabotaging their space missions. 
Blofeld is played by Donald Pleasence, who was also record exec B.D. 
in The Bee Gees' 1978 suck-fest SGT. PEPPER'S LONELY HEARTS 
CLUB BAND (of course, given The Bee Gees' reputation for tight 
pants and promiscuity, it's better not to ask what B.D. stands for. Big 
Something is my guess...) and Dr. "Pure Evil" Loomis in 
HALLOWEEN 1-2 and 4-6. In YOU ONLY LIVE TWICE we don't 
even see Pleasence's face until the traditional Bond-Is-Trapped-In-
The-Villain's-Underground-Hideout-And-The-Villain-Spills-The-
Entire-Plan-To-Bond-Thinking-There's-No-Chance-He-Can-Escape-
The-Second-Before-Bond-Lights-Up-His-Cigarette-Gun scene at the 
end of the movie.
        Everything that worked in the other Bond movies is laughable 
in YOU ONLY LIVE TWICE. The fistfights, death traps and 
inventions are all less creative and more ridiculous than usual. Even 
the dialogue with lusty secretary Moneypenny, which is witty and 
clever in the other movies, falls short here. (MONEYPENNY: Bond, 
the password chosen for this mission is "I love you." Say it back to me 
so I can be sure you've gotten it.) Bond is still God's gift to women, or 
should I say women are God's gift to him, but seeing him lay three 
different beauties in every movie is starting to make me sick.
        What cracked me up in the first few movies I watched was 
that even the women who hated Bond and were out to kill him still 
ended up in the sack with him, not to mention all the women he just 
met who stopped everything to get horizontal with him. When you 
calculate three woman a movie times seventeen movies and figure in 
the statistic that 25% of people in the world carry some sort of 
venereal disease, Bond should have more than enough to mix, match 
and trade with his friends. And just think of how many illegitimate 
003 1/2's he's probably fathered around the world. That's a hell of a lot 
in child support.
        If you don't have a sense of humor (and why would you be 
reading this post if you didn't?), you'll most likely think YOU ONLY 
LIVE TWICE is stupid. If you do have a sense of humor, you'll most 
likely think YOU ONLY LIVE TWICE is stupid, too, but at least 
you'll be able to laugh at the unintended campiness. And if you're the 
type who makes constant jokes while watching bad movies with your 
friends and family ("You mean with this Friends and Family program 
I can just sit on my toucass and save on long distance?" Sorry, I've 
seen that commercial way too much--and have since put out a hit on 
Whoopi Goldberg as a result.), like an amateur version of "Mystery 
Science Theater 3000," you'll probably actually enjoy watching this 
movie.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Jack-O (1995)
        When I rented PUMPKINHEAD a few years back, I 
was hoping for a slasher movie where a killer monster with a jack-
o-lantern for a head decapitates people. I got it with JACK-O (as in 
"Lantern"), but the movie was just as bad as PUMPKINHEAD. I 
knew it would be bad, but there are different degrees of bad. Some 
bad movies you can laugh at and crack a lot of jokes about; others 
are so bad you can't even find humor in the awfulness. JACK-O 
falls into the latter category.
        It looks promising on the box, where a menacing 
pumpkinhead wields a scythe and the subtitle promises "It's 
harvest time!" There's even a stupid little poem on the back about 
how Jack-O's gonna get you, but after watching the movie you 
realize the poem should have read, "This movie sucks and that's 
no lie; Talent was the first thing to die. Decapitations and cheap 
boob shots abound; And the acting is better if you turn off the 
sound."
        Standard horror plot: A bunch of horny kids go into 
the woods and pull the cross out of Jack-O's grave. The pumpkin 
monster arises from his grave and slits throats, cuts off heads and 
picks up women with his scythe, hurling them across the woods. 
Then he heads off to town on (of course) Halloween night, where 
he kills a grumpy old man who refused to give candy to trick or 
treaters, then goes after the descendants of the family who 
originally buried him.
        Before too long, a Wiccan witch realizes what's going on 
and leads Jack-O back into the woods, with the usual mumbo-jumbo 
spells and stakes-through-the-heart crap. But the door is left open 
for a sequel, one the direct-to-video market will surely produce with 
the title JACK-O 2: HE'S BACK-O! I should probably stop now 
before I give the producers too many more ideas. Just one suggestion 
to elevate the sequel to the level of laughably bad instead of just 
bad -- Next time make Jack-O talk. That way, before he slays his 
first victim, he can ask, "Orange you glad to see me?"
The PUMPKINHEAD Review (written Halloween 1993)
        "There are bad horror movies, then there are BAD 
HORROR MOVIES! PUMPKINHEAD gets the all-caps 
distinction. While the name itself might suggest a giant jack-
o-lantern that eats unsuspecting trick-or-treaters, we aren't that 
lucky. Pumpkinhead is some sort of demon or something that 
you can invoke and sic on people who have done very bad 
things like murder or directing bad horror movies.
        "So, unless you are in the mood for something 
completely devoid of any entertaining value, I strongly 
recommend staying farther than a pumpkin's throw away 
from this movie."
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Contact (1997)
        There have been so many movies in recent years about 
aliens that if any extraterrestrials ever do show up it will certainly be 
an anti-climax. CONTACT seems the exception -- no alien 
intervention could possibly be as anti-climactic as the last half-hour 
of CONTACT, a slow-moving film that builds up to a promising 
close encounter of the third kind and gives us an incredibly hokey 
dream-like sequence instead.
        It's a shame, too, because I really admired CONTACT 
up to that point. It's one of the only intelligent dealings with the 
ramifications of searching for alien life and the inevitable conflicts 
that will arise between the elements of religion and science and the 
representatives thereof. This Carl Sagan adaptation takes the high 
road all through the lengthy setup, providing us with a protagonist 
in which we invest a lot of emotion.
        We meet Ellie Airway, played by Jodie Foster (in her best 
performance since SILENCE OF THE LAMBS), at the tender age of 
8, already initiating contact via short-wave radio with people in far 
off places and looking through telescopes at the stars above. It's the 
nurturing of her loving father that makes it all possible and, like any 
other movie in which one parent figures large, we see the death of 
the father. The young Ellie doesn't buy the priest's explanation that 
it was part of God's undecipherable master plan, setting up a lifetime 
(and a movietime) of conflict between Ellie's rational agnostic mind 
and people of faith.
        The most interesting thing about CONTACT is this 
dichotomy and I'm sure it's by no personal bias of Sagan that the 
agnostic astronomer seems the most moral and emotional person in 
this diegetic universe. With a cast of one-notes like Tom Skeritt (the 
bastard-in-power who first cuts Ellie's funding then takes all the 
credit once contact with aliens is made), Angela Basset (skeptical 
White House female security agent) and James Woods (skeptical 
White House male security agent), that's hardly a surprise.
        Then there's Matthew McConaughey, the sympathetic 
religious figure who also serves as the movie's love interest. The 
word "religious" in CONTACT denotes a person who believes in 
faith over science -- as McConaughey's pontificating hippie points 
out, some people _need_ to believe in God rather than resign 
themselves to the loneliness felt when they realize they're so small 
and minute. Ellie's flip-side view is that science is the universal 
language and the existence of aliens would allow humans to be part 
of a much more unifying cosmic force.
        Lest the movie bog itself down too much beneath these 
sentiments, director Robert Zemeckis intersperses the same kind 
of media tricks that made FORREST GUMP seem in places like an 
important documentary. As Ellie receives a message from the great 
beyond, with visual instructions hidden behind images of Hitler 
(quite a unifying cosmic force his own self), the world takes notice. 
We see every CNN anchor ever hired pondering the ramifications of 
this contact, along with deftly-edited footage of President Clinton 
saying that this ground-breaking new discovery may alter the course 
of history. The real-life speech was about the advent of the Arch 
Deluxe burger, but a snip here and a morph there and suddenly he's 
talking about aliens.
        To which degree you will like CONTACT depends on your 
interest of the topic. We've seen alien intervention treated a hundred 
different ways in the movies, but rarely has it seemed so real and 
possible than in CONTACT. Rarely also has it been flushed down 
the cosmic crapper by such a New Age ending that looks like a 
Shirley MacLaine music video than a Hollywood finale. CONTACT 
is miles removed from MEN IN BLACK but with about 100 extra IQ 
points and a refusal to give the audience what they crave.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Life of Brian (1979)
        I've heard this movie condemned as one of the most 
blasphemous pieces of Satanic filth ever put on celluloid. I'd say it's 
just not that funny. When you're taking on the dominant religion of 
your culture, you'd better have some pretty dynamite material, but 
that can't be said when the funniest part of the movie has your 
"chosen one" singing "Always Look on the Bright Side of Life" 
while being crucified. The Monty Python troupe managed to turn 
death and the afterlife into something hilarious in THE MEANING 
OF LIFE, but when trying to satire the life of Jesus, they more or 
less strike out.
        Their focus isn't on Jesus Himself but on a lesser known 
contemporary, Brian, who lives a normal life until one day a bunch 
of people just start following him for no reason. He is soon hailed 
as the Messiah, even though he insists he's not. And eventually, he 
ends up on the cross singing "Always Look on the Bright Side of 
Life." A skimpy plot summary, yes, but so is the plot itself. I only 
saw this two days ago but can scarcely remember anything about 
it other than the impression that only a few of the jokes were 
funny. It would have taken a miracle from God to save this 
movie, but obviously the Pythonites aren't on His good side 
anymore.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Two if by Sea (1996)
        Two stars if mediocre, that's a rule of mine in movie 
reviewing and boy oh boy does it apply here. I like Denis Leary--his 
supporting rols in DEMOLITION MAN and JUDGMENT NIGHT 
complemented what were already good movies--but when he tries to 
carry a movie himself, as in THE REF, the results are a little less than 
ideal. He can only keep up the complain-about-everything motif for so 
long before it gets stale, and in TWO IF BY SEA he doesn't even give 
us that. His character is more of a brainless jerk than just a jerk.
        And Sandra Bullock I like too, but I still think she wasn't cut 
out for romantic comedies. She does about as well here as in WHILE 
YOU WERE SLEEPING, only here she plays the Jersey Jew stereotype, 
a Rhoda for the 90's. The thing is, Bullock is just too sweet and 
appealing to pull off a brash, abrasive character like that. She's the 
victim of miscasting here, in a role I'd saw was originally intended for 
Marisa Tomei. Again I say, Sandra, stick to the action movies like 
SPEED and THE NET, or at least pick a _funny_ script when you want 
to do comedy.
        So, to recap, both of their characters are unsuited to their 
personalities. In addition, the idea of a Denis Leary-Sandra Bullock 
team-up in the first place isn't something nature ever intended. 
(What's next? Howard Stern and Kathie Lee Gifford?) The premise 
here has Leary as a small-time thief and Bullock as his lover. He's just 
stolen an antique painting and is trying to shake the cops. It opens 
with the traditional car chase and proceeds to a traditional train chase, 
before the two of them find a vacant island mansion to lay low in until 
their buyer shows up.
        Nothing original so far, and if you stick around for the rest of 
the movie, you'll see Leary try to get back to nature by going fishing 
(He ends up shooting the fish. Ha!), a cultured neighbor try to steal 
Bullock away from insensitive Leary and Leary act like a shot-fish-
out-of-water at the neighbor's cocktail party. All of these are second-
rate sitcom and movie cliches that are reworked here with nothing 
original or amusing to add.
        All the while, a group of the dumbest criminals you've ever 
seen and a detective are in the process of tracking Leary down to get 
the painting back. It all leads to a predictable, absurd climax, a 
suitable bookend to this dull comedy. You know, I heard Denis Leary 
say he devoted two years of his life to scripting this movie. It wouldn't 
have hurted to give it another two... if by sea, of course.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
and check out the 40+ new reviews since Christmas.

Title
Review for Diamonds Are Forever (1971)
        One of the most entertaining James Bond outings, with Sean 
Connery in his last appearance as 007, is filled with the best of the 
usual Bond gimmicks--the supervillains, death traps, chase scenes, 
helpless women, killer women (Bambi and Thumper... Bambi's mad 
because her mom was killed and Thumper just wants to lash out 
because her foot won't stop twitching) and high-tech gadgets. Q even 
invents one for his own amusement that makes slot machines pay off.
        Yes, Bond's gone to Las Vegas this time to get to the bottom 
of a diamond caper headed by a villain who's perfected a cosmetic 
surgery technique that makes face-cloning possible. Then there are the 
evil homogenized two, Mr. Kidd and Mr. Play... Okay, the other guy's 
name isn't Play, but I've seen way too many Bond movies in way too 
short a time to remember the names of all the criminals. All I 
remember is one of the two looks a lot like Sonny Bono.
        Thankfully, the leading lady doesn't look like Sonny or Cher. 
It's Mrs. Robert Wagner, Jill St. John, who also guest-starred on the 
first episode of the "Batman" TV show as a villainous discotheque 
dancer who was vaporized in the Batcave's nuclear power generator. 
("What a terrible way to go-go," Batman laments.) If you haven't 
figured it out yet, it's my duty to interject a tidbit about "Batman" in 
roughly a tenth of the reviews I write.
        St. John also inspires the best line in the movie. Bond is 
making out with her when a group of bad guys burst into the hotel 
room. "Gentlemen," he says, "I'm afraid you've caught me with more 
than my hands up." Now that's The Man!
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for I Know What You Did Last Summer (1997)
        Also known as, I KNOW WHAT MOVIE I SHOULDN'T HAVE SEEN LAST NIGHT. 
Kevin Williamson got the world on a platter when the horror comedy 
he wrote, SCREAM, grossed more than $100 million with its 
willingness to flip the bird to horror cliches while at the same time 
embracing them. Now comes Williamson's follow-up, I KNOW WHAT 
YOU DID LAST SUMMER, which skips the ironic humor and just 
sticks with the cliches instead. I can hardly wait for SCREAM 2.
        Williamson gives us four main characters straight from the 
horror mold. There's brooding Julie (Jennifer Love Hewitt, filling the 
Williamson quota of one beautiful "Party of Five" girl in every movie 
he writes -- now that I know Neve Campbell and Hewitt are both on 
the same show I might have to make it a party of six every week), the 
smart, responsible one. On the opposite end is Helen (Sarah Michelle 
Gellar, TV's vampire slayer Buffy), the town beauty queen, in the 
movie to scream and show off cleavage. Her boyfriend is Barry (Ryan 
Phillipe), football quarterback and all-around stud. Rounding out the 
group is Ray (Freddie Prinze Jr.), Hewitt's boyfriend and the artistic, 
freakish type.
        We meet these four on the fourth of July, during their South 
Carolina fishing town's big celebration. They all drink, party and 
make out like all horror movie teens do, and are on their way home 
when disaster strikes. A man runs into the path of their car and gets 
creamed. Chaos ensues, with Ray not wanting to go to prison, Billy 
drunk and revealing psychotic tendencies and Hewitt trying to talk 
some reason into them. The decision is made to dump the body in the 
river, and they consent, promising they'll take the secret to their 
graves.
        But, and this should come as absolutely no surprise, 
someone knows what they did last summer. Julie gets a note with 
nothing but the movie's title written on it (talk about shameless self-
promotion!) when she comes home from college next year. As the 
guilty party, she rounds up the other three, who are still languishing 
around town, and they try to figure out what's going on. Here's what's 
going on -- there's a slasher killer on the loose, someone who dresses 
up in a fisherman's slicker and kills people with a meat hook. This is 
the person who knows what they did last summer, and you'd think 
these kids would just send him a note back saying, "I know what 
you're doing right now." I mean, the guy's a freakin' murderer.
        Like SCREAM, Williamson tries to make I KNOW WHAT YOU 
DID LAST SUMMER into a murder mystery. There are three main 
suspects -- David from "Roseanne," who has a killer crush on Julie 
(get in line, there, buddy), Helen's jealous older sister (Bridgette 
Wilson, who isn't convincing because she's actually prettier than her 
sister) and the dead guy's sister (Ellen's better half, Anne Heche, who 
is even more butch and white trash than usual here). None of this is 
the least bit well constructed and is resolved in an even more 
disappointing fashion.
        There's not a whole lot to like in I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST 
SUMMER, but I tried my hardest. Aside from some very nice Hewitt 
wardrobing (I never wanted so much to be a shirt two sizes too small) 
and a few clever kill scenes, this movie has none of the original 
dialogue, charm or humor of SCREAM. And very little suspense. Its 
clone characters, lame murder mystery and constantly-pulsing "hip" 
soundtrack make this the very kind of movie SCREAM so mercilessly 
satired. And the door is left wide open for a sequel. I know what 
they're doing _next_ summer...
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Feeling Minnesota (1996)
        In FEELING MINNESOTA, a lot of likeable stars say and 
do a lot of stupid, incomprehensible things. It's the kind of movie 
that, with every plot development, makes you ask yourself, "What 
ninth grade English class short story was this movie adapted from?" 
I blame the script, which seems to promise a plot that will take off, 
revealing some kind of cleverness or insight into the characters. It 
never does, falling back on half-thought out blackmail schemes and 
mistaken murders instead. There's dialogue like "Life is like this 
orange. It's round, it comes back to repeat itself." There are a 
hundred other lines like that, delivered straight by the likes of 
geniune talents who are apparently bound by contract to say 
whatever the director tells them to.
        FEELING MINNESOTA stars Keanu Reeves and Vincent 
D'Onofrio (the alien-inhabited farmer in MEN IN BLACK) as a pair 
of lowlife brothers, one who spends most of his time locked up and 
one who should be. D'Onofrio is an accountant for organized crime 
man Delroy Lindo who is given, as a reward, Cameron Diaz. It's a 
damn good reward, as any heterosexual man can tell you, and 
D'Onofrio puts it to good use, dragging her immediately and 
reluctantly to the altar. That's when Reeves shows up, invited by 
his mother (Tuesday Weld, about 40 years past "Dobie Gillis").
        This being a movie, not an hour passes from the vows to 
Diaz, still in her wedding dress, humping Reeves' brains out on the 
bathroom floor. It's the start of what Prince would call a strange 
relationship that leads to Diaz begging Reeves to take her with him, 
Reeves refusing, Diaz humping his brains out in the front seat of the 
car, Reeves taking her, Diaz insisting they go back to get some 
money D'Onofrio stole from Lindo, Reeves going back, D'Onofrio 
biting his ear off, and so on. 
        It's after that point that FEELING MINNESOTA really 
starts to get bad. The plot keeps, like that orange, going around and 
around, shifting from similar locale to similar locale, making turns 
we can see miles away and spewing that horrible dialogue like 
regurgitated bile... really disgusting regurgitated bile. We meet 
corrupt cop Dan Aykroyd and diner waitress Courtney Love, who 
never quite figures out why repeat customer D'Onofrio has blood all 
over him and a wad of money in a garbage bag.
        All the time, you're wondering why those poor actors are 
putting up with it. Keanu, sure, he's cut out for this kind of crap 
(playing a character named, no kidding, "Jjaks"), but people like 
D'Onofrio, Diaz and Lindo should know better. Trust me, after 
watching this movie, Minnesota is something you _don't_ want 
to be feeling.
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving The World For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Rosewood (1997)
        ROSEWOOD is the kind of movie that makes me ashamed 
to be white. That might be too strong a statement, but a movie like 
this does remind me that, yes, we honkies have traditionally done a 
lot of wrong to minority races. ROSEWOOD is based on the true 
story of the massacre of scores of blacks in a Florida town in 1922, 
told by director John Singleton in the same guilt-inducing but fair 
way that made his last film, HIGHER LEARNING, so powerful.
        At 142 minutes, ROSEWOOD seems to be Singleton's 
MALCOLM X, a detailed, large budget period piece that documents 
an important (and, in this case, embarrassing) part of black history 
with clear cut characters, real emotion and a lack of sermonizing. 
It's a hard movie to film and market because this kind of movie is 
uncomfortable for both black and white viewers, but in two 
characters, on both sides of the racial spectrum, Singleton 
provides appeal.
        On the white side, there's John Wright (Jon Voight), a 
Rosewood store owner. He's one of the few white residents in the 
black-owned town but gets along with everyone, kind of like Sal in 
DO THE RIGHT THING. Wright is the only white man who tries to 
stop the lynch mob's attacks on the black residents once the episode 
begins. It starts with a rich white woman claiming she was beaten by 
a black man to cover up her affair with violent Robert "T-1000" 
Patrick. This is just what the white folks want to hear; they booze up, 
grab their shotguns and mobilize to dispense justice, which seems 
like an inhuman game more than anything else.
        On the black side, we have Mr. Mann (Ving Rhames), the 
stranger-comes-to-town archetype. He's a drifter and WWI veteran 
who wanders into town the day before the fun begins and is embraced 
by the townfolk. ROSEWOOD is based on life, but Mann isn't. His 
character is to serve as the superhuman leader of his people and, 
although it diminishes the power of the "true" images, it makes the 
movie more audience-friendly to have someone to root for. I can only 
imagine how many audiences burst into spontaneous applause at the 
end of his hanging scene.
        The other black characters seem more human than Mann. 
There's Sylvester (Don Cheadle), the piano instructor who refuses to 
leave town when the white sheriff (Michael Rooker) warns him of the 
approaching redneck mob, and instead stays to fight. His mom is 
played by Esther Rolle of "Good Times," although her times in 
ROSEWOOD seem anything but. As the maid of the white woman 
who starts the mess, she knows it was Patrick who beat her, but also 
knows she will be lynched if she says anything.
        The cast does a good job -- it's one thing to play a 
sympathetic character, but it takes a lot more work to portray a truly 
ignorant, racist character everyone will hate. I have to hand it to the 
bearded guy in the lynch mob because, by the end of the movie, I 
really hated him. If I see him on the street, I will beat him. _That's_ 
good acting.
        And, as always, Ving Rhames is the man. Entertainment 
Weekly's review of ROSEWOOD was negative because of Rhames, 
saying his character goes against the riviting drama of the narrative 
by providing an unrealistic action hero. That's probably right, but I've 
never thought anything but "Ving's the man" when I've seen him in a 
movie. I think he adds a lot to the movie, but what I could have done 
without are the last two or three scenes, which add sentimental anti-
climax after everything is said and done. If there's anything 
ROSEWOOD doesn't need, it's anti-climax.
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving The World For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Manhattan Murder Mystery (1993)
        This film marked a comeback of sorts for Woody Allen 
(who's planning a sequel to this movie with Soon-Yi, entitled 
INDIANA INCEST INCIDENT), a solid comedy piece with a dash 
of suspense. The murder mystery begins one night as Woody 
and his wife (Diane Keaton) return from dinner to find their nice 
old neighbor's wife is dead. What's strange is the night before, 
Woody and Diane had dinner over at their place and she seemed 
fine then.
        That's all it takes for Diane to contemplate conspiracy. 
And late that night, when she hears footsteps in the hall of their 
apartment complex, from a person who gets on the elevator. Oooh, 
he must have just killed someone. Woody, meanwhile, is his usual 
uptight, neurotic self, spouting his trademark one-liners. Since 
Woody won't help her out, Diane starts investigating the murder 
with their yuppie friend Alan Alda (just back from a war in Korea). 
This makes Woody kind of mad (you'd be mad too if your name was 
"Woody"), but instead of punching out Alda (as well someone 
should), Woody decides to start investigating the murder with his 
wife for fun.
        Sure, it's not much on paper (especially this paper), but 
trust me, MANHATTAN MURDER MYSTERY is a good movie. 
Yeah, I know that's what I said about PORKY'S VI and 
OVERWEIGHT TEENAGE SLUMBER PARTY , but this time I'm 
right.
And two brief, bonus reviews of Allen films...
(too short to post separately)
Annie Hall (1977) ****
        This is pretty much the best Woody Allen movie you'll ever 
see. This is the one where he plays the neurotic Jew who has 
troubles with women... yeah, this and about thirty other movies of 
his, but he's just as entertaining as ever here, as a stand-up comic 
who reflects on his life and relationship problems. It's mostly an 
episodic excuse for Woody's trademark one-liners, and I'll be 
damned if the whole movie isn't hilarious.
        Some of the more memorable sequences include Woody 
explaining the source of his nervousness (growing up in a house 
built under the Coney Island roller coaster), Woody being hounded 
by a couple Bronx fans and Woody's marathon viewings of Holocast 
documentaries. Along the way, he meets first Diane Keaton and 
then Shelley Duvall. I personally think the thought of Woody Allen 
and Olive Oyl having sex is inherrently funny, even if Woody's post-
coital comment "I think I'm starting to get the feeling back in my 
jaw" is more than disgusting.
Zelig (1983) ***
        Yes, I admit I only watched this movie so I'd have a "Z" 
review to close out the book with, but upon watching ZELIG, I found 
it was a clever, funny movie. It comes to us from Woody Allen, who 
plays Leonard Zelig, an enigmatic man of the 1920's who was a 
human chameleon, changing races and personalities to match the 
people he was around. Mia Farrow (believe you Mia) is the 
psychiatrist convinced she can cure him. The two start out with a 
professional relationship and move on to a physical one, until he 
runs off with her adopted Korean daughter (one more Soon-Yi joke 
won't kill you).
        ZELIG is told as a black-and-white documentary, with 
Allen mixing old newsreel footage with fake interviews. It's more a 
novelty movie than anything, but Allen still manages to work in a 
few of his trademark one-liners. For instance, during an early 
session with Farrow, he assumes the persona of a doctor, saying, 
"I have to leave now. I teach a course in advanced masturbation at 
the community college and if I don't get there on time, they start 
without me." That's Woody for you.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Juror, The (1996)
        I always knew somewhere, somehow Alec Baldwin 
and Demi Moore would star in a movie together. Think about 
it -- they're both dark-haired, husky-voiced hunks who can't act 
very well. THE JUROR is the movie that proves when you put two 
people of that calibur next to one another trying to pull off serious 
acting, the result will be mostly laughable.
        Demi plays a single parent (mother of androgynous "3rd 
Rock From the Sun" teen Joseph Gordon-Levitt) who is called up 
for jury duty in a Mafia murder case. The jury selection scene at the 
beginning where Demi admits she never follows the news and has 
no idea what's going on in the world seems almost autobiographical. 
I have a hunch she's used the phrase "Someone needs to vote Reagan 
out of office" at least once in the past year.
        No sooner does the trial begin than a handsome gentleman 
shows up to buy some of Demi's sculptures. (If they're anything like 
her pottery in GHOST, I'm sure they'd sell out instantly... That's 
sarcasm.) It's Alec, of course, and after he charms her and gets into 
her house, he reveals his true intentions. He's got the house bugged 
and he'll hurt the kid if he has to unless he hears those two magic 
words -- not guilty.
        Apparently, Demi is the only juror targeted by Alec for 
extortion. He reveals that he "picked" her to convert the other jurors 
to a not guilty verdit because of her magic gift of debate and 
persuasion... and a pair of knockers that won't quit. The first hour 
of THE JUROR is divided between Demi being inexplicably bitchy 
to her kid and slutty best friend and shots of Baldwin listening in 
on and taking pictures of her. Predictably, it turns into a fatal 
attraction kind of obsession, with Alec going above and beyond 
the Mafia call of duty to keep Demi in her place.
        She actually does get them all to acquit the man on trial, 
but that's just the first half of the movie. Baldwin still has to go even 
more over the top in his portrayal of a man so obsessive he kills four 
people after the trial and keeps stalking Demi after she's sent her son 
off to Guatemala for safe-keeping. In between, there are more than a 
few scenes of the two together, sending the Overacting Meter off the 
chart with their inadvertently hilarious exchanges.
        THE JUROR also sets off the Predictability and Boring 
Expository Information Meters in more than one location. I'm going 
to have to sentence this one to life in the Jail of Mediocrity because 
it's probably the worst court trial movie since the gay porn orgy 
HUNG JURY, starring "Twelve Horny Men."
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for GoldenEye (1995)
     I haven't seen many other James Bond movies to compare this new
one to (translation: zero), but it stands on its own as a decent action
flick.  I did find it an uneven movie to be mainly appreciated by
middle-aged adults who grew up on the Connery Bond films of the 60's
and are in need of something to cling on to in light of the recent wave
of P.C.-laden movies and sex-killer flicks.  And I was pretty much
proven right when my mom asked me how I liked it and I said "It was
okay." She replied, "Are you kidding? I loved that movie." And yes, I
do still see movies with my mother.  What's it to you?
     GOLDENEYE, at least, plays the outdated Bond movie staples for
laughs.  What else can you do but snicker at a movie with a
White-Anglo-Saxon-Protestant hero, an abnormal ratio of cigarette
smokers to non-smokers, helpless women, Russian villains, absurd
high-tech gadgets, explosions, red convertible sports cars and
ridiculously far-fetched death defying scenes?  Add in a beautiful yet
villainous masochist woman (Xenia Onatopp) who gets off on her fights
with Bond and the movie may as well be a time machine to a
long-forgotten era.  I was waiting for them to talk about President
Nixon or hot pants.
     Pierce Brosnan does a good job of playing 007 (which represents
his agent number and his I.Q.) here and, as usual, James Bond gets all
the chicks while making the world safe for kids to play in the
streets.  And what does he get for his efforts? People call him a
"sexist, misogynist dinosaur." This time, Bond has to protect the world
from a missile system that short circuits all the world's electricity,
undoing the progress the world has made in the last century.  Please,
this movie is far enough in the Stone Age already.

Title
Review for Tell Your Children (1936)
        REEFER MADNESS is one of the most famous bad movies 
of all time. It's an ancient propaganda piece about the dangers of 
marijuana, "the new drug menace that is destroying the youth of 
America in alarmingly increasing numbers." An on-screen prologue 
tells us, "Something must be done to wipe out this ghastly menace," 
but obviously this movie isn't the thing to do it. If anything, it has 
prompted sixty years worth of teenagers to try pot for the first time 
and countless others to laugh hysterically at some of the worst 
acting and preposterous dialogue in cinema history.
        The movie centers around a clean-cut WASP couple, Bill 
and Mary, who spend their days playing tennis and drinking tea 
on the back porch, where Bill says to Mary, "I went home and told 
mother that the problem with her pot roast gravy was that she hadn't 
added three heaping teaspoons of olive oil." From the looks of these 
two, they're already either tripping acid or on heroin, but their 
friend, Jimmy, soon introduces Bill to someone who can get him 
something even better.
        It's Jack, the local dealer, who invites kids up to his 
girlfriend's apartment and gives them free pot. Bill comes up with 
his friend and begins to light up his plain old tobacco-and-nicotine 
cigarette when a beautiful girl gives him one of her cigarettes. Soon 
Bill's giggling like a schoolgirl and dancing a frantic jitterbug. If 
REEFER MADNESS only serves one education purpose, it's as 
evidence that white people can't dance when they're stoned 
either.
        Of course, after one joint, Bill's hooked. And, as his grades 
and tennis game go down the tubes, the principal can't help but 
notice. He comes right out and asks Bill, "Isn't it true that you 
have, perhaps unwillingly, acquired a certain harmful habit through 
association with certain undesirable people?" But Bill ducks the 
question and heads back to the solace of Jack's apartment, where 
any kid can go to be himself.
        After one particularly potent reefer, Bill beds down 
with another girl. A concerned Mary tracks him down but gets the 
cigarette switch trick pulled on her. Soon she's giggling like a school 
girl while the weirdest of the potheads, Ralph, tries to jump her 
bones. When she resists and begins screaming, Bill comes running 
out, still under the influence of the evil weed. He begins 
hallucinating and blacking out at the same time Jack accidentally 
shoots Mary. The bullethole in her back is about the thickness 
of a pencil.
        "Is she alright?" the other girl asks. "She's dead," Jack 
replies, pinning the blame on Bill, who ends up being convicted 
of murder. Only Ralph and the other girl know the truth, and they're 
locked up in Jack's apartment for the duration of the trial, with only 
a piano and couple hundred joints to keep them going. That's when 
the movie's funniest scene comes along, in which the girl, joint in 
mouth, begins playing the piano and a paranoid Ralph keeps yelling, 
"Faster! Faster!" until finally the girl is playing a frenzied solo, 
establishing the marijuana-music connection which would peak 
in the 60's.
        The climax comes when Ralph kills Jack and the guilty 
piano girl blurts out the truth to the police. "I'm guilty, I'm guilty!" 
she cries as she signs her confession. Scarcely one minute later, 
as she is being led back to her cell by a prison matron, she runs 
down the hall and throws herself out the window, by which point 
most viewers of REEFER MADNESS have done the same. The only 
way to get anything out of this movie is stoned, with the video box 
serving as one giant rolling paper. But watch out because "the dread 
marijuana may be reaching forth next for your son or daughter... or 
yours... or YOURS!"
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Batman Forever (1995)
     There were two things I was looking forward to in June of 1995
(besides graduating from high school, of course): the Michael Jackson
HIStory album and BATMAN FOREVER, both of which turned out to be less
than ideal.  Everyone's saying this new Batman movie is a definite
improvement over the doom and gloom of the Tim Burton movies, which I
both liked, but there's really no way to compare the two because
they're so completely different.  In fact, it seems to me that great
measures were taken to ensure this movie was distanced as far from the
first two Batman movies as possible. Instead of calling it BATMAN 3, as
if to actually admit the Burton films exist, they called it BATMAN
FOREVER, which makes it seem more like a household cleaning product
than a movie ("Want to remove tough stains fast?  Use BATMAN
FOREVER.").
     Michael Keaton, who put on the cape and cowl in the other Batman
movies (and did an unexpectedly good job of it), has been replaced by
Val Kilmer, who makes Adam West seem almost Shakespearean. Kilmer's
portrayal of Batman is one-dimensional and wooden, and the manner in
which he delivers most of his serious lines borders on self-parody
("Are you trying to get under my cape, doctor?").
     Then there's The Riddler, played by a man you know I don't
like--Jim Carrey, who pretty much plays himself in a green
question-mark suit. I know there is a substantial percentage of people
out there who actually think Jim Carrey is funny, but then there are
also a lot of people who think they've been abducted by aliens and
stalked by Elvis. Most intelligent people see right through the strange
facial configurations and recycled soundbites (The only thing missing
is an "Al-l-l-l-l-righty then.") and realize there's nothing funny
underneath, particularly when you realize the Riddler character is
meant to be crazy but not a comedian, kind of like The Joker from the
first Batman, played masterfully by Jack Nicholson. Of course,
comparing Nicholson and Carrey is an exercise in futility, like
comparing The Beatles and Weezer.
     Tommy Lee Jones plays the other villain, Two-Face, the epitome of
duality. One side is normal, upright, law-abiding, and the other is
ruthlessly evil, as a result of a face-scarring acid accident. You have
to give credit to Jones for at least trying to stay in character (more
than I can say for Carrey), but his performance, while notable, still
comes off as second-banana to scene-stealing (the ultimate crime)
Carrey, or did you notice they devoted thirty minutes to The Riddler's
origin and a ten-second passing reference to Two-Face?
     The movie's best performance is delivered by Chris O'Donnell
(Pacino's lackey in Scent of a Woman), who plays Dick Grayson, a
tormented acrobat teen whose family has been killed by Two-Face. He is
taken in as millionaire Bruce Wayne's youthful ward and, upon learning
Bruce's identity, insists on avenging his parents' murder as Batman's
sidekick. For a "light-hearted" movie, this aspect of O'Donnell's
character, along with Kilmer's flashback dreams of his parents' murders
and the realization that revenge has become his life, is definitely as
dark and moody as anything Burton did.
     Rounding out the cast (with a stand-out performance) is Nicole
Kidman as Dr. Chase Meridian, who is obsessed with Batman but soon
finds herself drawn to Bruce Wayne as well. Gee, that's a tough
choice.  And what if Batman ever found out she has having an affair
with Bruce Wayne? That's a fight I'd like to see. Kidman is as sexy as
ever (especially since I don't remember her ever being particularly
sexy in the first place) and is as good a replacement for Kim
Basinger's Vicki Vale as anyone. Another example of the disowning of
the Burton Batman films by Batman Forever comes when Kilmer tells
Kidman no one has ever found out about his secret identity before, even
though Vicki Vale, Catwoman and Max Shreck (evil businessman
Christopher Walken) all stumbled upon his identity in the first two
movies.
     Then there are the supporting players. Two-Face's duality is
brought out further in his two girlfriends--nice-girl Sugar (Drew
Barrymore, in the stretch of her career) and naughty dominatrix (I've
always wanted to use that word in a review) Spice (No One I've Ever
Heard Of). And the only two returning actors from Batman and Batman
Returns, Michael Gough as Alfred, Bruce's butler and confidant, and Pat
Hingle as Commissioner Gordon.
     The BATMAN FOREVER director, Joel Schumacher, has abandoned the
dark, Gothic style sets of BATMAN and BATMAN RETURNS in favor of a more
surreal, psychedelic comic book which helps create a mood that's
lighter and more trippy. It's blatantly obvious, though, that the
Gotham buildings are computer-generated, whereas the Burton skyline
consisted of tediously constructed miniatures, but again, comparing the
styles of Burton and Schumacher is like comparing apples and nipples
(whatever that means).
     The Batcostumes in BATMAN FOREVER are even more sleek and
streamlined than the Keaton costume, though for some odd reason,
Robin's costume includes fake nipples on the chest (so now it is like
comparing apples and nipples). Even the Batmobile is a different car.
This one shoots fire out the back all the time (fueled by Mexican food
apparently) and sports a strange-looking fin running the length of the
back of the car. Maybe Batman bought it used from Sharkman. One thing I
do know--the old Batmobile was a lot better.
     The plot this time has mad scientist Edward Nigma becoming The
Riddler after Bruce Wayne turns down funding for his invention "The
Box" (Isn't that a music video channel?), which makes interactive TV
possible, and also extracts knowledge from the minds of the viewers,
transporting it telepathically to the mind of The Riddler. It is
through this invention that The Riddler promises Two-Face knowledge of
Batman's true identity (which, according to Kilmer, has never before
been revealed--deliberate inconsistencies are the worst). In between,
the Chase Meridian/Batman and Robin story lines are developed and a few
death traps are thrown in to boot.
     All in all, BATMAN FOREVER is a good movie, but not as good as
it could have been with a few minor changes (drop Kilmer and Carrey,
tone down the set psychedelia, stick with the original costumes and
Batmobile, etc.). Still, I'm looking forward to that fourth Batman
movie in 1998.

Title
Review for Never Say Never Again (1983)
     Never say, "Watch this movie," to someone either. Not that anyone 
said that to me. In fact, I wish someone had said the opposite to me. I 
sat through two-plus hours of Sean Connery trying to pretend he was 
still young enough to be James Bond, more than twenty years after 
portraying 007 for the first time in DR. NO. His age makes the multiple 
fistfights and love scenes with beautiful women more absurd-looking than 
usual. I'd say the fact that six years later Sean Connery would start 
playing action heros' fathers (INDIANA JONES AND THE LAST CRUSADE and 
ROBIN HOOD: PRINCE OF THIEVES) should clue you in on what I'm talking 
about. Why Connery couldn't leave the legend as it was instead of 
returning for the most bland Bond movie he's ever done is what puzzles 
me. No, I don't ponder the mysteries of the universe and the mortality 
of life. I ponder this for hours on end. 
     NEVER SAY NEVER AGAIN is a remake of 1965's THUNDERBALL, one of the 
more mediocre efforts from the Connery years. (Why they couldn't redo 
GOLDFINGER or DIAMONDS ARE FOREVER is another thing I stay awake
nights pondering.) It keeps the basic premise of that movie--villain 
Largo, owner of an enormous yacht, steals two nuclear devices and 
threatens their detonation on the world if a ransom is not met--but 
changes almost everything else. 
     Bond is reactivated as a double-o agent, only to be shipped off to 
a health farm to purge him of his ancient habits of eating red meat and 
drinking martinis shaken not stirred (when it's so much better for your 
body to have them stirred and not shaken). He does engage in a couple 
other old habits of his--sex with his masseuse and a destructive fight 
with a goon trying to kill him. He also stumbles upon the evil nurse 
(Barbara Carrera) working for Largo. That's conquest number two for 
Bond, who attracts beautiful women like flies... actually, mosquitoes 
might be a better comparison when you think about it. 
     He then ends up playing a high-stakes video game with Largo (They 
had to take advantage of that 80's technology.) and doing the tango 
(vertically and horizontally) with Kim Basinger. Then there's the 
motorcycle chase, laser watch, Carrera's combustion and endless scuba 
diving. But it never seems like a full-fledged Bond movie. Besides the 
fact that Connery is over the action hero hill, British inventor Q. is 
played by a different actor and Moneypenny only has two lines. Wouldn't 
you think if Connery aged twenty years since the first movie that 
Moneypenny would be pushing fifty too? Nope, she's still unexplainably 
thirtyish. That's something else I'll be pondering at great lengths 
tonight.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Santa Clause, The (1994)
        Tim Allen of "Home Improvement" stars in this winter's 
big family Christmas movie. At the beginning, jolly old St. Nick 
falls off Allen's roof on Christmas Eve. Santa agrees not to sue if 
Allen tries on his clothes and jumps in his sleigh. Sound like 
innocent family fun to you or a night at the all-male cinema? Just 
asking. Allen puts on the suit and is whisked away to the North 
Pole, where he meets the elves, who are actually just a bunch of 
kids who never grew up. In other words, the Hollywood script-
writers responsible for this childish movie.
        After a night of toy delivery, he turns up back in his own 
bed, convinced the whole thing was a dream brought on by some 
bad eggnog. However, he soons beginning gaining weight rapidly 
and sporting a thick gray mane and beard (so is this guy supposed to 
be metamorphosing into Santa Claus or Kenny Rogers?). The people 
around him think maybe it's a little weird that he's gained sixty 
pounds in a week and it doesn't help matters much when Allen's 
kid starts telling everyone his dad is the big S.
        But Allen eventually comes to grips with his Santahood 
and convinces his ex-wife and her live-in psychiatrist boyfriend (this 
may be the first Disney movie where two characters are "shacked 
up," if you don't count those dwarves from SNOW WHITES, also 
reminiscent of a night at the all-male cinema) that he's not really 
insane. Sure, people ride around in sleighs driven by flying reindeer 
and slide down people's chimneys all the time. What, don't tell me 
I'm the only one!
        At least in this movie the writers try to explain exactly 
how fat old Santa gets down all those chimneys and delivers all 
those toys in one night... even if it is a really stupid explanation. 
Thrown in a typical formulaic sappy and happy Michael Eisner 
ending and you've got a decent Christmas movie for the entire 
(dysfunctional) family.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for Ice Storm, The (1997)
        Christina Ricci saying, "I'll show you mine if you show me 
yours," _that's_ what more arthouse movies need. THE ICE STORM, 
adapted from the novel by Rick Moody, is a powerful Ang Lee film 
that explores the world of empty bitterness and loneliness of two 
Connecticut families during the sexual revolution of the '70s. As we 
all know, the American colonial war wasn't the only revolution with 
a "shot heard 'round the world." I don't know what that last sentence 
was supposed to mean exactly; just chalk it up to one more vague 
sexual innuendo from the mouth of Andrew.
        Kevin Kline, Mr. Name Above the Title, plays an average 
husband. He's got a wife (Joan Allen), two kids and a lot of tacky, 
big-collared shirts. It's the kind of family that ships the teenage son 
off to boarding school, leaves the teenage daughter at home and 
heads off to some lame party every night, parties where they 
speculate about those wild California "key" parties. That's when the 
men put their car keys in a bowl and the women fish out a random 
set of keys at the end of the night to see which guy they're going 
home with. It beats the hell out of mistletoe, I'll tell you that.
        Kline also happens to be having an affair with the 
neighbor, Sigourney "Zuul" Weaver. But look out, tables are 
turning, Allen eventually gets it on with the husband in his car ("Do 
these seats go back?") and Weaver's son (Elijah Wood) is messing 
around with Kline's daughter (Ricci), the kind of plot twist you'd 
find in an X-rated episode of "The Brady Bunch." At the same time, 
Ricci is drawn to Wood's younger brother, a weird kid who spends 
his time blowing up his model airplanes and hanging his Army 
dolls.
        Meanwhile, there's Kline's son, the only person who 
manages to pursue anyone outside the neighbor's family. Home from 
boarding school for Thanksgiving weekend, he arranges a train trip 
into New York to see a girl from his school. For once, he's trying to 
get to a woman before his best friend does, until he shows up at the 
house and finds the friend already there. This storyline was my 
personal favorite of the movie, as someone who's had that special 
"brother" relationship with a lot of girls I've had crushes on.
        THE ICE STORM takes its precious time to get started, but 
once it does, it turns into one hell of a ride. Its circular, orchestrated 
plot and existential dialogue keep it from being anything raunchy or 
low-brow. In a movie where people of all ages search for meaning in 
sex, drugs and alcohol, nothing is glorified or exaggerated. That is 
the beauty of THE ICE STORM and, having seen it, I can now say 
with all honesty, "I'll show you mine if you show me yours."
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America for more than 1/25th of a century!

Title
Review for Murder at 1600 (1997)
        There's only one presidential election every four years, but it 
seems like every few months we get another presidential conspiracy 
movie painted as _the_ thriller of the year. In 1997, we've had 
ABSOLUTE POWER, AIR FORCE ONE, SHADOW CONSPIRACY 
and MURDER AT 1600. This one is about as lame duck as old Gerald 
Ford, trying to bring us a complex plot of cover-up and intrigue but 
copping out over and over again with rehashes of action flick 
standbys.
        Here's what happens this time. It's night at the White House. 
A secretary is having sex with some unidentified guy with a cute butt. 
The next day she's dead and hotshot detective Wesley Snipes is called 
in. How do we know he's a hotshot? We've seen the traditional action 
flick opener -- the clever hostage negotiation scene. It's not so clever 
this time, consisting of Snipes disarming a suicidal ex-government 
employee holding a gun to his head in the middle of the street.
        Snipes is off to the White House, where he finds the Secret 
Service head (the shiny bald head of Daniel Benzali) won't cooperate 
with him at all. In fact, if not for the intervention of National Security 
Adviser Alan Alda, Snipes wouldn't have been allowed in the White 
House at all. Alda helps Snipes out further, assigning a sexy Secret 
Service agent (Diane Lane) to act as his liaison... a very dangerous 
liaison. Well, not really, I just wanted to say that.
        Almost immediately, a suspect is found, an eccentric night 
janitor seen flirting with the deceased on one of the security videos. 
Snipes doesn't buy it, and launches into an independent investigation 
of his own, one that reveals planted evidence and romantic 
involvement by the president's son. Snipes' partner, an always-
wisecracking Dennis Miller, calls him up every once in awhile with 
more news and Lane, who at first doesn't believe Snipes, eventually 
and predictably comes around, and risks her ass to break into Social 
Security storage and break out some classified information.
        For the first hour or so, MURDER AT 1600 looks like it 
could be going somewhere interesting. Sure, we have to sit through 
the lame opening sequence and plenty more lame scenes after that, 
but the whole murder in the White House thing makes for an 
interesting premise that is never quite delivered upon. Snipes and 
Lane don't make for a bad action team, but with nothing to work 
with, they're just cogs in the bad movie machine. Dennis Miller 
might as well not even be in the movie; they waste his talents more 
in MURDER AT 1600 than they did in BORDELLO OF BLOOD, and 
that's saying a lot.
        When you get to the last half-hour, the movie has descended 
metaphorically and literally into a wet sewer, busting out the old 
break-into-the-building underground climax. And when they finally 
reveal who killed the woman and why, you'll wish you never sat 
through this movie at all. The "1600" in the movie's title doesn't 
represent an address, it represents the number of satisfied customers 
worldwide.
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving The World For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Rosemary's Baby (1968)
        Can you say "dated"? You can if you've seen ROSEMARY'S 
BABY which, like THE EXORCIST, was a thrilling horror film in its 
time but seems boring and laughable in the decades that have passed 
since its original release. "Mystery Science Theater 3000" has 
skewered the bad films of the past, but let me tell you, it could do a 
number on the "good" ones too. ROSEMARY'S BABY stars Mia 
Farrow (from the time she was actually good-looking) as an 
innocent housewife and her not-so-innocent husband (John 
Cassavettes), an actor who takes an easy, albeit evil, road to 
success.
        It all seems so harmless in the beginning. Mia and John 
move into an apartment where several past murders have been 
committed. (There's also a skull in the living room, but it's only for 
decoration.) Their elderly neighbors pop in for a housewarming. 
All's well for about the first hour of this slow-moving film, until Mia 
eats some of the neighbors' chocolate mousse and passes out. 
When she comes to, she finds herself in a darkened room with a 
bunch of people yelling and dancing like savages and a big, evil 
man raping her -- a foreshadowing of her future life with Woody 
Allen.
        It seems like a dream and, when she finds herself pregnant, 
she almost forgets about it. And everyone's helping with the 
pregnancy. The neighbors have some wonderful vitamin potions 
for her to drink, a good-luck charm for her to wear around her neck, 
and the name of an obstetrician who's been in the business 66.6 
years. Meanwhile, Mia begins having chronic stomach pains and 
losing a lot of weight. Before too long she looks just like the lead 
singer of The Cranberries. That's when you know your health's 
failing.
        The only person in the movie who's the least bit suspicious 
of all this is an old friend (Maurice Evans) who calls Mia up to give 
her the bad news -- and immediately falls into a coma. By about the 
two-hour mark I felt the same way. ROSEMARY'S BABY is way too 
long, and leads up to a payoff that's about as boring and laughable 
as the rest of the movie. I guess someone put a spell on this movie.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for American President, The (1995)
     A wonderful Rob Reiner film that expertly combines comedy, drama,
romance and even some sociopolitical commentary, THE AMERICAN PRESIDENT
chronicles the newfound romance of a lonely widower (Michael Douglas)
who just happens to be leader of the free world.  And having a
sexually-frustrated president who exercises the pocket veto in the
absence of female companionship can never be a good thing.  So when
Douglas finds himself actually about to make a pass at Janet Reno, he
decides it might be time to find a first lady.
     In walks Annette Bening, an environmental lobbyist who's trying to
make sure Douglas will support a fossil-fuel bill to be sent to
Congress.  And something about the 97-octane perfume she wears gets to
Douglas, so he asks her to a state dinner, your average first date.  One
thing leads to another and soon he's emancipating her in the Lincoln
bedroom.  Interestingly enough, five minutes into the act, a tour guide
leads a group of tourists into the bedroom... "And this is the Lincoln
bedr--OH MY GOD!"
     As it has a propensity to do, the press soon finds out about the
fling.  The cabinet, which includes Michael J. Fox (who I suspect got
down on his knees and begged Reiner to put him in the movie) and
talented character actor David Paymer (of QUIZ SHOW and MR. SATURDAY
NIGHT, among others), is appalled, knowing Douglas' main opposition, an
evil Republican senator (Richard Dreyfuss) will have a field day
smearing Douglas with peanut butter... no, with the affair.  Of course,
in Hollywood, the phrase "evil Republican" is all but redundant.  One
of the few faults of THE AMERICAN PRESIDENT is its portrayal of the
right wing as heartless and incompetent and liberals as the world's
humble messiahs, while completely ignoring indisputable facts about the
Republican party--that Rush Limbaugh always tells the truth, Ronald
Reagan never forgets and Newt Gingrich in no way resembles Doc from
Snow White and the Seven Dwarves.
     THE AMERICAN PRESIDENT features first-rate writing, directing and
acting.  Surprisingly, even Michael J. Fox has graduated from the
superficialities of insulting Mallory and Jennifer and traveling
through time in a Delorean to the world of dramatic acting.  And as
usual, Bening, Dreyfuss and Paymer all give good performances.  Douglas
shines in what is the second Hollywood version of Bill Clinton
(remember Kevin Kline in DAVE?).  Douglas even looks like Clinton
(Michael, if you're reading this, no offense man.) and seems to have
mastered Clinton's mannersims, even down to the exact manner in which
he signs bills, downs a box of super-size fries in one gulp and
unhooks the bras of Washington women with the greatest of ease.
     This is definitely a terrific romance comedy that is believable,
intelligent and touching, even if it does have political correctness
coming out its ... lower posterior region.  I would have used that three
letter word with the one A and two S's but I too have been stricken
with the P.C. virus of late.  Well, except for the jokes about having
sex in the Lincoln bedroom, Reagan's Alzheimer's and Clinton's
reputation for promiscuity.

Title
Review for Beavis and Butt-head Do America (1996)
        Yes, three years after everybody stopped caring about the 
show, out comes the "Beavis and Butt-head" movie, an animated ode 
to the onslaught of stupidity the teenagers of America eagerly 
embrace. If you can allow yourself to embrace it for 78 minutes or 
so, you'll find a lot of entertainment in Beavis and Butt-head 
Do America. It's no intellectual satire of the times, but it does 
have its moments. And let's face it, creator/director Mike Judge 
could have released a blank screen and still made 100 million 
bucks.
        I'm assuming that you, as a literate person, have at least 
some idea of the premise behind the "Beavis and Butt-head" show 
and its ensuing movie. Over 100 half-hour episodes have chronicled 
the exploits of these two teenagers, Beavis the stupid blond-haired 
one, Butt-head the stupid dark-haired one. Both of them high school 
freshman, they go through life watching music videos, laughing at 
every possible double entendre phrase in the book, and hoping 
against hope that one day they'll score with a chick.
        The show has its share of critics, but nearly every teenaged 
boy gets hooked into it at some time or another. I fell victim to the 
show over three years ago, at the age of 15, before the show became 
clich  and I grew up at least a little bit. I've seen about every episode 
since but can't really call myself a fan, as I doubt anyone with a 
100+ I.Q. can. I was still looking forward to seeing Beavis and 
Butt-head Do America and, believe me, it didn't disappoint.
        What's the plot? Stupid question, but here goes anyway... 
Beavis and Butt-head wake up one morning to discover their TV's 
been stolen. They set out to find another TV to watch, first 
attempting to steal one from school, then walking into a hotel room, 
where some guy who talks like Bruce Willis offers them $10,000 to 
"do" his wife. They jump at the chance because not only would 
they 
get to score with a chick, but they could also buy themselves 
a big-screen TV with that kind of money.
        Thus begins the adventure, as Beavis and Butt-head board 
a plane to Las Vegas, where they participate in a few hijinks and 
Beavis gets to become Cornholio for the fourth time. In Vegas, they 
find the wife, who talks like Demi Moore. In a RED ROCK WEST 
plot twist, she offers them $20,000 to go back where they came from 
and "do" him, a concept that doesn't appeal to the boys for some 
reason or another. As police close in on the hotel, Demi slips a 
top-secret chemical weapon into Beavis' pants, where a top-secret 
chemical weapon apparently already resides.
        Once this happens, Beavis and Butt-head have all manner 
of federal agents (headed by a cavity-search obesessed Robert Stack) 
chasing them across the country. Over the course of Beavis and 
Butt-head Do America, we see how the two brain-dead 
cartoon characters react to the Hoover Dam, the Grand Canyon, 
Yellowstone Park, the Capitol Building and even the Oval Office. 
They even meet two men who are very probably their fathers.
        This movie probably isn't for anyone who doesn't already 
like the show. If you do like the show, though, this is the best 
episode yet. It gets the two main characters out of the same 
neighborhood and the same boring routine we've seen them engage 
in for four seasons on the TV show, but it still manages to work in 
the best recurring characters from the show. Beavis and Butt-
head Do America does not suck.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for Clerks (1994)
        I guess it's just the fact that I've been a teenager for the past 
five years and heard every possible obscenity and sexual innuendo 
on a daily basis, but the film CLERKS didn't offend me at all. There 
were certain lines of dialogue that morally disgusted me, but none 
of it had any shock value. Nothing new under the sun, as it were. 
But the Motion Picture Association of America took a different 
stance on the movie, slapping it with the dreaded NC-17 rating, 
the first movie ever to receive an NC-17 based on language alone. 
It was eventually reduced to R, but CLERKS is definitely an 
adult film, even if I've heard and read this kind of stuff since 
junior high.
        Talented director Kevin Smith brings us a day in the life 
of two slackers, Dante Hicks (no relation) and Randal, who work in 
a convenience store and video store, respectively (but not respectfully). 
Dante agrees to man the store on his day off because another employee 
is sick. He definitely picked the wrong day to come to work. By the 
day's end, he's closed the store twice to go to a funeral and play 
hockey on the roof, been responsible for an act of necrophelia, lost 
two girlfriends and been fined $500 for selling cigarettes to a four 
year old, among other things.
        In the wake of PULP FICTION's revolutionary use of 
pop-culture references in intelligent dialogue, CLERKS brings us 
several memorable exchanges, in sexual and nonsexual contexts, 
including the least respectable job on the planet (the guy who 
mops the peep show booths at a porno house), the ending of 
THE EMPIRE STRIKES BACK vs. RETURN OF THE JEDI and 
Randal on the phone to the video distributor, ordering a couple 
dozen adult movie titles while a woman and her small child wait 
to be helped. There are plenty of G-rated sequences mixed in with 
the NC-17 ones, leading me to believe this movie actually could 
be shown on TV one day, albeit in an hour time slot.
        CLERKS is basically plotless, but Smith keeps it far 
above the level of a sitcom or "wild comedy" movie like D.C. 
CAB or REVENGE OF THE NERDS. It has a distinct identity 
no other "Generation X" film has brought us, filmed in black-
and-white, surveillance camera-style. Most artsy movies like this 
don't appeal to the masses, but CLERKS brings with it that 
self-indulgent air of dirty talk most people our age secretly enjoy 
engaging in at some point or another with our friends. What the 
MPAA needs to realize is that everyone's life would be rated 
NC-17 if it were a movie because none of us can escape the adult 
situations and dialogue life brings us. Not to mention the 
gratuitous nudity every time we take showers.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Carrie (1976)
        I'm convinced CARRIE has become regarded as a classic 
merely because it depicts what everyone would like to do -- go to the 
prom with the best-looking person in high school, then kill all the 
students and teachers with your mind. Well, I wouldn't have minded it 
at MY senior prom...
        CARRIE set the stage for most future adaptations of Stephen 
King books -- cut most of the plot out, melodramatize the rest and fill 
it with B-grade actors. This isn't always the case; for every "Starsky 
and Hutch" star in a vampire flick, there's a Nicholson yelling, "Here's 
Johnny" or, here, John Travolta slaughtering a pig. Usually, though, 
King's novels don't translate well to screen, as in this threadbare tale 
of a misunderstood teenager who just happens to be telepathic.
        The title character is played by Sissy Spacek, who is probably 
one of the strangest looking actresses in movie history. In the famous 
opening sequence, she's in the locker room shower after gym class, 
scrubbing away at her pert breasts, when she gets her period. It scares 
the crap out of her, this unwarranted blood flow (those last three words 
would be a good name for a punk band, by the way), so she goes 
running through the locker room. Naked and screaming, blood on her 
hands. I'd say that's a good way to never, ever be popular again.
        We soon find out why young Carrie is so shocked. The 
principal and gym coach send her home, where she encounters her 
Crazy Christian mom (Piper Laurie). There are a lot of religious 
whackos in Stephen King movies, but Laurie creates one of the most 
memorable, house full of candles and decked out with a prayer closet 
that has a giant cross-bound Christ. Mom tells Carrie her period is 
surely a sign of sexual sin ("First comes the blood, then the men") and 
locks her in the closet.
        It's no wonder she's ostracized at school, but it gets worse 
after the gym coach punishes the other girls for pelting her with 
tampons. The tampon pelting (another good name for a punk group) 
earns them a special after-school gym practice, where they have to 
jiggle their way through jumping jacks and push-ups. Revenge is the 
first thing on the minds of the popular crowd; one of them orders her 
Frampton-looking boyfriend to ask Carrie to the prom.
        No surprise, the boyfriend ends up with an appreciation for 
Carrie after she makes herself up for the first time, damning her 
mother's advice through a little telepathy. Without her mental abilities, 
there would have been no chance for retaliation after the horrific prank 
pulled on her at the prom. It may seem an overreaction to eliminate 
your entire school, but then again, there's really no proper etiquette for 
what to do when someone dumps pigs' blood on you at your prom. 
Someone should write Miss Manners about that, I guess.
        CARRIE is certainly one of the more memorable Stephen King 
adaptations and, as the first, worth watching. Still, there's not much to 
the movie. The "creepy girl gets humiliated, peers laugh, get in trouble 
and decide to get revenge, after which creepy girl gets better revenge" 
plot could be told in a "Tales From the Crypt" episode. The climax, 
filmed through a blood-red filter and split-screen, is more hokey than 
scary viewed 21 years later. We don't see much motivation behind the 
people who ally themselves with Carrie -- the boyfriend and the gym 
coach -- only capsulizations. I haven't read the book, but there has to 
be more to the story than that.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for While You Were Sleeping (1995)
     And while I was watching, I was wondering why this was such a
popular movie.  Sure, it's a good date movie, but I saw this movie on
residence hall cable with my militant "Wings"-obsessed roommate (the
one I've been berating mercilessly in my comedy diary "Another Year in
the Life of a Nerd."  Check it out sometime.), so I think we can throw
the romantic element right out the window, just like I'd love to toss
that damn hat he always wears right out the window.  But that's not
something I should go into in this separate manuscript.
     Even without the romantic element, I still expected to like WHILE
YOU WERE SLEEPING for its comedic element and the element of
tungsten....  Sorry, we nerds know the Periodic Table like the back of
our hands.  You can't even call yourself a nerd if you don't know the
atomic mass of Ytterbium (163.0, of course).  And before that pitiful
digression, I was going to list Sandra Bullock, the movie's glamorous
yet seemingly down-to-earth star, as the movie's other major element of
appeal.  As always, Bullock's charm and beauty remains intact, but her
performance, like everything else in the movie, seems lackluster.
Maybe it proves Bullock should stick to action movies like The Net and
Speed rather than cutesy comedy.
     Bullock plays a lonely subway employee (that's half her problem
right there--what guy's going to date someone that works for the
transit system?) who has a classic case of unrequited love (you think I
don't know what that's like?!) for a man that comes by every morning.
One of those mornings he happens to fall on the subway track and
Bullock is the one to come to the rescue and save his life.  The poor
guy's in a coma, yes, and when she visits him at the hospital, a little
misunderstanding ensues, with the nurse blurting out to the guy's
family that Bullock is his fiance.
     And as you know, you can't have one misunderstanding in a movie
without several hundred others ensuing, so Bullock plays along with the
masquerade for whatever reason.  The guy stays in his coma while
Bullock wins over the family, while slowly finding herself in a
dilemma--she now loves the unconscious one's brother.  But she can't
make a move because she's engaged to a guy she's never spoken to.  If I
had a dime for every time that's happened to me....
     WHILE YOU WERE SLEEPING is a pretty good movie, but not nearly as
good as I was expecting.  That may have to do with the lack of romantic
atmosphere during my screening (watching a romance movie with the one
person you'd most like to stick red hot pokers in the eyes of probably
has that effect) but it also has to do with Bullock's half-hearted
performance and lack of quality writing.  The movie is too predictable
in plot and humor.  About halfway through, I started finishing all the
character's jokes before they did based on the setups.  Of course I did
have a copy of the script sitting in front of me....

Title
Review for Excess Baggage (1997)
        BATMAN AND ROBIN was probably supposed to be the 
turning point in the career of Alicia Silverstone, the role that would 
make her a box office superstar rather than just the Moon Pie-faced 
cutie that carried such worthless "the" movies as THE CRUSH and 
THE BABYSITTER. The fourth BATMAN film, of course, turned out 
far worse than expected, in quality and quantity (at the box office), 
then Silverstone made the not-so-brilliant choice to follow that 
mistake up with EXCESS BAGGAGE , which will probably have her 
doing Aerosmith videos again by the year 1999.
        Read my old reviews of Silverstone efforts and you'll see 
I had a killer crush on her through my late high school years -- 1993 
through 1995. Back then, I was convinced that she had enough beauty 
and charm that, if she could ever pick a decent script, she would be a 
force to be reckoned with at the office. Now I realize that can't happen. 
Two or three bad movies could be a coincidence, but when you get to 
turkey number five, six and seven, it's time to get out of Hollywood 
and let some other teenage bulemic take her turn.
        It sounds mean, but I've got no more patience for Alicia. 
Where a media-created infatuation used to lie, now I wonder what it 
was I liked about her in the first place. She's never acted convincingly 
in any movie other than CLUELESS, and then because the ditz 
character was tailored to her personality. Even though I didn't like it 
the first time out, I admit CLUELESS was her defining movie. I've 
taken the advice of countless e-mailers and watched the film again -- 
and, no, it's not as bad as I thought. I'd up it to a two-and-a-half star 
rating in the wake of other Silverstone disasters. At least she was 
likeable there.
        I went to see EXCESS BAGGAGE at the insistence of my 
younger brother, who's just now going through his Silverstone phase, 
maybe a little late. I've talked to a lot of guys my age and we were all 
infatuated with her at one time. This is the first time I've realized just 
how annoying she is when you're not attracted to her. Freed from my 
past crush, I could finally watch objectively as Silverstone embarrassed 
herself in her worst movie since THE BABYSITTER, even though this 
one had a budget and a theatrical release.
        Silverstone plays a none-too-intelligent spoiled brat (a 
serious method acting role for her) who stages her own kidnapping 
as a last-ditch effort to gain her father's attention and affection. The 
movie, thankfully foregoing any buildup to the fake kidnapping, joins 
her just as she is arranging to have the ransom exchange. Then she 
handcuffs herself (a private preference of hers) and locks herself in the 
trunk. So far, so good. Then comes a fatal mistake -- car thief Benicio 
Del Toro decides to steal her BMW. That's not the mistake; the 
mistake is letting her out of the trunk when we all would have been 
much happier leaving her in.
        This starts a series of predictable scenes -- brat Silverstone 
kicks him in the crotch, he locks her in the bathroom, she burns down 
the warehouse with a discarded cigarette butt, they end up in a car 
together, he dumps her, he finds out who she is and goes back to get 
her, she claims he molested her (in the movie's only funny line, 
"Daddy, he made me touch his penis," made even more amusing when 
you realize she wasn't talking about Benicio but the executive who was 
casting this movie), they fall in love -- that each become more tedious 
and grating than the last.
        Then there are two supporting characters that lend nothing 
to the film. There's Harry Connick, Jr. (it had to be him) as Benicio's 
associate, who shows up a couple times to demand his money and 
ask what the hell's going on, why Alicia's still there, etc. And there's 
Christopher Walken, the uncle who is really sort of a surrogate father 
to Alicia. Walken tries to act fatherly but comes off creepier than 
normal in scenes where he tries to track down Alicio and Benicia.
        None of this is the least bit amusing, intelligent or fun in 
execution. Alicia is unconvincing as the bad girl who has to smoke 
and cuss, Benicio is confusing in a performance that is a bizarre 
combination of Nicholson, French Stewart and Brad Pitt hell, 
everyone is miscast except for Connick and he might as well not even 
be in the movie. Bad acting and bad writing combine to give this 
movie a plodding pace that makes it seem like it will never end. Better 
give Steven Tyler a call, Alicia.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Almost 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Husbands and Wives (1992)
        This Woody Allen film takes on an extra layer of meaning 
in light of the over-publicized custody hearings with Mia Farrow. 
Woody plays an over-the-hill professor / writer who's having 
doubts about his marriage to Mia, doubts she shares once two of 
their friends (Sydney Pollack and Judy Davis), who seemed so 
happy with their marriage, announce they're splitting up, in a long, 
unbroken, one-camera shot. The most annoying thing about 
HUSBANDS AND WIVES is that Woody tries to make the whole 
thing into a documentary, using one camera to go from person to 
person instead of cutting between cameras and sticking interviews 
with the main characters between scenes.
        The motion is intentionally jerky and the edits are clumsy 
and obvious. God knows why the man did this -- maybe it's to 
illustrate how unstable a relationship is by the time a couple has 
been together that long. Or maybe he's just a clumsy jerk. But for 
whichever reason, the movie looks like THE REAL WORLD WITH 
WOODY ALLEN. It's a little too late for him to appear hip and 
trendy, especially considering this movie starts out with the same 
white on black credits / jazz music sequence his old movies were 
known for.
        HUSBAND AND WIVES focuses on those two husbands 
and those two wives in their extramarital pursuits. A typically 
creepy Woody finds himself drawn to one of his students, played 
by a typically creepy Juliette Lewis. Somehow those two seem to 
belong together. The freak factor matches up rather well in this case, 
although I'm sure she's no Soon-Yi. (Not every part of this movie 
was autobiographical.) Mia wants to pursue a relationship with a 
Scotsman at work (and see what's under that kilt), but he's already 
been set up with Judy, thanks to Mia. And Sydney is currently 
having a fling with his New Age vegetarian aerobics instructor.
        Most Woody Allen movies offer us a window into his life, 
but this one seems to offer one into Woody and Mia's collective life. 
It's all incredibly voyeuristic and addictive. The message here, as 
Juliette Lewis so succintly puts it, is that when you reach that age 
you can either have loneliness or suburban discontent with no 
passion or romance. But love at that point isn't about romance, as 
Judy so succintly puts it, it's more of a companionship issue, actually 
having someone to grow old with. Woody doesn't have Mia anymore 
but he does have Soon-Yi to retire with. When he's 70, she'll be 30, 
so it all works out -- as I so succintly put it.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for D.C. Cab (1983)
        If anyone had been able in 1983 to forsee a late-night cable 
show hosted by Gilbert Gottfried showcasing some of the worst films 
of the 80's, they'd agree D.C. CAB is the quintessential "USA Up All 
Nite" movie. It's one of those childish R-rated movies that kids would 
love but can't see until it's edited for TV. It's also one of those 
pointless, almost plotless movies with hardly any laughs. And, 
strike three, it pairs Mr. T with Gary Busey.
        I heard Gilbert say D.C. CAB had "an all-star cast," but I'm 
still hoping there was some degree of facetiousness in that statement. 
When third-billing goes to a two-minute appearance by famed 
flashdancer Irene Cara "as herself," you can't say a damn thing 
about all-star casts. Likewise for token appearances by Marsha 
"Roz" Warfield, Paul Rodriguez and "Politically Incorrect" host 
Bill Maher, before he was somebody. Appearing in D.C. CAB 
pretty much had the opposite effect on everyone else, especially 
Irene "I'm Gonna Live Forever" Cara.
        D.C. CAB is an ensemble comedy from Joel Schumacher 
(who would go on to direct BATMAN FOREVER) about a bunch of 
misfits who drive cabs. You get the feeling if the POLICE ACADEMY 
cadets had made a different career choice, this would be the result, 
except here you have such interesting characters as the "token white 
guy" (Busey) who wants to get in tight with the blacks now before 
they take over the world, the token jive talker named Tyrone (Charlie 
Barnett) who wears his hair in rollers and uses the word "honkey" as 
much as possible, the tough guy with the mohawk and gold chains 
(Mr. T -- a real stretch for him), the aspiring musician waiting for his 
big break (Maher), the Mexican gigolo (Rodriguez), the woman who 
actually wants to drive cabs for a living (Warfield) and the guy who 
wants to own a cab company for a living (Adam Baldwin).
        We've all seen dozens of bad comedies from the 80's. Some 
are fun to watch and some are actually funny. This one is more or 
less neither. You'd think plenty of comedic sparks would fly from the 
assemblage of talent (whatever), but D.C. CAB more or less falls flat 
on a continual basis, culminating in the usual contrived Hollywood 
finale as Baldwin is kidnapped and the other cabbies have to go to 
rescue him. It's a shame no one was able to rescue this movie from the 
depths of stale jokes and unoriginality. D.C. CAB has rightly earned 
its position on "USA Up All Nite."
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Striptease (1996)
        About 14 months after its original release, I finally got 
around to seeing STRIPTEASE and, let me tell you, I could have 
waited at least another 14 months. There's good news and bad news 
about STRIPTEASE. The good news is that a lot of this movie is 
completely different from what it was marketed as -- Demi Moore Gets 
Topless. The bad news is that there is still a lot of focus on the Demi 
striptease motif which, as far as that goes, is nothing but a tease. As 
highly publicized and compensated ($12.5 million) as her nudity is, 
you get good, unadulterated glimpses of her breasts for maybe 12.5 
seconds, which adds up to a million bucks a second. Even I'd get 
naked in a movie for that kind of money.
        STRIPTEASE was adapted from a comic novel by Carl 
Hiaasen that made light of the skin trade and its patrons, and a lot of 
the comedy still shines through. Every character but Demi's is played 
for laughs, but it just doesn't work to have her dropped in as the one 
serious character, the one who sees her "dancing" as a form of art and 
expression, and a way to make an honest living. There's a moment 
early on where she holds up a cocktail napkin with a nude female 
silhouette and tells the owner of the club, "Get rid of these. They're 
tacky and they objectify women." Come on, Demi, those are the 
cornerstones of your career. That and a telling lack of any sense of 
humor. Think about it -- when have you ever seen Demi be anything 
but dead serious in a movie? Then why is it I keep laughing so hard at 
her whenever I watch one of her movies?
        If not for Demi, STRIPTEASE could have been a good, fun 
movie. If they'd cast someone who could play the character for laughs 
to fit in with the others, it might have worked. Instead, painful steps 
are taken to make Demi into the single parent martyr of the strip 
industry. Before the dust has settled on the opening credits, Demi has 
already been screwed over by the male power establishment, as a 
bastard judge awards custody of her 7-year-old daughter to her 
husband (Robert "T-1000" Patrick), a redneck scam artist who makes 
a living stealing wheelchairs.
        Demi has to take solace in her dancing, as we see in at least 
six stripteases, only three of which she shows brief glimpses of each 
$6.25 million breast. She dances to more Annie Lennox songs than I 
knew existed, but I do have to give her props for doing a striptease to 
Prince's "If I Was Your Girlfriend," making it an even trilogy of 
Prince-teases in 1995 and 1996, from "Erotic City" in GIRL 6 to "319" 
in SHOWGIRLS (which I never saw, by the way, Mom). Actually, we 
see more of the other dancers' skin than Demi's, especially silicone-
enhanced snake dancer Pandora Peaks.
        The plot is more wacky and clever than Demi deserves. 
It involves a Demi-obsessed fan (William Hill) who tries to help her 
get custody back by blackmailing perverted Congressman Burt 
Reynolds (in his lamest hairpiece yet) with pictures of him attacking 
one of the strip club customers to protect his "angel," who of course 
turns out to be Demi. After Hill turns up dead, cop Armand Assante 
shows up to ask questions and investigate. It turns into a sex farce that 
could have been a decent comeback for Reynolds had anyone gone to 
see this movie.
        And I must give the Person Who Almost Saved This Movie 
award to Ving Rhames, who made me laugh every single time he 
turned up in STRIPTEASE . Playing a comic version of his toughass 
Marsellus Wallace character from PULP FICTION, Ving is the strip 
club bouncer and father figure to the dancers. Pure muscle at first 
appearance, he is more clever, literate and sarcastic than everyone else 
in the movie. Where Demi is too serious and Reynolds too wacky, 
Ving invigorates the movie with the same biting wit and satire 
Hiaasen intended for all the characters. Right now, I'd kill to see him 
in a decent comedy. One word of advice to anyone planning to adapt 
and film a Carl Hiaasen novel -- lock Demi up and pay Ving the $12.5 
million.
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving The World For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Crossing Guard, The (1995)
        Why did Sean Penn cross the road? I don't know and I don't 
care. My question is more along the lines of why Sean Penn devoted 
so much of his energy to scripting and directing this thriller whose 
only action scenes are at the beginning and end with a whole lot of 
boring melodrama in between. I don't know if you'll take my word 
for it, though, because from the video box it looks like a promising 
movie. Jack Nicholson plays the father of a murder victim who's 
been counting off the days to the killer's release from prison, when 
he'll exact his revenge, most likely in the eye-for-an-eye manner 
by killing the killer.
        But we know from the beginning that Jack ain't such a 
smart guy. He marches into the home of his ex-wife (Anjelica 
Huston), who was his wife at the time of the murder, and announces 
his plans to kill the murderer. Huston and Nicholson have had this 
discussion over and over (and will have many more before the 
fade-to-credits) and it's obvious Nicholson is a disturbed man 
who intends to go through with his plans, but Huston doesn't 
tip off the police, even after Nicholson gets in a fistfight with 
her new husband.
        So the murderer, played by David Morse of "St. Elsewhere" 
and 12 MONKEYS, gets out of prison and returns home to his loving 
parents. By this point we know something's wrong -- Nicholson is 
much more of a menace to society than Morse. That night Nicholson 
sneaks into Morse's bedroom while he's sleeping and points a gun at 
him before realizing there are no bullets. Morse wakes up and 
begins a casual conversation with him ("Oh hi, Jack. Come to kill 
me again?"), fully aware of Nicholson's plan to kill him. Everyone 
in this movie knows what Nicholson is up to but no one tries to 
stop him. All Morse does is ask for three days to live out his life 
before Nicholson claims it.
        Nicholson grants him the three days, beginning a long, 
no-action stretch of movie in which Morse falls in love with Robin 
"Jen-ny" Wright (you almost expect Forrest Gump to start stalking 
him too) and Nicholson spends most of his time at a strip club and 
lays at least ten separate women. This guy gets more action than 
James Bond, but unfortunately THE CROSSING GUARD has none 
of the action of a Bond film. That hour or so in the middle serves 
mostly to show us Morse is human after all, with a lot of remorse 
for what he did, and that Nicholson is nuts after all, which we 
know before the opening credits are even up.
        Even the climax is dull, beginning with Nicholson being 
pulled over by the cops. He runs off into the woods, leading them 
on a chase, before somehow ending up at the home of Morse. Then 
they both run down the street for awhile, take a bus, run some more, 
climb a fence or two -- mostly in slow motion. When even the action 
scenes are boring, there's a problem. And when there's at least thirty 
minutes of painfully-slow, superfluous drama, including Wright's 
interpretive dance of Salt-N-Pepa's "Whatta Man," there are a 
_lot_ of problems.
        Penn's message that the guilty are still able to feel remorse, 
to love and be loved, was later personified by Penn himself in DEAD 
MAN WALKING, which had genuine drama and none of the 
contrived action. The fault for THE CROSSING GUARD rests 
squarely on his shoulders. Lord knows Nicholson and Huston are 
wonderful actors, but when given crap, they can hardly rise above 
it. It may be high-quality crap, but it's still crap, a dead movie barely
crawling.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Silent Night, Deadly Night (1984)
        This one caused a huge controversy when it was first 
released, but not for the right reason. While everyone was worked 
up over the fact that SILENT NIGHT, DEADLY NIGHT depicted a 
man in a Santa suit killing off horny teenagers, they should have 
been boycotting it because it's the worst slasher movie ever made.
        From the very first moment, the mysteries of the movie 
are 100% predictable. First we see a family driving along on 
Christmas Eve, talking about how Santa punishes naughty children, 
and we know the traumatized little kid in the back seat will become 
a psychotic killer who kills the "naughty" people (such as anyone 
who was associated with this movie).
        That plot development is further cemented when the family 
goes to visit catatonic grandpa and the parents leave the kid alone 
with him. It's obvious the old guy will suddenly start talking to the 
kid, filling his mind with more nonsense. And then, as a catalyst, we 
are shown a scene with a man in a Santa Claus suit pumping three 
bullets into a convenience store clerk. In the next scene, the family 
stops to pick up a stranded motorist in a Santa suit -- coincidentally, 
the same guy. Even more coincidentally, and for no reason, he kills 
the kid's parents, ripping mom's shirt open for the first cheap 
two-second breast shot.
        So this kid starts off with a Santa psychosis, which is 
continued in the next few scenes, as he and his baby brother are 
sent off to a Catholic orphanage, one of those orphanages where 
the nuns beat kids who engage in "naughty" sexual activities and 
are tied up if they leave their beds at night. Now the kid equates sex 
with naughtiness, naughtiness with punishment and punishment 
with murder. Flash forward to the present, where the kid, now 
eighteen years old, is given a job in a toy store. And that Christmas, 
after he starts shaking from seeing the giant Santa poster, the owner 
asks him to dress up as Santa Claus. And the filmmakers don't 
expect us to see any of this coming!
        After scaring every kid who sits on his lap, he notices 
two co-workers slipping into the back room for a quickie. That's 
when the fun begins and Santa first strangles the man with a strand 
of Christmas lights (which stay lit throughout the murder) and then 
hacks up the woman (after a cheap two-second breast shot, of 
course). The owner comes back to see what the commotion is about 
and gets killed himself. Then the last remaining woman gets shot 
with an arrow. Not only are we supposed to know any of the movie's 
plot twists beforehand but now we're also not supposed to wonder 
why there's a real bow-and-arrow set in a toy store instead of a cheap 
Nerf imitation.
        Just when you don't think it's possible, SILENT NIGHT, 
DEADLY NIGHT degenerates even further, as the killer Claus 
interrupts two people making love on a pool table ("Two ball in 
the corner pocket"), killing the girl by impaling her on a set of deer 
antlers (no kidding) and after the boy calls out to his girlfriend, 
"What are you doing up there?" (She was too dead to reply "Just 
hanging around.") Santa gets him too. But he spares the little girl 
because, when he asks her if she's been naughty, she replies that 
she hasn't. If some psycho with a hatchet asked me if I deserved 
punishment, I'd most likely respond in the negative as well, but 
that's just me.
        A few victims later, Santa returns to the orphanage for 
vengeance and the stage is neatly set for a sequel. Actually, there 
were four sequels to SILENT NIGHT, DEADLY NIGHT, none of 
which could possibly top the original for sheer awfulness. There's 
even a scene here where the killer walks by a snowman and 
decapitates it, something I actually jokingly suggested would 
happen beforehand. Like I said, you see everything coming in this 
movie, then they show you everything that's already happened in 
flashback scenes just so you won't forget why the guy in the Santa 
suit is killing all those people. This movie assumes its audience has 
a double-digit I.Q. -- which is probably the only demographic that 
would enjoy it.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Search and Destroy (1995)
        A bizarre play becomes a bizarre movie. SEARCH AND 
DESTROY is about a no-talent guy who wants to turn a bad book 
into a low-budget movie -- so it's at least partially autobiographical. 
But it's never more than partially watchable and partially 
interesting. Griffin Dunne plays the no-talent guy, a second-billed 
Rosanna Arquette his bitchy wife in the first five minutes of the 
movie. After that, Christopher Walken enters the picture as a 
businessman / drug dealer who also loves the book Dunne wants 
to make into a movie and promises to back him if he runs a few 
deals for him.
        The author of the book is strange Dr. Dennis Hopper, who 
does those inspirational late-night informercials. After Hopper and 
his assistant (Ethan Hawke) kick Dunne out of his offices, Hopper's 
assistant (Illeana Dougas, the hockey-skating sister from TO DIE 
FOR) ends up falling in love with Dunne and slips him a backstage 
pass to see Hopper, after which he gets kicked out again. Dunne's 
only hope (not for his career; he doesn't have any hope left there) 
is to get $500,000 for the movie rights from Walken and his crazed 
dealer friend John Tuturro, who looks exactly like Kenny G here.
        It may sound interesting to you -- it did to me, that's why 
I rented it -- but SEARCH AND DESTROY never rises above the 
level of mediocre and spends most of its running time far beneath 
that level. The big draw is the cast, but Arquette, Hawke and 
Turturro all have five minutes screen time or less, despite being 
billed above the title. Walken and Hopper in a movie doesn't 
guarantee quality (think of NICK OF TIME and WATERWORLD) 
and Douglas, who actually gives a best performance of the movie, 
isn't mentioned anywhere on the video box. The movie never 
delivers on its promise to be a scathing satire of Hollywood (a la 
THE PLAYER), but instead gains irony by illustrating just how 
substandard many current-release movies are.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Crash (1996)
        The realm of soft-core porn has officially run out of 
premises to tie together its mismatched sex scenes. Hence CRASH, 
a film where the generic sex scenes revolve around car crashes, 
which turn us all on in our own way. Of course. CRASH caused a 
big controversy at the Cannes film festival last year with its show of 
fetish in such violence circumstances; even Ted Turner was appalled 
and he's married to Barbarella, for God's sake!
        The movie begins with a woman (Deborah Kara Unger) 
pressing her breast against a small aircraft. A man takes her from 
behind. Cut to a Hollywood camera room. A man (James Spader) is 
pounding into a pretty Asian camerawoman. Cut to later that night. 
We find out Unger and Spader are married, and enjoy the thrill of 
swapping, public sex and the like. They provide Brief Sex Scene #3 
on the balcony, as they stare down at the highway traffic.
        Here's where CRASH starts to deviate from anything else 
you can see on Cinemax after midnight on Fridays. Spader is 
driving on the highway, happy as you please, when he steers into 
the opposite on-ramp and hits an oncoming car head-on. The other 
driver sails through the windshield and into Spader's passenger seat, 
which in a football game would earn you three points. He's dead, of 
course, but Spader and the man's wife (Holly Hunter) survive the 
crash and go through recovery in the hospital.
        After the requisite "erotic sponge bath" scene, Spader 
and Hunter are released from hospital, Spader with the irrepressible 
urge to get back behind the wheel. He gives Hunter a ride to the 
airport, during which a car crash is narrowly averted. It makes them 
horny like the dickens, though, so those two have sex in the front 
seat, which is indeed included in the deluxe options package. Then 
comes the exciting Spader-Hunter first date, a trip to an 
underground car show in which a man (Elias Koteas) and his 
cohorts reenact the fatal crash of James Dean.
        Yes, Koteas is down with the car-sex fetish and finds two 
willing friends in Spader and Hunter, who join him, his leather-clad 
girlfriend (Rosanna Arquette) and a couple other people to 
masturbate to crash test videos. No kidding. The material in 
CRASH is utterly hilarious because it's all taken so seriously. 
Writer / producer / director David Cronenberg would have us believe 
that this car crash sex stuff is perfect dramatic material for the 
masses. Played as a parody of soft-core sex flicks, CRASH would 
have been great. Played straight, it's almost unbearable. Keep these 
people away from monster truck shows.
        Rated NC-17 for man / woman sex, woman / woman sex, 
man / man sex, woman / aircraft sex, man / tailpipe sex, woman / 
parking brake sex, man / car cigarette lighter sex and woman / 
woman / strap-on-rearview-mirror sex.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Almost 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Girl 6 (1996)
        Ten years ago with SHE'S GOTTA HAVE IT, his first 
film, Spike Lee made a critically-acclaimed movie about a woman 
who wanted sex without commitment. Now, with GIRL 6, he tells 
the story of a woman who wants sex without physical contact. 
Played by Theresa Randle, the main character is a struggling 
actress who is trying to break into film but finds it impossible 
to get a decent role she doesn't have to take her clothes off 
for.
        Apparently, Randle herself didn't have this conviction, 
for even in the scene in which Lee is trying to show the corruption 
of the movie business in taking tits over talent by having guest star 
Quentin Tarantino (as "QT," the hottest director in Hollywood) 
force Randle to expose her breasts in an audition, Lee has her 
appear topless. If this isn't the irony of ironies, I don't know what 
is.
        Randle can't find a decent acting job, so she decides to 
settle for another type of acting -- phone sex. She makes her 
rounds of the New York phone entertainment scene, including a 
Bell brothel headed up by Madonna, who tells Randle a typical 
phone sex conversation may include "toilet training, bestiality, 
foot fetishes, butt plugs, three ways, five ways, six ways..." 
Coincidentally, those seven things are all on Madonna's "To 
Do" list most days.
        Randle eventually becomes Girl 6 at an upscale phone 
sex operation, where the operators are model-gorgeous women 
worth paying five bucks a minute for. Naomi Campbell is even 
one of the phone operators, seen wearing a t-shirt inscribed 
"Models Suck" (but let's leave what they have to do to get 
their contracts out of this). I'm pretty sure Lee's view of the 
women behind the phones isn't quite as accurate as the Aerosmith 
"Sweet Emotion" video, where the obese housewife with a crying 
baby on her shoulder did the chores while seducing horny guys 
on the phone.
        Girl 6 finds she does a pretty good job of getting men 
off, from her dominatrix character April to girl-next-door Lovely. 
Soon she finds herself enjoying the power she has over men and 
the no-strings-attached thrill of it all. She slowly begins to withdraw 
from the real world and into the phone sex one, while her close 
friend Spike Lee and ex-husband-but-still-in-love-with-her Isaiah 
Washington grow more and more concerned about her.
        Even though almost all the beautiful women working 
there are black (with the exception of the absolutely sexy Kristen 
Wilson), they're instructed to identify themselves as white unless 
someone requests another slice of the racial pie. But we're constantly 
reminded of Girl 6's race by her intrusive fantasies, where she 
pictures herself in the role of great black women through 
entertainment history, from Foxy Brown to Thelma on "The 
Jeffersons." (Seeing Spike Lee play George Jefferson is well 
worth the price of the video rental.)
        Those scenes, and many others in this 108-minute movie, 
are needless padding that bring the movie down. GIRL 6 starts out 
a decent movie, and some of the early phone sex scenes are 
simultaneously hilarious and fascinating, but the movie crashes 
and burns fast, leaving a surreal climax and about fifteen boring 
minutes after that. The entire time, old and new Prince songs play 
constantly in the background, from opening credits to end credits. 
The last lyric before the fade-to-credits is something like, "Nothing 
good lasts forever," which describes GIRL 6 all too well.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Kids in the Hall: Brain Candy (1996)
        For a span of two weeks or so when I was in ninth grade, 
"Kids in the Hall" was my favorite show. I watched edited rerun 
after edited rerun of the sketch comedy show on Comedy Central 
until I started to see the same episodes over and over again. 
Eventually, I got sick of it all and moved on, returning a few years 
later to see reruns of the next few season's worth of episodes. By 
that point, "Kids in the Hall" had gone down the tubes like crap 
through a goose and I wondered what I ever saw in that show in 
the first place, but I still felt obligated to watch and review the 
feature-length movie it spawned, just as I will when the "Beavis 
and Butt-head" movie comes out this Christmas.
        For those of you who have never seen the show on HBO, 
Comedy Central or your local CBS affiliate at two in the morning, 
"Kids in the Hall" is a thirty minute sketch comedy show written 
by and starring David Foley ("Newsradio"), Bruce McCulloch, 
Mark McKinney (now on "SNL"), Kevin McDonald and Scott 
Thompson. Basically a western hemisphere version of "Monty 
Python's Flying Circus," the sketches range from funny and bizarre 
to vulgar and indecipherable, with most female parts played by the 
Kids in drag. The show, even during its best, early years, was a 
mixed bag of entertainment.
        The movie BRAIN CANDY is also a mixed bag of 
entertainment and spans the usual "Kids in the Hall" spectrum 
of being alternatingly funny, bizarre, vulgar and indecipherable. 
Like the Python movies HOLY GRAIL and LIFE OF BRIAN, the 
movie has one thin storyline serving as a setup for the troupe 
to play a range of male and female characters in different episodic 
situations. Here, McDonald plays the scientist who invents a 
wonder drug curing depression by having its patients recall over 
and over the most pleasant memory of their lives. The evil heads 
of the company (McKinney and Foley) rush the drug onto the 
market before sufficient testing can be done on the product and 
soon everyone is taking the drug.
        Some of the early recipients of the drug are an old lady 
(Thompson) whose happiest memory involves the Christmas her 
son and his kids came over for a few minutes, a married man 
(Thompson again) who is in denial about his homosexuality, 
and a depressed heavy metal star (McCulloch). Some of BRAIN 
CANDY's best moments come when these characters take the drug 
for the first time. Thompson's gay character walks down the street, 
singing a production number to inform the world of his sexual 
orientation, and McCulloch begins singing folk music about 
flowers and puppy dogs.
        BRAIN CANDY has some great comedic moments but is 
played a lot more straight (Thompson excepted) than you might 
think. Many of its scenes toward the last half-hour don't attempt 
laughs at all but instead achieve a surreal artsy look. The opening 
credits themselves prepare us for a movie that pays a lot more 
attention to art design than is customary in the world of sketch 
comedy. BRAIN CANDY bears little resemblance to the "Kids in 
the Hall" TV show but is equally or more entertaining.

Title
Review for Good Will Hunting (1997)
        At the time of the 1998 Oscars, I had seen four out of five 
Best Picture nominees. The only one I hadn't seen was GOOD WILL 
HUNTING, and it took another three months to remedy that. I don't know 
why I had the motivation to go see theatrical movies like WILD THINGS 
and GODZILLA while neglecting this movie, but now that I finally have 
seen GOOD WILL HUNTING, my question is, why all the hoopla? It's a 
good movie, yeah, but not really Oscar quality.
        My personal theory is that the Hollywood community didn't 
expect much out of a movie written by pretty-boy actors like Matt 
Damon and Ben Affleck, and the fact that GOOD WILL HUNTING actually 
was good bowled the Oscar folks over. Otherwise, it's a routine 
Prodigy Rebel Who Doesn't Want To Get Close To Anyone Or Do 
Much With His Life drama that comes complete with a cross-tracks, 
cross-continental romance that begins, ends and resumes on schedule 
and an eccentric father-figure who is the only person who can break 
through to the Prodigy Rebel.
        Damon is the genius in question, a 20-year-old janitor at the 
Massachusetts Institute of Technology. That must be impressive when 
he comes across someone who mops floors at a state university. ("Oh 
yeah? I'm an Ivy League janitor!") Even more impressive is the fact 
that he solves a medal-winning professor's proof that is posted in a 
hallway. He's a very smart boy, you see, but he hangs out with slackers 
like Affleck who spend most of their time drinking and getting into 
fights.
        It's after one such fight that Damon heads off to prison, where 
they love guys with butts as nice as his. The judge is unimpressed with 
his citing of legal precedents from the 1700s and only releases him 
when the MIT professor intercedes. In addition to helping him with 
difficult mathematical formulas, Damon has to see a therapist every 
week. A few amusing scenes ensue as Damon manages to drive away a 
series of therapists.
        We know from seeing Oscar-boy Robin Williams' name in the 
credits that he's going to be the one that ends up helping the kid Love 
Life. The Williams character is dangerously close to the DEAD POETS 
SOCIETY mold but is a complicated and well-written one. If there's any 
one good thing about GOOD WILL HUNTING, it's that all the characters 
know what each other's problems are and can have the kind of 
articulated arguments that only come across in movies.
        Still, it's a copout that the only thing holding Damon's 
character back is that he was beaten as a child. His diatribe about 
having cigarettes put out on his body made me wonder just how many 
movie characters have been used as ashtrays. It's a pretty convenient 
dramatic device that dates back, at least, to John Hughes and THE 
BREAKFAST CLUB. And even more of a copout that all it takes to solve 
Damon's problems is for Williams to keep saying, "It's not your fault" 
over and over again.
        I can complain all I want but the truth is Damon and 
Williams both did terrific work in this movie. Affleck, on the other 
hand, isn't around much and, when he is, he more or less plays the 
same addled but charming character he always has. You know, the 
kind that inevitably says, "I ain't the smartest guy on the block, but I 
do know this..." And Minnie Driver, she's charming, but why the hell 
was she nominated for this movie? As the Harvard pre-law love 
interest, her British ass is around for maybe 20 minutes total. I think 
she did better in GROSSE POINT BLANK.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for Fandango (1985)
        Freddie Mercury spoke to me a couple days ago on the radio, 
saying, "Scaramouch, Scaramouch will you do the Fandango?" I hate 
it when he calls me Scaramouch, but I decided to oblige him and 
watch FANDANGO anyway because hey, where else are you going to 
find a movie that gives Judd Nelson top billing over Kevin Costner? 
FANDANGO is a road comedy set in the 60's, with four college 
buddies out to reclaim some lost youth before they're forced to 
grow up and/or go to Vietnam.
        It's one of those comedies that's only ninety minutes long but 
is still padded with unnecessary scenes to lengthen the thin plot. That's 
because, in it's original form, it was a short student film. They had to 
add in enough plot digressions to make it hit the hour-and-a-half 
mark, but at least most of them are entertaining, as when the car runs 
out of gas and one of them decides to connect a cable between the car 
and a passing train for a free tow, or the sequence where the four 
college buddies and a couple of "jailbait" girls are shooting fireworks 
at each other in a cemetary. Most of the scenes have a dramatic 
context as well, the tombstones and flying fireworks in the cemetary 
reminding them of the threat of death under fire in Vietnam.
        The longest piece of the plot involves Judd Nelson, who 
plays the nerd of the group. (So now we know Nelson can play both 
extremes of the spectrum -- the too-cool rebel in THE BREAKFAST 
CLUB and the wimpy dork here.) The other guys pressure him into 
skydiving with a whacked-out, pot-smoking pilot and later scramble 
on the ground to warn him his parachute is faulty. It's definitely the 
most entertaining part of FANDANGO and serves to point out that 
beneath all their differences they still like Judd Nelson, even if all of 
Hollywood has since betrayed him. Interestingly enough, the entire 
"Breakfast Club" is now serving breakfast at the Pasadena Denny's.
        Although it's mostly entertaining, FANDANGO isn't the best 
road movie and it isn't the best comedy set in the past about a bunch 
of guys trying to reclaim their lost youth (a.k.a. DINER). It isn't the 
first in each genre and it isn't the last. Nostalgia for the teenage years 
will continue to be a popular film theme for decades to come because, 
as Judd Nelson said, "Give me work, any work! Voice-over work, 
guest appearaces on sitcoms! I'll take anything! I'll be the San Diego 
chicken, for God's sake!" He also said in FANDANGO, "You're only 
eighteen once, just like you're only a virgin once." Well, listen here 
people, I am eighteen and I am a virgin and I can't imagine ever 
looking back on this point on my life with any degree of longing. 
And Judd, if you're reading this, I'll give you twenty bucks to 
mow my lawn, but that's it.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Spy Hard (1996)
        SPY HARD isn't quite on the comedic level of the NAKED 
GUN trilogy, but it does definitely hold its own in the realm of 
joke-a-second parody movies. This time Leslie Nielson, looking 
about 70, takes on the James Bond series while also working in 
parodies of HOME ALONE, TRUE LIES, APOLLO 13, and others. 
He plays suave secret agent WD-40, who is called out of retirement 
to rescue the daughter of his only true love, who he accidentally 
dropped off a cliff fifteen years ago.
        The daughter is being held captive in the island hideout of 
the evil General Rancor, played by Andy Griffith, just one of the 
many down-and-out Hollywood faces you'll recognize in SPY HARD. 
Nicolette Sheridan, whose resume is eternally marred by the fact that 
she's voluntarily had sex with Michael Bolton, plays Nielson's love 
interest. There are also token appearances by Mr. T, Hulk Hogan, 
Fabio, Dr. Joyce Brothers and a few other second-rate cameos who 
are notorious for saying or doing anything as long as there's a check 
involved.
        Nielson's secret agent co-workers themselves prohe director of the
spy organization is so paranoid about 
secrecy that he always disguises himself as a piece of office furniture 
(or a pair of blinds [or the floor] ) for the ultimate stealth. Then
there's 
the seven-year-old agent who looks like Macaulay Culkin and attacks 
a couple intruders to his house. This time we see what would have 
happened if the blow torch over the door didn't work and the swinging 
paint cans hadn't caused enough damage to knock the burglars out.
        Some of the best moments are direct parodies of the Bond 
films, as when a secretary named Miss Chevious trades obscure sexual 
innuendoes with Nielson in the tradition of Bond and the venerable 
Miss Moneypenny. Even the opening credits skewer the Bond series, 
with "Weird Al" Yankovic singing the theme while the usual lithe 
female silhouettes swim by in the background. Soon a few incredibly 
obese women swim by as well, followed by a few farm animals and 
inanimate objects. Before too long you're wondering if you're in the 
wrong theater watching TWISTER again.
        Nielson is definitely the actor most suited for this genre of 
film. He can deliver the most corny jokes possible in such a serious 
way that it's funny for an entirely different reason. Yes, comedy is just 
that complicated, but if you like these kind of movies, SPY HARD is 
well worth watching. If you thought the NAKED GUN movies were a 
bunch of crap, stay away. And if you feel suicidal hearing dialogue 
exchanges like "I'm gonna shoot you so full of holes you'll look like 
Swiss cheese," followed by Nielson's Italian-accent reply, "That's no 
Gouda," you're better off sticking to something a little more serious... 
like TWISTER.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Armageddon (1998)
        If nothing else, ARMAGEDDON will probably go down in history as
the loudest movie ever. It applies the mechanics of brain-dead,
quick-cutting action movies like CON-AIR and THE ROCK to the disaster
movie formula, with mixed results. As far as the summer of 1998 goes,
ARMAGGEDON is better than GODZILLA and DEEP IMPACT, but not by much.
Movies like these are becoming more about creating hype than living up to
it.
        Once I saw who would be in ARMAGEDDON, I hoped it would be one of
the rare action movies that manages to mix thrills with humor and perhaps
even a wee bit of intelligence. This cast is almost all famous for good
independent movies, people like Billy Bob Thornton (SLING BLADE), Ben
Affleck (CHASING AMY), Liv Tyler (STEALING BEAUTY) and Buscemi (RESERVOIR
DOGS and several hundred other Miramax movies). 
        Then there's Bruce Willis, who's past his prime but still capable of
holding an action movie together. ARMAGEDDON is the beginning of the end
for Willis, though, because as we all know, once an action hero plays
another action hero's father, his days are numbered. (Ask Sean Connery
after the third Indiana Jones movie.) He plays a champion oil driller
whose rig is stationed somewhere out in the ocean, his military days far
behind him. No, he's more concerned now with his daughter's (Tyler) 
romance with cocksure driller Affleck, as he finds them in bed together
and chases Affleck around the boat with a gun. 
        This is just one of the scenes that make you ask, "Why?" The first
comes before the credits begin, when Charlton Heston tells us of the
meteor that made the dinosaurs extinct and vows, "It will happen again.
The question is when?" A title card then pops up that says, "65 Million
Years Later," which is pretty convenient. More credible would be the title
card "65 Million, 243 Thousand, 792 Years, 4 Months, 3 Weeks, 1 Day, 8
Hours, 23 Minutes and 15 Seconds Later," an exercise would require double
the attention span the entire movie allots its audience. 
        Cut to New York, where a man is walking his dog. The dog attacks an
inflatable lizard that a vendor is selling, as the vendor yells, "Hey,
leave Godzilla alone." No room for subtlety here, although ARMAGEDDON does
kick GODZILLA's ass, if just barely. Meteors rain down on the city, the
Chrysler building falls over, much destruction is wrought and two Japanese
tourists tell their cab driver, when it's all over, "I want to shop!"
Worse than that, this shameful sequence has no bearing on the rest of the
movie. 
        What's next? If you've seen two or more disaster movies, you know.
Some amateur scientist has to discover the disaster before the real
scientists do. This time it's a crazy old man who happens upon the giant
meteor headed for Earth, and insists they name it after his wife, Dottie.
"She's a crazy, destructive bitch," he says, and somehow she's flattered.
I guess it would take a crazy, destructive bitch to be flattered by having
her husband tell the world she's a crazy, destructive bitch. 
        The government is in a panic but keeps it under wraps, fearing "a
breakdown of all social services." I guess when humanity only has two days
to live, all it can depend on are its social services. The plan pushed by
NASA operative Thornton is to send a mission to space to land on the
meteor and drill a hole in it, drop a warhead in there and blow the meteor
into two pieces, both of which will miss the earth. It's a brilliant plan
and identical to the one in DEEP IMPACT. 
        The difference is, instead of astronauts, NASA picks Willis to head
the mission. I think this is because the writers of ARMAGEDDON realized a
crucial fact -- astronauts are boring. Much better to assemble a group of
uncouth oil drillers to save the world. It's that same audience-
manipulating underdog effect that worked in ID4, and one of the only
things ARMAGEDDON really has going for it. The two leads are Willis and
Affleck, who don't get along at the right times and then finally start
getting along at the wrong time, as is Hollywood custom. 
        Then there's the rest of the crew, which consists of Buscemi and
three people I didn't recognize. These characters exist to crack jokes
about the end of the world and, in Buscemi's case, about pedophelia. (When
the FBI men come to get him for the mission, he immediately blurts out,
"She told me she was 18!") This is the second consecutive Bruckheimer
movie that's had Buscemi as some kind of little girl lover, which makes me
wonder whose idea that is. If I was Buscemi, I wouldn't be flattered if
they called me every time they had a pedo role to fill. 
        From then on, ARMAGEDDON has what you'd expect -- the training
montage, the launch, the refueling at the Mir station, the landing on the
meteor, the attempt to drill into it. Each leg of the movie has at least
one major thing that goes wrong as the music swells and the cast rushes to
solve the problem. And toward the later sequences, at least one casualty
per disaster. It gets old fairly fast, which isn't a good thing when your
movie is almost three hours long. 
        Somewhere in there, Paris is destroyed, Affleck proposes to Tyler,
four Aerosmith songs appear on the soundtrack and Buscemi goes crazy.
Armageddon has some decent scenes of both suspense and destruction, but
there's never any question that it will be anything other than a
by-the-numbers summer blockbuster. 
        With each passing year, less effort goes into the writing than the
production. The filmmakers instead pay off credible actors (John Cusack
and John Malkovich in CON-AIR, for example) from other good movies so
you'll think something like, "Oh wow, Thornton, Affleck and Buscemi all in
the same movie. It must be good or they wouldn't be in it." I had my
hunches before, but it wasn't until ARMAGEDDON that I finally realized you
can't trust good actors and special effects to carry a movie. 
Address responses to c667778@showme.missouri.edu
Visit my homepage at http://students.missouri.edu/~ahicks/movies.html
More than 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair.
Serving America for almost 1/20th of a century!

Title
Review for Leaving Las Vegas (1995)
        I don't think there's been a movie since SCHINDLER'S LIST, 
or at least DEAD MAN WALKING, that I've been so involved in that it 
was nearly impossible to get through. Adapted from the John O'Brien 
novel, LEAVING LAS VEGAS is a portrait of depression that wraps us 
up in two people, making us know, care and sympathize with them, 
then leaves us helpless in watching them destroy themselves. This 
uncompromising Mike Figgis film is an incredible emotional 
experience that leaves out all the usual Hollywood trappings, save 
its two stars.
        Nicolas Cage plays a writer who has been leaving reality 
behind, on an escalating basis, since his wife left him. It's to the point 
where, from the moment he gets up in the morning until he passes out 
at night, he's in an alcohol-induced stupor and can't allow himself to 
sober up. So, when he embarrasses himself in front of some colleagues 
(including one of his fellow DRUNKS, Richard Lewis) and is fired 
from his job, he sells or burns everything he owns and heads to Las 
Vegas. He may not have much left, but with the Vegas gamblers, 
mafiosos, drunks and hookers, at least he'll be in good company.
        Cage's plan is to just keep drinking until he dies and, indeed, 
after one painful bank scene, we never see him sober again. Most of 
the time, he's guzzling down vodka or tequila like it's Evian water. In 
Vegas, he meets Elisabeth Shue, a street hooker he takes back to his 
$29 motel room. She wants to blow him, he wants to talk and it turns 
out she's just as lonely as he is. And she has her share of problems 
with abusive pimp Julian Sands slashing her butt cheeks after she 
returns from a night of work with less cash than required, plus it 
seems people just don't respect her profession. Hey, people, she 
works hard for the money!
        They work out a beneficially mutual relationship. She has 
someone to keep her warm nights and he has someone to take care of 
him -- feed him, clean up after him, direct him to the nearest place he 
can puke -- and both accept each other without trying to change them. 
Unfortunately, this means Shue will just have to sit by and watch as 
Cage's liver gets closer and closer to that of David Crosby and that 
Cage will have to share Shue with anyone who can cough up a couple 
hundred bucks, or $175 on double coupon day. But, for each of them, 
the other is the only caring person they know.
        Cage won an Oscar for LEAVING LAS VEGAS, and a 
completely deserved one at that. He's always fun in action movies and 
light comedies, but it's almost inconceivable that this is the same guy 
who starred in AMOS AND ANDREW and CON-AIR. His performance, 
in conveying the depression and hopelessness of his character while 
still making him seem human and likeable, in various states of 
drunkenness no less, goes far beyond anything else Cage has achieved. 
Shue, as the damned-if-she-do-damned-if-she-don't hooker with a 
heart of gold, is amazing too. This is a career reviving performance for 
the woman who seemed so innocent in fluff like ADVENTURES IN 
BABYSITTING.
        The relationship Cage and Shue have with each other is a 
Catch-22 in which disappointment and loss is inevitable, and once we 
as viewers realize this, we set ourselves up for the same frustration 
Shue's character must have, in caring but being unable to stop the path 
of destruction. LEAVING LAS VEGAS is utterly absorbing because the 
acting is so incredible, the characters compelling and the writing 
superior, but it's hard to keep watching because it seems so real and so 
sad. That was probably O'Brien's goal; he wasn't a happy man himself. 
He committed suicide shortly after selling the movie rights to 
LEAVING LAS VEGAS. There's probably a really sad movie in that 
story too.
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving The World For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Little Women (1994)
        No, this movie doesn't feature the many girlfriends in the life 
of Tattoo from "Fantasy Island" (located two miles east of Gilligan's 
Island), it's an adaptation of the classic Louisa May-Alcott novel about 
the Civil War days... and a darn good one at that. I wasn't too thrilled 
about two hours of repressed women in bustles, but once I gave in to 
my feminine side (I know you're snickering right now, so just stop it), 
I got into it.
        Fueled by excellent performances from Winona Ryder (the 
movie was almost retitled SLAVERY BITES), Claire Danes (star of the 
defunct drama "My So-Called Life"), Kristen Dunst (who gets my vote 
of approval just for saying kissing greasy Brad Pitt in INTERVIEW 
WITH THE VAMPIRE was "yucky") and Susan Sarandon (obviously, 
she plays the mother), LITTLE WOMEN is thoroughly entertaining 
without the usual 90's Hollywood hang-ups of sex, violence and 
profanity. Well, someone does say "blast it!" (gasp!) in LITTLE 
WOMEN, but otherwise, it's profanity-free.
        If you were ever forced to read the book in school, you're 
already familiar with the dainty-yet-tough-as-nails ladies in the March 
family, who are making it on their own in the absence of the father, 
who is off fighting the war. The main character, Jo, wants to be a 
writer (let's not draw any parallels here), while the other sisters just 
want to find husbands (women never change). We see two hours of 
their trials and tribulations, with moments of tense drama and female 
bonding.
        It's a good movie, but even though I tried to block the flow of 
testosterone to my brain for two hours, I was still bored and restless at 
times. It took me no less than six sittings to get through LITTLE 
WOMEN, so a word of warning to you non-movie-reviewing guys--this 
movie is not to be entered into lightly. Male minds require great 
persistance to finish LITTLE WOMEN, which is one of the ultimate 
chick flicks out there, but once you get through, you can list it on your 
resume for the rest of your life.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Trial and Error (1997)
        Anyone who has embraced the rumors that Michael 
Richards will star in a Kramer spinoff after "Seinfeld" ends its run 
should watch TRIAL AND ERROR. Then you'll know Richards just 
plain can't carry a comedy vehicle. He's great in moderation, as a 
supporting cast member, but as the attention-grabber, the pratfalls 
just don't work. The fact that TRIAL AND ERROR has a generally 
weak, predictable script doesn't help things any for the "Seinfeld" 
fans who are used to top-notch comedic writing.
        Richards plays an actor who throws a bachelor party for his 
best friend, Jeff Daniels, who used to be a serious actor. This was 
Debra Winger's husband in TERMS OF ENDEARMENT, but ever 
since that Ex-Lax scene in DUMB AND DUMBER, no one's taken 
him the least bit seriously. Here, he does little to earn back any of 
our respect. As in DUMB AND DUMBER, Daniels is again the 
straight man, the Dean Martin to Richards' Jerry Lewis.
        Daniels plays a straight-laced lawyer who gets way too 
drunk at the bachelor party and ends up with a monstrous hangover 
the next morning. He has court, but all he has to do is request a 
continuance. No big deal, Richards thinks, and when Daniels passes 
out in the bathroom, Richards decides to impersonate Daniels in the 
courtroom. Of course, the judge doesn't grant the continuance, so 
Richards has to continue being the lawyer for the duration of the 
trial.
        That's the premise, and it does lead to a few strained 
laughs, but basically it's a retread of MY COUSIN VINNY, right 
down to the bitchy D.A. and the sarcastic judge. The sad part is, 
TRIAL AND ERROR director Johnathon Lynn also directed MY 
COUSIN VINNY, so the only person he's ripping off is himself. The 
thing is, Richards is no Joe Pesci and there's no equivalent of Marisa 
Tomei. The closest we get is sexy Charlize Theron, a nature girl 
Daniels falls in love with. It's a plus that Theron never wears a bra, 
but she does nothing for the comedy of the film. Then again, what 
comedy? This movie is both a trial and an error.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Midnight in the Garden of Good and Evil (1997)
        Clint Eastwood, in his ripe old age, is cashing one talent in 
for another. MIDNIGHT IN THE GARDEN OF GOOD AND EVIL is an 
Eastwood-directed film Clint isn't even in, and it's damn good. 
Adapted from a best-selling John Berendt novel based on true 
events, this movie is set in the bizarre Georgia town of Savannah, 
where people walk invisible dogs and attach horseflies to their head. 
And that's just the mayor.
        As director and producer, Eastwood contributes a self-
indulgent but very competent 150 minutes, neatly balancing drama, 
suspense and humor. Like all great movies, MIDNIGHT IN THE GARDEN 
has a lot of funny moments that spring from the characters 
themselves, and not from some contrived, juvenile intrusion. The 
acting, from big-time stars John Cusack and Kevin Spacey, is as 
good as you'd expect, but it's the supporting stable that gives the 
movie its offbeat charm.
        Cusack plays a free-lance reporter sent to Savannah to write 
a fluff story for Town & Country magazine about one of eccentric 
millionaire Spacey's parties. Lots of food, beverages and gunplay. 
Yes, an employee of Spacey's has a huge argument in front of 
Cusack and later turns up dead. It seems like a simple matter of self-
defense -- the guy threatened Spacey, shot at him, missed, then 
Spacey took him out -- but being a movie, there's much more to it 
than that, and Cusack decides to stay in town and write a book about 
the murder, a book which will eventually become a movie he will 
star in. The weird circle of entertainment.
        This is where the stable of supporting characters comes in. 
There's the requisite sexy woman (Alison "Nepotist's Daughter" 
Eastwood), the strange piano player, the voodoo woman and the 
transvestite. Miss Chablis deserves a paragraph of his/her own, as 
the stealer of every scene she appears in -- what would this movie be 
without the Castilian scene and her testimony? Chablis, playing 
herself, is five times funnier than reigning drag queen RuPaul, but 
never seems exploited as the movie's comic relief or out of place in a 
basically serious movie.
        There are also a fair share of courtroom scenes, which these 
days almost never seem welcome in a movie, but even here Clint 
manages to keep the movie fascinating. Certainly the 
characterizations of the judge and Spacey's lawyer both help 
immensely, as does having the fly-guy as the jury's foreman. It's here 
we realize the case boils down to an indictment of Spacey's 
homosexuality. Yes, Spacey had a sexual relationship with the dead 
man -- before he shot him, of course.
        MIDNIGHT IN THE GARDEN OF GOOD AND EVIL isn't a classic, 
but it is one of the better celebrity-directed, true-story best-seller 
adaptations out there. Likewise, no one from this movie will be 
getting any Oscar nominations, but the performances are all great. 
In fact, I'd almost recommend that the Academy add a Best 
Supporting Transvestite category.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America for more than 1/25th of a century!

Title
Review for Oh, God! You Devil (1984)
        Oh, God, is OH, GOD funny. Sorry, I just wanted to say that. 
It's not keel-over-and-compulsively-slap-your-knee funny, but it is a 
good 70's comedy, with George Burns playing God. Geez, I know the 
guy's old, but he doesn't really pass for seven trillion. God visits John 
Denver, who plays a supermarket manager (who keeps the Grape Nuts 
well stocked). And who knows, Denver may work in a supermarket 
today--as a bag boy, of course.
        God tells Denver to spread his word (through his magical 
talent of folk music... Yeah, right!) and Denver is in no position to 
decline. Naturally, the world at large thinks he's crazy (for recording 
that stupid "Annie's Song" crap), but at least the movie's soundtrack is 
pretty good. You should hear John Denver sing "Thank George Burns 
I'm a Country Boy."
        This movie was followed by two sequels, and I hear there are 
plans in the works for another one, with Burns as God, Jerry Lewis as 
Jesus and Bob Hope as the Holy Spirit. OH, GOD! also has it's share 
of rip-off imitators, including OH, SHIT! OH, HELL! and, of course, 
OH-KLAHOMA!.
        Oh, God, not another OH, GOD! movie."Book II gets a 
half-star for leaving John Denver out of the proceedings, but that's 
about the only good news this time around. George "God" Burns still 
seems kind of God-like, only slightly older. Here, he comes back to 
earth and reveals himself to an eleven year-old girl (you know what I 
mean!), telling her to come up with a good advertising slogan for Him.
        Apparently, "turn or burn" isn't good enough, so the girl 
abandons her studies to think up a good God slogan. She finally comes 
up with one--"Think God"--and Burns encourages her to plaster the 
slogan on every wall, sidewalk and bald head in town, an act which 
soon gets her thrown out of school. Soon, her parents are convinced 
she's crazy, and a panel of psychologists is faced with the decision of 
whether or not to put the girl in a padded cell next to the OH, GOD! 
BOOK II script-writers, in an ending paralleling the first OH, GOD! 
In fact, this whole sequel is a needlessly mundane retread of the first 
one. God never changes, I guess.
        You'd have more fun memorizing the Book of Numbers than 
watching this dismal movie.
        Oh, God, that devil George Burns is at it again in this third 
movie in the OH, GOD! series, featuring George Burns as God of the 
Codgers once again. The twist is that this time Burns also plays the 
hairy host of hell, so now the producers are telling us God and the 
Devil both look like a cigar-smoking old man (forget that "angel of 
light" business). There goes my hope of a pleasant afterlife.
        The devil, in the guise of a recording agent (what are they 
trying to tell us here?), offers a struggling musician (Huey Lewis) a 
sure chance at super-stardom for seven years (Why they didn't make it 
six years, I'll never know.) in exchange for--you guessed it--his 
immortal soul, which reminds me, I have to call back that publisher 
who offered me $2 million for this book in exchange for a minor 
payment to be made at a later date. What was his name? Oh yeah. 
B.L. Zebub.
        The musician immediately assumes the identity of the biggest 
rock star in the world (that "hee-hee" guy), while someone else takes 
his previous life ("I'd sell my soul to be a struggling musician"). The 
musician soon learns carefree sex every night isn't all it's cracked up to 
be (especially if it's with George Burns) and tries to get his old life 
back. That's where God comes in, to play a climactic game of poker 
with the devil over everyone in the world's souls. Needless to say, the 
theology in OH, GOD! YOU DEVIL, as in the other OH, GOD! 
movies, is somewhat lacking, but this movie is a definite improvement 
over the dreadful BOOK II, which God Himself couldn't have saved. 
But that's what happens when you take George Burns' name in vain.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Toy Story (1995)
        This movie sucks! No, just kidding. I'd like to be able to voice 
an opinion on this movie that doesn't match that of every other movie 
critic and film buff in the country, but I too enjoyed every second of 
TOY STORY. It is quite simply a movie for everyone, young or old, tall 
or short, thin or fat, ribbed or regular... And it proves audiences in this 
day and age can still be entertained by something wholesome and 
positive. It's a shame I haven't quite reached that point yet, but maybe 
in some distant utopian society of the future I won't feel the need to 
crack "ribbed or regular" jokes for cheap laughs.
        TOY STORY is a landmark achievement in that it's the first 
fully computer animated feature film, if you don't count Oliver Stone's 
NIXON. (I don't know what that was supposed to mean.) TOY STORY 
is a kids movie, but a lot of the jokes can be appreciated solely by us 
older folk. Don't tell me elementary school kids have any idea what the 
"laser envy" comment refers to, but they can enjoy the myriad physical 
comedy scenes in the movie. In every single appearance by Mr. 
Potatohead, you can count on some or all of his face being knocked 
off.
        There are a few humans in the movie, but the main characters 
are toys that act like humans when the humans aren't around. The toys 
belong to an elementary school kid named Andy, with Woody the 
sheriff cowboy (voiced by Tom Hanks) as their leader because, after 
all, he's Andy's favorite. Every birthday and Christmas brings new toys 
to the universe, and a platoon of plastic soldiers is sent down to the 
living room on one such birthday to find out what presents may 
threaten Woody's position as favorite.
        Enter Buzz Lightyear (voiced by Tim Allen), an intergalactic 
astronaut action figure based on a popular cartoon show. He can fly 
and has laser beams and every other possible gimmick. 
Understandibly, Andy is in awe, as are the other toys. Afraid of losing 
his superiority, Woody decides to put Buzz in his place. That plan 
backfires and they both end up out in the real world, one dominated by 
speeding cars, dogs and mean little boys named Sid who torture toys 
for fun. Buzz and Woody are now forced to team up for survival, in a 
journey that comprises most of the movie.
        The vocal performances in the movie are all noteworthy. 
Hanks and Allen, as expected, are great but the minor characters also 
boost the movie. Don Rickles plays Mr. Potatohead devoid of his usual 
insensitive, politically-incorrect demeanor (Rickles, not Mr. 
Potatohead--although he's been known to crack an anti-egg joke every 
now and then too). John Ratzenberger provides the voice of Andy's 
piggybank as pretty much a revitalization of his Cliff Clavin character 
from "Cheers." The only thing missing is the catchphrase "It's a 
known fact..." And I didn't stick around for the closing credits but I'd 
swear the voice of the slinky dog was Jim "Ernest" Varney.
        TOY STORY is the best movie I saw at the theater this year, 
but then again the competition includes such bombs as NINE 
MONTHS, CLUELESS and HALLOWEEN VI. It's a terrific 
achievement in the field of computer animation (eclipsed only by the 
Dire Straits "Money For Nothing" video) and is also one of the most 
entertaining movies I've ever seen, certainly the best kids movie I've 
seen. If you haven't seen this movie yet, what the heck is wrong with 
you?!
--
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
and check out the 40+ new reviews since Christmas.

Title
Review for Dr. No (1962)
DR. NO (1962) **1/2 (out of four)
        OH NO would be a more suitable title for this one. It's the 
first James Bond movie, but it hardly ranks as one of the best. Sean 
Connery is entertaining as usual as 007, but the movie itself lags. The 
action and death trap scenes are barely thrilling. Besides that, the plot 
is never actually explained. We know Dr. No has his underwater 
hideout beneath an island, but what's it there for? What nuclear device 
is he about to launch at the end of the movie, and at what target? It 
wouldn't hurt to let the audience in on these things.
        Bond is off to Jamaica in DR. NO (and, if you've never heard 
someone with an English accent say, "Hey mon!" you're a mighty 
deprived person) to find out what happened to a missing fellow agent. 
Along the way, he wakes up to find a tarantula in his bed (It's sad 
when you're so drunk you don't know who you're going home with.) 
and trespasses on No's island, where he finds a beautiful woman 
(Ursula Andress) gathering seashells. He also finds a few Jamaicans 
opening machine gun fire on him. You have to take the good with the 
bad... Sorry, I've been working on the side as a fortune cookie writer 
lately. My favorite message to people who have just finished eating 
Chinese food: "Your sweet and sour pork was infected with E. Coli 
bacteria."
        DR. NO is worth watching just because it was the movie that 
started off the seemingly endless set of sequels. It's one of the weakest 
Connery vehicles (with YOU ONLY LIVE TWICE taking the cake), 
though, and has much more dialogue than action. You know a James 
Bond movie moves slowly when Bond only nails two women in the 
entire movie. Promiscuity is the all-encompassing gauge of success... 
Another one of my cookie fortunes. I apologize.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Ace Ventura: When Nature Calls (1995)
        Apparently, when crap calls, Jim Carrey answers. Here he is, 
mugging it up in countless unfunny ways for the fifth time, his second 
go-around in the role of Pet Detective Ace Ventura. That means more 
talking ass-cracks, penis jokes and cries of "Al-l-l-l-l-l-l-l-l-l-lrighty 
then." It all adds up to a sequel that makes the original resemble 
SCHINDLER'S LIST in terms of dramatic merit, or lack of. Granted, 
there are a few laughs amid the constant barrage of pre-school humor, 
but anyone who appreciates good comedy will bang their head against 
the wall ten times for every minor chuckle. It's a painful experience for 
anyone with a brain.
        Ace is distraught after accidentally dropping a racoon into a 
canyon (in a parody of the opening scene of Sylvester Stallone's 
CLIFFHANGER, Jim Carrey being the only person who can make 
Stallone look like a college professor in terms of intellect, or lack of) 
and decides to retire to the mountains of Tibet to gain a higher level of 
consciousness (or, in his case, a level of consciousness). But he is 
pulled out of retirement to the tune of $20,000 to retrieve a sacred 
white bat for an African tribe. Why Africa? So Carrey can disguise 
himself nude inside a fake rhino and later climb out the rear end as a 
tourist family watches ("Look, the rhino's about to give birth!"). If that 
seems like hee-haw humor to you, by all means, see the movie. If not, 
claim your place in human civilization with the rest of us.
        Obviously, there are quite a few nonmembers of civilization 
who made this movie, like the first ACE VENTURA film (I use the 
word "film" only because it was filmed, not because there's any level of 
artistic merit.), a huge success. In fact, Carrey only has a career 
because of the decline of intelligence in our culture. You may say to 
me, "But Andrew, look at Jerry Lewis. He was born with a negative 
I.Q. and look how popular he was thirty years ago." Maybe, but I still 
say Jerry Lewis is a notch or two up on the comedic ladder because he 
never actually did an impression in a movie of a rabid bulldog biting 
off a man's testicles... Lewis at least had the dignity to save that 
performance for when company came over.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Licence to Kill (1989)
        No, that's not a typo, that's how they spell the word "license" 
in England. Leave it to the British to be snobby enough to reject the 
letter "s" in all its forms. It doesn't make sense, but neither do any of 
the movies in the James Bond series. How can one man have sex with 
three beautiful women and defuse an atomic bomb in every movie? 
Even the most suave amongst us would have sex with an atomic bomb 
and defuse three beautiful women by mistake every once in awhile.
        This was Timothy Dalton's second and final appearance as 
007 and good riddance to him, I say. Sure, he's not a bad Bond, but 
he's got a certain sliminess about him I just don't like. Dalton 
outstayed his welcome after only two movies, whereas I didn't start to 
get sick of Roger Moore until the OCTOPUSSY period. Let's face it, 
though. Any rugged-looking white guy with dark hair could do a 
decent James Bond. Hell, people would even pay to see Regis Philbin 
in the role. And Kathie Lee could play Octocody. Just a thought...
        Even with Dalton at the helm, LICENCE TO KILL is still a 
good Bond outing, for the fact that it so drastically departs from the 
tried-and-true 007 formula used in the seventeen movies before it. 
Here, Bond is on a personal mission to avenge the murder of a CIA 
friend and his wife. Bond is all alone this time, his "licence" to kill 
having been revoked by the British secret service, and must track 
down the Mexican drug lord who ordered the double execution.
        Locating the villain in a Bond movie is never hard. Just look 
for the biggest exotic mansion around. Bond finds the place and, as 
usual, is held captive for a considerable percentage of the movie 
(something like 22.7%, but don't quote me on that). He also invites the 
drug lord's girlfriend to a fiesta in his pantalones. That's one of 
Dalton's two conquests in LICENCE TO KILL... See, that right there 
is how you know he wasn't meant to play James Bond. The other 
Bonds get at least a trio of ladies per movie, even George Lazenby in 
ON HER MAJESTY'S SECRET SERVICE.
        LICENCE TO KILL clocks in as one of the better entries in 
the series, with a visually-stimulating-yet-down-to-earth climax, a 
more gritty feel to it and an entirely new direction for the Bond series. 
Bond is self-motivated and independent, with a little help from his 
friend Q. (who actually joins Bond in the mission toward the end) and 
his unusually competent girlfriend Pam (who also functions as a low-
calorie cooking spray). It also reminds us what the 80's were all about 
by throwing in cocaine and Wayne Newton. You have to have the 
cocaine to tolerate Newton.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Judgment at Nuremberg (1961)
        There are better three-hour epics and far-better courtroom 
dramas than this (ANATOMY OF A MURDER and 12 ANGRY 
MONKEYS for starters), but JUDGMENT AT NUREMBERG is 
for the most part a compelling Nazi retrospective reenacting the 
Nuremberg Trials of 1948. The outcome is never in question, but 
the German defense attorney does a convincing job of introducing 
arguments that shed doubt on the guilt of the Nazi judges and 
lawyers put on trial. His line of argument is that they were merely 
following orders and weren't aware of the concentration camps, 
until German doctor Burt Lancaster's guilt brings on a climactic 
speech contradicting everything the defense attorney argued.
        There are too many climactic speeches in the 
movie -- multiple climaxes, you might say. Besides stirring 
speeches from the head judge, both lawyers and Lancaster, there 
are also a couple tense scenes with witnesses on the stand. One 
was a forced sterilization victim whom the prosecutor argues was 
neutered because he was Jewish, but it's painfully (not as painful 
as a sterilization though) obvious that he was sterilized because 
of his mental incompetence. Another is a young woman whose 
elderly Jewish lover had been executed for suspected rape, but the 
defense attorney breaks her down by yelling over and over the 
question, "DID YOU SIT ON HIS LAP?!"
        Nobody knows why this would break a person's defenses 
down, but it does. It's also better not to ask why everyone in 
Germany is speaking English, even though the first ten minutes in 
the courtroom have interpreters relaying the questions back and 
forth between the Americans and Germans. Then, midway through 
the defense attorney's opening remarks, he switches to English, as 
do the other Germans. Hell, even the sterilized idiot speaks perfect 
English. He can't remember Hitler's birthday but he can remember 
vocabulary words and dozens of complex verb forms.
        JUDGMENT AT NUREMBERG is at its best when it milks 
Nazi inhumanity for emotion, particularly during the showing of a 
newsreel of atrocities, but it starts to become incredibly tedious 
after the 150-minute mark. By the three hour mark it seems longer 
than World War II itself. Part of the blame lies in the lengthy 
speeches but most of it is in the needless out-of-the-courtroom 
scenes which show the judge and his assistant (a young, pre-
hairpiece William Shatner) out on the town with old German sexpot 
(Marlene Dietrich) who wants to convince the judge that not all 
Germans are monsters. SCHINDLER'S LIST it ain't, but it still 
makes for an overwhelmingly positive viewing experience.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Flatliners (1990)
        In medical slang, a "flatline" is when a person suffers 
clinical and mental death. Ironically, the film FLATLINERS does 
the same thing about halfway through. It starts out a fascinating 
drama about a group of medical students who have found a way 
to induce death and bring themselves back to life, experiencing the 
mystery of the afterlife and living to tell abotu it. It ends up 
becoming a supernatural thriller reminiscent of the most 
mediocre Stephen King TV-movie adaptations.
        At the outset, Keifer Sutherland convinces a few of of his 
fellow students to help him with his death-cheatin' experiment, 
which calls for them to lower his body temperature and inject 
various chemicals into his blood stream until he flatlines. Kiefer 
flies over a giant field of flowers and trees for awhile. Then, thirty 
seconds later, they begin to raise his temperature and electroshock 
him back to life. Here, as with every other part of the movie where 
one of the flatliners is being brought back to life, director Joel 
Schumacher milks every drop of suspense he can get by making 
us think the students won't be able to bring their colleague back 
from the great beyond.
        Sutherland comes back blathering about the tunnel, the 
shining light and all that crap, and suddenly the other students want 
to experience it as well. Next comes Billy Baldwin, the stud of the 
bunch, whose personal afterlife involves quick cuts of beautiful 
women in various stages of undress, once again reinforcing my belief 
that heaven is an Aerosmith video. Finally, Kevin Bacon and Julia 
Roberts experience a few fleeting moments of death.
        But the movie's only halfway over, so we now some kind 
of complications will come along with these four manipulating the 
forces of nature. I just didn't think it would be a cross between BILL 
AND TED'S BOGUS JOURNEY and the ending of GHOSTBUSTERS. 
Suddenly everyone's worst memory of regret comes back to haunt 
them, Keifer's being an eight-year-old boy he inadertently killed 
when he was a child, Joe's in the form of all the women he's lied to 
for cheap sex (which he also secretly videotaped and sent to Bob 
Saget), Kevin's nightmare a ten-year-old girl he used to torment at 
school and Julia's her dead father.
        It's at this point the movie crashes and burns, becoming 
a second-rate horror/thriller. The topic of death is one that either 
interests or frightens everyone, and FLATLINERS could have taken 
more time to explore the theme instead of making it a plot device 
that brings the characters' worst feelings of guilt to life. In reality, 
the only guilt these people should feel is standing by and letting 
this movie die instead of doing something to save it.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Producers, The (1968)
        THE PRODUCERS is the movie that reminds us that one 
time, long ago, Mel Brooks used to make good movies. With this 
and his 70's hits like BLAZING SADDLES and YOUNG FRANKEN-
STEIN, it must have seemed like he would be a formidable comedic 
force to be reckoned with. But as time wore on and his output 
extended to movies like DRACULA... DEAD AND LOVING IT and 
LIFE STINKS, it was obvious Brooks burned out. The message 
here is to stick with 60's and 70's Brooks and stay away from 
everything from the past two decades.
        To be sure, even his good movies had plenty of strained 
moments where the comedy just wasn't working, especially in THE 
PRODUCERS, which has annoying scenes of loud silliness that 
make you want to throw the TV out the window. From the early 
scenes, it seems like a bad, plotless movie, especially the scene 
where Gene Wilder gets hysterical (translation: ultra-whiny) for a 
minute and a half because Zero Mostel has taken his "blue blanket" 
away.
        Even a normally likeable performer like Wilder can get on 
one's nerves with bad comedic material (Remember his Man-
Smitten-With-Sheep scene from Everything You Always 
Wanted to Know About Sex?), and Lord knows there are 
places here where you wish someone would shove an Everlasting 
Gobstopper in his mouth to shut him up.
        Wilder is an accountant who has come to balance 
Broadway producer Mostel's books and soon becomes partners 
with him in a scheme to produce a play that will be a surefire flop 
and pocket the investors' money. First he needs some investors, 
whom he culls from his usual bevy of blue-haired old ladies who 
invest in exchange for sex with Mostel, the oldest and fattest gigolo 
alive. His sex appeal is less than his first name, but to an arthritic 
old lady, I guess it doesn't matter.
        The rest of THE PRODUCERS continues on an episodic 
scale, with scenes where Mostel and Wilder have to find the worst 
play ever written ("Springtime For Hitler: A Gay Romp With Adolph 
and Eva"), track down the author (a crazed Nazi), find a director 
("the worst director to ever live," who also wears a dress... I thought 
Ed Wood was dead.), audition some actors (including a hyperactive 
hippie Hitler who acts like Robin Williams) and finally put on the 
play itself.
        Most of the best moments in THE PRODUCERS come 
from the performance of "Springtime For Hitler" and its opening 
song-and-dance number, complete with a chorus line of German 
babes who form a moving swastika with their bodies. Tasteless 
(but not as tasteless as the man-smitten-with-sheep scene -- 
remember that?) but incredibly funny, unlike the rest of the movie, 
which is brainless and marginally funny. As a whole, though, 
THE PRODUCERS is a classic of 60's comedy and one of the 
few Mel Brooks successes.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Fan, The (1996)
        I'm sure this seemed like a good movie somewhere along 
the line. But then sh*t hit THE FAN, turning a surefire success into 
cliche-ridden thriller crap. Robert DeNiro has played some good 
crazies in his time, from TAXI DRIVER and the 1991 remake of 
CAPE FEAR to his star-stalking fan in THE KING OF COMEDY. 
Now he's the baseball player-stalking fan out to make sure Wesley 
Snipes gives credit where credit is due. This is all retread territory, 
from DeNiro as the stalker to Snipes as the baseball player. Or 
have we forgotten a lame 80's comedy called MAJOR LEAGUE?
        Watch the commercials for THE FAN and you'll know 
where it's headed in thirty seconds. But it takes over an hour for 
the actual movie to go anywhere. No, we have to watch DeNiro 
DeGenerate from a knife salesman to an unemployed lunatic, and 
we have to watch Snipes suffer through a severe slump after being 
signed to a $40 million contract with the San Francisco Giants. 
There are more unnecessary expository scenes than you can 
count and we even have to sit through Aaron Neville's rendition 
of the national anthem on opening day. I wondered for a few 
minutes why they chose Neville before realizing DeNiro probably 
demanded they put someone with a bigger mole than him in the 
movie.
        Meanwhile, the supporting players worm their way into 
the movie. John Leguizamo, el mexicano tokeno, plays Snipes' agent 
and best friend. Ellen Barkin plays the "ball-busting" radio reporter 
who serves no other purpose than to display her new Aniston 
haircut. She runs the call-in show that DeNiro frequently runs his 
mouth on.
        You see, DeNiro is completely obsessed with the game 
and has a Shrine-O-Snipes in his house. So it's only natural that, 
after another player (Benicio Del Toro) gets on a winning streak 
that Snipes attributes to his wearing the number 11 on his uniform, 
DeNiro sneak into the steam room and stab Del Toro in the leg with 
one of his company's knives, as a free demonstration of their quality, 
of course. Up to that point, there's no action whatsoever in THE 
FAN.
        And after that point, the movie still doesn't get any better. 
That's when Snipes starts hitting again but tells DeNiro it's because 
he stopped caring, the cardinal sin for DeNiro. Not only do you 
care about the game, you also thank the psychos who kill off your 
competition, something Snipes apparently never learned in the 
minors. Now he's got a crazed ex-pitcher on his hands, an ex-pitcher 
who knows the one thing in the world Snipes cares about is his 
son. So guess what DeNiro does to the son? Imagine a kid taking 
a nap and the answer will come to you.
        There's not a single move in THE FAN that isn't apparent 
several scenes before it happens. The whole time I was waiting for 
the movie to catch up to me, but it never did. I was on third base 
by the time the movie was on first. Not only was it unoriginal and 
predictable but the cutting-edge tilted camera angles got on my 
nerves before the first reel was up. That stuff can benefit a movie 
aesthetically only if it's used sparingly. Film every scene that way 
and it becomes annoying.
        Normally you can count on DeNiro and Snipes both to 
appear in high-quality movies but not even the best all-stars hit 
home runs all the time. With an average like theirs, though, you 
can forgive the occasional strike-out, which is exactly what THE 
FAN is.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for City Hall (1996)
        If they really wanted a title to sum up the movie, they'd 
change the "C" in "City" to an "Sh." As you can guess, it wasn't quite 
the viewing experience I expected. Al Pacino is excellent as always, 
but is relegated to the background of the movie to deliver key speeches 
from time to time. The real star of the movie is John Cusack, with 
Bridget Fonda and Danny Aiello rounding out the cast. All three give 
good performances, but the story itself (and its poor pacing) brings the 
movie down.
        CITY HALL tells a story of government corruption on the 
local level, corruption that unfolds when an off duty cop buying 
cocaine from a mobster's son gets in a shoot-out with the mobster's 
son, resulting in both their deaths and the accidental shooting death of 
a small child. That's the only action in the movie. The rest of the time 
we see Mayor Pacino giving speeches at press conferences and 
funerals, while Deputy Mayor Cusack plays detective in his spare time, 
solving the mystery of the murder.
        The mystery doesn't lie in the murder itself but in the 
murderer--the mobster's son. A little investigative snooping by Cusack 
reveals that, at the mobster's son's trial, the recommended sentence 
was twenty to thirty years, but for some reason he got off with 
probation and was therefore able to cause the death of the innocent 
kid. Who in the New York political hierarchy pressured the judge into 
changing the sentence? Which official did the mobster bribe? Do we 
care? I certainly didn't. In fact, the best part of the movie, for me, was 
when I went out to the concession stand and bought a Cherry Coke 
and some nachos. I paid with a twenty but didn't get any change back.
        I won't bore you with the details of Cusack's search or his 
ongoing sexual tension-fueled feud with Fonda, the lawyer 
representing the dead cop's wife, who hired Fonda to dispel charges 
that her husband was corrupt. I won't tell you about Aiello's character, 
the influential Brooklyn man involved in the conspiracy. And I'm sure 
not going to discuss the movie's message, that it's impossible to 
survive in politics without succumbing to compromise and corruption.
        CITY HALL just wasn't my cup of Cherry Coke. It moved 
slowly, taking forever to reach its conclusion and, once it did, was 
anti-climactic. As you can probably guess, the ending involves a long 
speech from Pacino, who by this point in the movie seems more like 
the president of a high school debate club than an actual character. 
The story itself might have worked as a one-hour episode of "Law and 
Order" or a similar show, but not as a feature-length movie.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Dead Man Walking (1995)
        The phrase "wholesome R-rated movie" is usually the 
ultimate oxymoron in Hollywood, but this time it applies. DEAD MAN 
WALKING is an intense human drama about two polar opposites--a 
convicted murderer on death row (Sean Penn) and a nun (Susan 
Sarandon). For once, a Christian movie character is portrayed in a 
good light. The nun is a dedicated, caring woman who helps Penn 
with his eternal struggles despite ostracism and rejection by her peers 
and, most importantly, the parents of the two teens Penn killed.
        Penn writes Sarandon a letter asking for her help and, having 
taken all those vows, she agrees. At first, he acts the part of a 
remorseless convict--refusing to admit he committed the crime, telling 
Sarandon she's lookin' mighty good about now (you'd have to be in 
prison for quite awhile to think that) and spouting off about the Aryan 
nation--but Sarandon's unconditional acceptance eventually gets to 
him and he changes his ways.
        Much of the movie deals with the various court appeals 
Sarandon is involved in on Penn's behalf. Of course, none of the courts 
anywhere along the line will overturn the death sentence ruling and, as 
the days to Penn's lethal injection execution get closer, he has to accept 
the fact that death is inevitable. By the time execution day rolls 
around, the audience has collectively been sucked into the movie and 
truly cares for Penn's character. If anything, DEAD MAN WALKING's 
purpose is to show how even murderers aren't beyond redemption.
        Like I said, there are strong Christian overtones in the movie, 
which was adapted by Tim Robbins (also the movie's director) from 
the autobiographical book written by the actual nun. You'd think ultra-
liberal Robbins and his live-in lover Sarandon, who hijacked the 
Oscars a few years ago to preach against General Electric, would 
produce a more secularized, New Age-ized story, but thankfully, they 
didn't. No matter your religious persuasion, you'll agree leaving the 
story in a Christian context is more powerful than if Sarandon had 
sermonized Mother Earth or the life force to Penn in the face of death.
        DEAD MAN WALKING has the distinction of being the 
movie that almost made me cry (and I was pushed over the brink once 
I learned the concession stand was out of Jujy-fruits). It really is an 
emotionally-charged film that successfully plays on all our human 
tendencies. It's an almost-perfect movie from the movie critic 
standpoint, the only flaw I noticed being Penn's absolutely awful 
coiffure and goatee, which mesmerized me during most of the movie, 
causing enough distractions that I missed the entire second act.
        Now that I think about it, we could have all done without the 
agonizing vocal score that accompanied most of the dramatic scenes. It 
sounded to me a few bushmen wailing in anguish at some sort of 
throbbing pain, perhaps brought on by dental surgery. It caused pain 
for me too. Music this bad should be a form of capital punishment in 
itself.
        The movie wouldn't have been watchable without the 
outstanding performances from Penn and Sarandon, who I'm sure will 
both be nominated along with Robbins at Oscar-time. I saw the movie 
about a month after its original release and the theater was still 
packed, which might have taken something away from my viewing 
experience, because when Penn's life was flashing before his eyes at 
the movie's climax, the person next to me's rank breath was flashing in 
front of my nose. Despite that factor, the goatee and the painful score, 
I still give this movie my wholehearted endorsement.
        I personally don't see why DEAD MAN WALKING has been 
given the R rating. Granted, the f-word is uttered once, but the PG-13-
rated THE AMERICAN PRESIDENT featured the word three times. 
And there's hardly any violence. Perhaps it earned the R rating for its 
inclusion of highly adult themes and overtones. Kids may not be able 
to handle the lengthy death scene at the end of the movie, but DEAD 
MAN WALKING has a strong message for all ages.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Godzilla (1998)
        It happens every year -- the days get longer, the weather gets 
warmer and the studios start releasing their big-budget blockbusters. 
This year's crop already seems inferior to that of past summers, even 
1997's lackluster trio of BATMAN & ROBIN, THE FIFTH ELEMENT and 
THE LOST WORLD. The marketing blitz in 1998 has been centered 
on GODZILLA ("Heeere, lee-zerd, lee-zerd..."), which doesn't make me 
optimistic about future summers. GODZILLA is, of course, based on a 
series of cult movies (translation: really bad movies only a few people 
can tolerate) from Japan that turn up really late at night on Ted 
Turner-owned cable stations. That this big-budget remake won't rise 
above its roots is fairly obvious.
        The credits show us the origin of Godzilla. In five words: 
Nuclear explosion creates giant lizard. Sounds like an Enquirer 
headline, doesn't it? The mushroom cloud is followed by the inevitable 
"discovery" sequence. This time, a Japanese guy is eating noodles with 
chopsticks while watching Sumo wrestling (if that ain't a stereotype...) 
when he discovers the telltale radar blip. People die.
        Cut to our protagonist, played by Matthew Broderick. He 
makes his first appearance wearing headphones, warbling along to 
"Singin' in the Rain." It's a none-too-subtle sign that he wishes he 
were in a classier movie. No dice, Bueller. From the beginning, poor 
Matthew has to do embarassing things like fondle giant earthworms 
and stand in Godzilla's enormous footprint. Every disaster movie has 
to have a know-it-all scientist, and this time Broderick is it.
        As the world's leading expert on radiated earthworms (And 
wouldn't you love to have that printed on your business card?), 
Broderick is invaluable to the government. He immediately dispels 
Vicki Lewis' theory that Godzilla is a dinosaur because, hey, you can't 
take seriously the intellectual arguments of "Newsradio" cast members. 
Broderick instead hits the nail on the head, announcing Godzilla is a 
radiated lizard. "The radiation isn't an anamoly," he announces, and 
lightning strikes. "I believe this is a mutated abberation," he continues, 
and lightning strikes again. It's vocabulary lightning, you see, 
activated by words of four syllables or more.
        Meanwhile, we're introduced to our New York cast, headed 
by an ambitious broadcast journalist (Maria Patillo), Broderick's 
former love. Gee, what are the odds their paths will cross again at a 
dramatically important time? Poor Patillo has been trying to get ahead 
in the news business for years but has been held down by heartless 
anchorman Harry Shearer. Italian cameraman Hank Azaria tells her 
she's not ruthless enough: "Nice doesn't get you anywhere in this town. 
It's dog eat dog."
        Actually, it's lizard eat city, as Godzilla emerges from the 
Atlantic to begin a rampage on the Big Apple's core. The filmmakers 
provide us with a one-note drunk fisherman who hooks Godzilla. "I 
think I've got a bite," he announces as a gigantic tidal wave begins 
rushing toward him. You can guess what happens next. Similar 
reactions spring forth as the monster prowls the city. Hearing the 
rumble of approaching footsteps, one New Yorker remarks, "Please 
don't tell me that's another parade." Please don't tell me that's the best 
line you could come up with.
        Mayor Ebert is not pleased. Played by the principal from 
"Head of the Class," he continually makes the wrong decision when 
given an option, and bickers with his assistant Gene. I guess the 
filmmakers knew they'd be getting two thumbs down from the critics 
and didn't even bother to kiss ass. The problem is, if you're going to 
attack Siskel and Ebert, you should at least make it funny. Dialogue 
like, "Didn't we agree that we weren't going to have any sweets until 
after the election?" followed by, "Back off, Gene," just doesn't work for 
me. Other lame running jokes include everyone mispronouncing the 
Broderick character's last name and Frenchman Jean Reno's inability 
to find a good cup of coffee in New York.
        There's even more fun to be had as GODZILLA progresses. As 
the beast heads back into hiding, Broderick suggests the military lure 
it out with food. Cue twelve dump trucks, all dropping fish into a New 
York intersection. (BRODERICK: That's a lot of fish.) That ambush fails, 
but Broderick soon figures out why Godzilla came to New York by 
buying $50 worth of home pregnancy tests and running lizard blood 
through them. Yep, Godzilla's with children, which makes you wonder 
just what kind of creature would be horny enough to have sex with 
Godzilla. That's until Broderick explains that Godzilla reproduces 
asexually, like Linda Tripp.
        GODZILLA comes to us from the makers of INDEPENDENCE DAY, 
so it has a lot of dumb action scenes, destructive special effects and 
shallow subplots. Look no further than Patillo's betrayal of Broderick 
(PATILLO: What have I done, Animal? What have I become?) and 
the climactic "Godzilla's nest" sequence in Madison Square Garden. 
The main difference is, INDEPENDENCE DAY was about the experience. It 
had a real global, patriotic element to it, and some genuinely fun 
characters. GODZILLA has lots of rain and lightning, reptilian action 
ripped off from JURASSIC PARK and endless product placement from the 
likes of Kodak, Blockbuster, Juicy Fruit, Swatch, Sprint and Bumble 
Bee Tuna. Yes, Bumble Bee actually paid to be known as the official 
tuna of GODZILLA . That fact alone is twice as interesting as anything 
in the movie.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for From Dusk Till Dawn (1996)
        If Beavis and Butthead had a favorite movie, FROM 
DUSK TILL DAWN would probably be it. Scripted by Quentin 
Tarantino and directed by Robert Rodriguez (Desperado), the 
movie panders to the very worst in sex and violence -- and is 
incredibly fun to watch. It starts off as a PULP FICTION-type 
crime story, with criminal brothers George Clooney and Tarantino 
robbing a convenience store. Because this is a Tarantino movie, 
however, it's not just a case of pull the gun and take the loot, it's 
a case of a hole being shot through someone's hand, a man on fire 
jumping out behind the counter and the entire store blowing up as 
they drive away.
        The opening scene sets the tone for the rest of the 
movie -- everything overdone and nothing as it seems. Clooney 
and Tarantino bring a hostage to the motel and then hijack an RV 
with a family in it. Harvey Keitel plays the backslidden ex-preacher 
and Juliette Lewis his daughter, whom registered sex-pervert 
Tarantino eyes endlessly. You know you're mentally unbalanced 
when you find Lewis the least bit attractive, although she's not 
nearly as obnoxious as usual in FROM DUSK TILL DAWN.
        The first half of the movie has the criminals and hostages 
trying to get to and through the Mexico border, Clooney's strategy 
involving hiding in the RV shower while Lewis is on the toilet. It 
does its trick; the border guard takes one look at Lewis relieving 
herself and immediately goes blind, never noticing Clooney or 
Tarantino.
        Once they get to Mexico, it's time to wait at the rendezvous 
point, a topless bar called Titty Twister where we're once again 
reminded Tarantino wrote the movie as he drinks champagne off 
the foot of a stripper. Finally, after about ten minutes of intercut 
boob shots and Clooney forcing Keitel and Lewis to drink with 
him, the stripper turns into a vampire. Soon half the people in the 
bar are vampires and the other half fall or fight back.
        That's right, we've come all this way to see a vampire 
movie. But like everything else, Tarantino takes this age-old genre 
and twists it to his own ends to produce over-the-top entertainment. 
So we get holy water condom balloons, heads rolling, quadruple 
impalement on an overturned table and Keitel getting bitten by a 
vampire and announcing he only has a few minutes left before he 
becomes "a lap dog of Satan."
        The FROM DUSK TILL DAWN dialogue is 100% 
Tarantino, hovering between absurd and disgusting (as when 
they're entering the nightclub and Cheech Marin announces the 
main attractions of the Titty Twister), but always entertaining, and 
is a huge reason the movie is so much fun to watch instead of 
being one more second-rate gorefest. Clooney, Keitel and especially 
Tarantino are so over-the-top with their delivery that the dialogue 
is that much more hilarious, ensuring not one second of FROM 
DUSK TILL DAWN is taken the least bit seriously.
        Stuff like this would be terrible in any other movie, but 
Tarantino and Rodriguez know exactly what to do to entertain 
people, even if there's absolutely no message or meaning to 
FROM DUSK TILL DAWN. PULP FICTION had the vulgarity 
and violence for a reason, but this movie just throws it out for 
cheap entertainment. FROM DUSK TILL DAWN isn't the classic 
of modern cinema that PF is, but is does prove you can do a 
good job making a really bad movie.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Opposite of Sex, The (1998)
        Christina Ricci was always a little weird. I mean, you'd have 
to be to play a convincing Wednesday Addams and hang out with 
Casper the Friendly Ghost. But in the past year, most of her movies 
have seen a turn from sitcom remake queen to a messed-up whore. 
Last year's THE ICE STORM saw her seducing a junior-high kid, but that 
was just the beginning. THE OPPOSITE OF SEX is one of the most twisted, 
amoral films of the year, and also one of the best.
        Ricci plays a teenager whose home life gets so bad that she 
heads to Indiana to live with a gay half-brother (Martin Donovan) who 
teaches high school. Life isn't so great for the brother, either. His lover 
has just died of AIDS and, worse yet, his ex-lover's sister is Phoebe 
from "Friends," and she won't go away. Actually, Kudrow has for once 
chosen a role with brains. She's been ditzy funny in ROMY AND 
MICHELE'S HIGH SCHOOL REUNION and MOTHER, but here she rattles off 
some of the most intelligent one-liners in the film.
        Clever one-liners are the backbone of THE OPPOSITE OF SEX, as 
is the cocky narration from Ricci. Rarely does the "Yeah, I know this 
is a movie" approach work, but when Ricci's character advances the 
story like someone who has seen hundreds of conventional movies and 
wants to keep her biography from being anything but, it's a new and 
witty approach. And, more importantly, it fits with a movie about 
unstable, abnormal people.
        As Ricci comes to visit Donovan, her brother has a new 
boyfriend in the overly handsome Ivan Sergei. She makes some 
smalltalk about "homos" and what-not before deciding Sergei is only 
gay because he's never had a real woman and, as all Internet perverts 
know, Christina Ricci is definitely a real woman. It doesn't take much 
prodding before Sergei decides to forsake the out-hole for the in-hole 
and join the heterosexual team.
        That's about the time Sergei realizes the biggest drawback of 
the straight life -- having your girlfriend tell you she's pregnant. Yes, 
Ricci is with child and Donovan is pissed, kicking them out of the 
house. So they swipe $10,000 of his money and head to L.A. while an 
ex-boyfriend (Johnny Galecki, David from "Roseanne") demands to 
know where Sergei is. When Donovan doesn't help him out, he tells 
the cops that the teacher molested him in high school.
        THE OPPOSITE OF SEX continues in true Springeresque fashion 
through one crazy plot development after another. Most of them are 
guaranteed to offend at least one audience member, although this 
product of writer-director Don Roos' imagination always manages to 
be elegantly sleazy. There are only a few ways to successfully approach 
horrendous storylines (blackmailing your half-brother by holding his 
dead lover's ashes hostage, Lyle Lovett as a love interest, etc.) but this 
movie does it well, and kept me laughing throughout.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for Mighty Aphrodite (1995)
        If you think people who walk around talking to themselves 
are strange, you'll gain a new respect for them when you see 
MIGHTY APHRODITE, the latest Woody Allen film, in which he 
regularly consults with imaginary characters from Greek tragedies. 
The Greek chorus, led by F. Murray Abraham, narrates the movie 
from an outdoor theatre and even performs a couple a cappella 
song and dance numbers. But this isn't some weird fantasy either; 
the real star, as always, is Allen, who plays a slightly toned-down 
version of his usual uptight, neurotic self.
        His wife (Helena Bonham-Carter) wants a baby but doesn't 
want to give up a year of her life carrying and delivering it, so she 
talks him into adoption. Even though Woody is dead-set against it 
(after all, think of the trouble he got into the last time he adopted a 
child), they end up with a newborn son anyway, and over the years, 
Allen is convinced his son inherited the intelligence of some 
superhuman Mensa members, and decides to track down the 
parents.
        The Greek chorus warns him not to (but then again, no one 
listens to the Greek choruses in their heads) but Woody sneaks into 
the adoption agency files and gets a name and a phone number 
anyway. Several apartments and name changes later, he finds out 
the mother is Linda Ash (Oscar nominee Mira Sorvino), part-time 
porno star (SORVINO: I was in THE ENCHANTED PUSSY.  
ALLEN: I don't believe I've seen that one...) and full-time hooker. 
So he sets up an appointment with her at her apartment, where the 
clock on the wall with the two pigs humping ensures even the most 
uptight men will be in the mood.
        Woody wisely resists the urge to become the woman's 
client and instead slowly becomes the woman's friend, a confidant 
who cares enough to try to turn the woman's life around. She doesn't 
know he adopted her son (which provides a huge irony at the end of 
the movie), she just thinks he's some kind of whacko whose sexual 
fetish involves helping strangers on the road to a better tomorrow, 
kind of like Michael Landon in "Highway to Heaven." And with no 
one else in her life to care about her, she welcomes the perennial 
beacon of hope that is Woody Allen.
        After a bonding experience at a horse race (where Sorvino 
bets on "Eager Beaver"), Woody tries to play matchmaker. And if 
you think his taste in women is weird, you should see the guy he 
picks out for her, a boxing onion farmer who's as dumb as a box of 
hammers (Michael Rappaport, the neo-Nazi from HIGHER 
LEARNING) and wants a nice "church girl." Woody bends the 
truth a little bit by telling him she's a virgin (and, to be honest, he 
was only a few hundred sexual experiences off on that estimate), 
but rest assured he only has the best intentions.
        The ending is as contrived and far-fetched as they come, 
but it's a welcome one. In MIGHTY APHRODITE, Allen returns to 
his 70's roots of making movies that are more entertaining than 
believable but still make a few serious observations about people. 
Allen is in top form as always, even though he looks a little too 
too old at this point to be a new father. He'd be attending that kid's 
graduation in a wheelchair. Still, like I said, it doesn't have to be 
believable as long as it's entertaining. Woody is the rare sort of 
filmmaker who can switch gears between movies, from the cynical 
dramas (INTERIORS, SEPTEMBER) to the wacky comedies 
(BANANAS, ANNIE HALL), while almost always being 
entertaining.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Anaconda (1997)
        ANACONDA is a horrible movie but a hell of a lot of fun. I 
have a feeling director Luis Llosa made it to be that way and so, after 
laughing at an overacting Jon Voight, an underacting Ice Cube and a 
fake-looking 40-foot long snake (which looks like it was computer 
generated on a Mac Classic), I'm giving ANACONDA a thumbs-
almost-up.
        It's constructed like a disaster movie, with a big cast of 
caricatures who will be in constant danger, fatal for most of them. 
There are also a string score, endless p.o.v. shots from the snake and 
even a few fake scares. None of this is original, but there are a lot of 
cheesy moments to make it a self-aware bad movie -- Ice Cube 
listening to his own music, a character saying "The jungle is making 
me horny" and a memorable and almost frightening waterfall attack 
scene.
        The movie begins as a film crew boards an Amazon boat. The 
plan is to make a documentary on a lost tribe, with Jennifer "Selena" 
Lopez the director, Ice Cube (that perpetual scowl still on his face) the 
cameraman, Jonathan Hyde the snooty TV host, Eric Stoltz the expert 
on Amazon tribes, Owen Wilson the sound guy, Kari Wuhrer as 
Secretary of Cleavage, and Vincent Castellanos the ship captain. Two 
will live to see the end credits, and it's not much of a mystery who.
        Voight soon hops aboard, after the crew members spot him 
stranded on his broken-down boat. From the beginning, his Spanish 
accent betrays him as the Man To Watch Out For, and when he talks 
of his love of anaconda hunting, there might as well be a flashing 
subtitle reading "Foreshadowing!" Indeed, within a few scenes, Stoltz 
is put out of commission when he goes scuba diving and some giant 
wasp gets stuck in his throat (which should serve as a lesson -- when 
you're scuba diving, never use a wasp hive as your oxygen mask) and 
they have to rush him to medical help, which will take a few days. 
Voight purposefully points them down a river path that is infested with 
those damn 40-foot snakes.
        The disaster springs from there, and when you're up against 
anacondas that big, it pretty much has to. The crew members start to 
get picked off, the least important ones first. There are plenty of scenes 
with the giant snakes wrapping around their prey and devouring them, 
and the pre-credits notation that anacondas regurgitate their prey to 
hunt and kill them again turns out to be no lie. The last 30 minutes of 
ANACONDA are the best 30, although the movie's IQ never rises to 
the three-digit level. If you think you can enjoy a laughable, mindless 
movie about giant killer snakes, well, here you go.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Talking trash on the web since 1995...

Title
Review for Monty Python and the Holy Grail (1975)
        This movie is a long-running favorite of Internet nerds, 
many of which wrote me nasty e-mail letters asking why I'd never 
written a review of it. Well, here it is, Monty Python fans, so you 
can stop cursing me in the name of Bill Gates. And guess what, I 
liked MONTY PYTHON AND THE HOLY GRAIL, although I had 
the added advantage of being able to read the script beforehand, 
which I found -- where else? -- on the Internet. Otherwise, I 
probably would have missed some of the key jokes because of 
that funny accent those English people have.
        As with the subsequent Python films, almost all the 
parts in the film are played by John Cleese, Graham Chapman, 
Terry Gilliam, Eric Idle, Terry Jones and Michael Palin, who also 
collectively wrote the script. The year is 787 and King Arthur is 
making a trek across England to attract knights for his round table. 
After a witch trial and fight with the Black Knight, who keeps 
issuing challenges to Arthur even after his arms and legs have 
been chopped off (probably the single funniest scene in the movie), 
Arthur and his knights are stopped by God Himself, who parts the 
clouds to tell them to go after the holy grail. So they do.
        Along the way comes a lot of episodic comedy, like the 
scene where a knight is trapped in a castle with over a hundred 
lonely women between the ages of 16 and 19 (reminiscent of the 
much less funny CASINO ROYALE) and run-ins with a three-headed 
knight and the knights who say "ni." Finally comes the final scenes, 
where the Python knights do battle with a ferocious rabbit and 
answer obscure questions to get across the bridge. The ending 
itself is bizarre and abrupt, but the rest of the movie has enough 
hilarity to make up for the few sequences that just don't work.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Austin Powers: International Man of Mystery (1997)
        I'd like to meet the executive who green-lighted this project 
and ask him that crucial word -- why? Mike Myers hasn't starred in a 
movie since 1993's SO I MARRIED AN AX-MURDERER, to which 
most people responded "So what?" Now he comes up with the brilliant 
idea to do a James Bond parody. Gee, and it's been almost a year since 
the last one, SPY HARD. That's two immediate strikes against AUSTIN 
POWERS and, enough lame jokes ensue that, in most ways, it's an 
even three strikes.
        Still, that immature part of me that used to love Myers on 
"Saturday Night Live" back in the early '90s has a hard time stifling 
laughter every once in awhile. Yes, this movie could have written 
itself, given its unoriginal premise and mediocre star. We've got the 
requisite scene in which Myers tries to play a compact disc on a record 
turntable and the one where he sees a masculine-looking woman and 
tries to pull her "wig" off to reveal she's a man, but it's her real hair. 
Stop my sides from splitting. He even recycles the "Wayne's World" 
bit where he turns a couch into a canoe, an elevator and an escalator. 
Oh yeah, Garth finally got pubes...
        The plot is as follows -- secret agent Austin Powers (Myers, 
naturally) was cryogenically frozen in 1967, when his adversary Dr. 
Evil (also played by Myers) also froze himself. Now it's 1997 and 
they're both thawed out. The world has advanced and left them in the 
swinging '60s, when a million dollars seemed like an exorbitant sum 
and free love was, well, free. However will they survive now that the 
world's gone on without them? It's THE BRADY BUNCH MOVIE all 
over again. And, come on, even the James Bond movie GOLDENEYE 
had fun with the notion of the Bond ideal being outdated.
        Let's focus on Dr. Evil for a second. Myers experimented with 
multiple roles back in AX-MURDERER, and he's still no Peter Sellers. 
Here, he latches onto the Donald Pleasance version of Blofeld, 
complete with scar and cat, albeit a sickening-loooking hairless cat. 
There a few amusing moments when he tries to resume his '60s plans 
for world domination by cutting a hole in the ozone layer and again 
when he meets his angst-ridden teenage son, who of course spouts 
'90s cliches about parental relationships. In the end, Evil decides to go 
the age-old Bond route -- destruction via nuclear weapons.
        There's a supporting cast too. Evil henchpeople like Random 
Task (the Odd Job clone), Alotta Fagina and #2 (Robert Wagner -- 
what's he doing in this movie?!) mingle with an unexplained cameo by 
Tom Arnold. Hugh Grant's prettier half, Elizabeth Hurley is the 
archetypal Bond girl, an agent Powers works with and tries all his 
worn '60s come-on techniques on. All of this is auto-pilot humor that I 
sincerely hope Myers didn't spend more than a few weeks writing.
        Like any Myers movie, there are some funny moments mixed 
in with the pathetic ones. The entire subplot with with Dr. Evil and his 
son was inspired, from Evil proving he's hip by dancing the Macarena 
to sitting through group therapy with his son. Then there's probably 
the only original thing in the movie, when Powers is nude and a series 
of strategically-placed objects keep us from glimpsing his bits and 
pieces. When you go into a Mike Myers movie, the best you can hope 
for is a few scattered laughs. AUSTIN POWERS lives up to those 
lowered expectations.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Prisoner of Zenda, The (1937)
        Of at least five filmings of the Anthony Hope novel, this 
1937 version is the most famous and -- I'm sure -- the best. Ronald 
Colman (not to be confused with sci-fi schlock director Roger 
Corman), one of those great old-time actors with a distinctive 
Shakespearean voice, plays a dual role as the King of Ruritania 
and traveling Britishman Rudolf Rassendyll, a fisherman with an 
uncanny resemblance to the king.
        Indeed, it is the resemblance that gets him into the king's 
castle for a private party the night before the coronation, when the 
alcoholic king drinks a cup of drugged wine. It's all part of an 
insidious plan by the king's evil brother Michael and his 
henchman Rupert of Hentzau (Douglas Fairbanks, another great 
old-time actor) to gain control of the throne. When the king's aides 
realize this, they call on commoner Rudolph to impersonate the 
king. (Almost sixty years later, a guy named Dave would be in a 
similar situation.)
        So Rudolph attends the coronation and meets Princess 
Flavin (Madeleine Carroll), who may or not be marrying the king. 
He, of course, instantly falls in love with her and she with him, 
noticing how incredibly different he has become (what a difference 
today makes). This causes the usual romantic complications, 
leading Rudolph to ask the immortal question, "Would you love 
me if I weren't king?" before an all-knowing aide whisks him 
away.
        This great old-time drama continues, with Michael and 
Rupert kidnapping the king and Rudolph going in to rescue him. 
Even in the 30's movies had those overblown climax scenes, THE 
PRISONER OF ZENDA's featuring a swordfight, several shootouts 
and even an army on horseback. The movie is almost entirely 
entertaining even today, with only a few romantic melodrama 
scenes with the obligatory string score in the background 
seeming laughable today, probably more laughable than the 
1979 comedy version of THE PRISONER OF ZENDA starring 
David Niven.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Mars Attacks! (1996)
        Tim Burton loves to indulge himself. His BATMAN films 
steered the venerable superhero out of his usual comfort zone and 
into Burton's own brooding vision of Gotham, his ED WOOD was 
one man's homage to the worst movie director ever, and this film, 
MARS ATTACKS, is Burton's own bizarre, campy take on the 
science-fiction genre. Five months after INDEPENDENCE DAY, 
this movie offers an even more caricaturistic take on aliens attacking 
Earth, one which has a deliciously mod art direction and a great 
sense of humor.
        Another thing linking INDEPENDENCE DAY and MARS 
ATTACKS is the star-studded ensemble cast that doesn't take itself 
the least bit seriously, although this film's cast blows ID4's out of the 
water. Jack Nicholson stars as both the President and a seedy Vegas 
land schemer. Glenn Close -- the second-billed star who has maybe 
five lines tops -- plays the First Lady, with Natalie Portman as their 
teenage daughter (if Chelsea Clinton was this cute, we'd have to 
throw the two-term limit out the window), Martin Short as the lusty 
press secretary and Pierce Brosnan as the professor optimistic about 
alien life.
        Outside of the White House are Michael J. Fox and Sarah 
Jessica Parker are married journalists with jobs at competing TV 
stations. Blaxploitation star Jim Brown is an ex-boxer who makes a 
living dressed up as a pharoah at the Vegas casino Tom Jones 
headlines. Yes, Tom is part of the MARS ATTACKS ensemble, and 
even gets a few lines in when he's not singing "It's Not Unusual." 
Danny DeVito and Lukas Haas are also in there somewhere. With 
a cast this big, most of the stars don't get a whole lot of screen 
time.
        The Martians themselves are a main part of the cast. A 
mixture of computer and stop-motion animation, they walk funny, 
have huge heads and bleed green. Obviously, they don't come in 
peace -- how much fun would it be if they did? No, these guys start 
an all-out war on the human race which includes disentigrating 
Congress (whether this is good or bad for humanity is debatable) 
and re-sculpting Mount Rushmore into their likenesses.
        Certain parts of MARS ATTACKS are Burton at his finest -- 
brightly colored sets and costumes, juvenile sight gags and corny 
lines delivered straight. But don't mistake this for a parody along the 
lines of SPY HARD or HOT SHOTS, this is more of a satire of an 
entire genre, a satire that relies more on over-acting and a mixture 
of incredible and purposefully-bad special effects. The alien saucers 
are little more than spinning pie plates but, as in ID4, various 
worldwide monuments are convincingly destroyed.
        MARS ATTACKS, serious or not, makes for a good disaster 
epic. That it actually has a sense of humor is a bonus. The rating on 
this movie would be much higher if not for the slow first half of the 
film. The last forty-five minutes or so is all four-star material, but 
MARS ATTACKS takes its sweet time to get started. It takes a certain 
amount of time to introduce the characters and set-up the invasion 
and attack. Here is where we could have used a lot of laughs, but 
Burton plays most of the opening scenes surreal yet basically 
serious. A lot of talent and potential comic material goes to waste 
there, which is a disaster in itself.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for Pretty in Pink (1986)
        Otherwise known as THE J. EDGAR HOOVER STORY... 
sorry, couldn't resist. Let's start the review over...
        PRETTY IN PINK is one of three teen comedies of the 
mid-80's from John Hughes starring Molly Ringwold. When you think 
about it, all the Hughes movies fall into two categories -- dramas about 
the pressures of conforming to the high school masses (THE 
BREAKFAST CLUB, SIXTEEN CANDLES) and fantasies about the 
individualists who don't (FERRIS BUELLER'S DAY OFF, WEIRD 
SCIENCE). PRETTY IN PINK is a mixture of both, giving us 
non-conformist characters Andie (Ringwold), Duckie (Jon Cryer) 
and Annie Potts, along with the dilemma of a mainstream character 
(Andrew McCarthy) who wants Ringwold as a girlfriend even though 
his "richie" friends won't approve.
        Ultimately, this movie is the same typr of predictable psuedo-
drama Hughes gave us in THE BREAKFAST CLUB, only this time the 
lines between characterizations are drawn more tightly. There are only 
two types of people in PRETTY IN PINK -- the mindless masses 
(translation: popular kids) and the people who are outcasts because 
they think for themselves and have outside interests. I think you can 
tell which group I side with in this case. I've always been one of the 
people who doesn't fit in, knows he doesn't fit in and doesn't want to fit 
in. So the movie rings true, even if Andrew McCarthy has never asked 
me out.
        But the main assumption of the movie is that the two groups 
of people can never mix. McCarthy loses his popularity in pursuing 
Ringwold and Ringwold is considered a sell-out by Duckie (and if 
there's one thing you should learn in life, it's to never get someone 
named "Duckie" on your bad side) for dating McCarthy... Of course, 
Duckie has also had a public crush on Ringwold for the past ten years, 
so that may account for part of his not approving the relationship. 
Still, I know from experience that popular people and independents do 
mix. I've always been liked by mainstream society even if our main 
interests and convictions in life clash horribly, preventing the 
friendship from moving beyond the acquaintance level. Even though 
I'd never pretend to be something I'm not to get friends, if someone 
accepts me as I am and wants to be my friend, who am I to turn that 
person down no matter how popular he or she already is? And I think 
anyone outside of a John Hughes movie would agree with me on that 
point.
        PRETTY IN PINK addresses familiar issues but not in a 
relevant way. The dilemmas of the main characters don't seem 
incredibly feasible to me. If your friends ostracize you for associating 
with someone they don't like, they weren't true friends to begin with. 
No, my name isn't Oprah all of a sudden, but that's kind of an obvious 
point.
        And if you're the type who is independent of society and find 
out an attractive and popular member of the opposite sex wants to go 
out with you, for God's sake, say yes. Why would you even think twice 
about such a thing?
        And if you've had a case of openly unrequited love for almost 
three presidential administrations for a person who clearly wants the 
relationship to stay at the level of friendship, don't act like a jerk when 
that person finds a love interest.
        And if you're Molly Ringwold, you'd better get used to the 
fact that you'll never work again in Hollywood and just hope the 
residual checks from Saturday afternoon airings of movies you did ten 
years ago keep coming in.
        And if you're John Hughes, stick with the fantasy movies 
instead of the predictable teen drama movies that are no longer 
relevant.
        And if you're a bitter teenage movie reviewer who uses this 
forum to get cheap laughs insuting people with more money than 
you... keep up the good work.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Octopussy (1983)
        I had no idea what this movie was about but decided to watch 
it anyway because--hey, who can resist a title like that? And it makes 
you wonder what kind of woman actually has eight of those. Fine, I'm 
a pervert, but what kind of a reaction does a title like OCTOPUSSY 
expect to elicit?
        OCTOPUSSY is one of the more absurd episodes in the 
James Bond series, but then I'm pretty sure every Roger Moore effort 
tips the scale of absurdness. And when the female lead is someone 
named Octopussy, the absurdity springs up. The perversity seems to 
spring up too, at least in a small dose, especially when Octopussy 
reveals that her name was given to her by her father, who always 
called her "my little Octopussy." Funny, I didn't know Jerry Lee Lewis 
had a daughter.
        This time, Bond is out to some some Faberge egg forgers (the 
bastards!), led by Octopussy and her male partner Kamal (at least 
they didn't name him Octodick). Bond meddles in Kabal's business 
one time too many and ends up captive in his palace. He escapes, but 
comes back a little later to get some octopussy. The two find out 
afterwards that they have more in common than just compatible body 
parts and, when Kabal doublecrosses her by placing the customary 
atomic bomb (no Bond movie would be complete without one), 
Octopussy joins Bond's side.
        OCTOPUSSY has its share of good and bad scenes. Good--
the plane chase teaser, the auction scene, the train chase and the circus 
scenes at the end. Bad--the other plane chase, the stuffed sheep head 
dinner (which pushes the limits of good taste... Monkey brains are 
okay, sheep's heads, no.) and that overlong chase through the streets of 
India, culminating in one of the bad guys being impaled on a bed of 
nails. "Get off my bed!" an Indian yells. A failed comic relief moment, 
to say the least. Almost as bad as my Octodick joke.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Net, The (1995)
        With all the hype about the Internet over the past few years, it 
was inevitable a series of movies exploiting the phenomenon would be 
rushed out before you could say "cybersex." After all, where else in the 
world can you download the theme from SHAFT, harrass "Star Trek" 
freaks and spend hours on end in the "Lacy Lingerie" chat room? Yes, 
I've surfed the Net myself, talking to people with such monikers as 
Maxie ("Like the pads?") and Brown Finger ("For heaven's sake, 
Brownie, wipe the finger off!"), and been asked countless times if I am 
"M or F," to which I always respond, "I'm a sexy MF." It's always good 
to keep a little ambiguity in a conversation.
        THE NET is pretty much a hybid of SNEAKERS and THE 
FUGITIVE, meaning it exploits new technology while keeping the 
traditional chase scenes intact. Its star, Sandra Bullock, can indeed 
carry a movie with her beauty and charm, not to mention significant 
acting skills--not exactly a requirement for movies like THE NET. 
That's not to say THE NET isn't severely flawed, but for much of the 
movie, the premise and chase scene retreads work. Around the second 
half, the small but vital bit of originality runs out and chase cliches 
involving carnival carousels and highway shoulders are needlessly 
thrown in. Then there's the final chase, which directly copies THE 
FUGITIVE's ending--but, of course, having Bullock yell out "I didn't 
kill my wife!" wouldn't work, so alternate dialogue was substituted.
        Bullock plays a computer hacker who stumbles upon some 
secret files one day while visiting the "Ronald Reagan Fantasies" chat 
room. Soon everyone she knows is being killed off one by one and the 
man she meets on her Mexican vacation pulls a gun on her after sex. 
"Okay, fine, we don't _have_ to cuddle," she says to him, but he tries 
to shoot her anyway. She survives that trauma, but upon returning 
homw, Bullock discovers the evil computer wizards (the same guys 
who built a 30-foot statue of Bill Gates) have changed her identity.
        Now the government has her fingerprints, social security 
number and fictional criminal record under a different name. 
Meanwhile, a look-alike has taken her place at work and, since Sandra 
has no real friends (besides her Toshiba laptop) and her mother has 
Alzheimer's (a disease where... oh, I forget), Bullock can'r verify her 
identity. So she sets out on that all-important trek to find an identity, 
literally, with the aid of ex-lover and shrink Dennis Miller, who soon 
leaves the film to be replaced by Kevin Nealon. No, wait, that's what 
happened on "Saturday Night Live."
        The message of THE NET is simple--the computer is our 
friend, but bad people can make it our enemy, particularly since in this 
day and age information about everyone is electronically stored 
somewhere. All Big Brother has to do is push a button here, a 
keystroke there and BAM! you don't exist. And I'm pushing that 
button right now, so be nice to me.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Romy and Michele's High School Reunion (1997)
        Most of Hollywood is composed of revenge fantasies, of 
people who still carry hatchets around from their less-than-perfect 
formative years. Once everyone's eyes are on them, they can make the 
cool people look bad, make their parents out to be idiots, show their 
bossy superiors as hypocrites, and so on. ROMY AND MICHELE'S 
HIGH SCHOOL REUNION crosses that with a coming-of-age of '80s 
teen comedies. Age, not maturity. The characters are still as 
caricaturistic as ever, although a witty script and buddies Mira 
Sorvino and Lisa Kudrow make it likable cinematic trash.
        Sorvino and Kudrow are, of course, the title characters -- 
Romy and Michele, a couple ditzes still pretty much stuck in the 
Valley Girl era and still bitter about the pains exacted upon them in 
high school by the A-crowd. In the ten years since high school, 
they've accompished nothing aside from Romy's low profile clerk job. 
They live together, alone, spending their nights fishing for men in 
L.A. dance clubs or watching PRETTY WOMAN for the 36th time. 
And they still get teary-eyed when the snobs in the clothing store 
finally let Julia Roberts shop there.
        In a time when movies from less than ten years ago have 
become "classics" that are cultural reference points for the uncultured 
boobs of Generation X, it's inevitable entire movies will be patterned 
the same way. If you don't believe me, sit there with a stopwatch 
during SCREAM and see if HALLOWEEN isn't mentioned every five 
minutes. The entire theme of ROMY AND MICHELE'S HIGH SCHOOL 
REUNION comes from that one replayed PRETTY WOMAN scene. 
These women have been shut out of the high-life and fully expect to 
receive the apologetic acceptance of the peers that rejected them 
when Kim Wilde's remake of "You Keep Me Hangin' On" was #1.
        So when Romy runs into bitter woman in black Janeane 
Garofalo (a former classmate whose claim to fame is having invented 
a cigarette that burns twice as fast, "for the woman on the go") and 
hears of the upcoming ten year reunion, she and Michele decide they 
have to go to show up all their fellow alumni. Problem is, what is 
there to show off? I mean, besides the fact that they're both gorgeous, 
statuesque blondes. The movie considers their beauty a moot point, 
even having them both go on crash diets before their reunion, I guess 
to bring them down to 100 pounds from 102.
        In fact, the least believable thing about ROMY AND MICHELE'S 
HIGH SCHOOL REUNION is the idea of the title characters as 
losers. Yes, they're not too bright, but come on, they're so lovable. 
And those freaky clothes they wear would make them the most 
popular girls in a modern high school. That doesn't stop director 
David Mirkin from including several flashback scenes where we see 
just how lame Romy and Michele's high school days were. Everyone 
plays themselves in the flashbacks, which is about as convincing as 
the rest of the movie.
        ROMY AND MICHELE'S HIGH SCHOOL REUNION is 
based on a Robin Schiff play that Kudrow performed in years before 
her current turn on "Friends." The Michele character is a Phoebe 
clone Sorvino isn't too far removed from her MIGHTY APHRODITE 
days. But both are fun and exuberant, and Garofalo is as entertaining 
here as ever. There's even a great collection of '80s tunes from "Time 
After Time" to "She Blinded Me With Science." If there wasn't so 
much padded crap in here, the star rating would be higher, but as it 
is, I _almost_ liked it.
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving The World For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for I Shot Andy Warhol (1996)
        You were wondering if this movie about the woman who 
shot Andy Warhol could be as strange as the famous 60's pop artist 
himself? Wonder no more; this movie is f*&%ing weird. It's also 
engaging and entertaining and does an incredible amount of justice 
to the sense of surreality that the late 60's had. I SHOT ANDY 
WARHOL was predominantly based on fact, but is too weird to 
have been entirely true. Its cast of characters includes hippies, drag 
queens and a man-hating lesbian.
        Played by Lili Taylor, the lesbian is the focal point of the 
story. As we catch up to her in the movie, she's graduated college 
with honors and is supporting herself through prostitution while 
writing plays and books on the side. Her claim to fame thus far is a 
book called The S.C.U.M. Manifesto, a propaganda piece for her 
one-member organization, the Society for Cutting Up Men. She's 
convinced men are biologically inferior to women -- the Y 
chromosome is after all an incomplete X -- and that the female of 
the species will soon retake their rightful position by force. Light 
reading this isn't.
        She wants Andy Warhol to produce her second-most-
interesting work, the play Up Your Ass, an equally Y-chromosome-
bashing piece of art. The only scene from this play we hear 
rehearsed involves a woman looking for a "yellow turd" for dinner. 
Her in-road to Warhol is a she-male friend who has long since 
forsaken his testosterone in favor of wigs and makeup. Taylor 
doesn't cut this guy up because she doesn't consider him a real 
man, and I doubt very few males would disagree with her.
        Taylor leaves the play with Warhol, who reads it aloud with 
a few ladyfriends who find the work of the "dyke" repulsive. Warhol 
doesn't want any part of this play either, but keeps in touch with 
Taylor anyway because she has this cool hippie vibe about her 
(everybody did back then). Meanwhile, Taylor keeps trying to sell 
copies of her manifesto on the street and soon signs a contract with 
a publisher to write a novel.
        Some of the scenes in I SHOT ANDY WARHOL are slow 
and dragged out, kind of like the trippy hippie experiences that 
influenced Taylor to try to kill Warhol. Ironically, Warhol and his 
open-minded self provided many of these drug-induced ideas that 
eventually pushed Taylor over the edge, convincing her that Warhol 
and her publisher were conspiring to oppress her life-changing 
works.
        Taylor's character is the very definition of mental illness, 
but still has a lot of interesting and / or amusing observations about 
society. A lot of the scenes that aren't even relevant to the Warhol 
plot are the most intriguing in the film. She relates one story toward 
the beginning of a man who paid her to walk on his chest in golf 
shoes for his own sexual gratification. It's a strange world. Even 
stranger, I still have scars on my chest from that.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for Breakfast Club, The (1985)
        A woman claiming to be my #1 fan has begged me for 
months to watch and review this 80's staple and, not wanting to get my 
ankles shattered with a sledgehammer, I decided to oblige her. She 
told me THE BREAKFAST CLUB was her favorite movie and she'd 
watched it scores of times and even reenacted the movie herself with 
action figures. I expected it to be good--after all, this woman has the 
good taste to be obsessed with my writing. Of course, it turns out I 
didn't like THE BREAKFAST CLUB as much as I thought I would and 
only gave it a two-and-a-half star rating, so I may get the 
sledgehammer treatment yet.
        The movie works in theory--an ambitious teen comedy from 
John Hughes (WEIRD SCIENCE, FERRIS BUELLER'S DAY OFF) 
taking place almost entirely in a high school library where five 
completely different students are spending their Saturday in detention 
for one transgression or another. The concept appealed to me, as did 
the movie's opening, which featured voice-overs from each of the 
characters as they arrived for their punishment (to the background 
strains of an extended version of Simple Minds' "Don't You Forget 
About Me"). I kept waiting for some brilliant comedy dialogue to come 
along, but except for a few small laughs, not too much entertainment 
transpired.
        The characters are cut out of the basic teen stereotypes. 
There's the rebellious Neanderthal (Judd Nelson, who might as well be 
called Judd Dredd), the stuck-up "princess" (Molly Ringwald, entering 
her eighth minute of fame here), the wrestling-letter jock (Emilio 
Estevez), the brainy nerd (Anthony Michael Hall) and the antisocial 
freak (Ally Sheedy). These five people would normally never associate 
with each other, but the circumstances force them to get to know each 
other and eventually, as the laws of predictability clearly state, become 
friends.
        Predictability reigns supreme in THE BREAKFAST CLUB 
without ever having any original insights to redeem it. When you have 
a movie that consists of 95% dialogue, the dialogue better be 
something good, alternatingly funny or poignant. The majority of the 
time, THE BREAKFAST CLUB is neither. And when the climactic 
moment you knew was coming finally arrives, it seems out of place. 
All of a sudden, the characters launch into speeches about how bad 
their lives are. Ringwald's got pressure from her friends, Estevez has a 
domineering father who's trying to regain his lost youth through his 
son, Nelson's home life sucks, Hall is flunking shop class and Sheedy 
is just plain nuts. These monologues should be dramatic or touching, 
but something's missing and I'm not quite sure what. The 
performances are all good, but something in the writing is lacking 
here and in the rest of the movie.
        THE BREAKFAST CLUB has always been touted as one of 
the quintessential teen movies of the 80's and, like I said, I was 
expecting it to be one, but it let me down by combining a predictable 
plot with bad writing. It's also unnecessarily depressing at parts, with 
an ending that's supposed to make up for all the angst-ridden 
arguments. [WARNING: Don't read this part if you don't want to 
know the ending.] Out of nowhere, Ringwald, who has stated 
repeatedly how much she hates Nelson and spent the movie arguing 
with him, suddenly starts making out with him for no reason at all. It's 
almost as contrived as having Ringwald give Sheedy a makeover. 
Suddenly she's a _beautiful_ freak and Estevez likes her. The end.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Perfect Murder, A (1998)
        Not so perfect, I'd say. At the beginning of the movie, 
Michael Douglas gives a toast "to stolen moments." A PERFECT MURDER 
is full of them, and Lord Hitchcock must turn over in his grave every 
time someone watches it. Dial R for this ripoff of Hitch's DIAL M FOR 
MURDER, though instead of black humor and a decent plot, we have the 
Ice-Cold Rich Couple standby, visible plot twists and an utter lack of 
any protagonist to sympathize with.
        Douglas, officially entering his old fart years, plays Steven 
Taylor (the lead singer of Aerosmith). He's a filthy rich investor who, 
we learn at the beginning, may be in some financial trouble. It's all 
good, though, because he's married to Gwenyth Paltrow, in her 
twentieth movie role of 1998. She's getting retribution for her cheated-
on character in SLIDING DOORS by having an affair with sexy artist 
Viggo Moortensen who, if he's not rich, at least isn't old enough to be 
her dad.
        a) Gwenyth works as a translator for the United Nations, 
therefore she must be intelligent and classy and, therefore, she can 
bond with anyone who speaks another language. This will be utilized 
with no subtlety when we discover her best friend is Spanish and the 
police detective is some kind of east European.
        b) Douglas is even creepier here than his Gordon Gekko 
character in WALL STREET, always giving people phony, pseudo-
charming one-liners while something sinister brews just beneath the 
surface. We're supposed to realize gradually that he's evil, but it's 
obvious right off the bat.
        c) Moortensen is also a total creep, albeit of the sleazy, petty 
variety. He's more or less the kind of guy who would sell out his 
grandma for a double cheeseburger, a contrast to Douglas' 
sophisticated facade. Either way, it proves Gwenyth is always attracted 
to losers (HOW long was she shacked up with Brad Pitt?).
        I'll hit the highlights of the first hour -- Gwenyth tells 
Moortensen to meet her at a party, not thinking Douglas will be able to 
make it. But he does, and the two men meet. The movie keeps us 
guessing (ha-ha) about whether Douglas knows of the affair, as he 
arranges to meet Moortensen to look at his art, then comes up to his 
loft and toys with him like cat and mouse, etc. And Moortensen 
notices Gwenyth left her wedding ring lying out, which I'm sure is 
symbolic of the value of the marriage. Whatever.
        Douglas reveals his knowledge of the affair in his charming / 
sophisticated / creepy way, then offers him $500,000 to kill her, 
threatening to blackmail him if he doesn't do it. You see, Moortensen 
isn't really a starving artist, he's a starving gigolo who romances 
women for their money, and Gwenyth is sitting on a $100 million trust 
fund from her family. As classy and creepy (read: Hitchcockian) as 
this movie is supposed to be, the motives all come down to money.
        The plot in a movie like this dictates the "perfect murder" 
will be far from perfect, botched in such a way that the three lead 
characters are still around to screw with each other's heads. Some of it 
is interesting and absorbing, but more often than not, it's an exercise 
in tedium. A PERFECT MURDER isn't much of a resume booster for 
Douglas or Paltrow, or director Andrew Davis, who brought us THE 
FUGITIVE in 1993. It illustrates the principle, if you're going to do a 
remake, at least do a good one.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for Air Force One (1997)
        Harrison Ford is one of the most beloved movie actors 
today and the airborne action flick is one of the most beloved movie 
genres today. It was only a matter of time before a team-up occurred. 
AIR FORCE ONE is the latest film to set its violence and carnage 
aboard a plane, although as the title suggests, it's the first to set its 
action in the American President's plane. The novelty of a butt-
kicking chief executive, and the performance of Ford as the 
president, makes this a watchable action thriller, but there are a lot 
of unbelievable sequences with less-than-credible special effects 
and bad writing that makes even Ford and Glenn Close look bad.
        Ford is an idealistic president with a picture-perfect family 
(a pretty wife and cute adolescent daughter, tipoff number one that 
Ford's character wasn't modeled after Clinton) who stuns the world, 
at the beginning of AIR FORCE ONE, by scrapping a scripted 
speech for an impromptu address that sounds even more scripted. 
He promises no tolerance on terrorism in a "be afraid, be very 
afraid" kind of speech that is sincere but suicidal in a political 
sense.
        Everyone climbs aboard Air Force One, a state-of-the-art 
luxury ship that looks like it cost the entire income tax of Wyoming. 
It sports some of the tightest security measures on the planet, as 
Russian "journalist" Gary Oldman and his "news crew" find out as 
they board. I put the words journalist and news crew in quotes 
because we all know by now that, whenever we see Oldman in an 
action movie, it spells disaster. He is a member of a psycho villain 
actors club -- the president of which is John Malkovich -- that grows 
continually smaller with every year.
        Luckily, Oldman's performance here, as a loyalist to a 
captured Russian Communist general, is much better than his work 
in this summer's earlier THE FIFTH ELEMENT, where he had fake 
glasses, prosthetic teeth and a muddled accent. As a Russian 
terrorist, he works much better; he's crazy but we at least understand 
his reasoning and loyalties. With Ford's character imperfect, the 
lines are blurred more than usual action flicks, although we always 
know who's good and who's evil.
        Oldman and his boys take the plane with lightning speed, 
but in a predictable fashion for anyone who's seen an airbound 
action thriller. It cuts way down on creativity to have a traitorous 
Secret Service man help them out with weapons, but the manic 
sequence that follows, with the terrorists killing existing Service 
men and Ford trying to escape via the escape pod, is good tense 
action. AIR FORCE ONE has an equal share of effective and 
misfired action sequences, although the downtime that dominates 
it is punctuated by some terrible dialogue.
        Most of it is due to intense overacting by those watching 
the drama unfold in Washington, D.C. Close is the Vice President, a 
level-headed woman with more balls than most of the men in the 
room, while Dean Stockwell, Secretary of Defense, is trying to 
wrestle power away from her. I don't know if director Wolfgang 
Peterson instructed them to act like that or what, but it's so over-the-
top it can't be taken seriously, and the way the loud score kicks in 
after every dramatic line or tense scene makes it even more 
unintentionally funny.
        The whole time, no one but Ford knows he's still aboard the 
plane, down in the hold shooting terrorists and sabotaging the plane. 
He's the president but he's still an action hero. That aspect of the 
film is fun to watch and root on, because none of the presidents 
we've had have been young or integrity-filled enough to do anything 
like that. AIR FORCE ONE isn't as classy as most Harrison Ford 
action films but fits right in with the current crop of summer 
entertainment.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Roommates (1995)
     If you've ever perused my college comedy diary "Another 
Year in the Life of a Nerd" (I never run out of cheap plugs), you know 
I didn't get along with my first-semester roommate too well.  In fact, 
during the three-week period between Thanksgiving and Christmas 
Break, I said a total of four sentences to him.
     So when I saw in the residence hall cable listings a movie 
called ROOMMATES, I envisioned 90 minutes of conflict between a 
couple of bickering young adults trapped in a 10 x 13 foot dorm room.  
Then I saw that the star of ROOMMATES is Peter Falk.  Scratch that 
idea.  But I still say someone should film the story of two college 
roommates whose relationship is less than ideal. Of course, in my case 
it would be a silent picture.
     Even without the college element, I still decided to watch 
ROOMMATES because I had absolutely nothing to do, unless you 
count studying for final exams (And who does?).  I'm glad I did.  Peter 
Falk's performance was actually what made the movie.  And this is a 
guy I never considered a real actor, more like someone who went 
around in a trenchcoat solving prescripted mysteries.  Falk pleasantly 
surprised me here, permanently earning my respect, so all you 
"Columbo" fans who think I live to insult the guy can just falk off.
     Falk plays Rocky, a 107-year-old Polish baker who raises his 
grandson after both the kid's parents die.  The movie begins with the 
mom's death and the son moving in with his grandparents.  After a 
couple stops along the son's journey to manhood, ROOMMATES 
progresses to the present day, with the grandson a surgeon and Rocky 
in a condemned house he refuses to leave.  The surgeon reluctantly 
offers the only possible solution -- Rocky will have to move into his 
place, the basement of a building rented by a group of Chinese 
students ("Communists!").
     The movie spans nine more years of Rocky's relationship with 
his grandson, and the trials posed when the grandson meets and falls 
in love with--gasp--a woman, and starts spending all his time with her.  
So, in his grandson's absence, Rocky turns his pursuits to professional 
boxing, achieveing the world heavyweight title in a climactic fight 
with Apollo Creed...  Or am I confusing movie plots again?
     ROOMMATES has an almost epic feel to it, covering several 
generations of a family with one fiesty immigrant who refuses to die.  
Death, though, knocks at the door of almost every other major 
character in the the movie.  ROOMMATES has about as many 
casualties as the first Halloween.  The number can't be counted on one 
hand, unless of course you're the victim of some hideous genetic 
mutation.  And you can probably guess who says farewell to Planet 
Earth at the end of the movie (no, not Duran Duran).  I won't come out 
and say it.  Instead, I'll just sit here and hum "Eye of the Tiger" until 
each and every one of you figures it out.
     ROOMMATES plays on all the major emotions.  It knows 
when to make you laugh and when to make you cry.  Movies that can 
perfectly mix comedy and drama are always hits with the audience, 
even though this one bombed at the theaters.  My point?  There are no 
absolutes.  Or, another possible point, Peter Falk just isn't such a great 
box office draw.  Either way, this is still a good movie and you should 
give it a chance like I did, whether you hate your roommate or not.

Title
Review for Planet of the Apes (1968)
        "You damn dirty apes!" That's just one of the inadvertenty 
hilarious lines from PLANET OF THE APES that's taken on a comedic 
context over time. No one back then seemed to realize how over-the-
top Charlton Heston's acting style was, but it shows now, particularly 
in this "Mystery Science Theater 3000" wannabe that was taken for a 
film masterpiece in its time, actually winning one Oscar (for makeup, 
no less) and being nominated for a couple others. It also spawned 
multiple sequels like Beneath the Planet of the Apes, 
Escape From the Planet of the Apes, Return of the 
Planet of the Apes, Beneath the Escape from the 
Return of the Planet of the Apes, Planet of the 
Apes: The Next Generation, Police Academy of the 
Apes... the list goes on.
        Heston is an American astronaut who spends a few thousand 
light years in space with his three companions and ends up on a planet 
not too dissimilar from Earth. The thing is, on this planet humans 
can't talk or think and the guys in the gorilla masks are the dominant 
species. Heston's companions are killed or turned into vegetables by 
the apon is imprisoned. He surprises them all with his 
gift of speech, making two primate scientists (Roddy McDowall and 
Kim Hunter) believe Heston is the missing link between ape and man. 
Believe me, we movie critics have been thinking the same thing for 
years.
        When the two apes present the idea before a judicial 
counsel (the head ape being Shakespearean actor Maurice Evans), 
it is received as heresy, for all good monkeys know God "created ape 
in His image." But Heston has already seen a cave that contains 
evidence that humans were originally the dominant species, before 
apes ever gained the ability to speak and run for president. And he 
takes them there, holding up a baby doll and yelling, "If humans 
couldn't speak, then how do you account for this TALKING DOLL?!" 
And how do you account for your acting ability, Mr. Heston?
        The absolute most laughable scene comes with the movie's 
surprise conclusion. I won't reveal the details except to say it involves 
Heston falling to his knees on a beach and yelling "God damn you all 
to hell!" several times in succession. The movie is atrocious and 
should only be viewed by those members of society who like to 
watch bad movies and laugh at them.
        What makes PLANET OF THE APES even more amusing 
is that it was supposed to function as some sort of social irony, a 
condemnation of fundamentals who reject the theories of evolution. 
But let me tell you, if Darwin could see the ape masks and hear the 
rotten dialogue exchanges (HESTON [to female ape]: May I kiss you 
before I go?  APE: But... you're so... ugly.), he'd convert to creationism
on the spot. Luckily for us, science-fiction movies have evolved over 
time to the point at which some of them are actually good.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Witness (1985)
        Aren't we all just a little bit fascinated with the Amish? 
These are people who have rejected the American government 
as well as every technological advancement of the last couple 
centuries in favor of those oppressive suits, beards and brimmed 
hats -- bonnets for the ladies. Those of us who are slave to 
electricity and television, not to mention the utter extravagance 
of running water, wonder what these inbred cults could see in 
plowing and milking at 4:30 in the morning.
        These innate curiosities we all have about Amish people 
are what elevates WITNESS from being just an average 80's action 
flick. Harrison Ford, Mr. 80's Action Flick himself, plays a police 
detective assigned to crack open the murder of a fellow officer. The 
only witness to the murder is a little Amish boy (Lukas Haas) who 
happened to be hiding in a bus station bathroom stall at the time of 
the murder, most likely mesmerized by the flush technology.
        Ford drags Haas and his mother (Kelly "Top Gun" 
McGillis, in her other movie appearance) to the police station, 
making him root through mug shots and lineups. More 
importantly, he exposes young Lukas to a world of sin and 
corruption which McGillis and her bearded counterparts have been 
trying to shelter him from. That's when Haas sees a picture of one 
of the force's most respected officers (Danny Glover) and 
recognizes him as the killer.
        Since, beneath its Amish exterior, this is a typical 80's 
action movie, millions of dollars in drugs are involved and the 
police corruption runs pretty much throughout the department. 
So Ford has to find a place to hide himself and his Amish 
witnesses. What better place than Pennsylvania Amish country? 
That's when the tables are turned and Ford finds himself a fish out 
of water, a fish in an oppressive suit and a bigass brimmed hat.
        WITNESS could have been a contrived comedy -- those 
were very popular in the 80's -- but it instead tries to paint a 
realistic portrait of Amish life. This ends up being a lot funnier 
than a sitcom approach, because nothing is more laughable than 
life itself. They bring out every Amish stereotype in the book, 
even a barn-raising. In this age of political correctness, the Amish 
are one of the last constituent groups that are still safe to make fun 
of, probably because they won't ever see or hear about what's being 
said about them, nor do they care. In their eyes, Billy Graham is a 
heathen for owning an electric hair dryer.
        The middle half of the movie is the actionless assimilation 
of Ford into the Amish community, which is always interesting if 
not amusing. Crusty old Eli doesn't like Ford too much, especially 
when he finds him dancing to rock music with his daughter 
(McGillis). Amish Kelly doesn't compromise herself with Ford 
beyond the realm of hungry French kisses, even if she does appear 
topless in a shower scene. That's where I really wouldn't have 
minded the Puritan approach; McGillis looks just like my high 
school Bible teacher. Seeing her make out with Tom Cruise was 
bad enough.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for MatchMaker, The (1997)
        Janeane Garofalo in a romantic comedy -- it was a good idea 
a couple years ago with THE TRUTH ABOUT CATS AND DOGS but is almost 
excruciating in THE MATCHMAKER. This is a by-the-books movie that 
plods along on a predestined course with no surprises and very few 
laughs. It also jumps on the ever-popular political satire bandwagon 
and manages to fall flat there, too.
        Garofalo plays a campaign aide to a Massacusetts senator (Jay 
O. Sanders) running for reelection. Denis Leary plays the stereotypical 
Strategist With No Ethics who decides the only way for the scandal-
plagued senator to win is to play up his Irish roots and cash in on that 
Boston Roman Catholic Democrat contingent that's made the Kennedy 
family so popular. So Leary orders Garofalo to go to Ireland and dig 
up some relatives to exploit.
        She soon learns why "Easier said than done" is the mantra of 
movies like this. THE MATCHMAKER falls for every cliche of things that 
can go wrong -- Garofalo has to take a tiny plane to Ireland, almost 
misses the bus to town, can't get a hotel room, ends up in the smallest, 
trashiest one around, has a dog piss on her luggage, and so on.
        Then comes what Roger Ebert calls the "Meet Cute." It 
happens in every romance: the man and woman have to meet each 
other for the first time in some unconventional, cinematic way. In THE 
MATCHMAKER, it happens when Garofalo walks into her hotel bathroom 
and finds a nude Sean (David O'Hara) in the bathtub, his dog sitting at 
his side. No points for guessing it's the same dog that just made water 
on her luggage.
        Also no points for guessing Garofalo hates O'Hara on sight. 
That's how it works in movies like these. I know from the instant I saw 
that Irishman in the bathtub that she'd hate him for awhile, then 
succumb to his charms, live happily for a reel or so before allowing 
some superficial detail to throw the relationship into turmoil, after 
which they'd reconcile in time for a happy Irish tune to play over the 
end credits.
        I haven't mentioned the movie's twist yet. Garofalo comes to 
the small Ireland town during the annual matchmaking festival, 
during which lonely folks from around the county pair off into a future 
of bliss. Milo O'Shea (who looks like an Irish Tom Snyder) is the 
matchmaker who pops onscreen occasionally to spew his words of 
wisdom and bring lonely souls together. Rest assured he'll do all he 
can to match up Garofalo and O'Hara. Oh, and in keeping with THE 
MATCHMAKER's utter predictability, he dies toward the end.
        What the message here? Sometimes even the most respectable 
person of comedic distinction, like Garofalo, will sell out with a weak 
script. I was excited to see Garofalo and Leary in the same movie, but 
they actually only have two or three scenes together. Leary stays 
stateside, for the most part, yelling at Garofalo over the phone and 
generally being an asshole. He even undoes himself with the old 
Microphone's Still On After He's Done Giving The Speech cliche. 
Both of them should have known better.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for Heat (1995)
        I saw this movie in a theater on Christmas day. I wouldn't 
recommend it, not only because movie theaters are filled on Christmas 
with all the losers and lonely people with nowhere else to go (myself 
not included, of course), but also because when it comes to peace on 
earth and good will toward men, HEAT is left out in the cold. It's a 
dark, gritty movie where people are shot point blank with machine 
guns for talking. If only the ushers would do that to noisy theater 
patrons...
        Al Pacino and Robert DeNiro star as polar opposites, Pacino 
the cop and DeNiro the criminal plotting to knock over a bank. The 
two are definite enemies but still have an intriguing sense of politeness 
toward each other, knowing they could have been good friends had 
circumstances been different. Both know and accept the fact that one 
will be triumphant over the other. In one of their few scenes together, 
Pacino pulls DeNiro over on the highway, only to ask him if he wants 
to have a cup of coffee with him. Certainly an unusual relationship 
those two have with each other. When's the last time you saw Batman 
and The Joker eating a plate of nachos together?
        HEAT combines the main story of DeNiro planning his big 
score and Pacino planning to stop him once he figures out what the big 
score is (an important first obstacle to overcome) with other subplots. 
Pacino's wife resents his preference of his work to her, his 
stepdaughter (Natalie Portman from THE PROFESSIONAL, who 
doesn't have any embarrassing Madonna numbers to sing this time) 
wants and tries to kill herself and DeNiro's henchman, Val "Batman" 
Kilmer (when's the last time you saw him sharing a plate of nachos 
with The Joker?), has a wife on the verge of leaving him.
        It's a depressing, pessimistic movie, to say the least, but a 
compelling one. Especially interesting is the plotline that has DeNiro 
meeting and falling in love with a woman. At first I thought his 
flirtation was an act so he could beat her to death with a crowbar once 
he got her alone, but it turns out some criminals can experience true 
love. (Donald Trump's been married twice.) His love for her causes 
complications a little later on, when choices are to be made.
        HEAT is three hours long, at least twenty minutes longer than 
it should be, but you need that length to tell the full story, I guess. 
Even with the lengthy storytelling throughout the movie, the final 
scene between DeNiro and Pacino is over way too soon. And by the 
end, there are still a few unresolved plot points. It's a good movie but it 
could be better, and briefer. A word of advice--don't see it on 
Christmas day.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
and check out the 40+ new reviews since Christmas.

Title
Review for Small Soldiers (1998)
        There are some movies marketed toward kids that I watch 
and think, "Boy, that would have scared the crap out of me when I was 
six." This Joe Dante film is one of those. He made GREMLINS, which 
was one of my favorite movies as a kid, that featured a lot of 
cartoonish violence and mayhem. SMALL SOLDIERS features a lot more of 
the same, but with a weird mix of minimum believability and 
maximum plot convention and twisted violence. How many other 
movies can you see a toy soldier shoot several corn cob holders into a 
kid's leg?
        Many of the scenes in SMALL SOLDIERS are the kind of thing 
you shouldn't push off as kids entertainment. The toys in this movie 
machine gun nails at people, make bombs out of household chemicals, 
lust after Barbie dolls and tie up small children, not to mention an 
adolescent protagonist who climbs a giant telephone pole and sticks a 
metal object between the transformers. For older kids, though, there's a 
lot to laugh at, both intentional and unintentional. The sick fantasy 
violence of killer toys would work as a horror movie for an older 
crowd, but it's too harsh to mix with the sickening sweetness that 
Dante throws at us. It doesn't take a rich Hollywood executive to see a 
bastard offspring of TOY STORY and CHILD'S PLAY isn't a brilliant idea.
        It's an interesting premise, though. A toy company is bought 
out by a huge conglomerate, and the CEO (Denis Leary as Denis 
Leary) demands "toys that actually do what they do in the 
commercials." That means toys that bust out of their packaging, have 
artificial intelligence and wage war with their toy enemies. Faced with 
these demands, the designers (David Cross and Jay "I Think I Just 
Sold Out" Mohr) power their soldiers with a surplus military 
intelligence chip. Gee, that's not going to backfire on them, is it?
        Meanwhile, there's that androgynous dork of an early 
teenager who always serves as the lead in movies like these. Here it's 
Gregory Smith as Alan, a so-called troublemaker who would actually 
get beaten up for his lunch money in real life. No such luck in the 
movies, where he manages to steal ex-vampire girl Kirsten Dunst 
away from her older jock boyfriend. We know the boyfriend is a pussy 
because he drives a motor scooter, and this opinion is corroborated 
later when he runs away from the small soldiers in his boxers.
        Alan's dad owns a small toy store that stocks goody-goody 
toys, not those fighting action figures that give kids bad role models. 
But when Dad goes out of town, Alan manages to talk the toy delivery 
guy (played by Mr. Futterman from GREMLINS, one of many inside jokes 
Dante includes -- Cross' password is "Gizmo") into giving him a few 
boxes of the new toys headed to a large chain store. The toys are 
divided into the Commando Elite and the Gorgonites, the former a 
war-loving bunch headed by the voice of Tommy Lee Jones and the 
latter a peaceful people. Both sets are programmed to be enemies, and 
the war begins shortly after Alan opens the shipment and leaves the 
store.
        SMALL SOLDIERS has the plot elements you'd expect -- underdog 
Alan attracts Kirsten without question, Phil Hartman is a one-note jerk 
who is later proven wrong and no one believes Alan when he tries to 
explain away damage to his house and his dad's shop. Strangely, 
though, no one seems that much surprised to see themselves under 
seige by a bunch of toys. During the climactic final battle, when an 
army of toys surrounds a house, none of the neighbors think to alert 
the police to the noise of gunfire and explosions. The continued 
implausibility and the fact that the movie is too horrific for children 
and too juvenile for adults keeps SMALL SOLDIERS from living up to its 
claim of being a "big movie."
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for Manhattan (1979)
        On the surface, this Woody Allen follow-up to the 
masterpiece ANNIE HALL seems like the same movie all over again. 
There he is, playing a neurotic New York Jew whose career involves 
entertaining the masses with his sense of humor and whose love life 
involves a continual string of mismatches and failures. After watching 
MANHATTAN, though, it's obvious this film explores the theme on a 
much more dramatic and profound level.
        Aesthetically, MANHATTAN is worlds away from ANNIE 
HALL. Filmed in black and white and featuring a constant soundtrack 
of Gershwin music, it seems like an artsy 50's film, but then again no 
film of the 50's ever had a seventeen-year-old girl offering a 
middle-aged man a chance to have sex in a wild way no other 
woman would try with him. That brings up the third difference 
between MANHATTAN and ANNIE HALL -- we get to see the 
charming pedophile side of Woody in this film as he enters a 
relationship with high school senior Mariel Hemingway. The 
mental image of those two together is almost as disgusting 
as Mariel's lesbian kiss with Roseanne. Almost.
        Mariel is in love with Woody, but he continually tells her 
she's too young for commitment. She needs to have more casual 
sex relationships with insensitive jocks before settling down with 
one man (the same advice Madonna's parents gave her at the age 
of seven). So he takes up with emotionally unstable Diane Keaton 
(a.k.a. Annie Hall), who is on the rebound from an extra-marital affair 
with a mutual friend (Michael Murphy) but is eventually lured back 
into the affair when Murphy promises for the millionth time to leave 
his wife. Looks like someone needs to rent WAITING TO EXHALE.
        Like most Woody Allen films, MANHATTAN is a melange of 
relationships gone wrong, only here there are less rapid-fire one-liners 
and more actual drama. Emotional damage occurs right and left in 
MANHATTAN and, while it isn't as funny as ANNIE HALL , it's just 
as rewarding a viewing experience on a different level. And it does 
expose Woody's charming pedophile side so rarely seen outside of 
custody trials.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Independence Day (1996)
        Nothing has been more hyped this summer than the 
release of Independence Day. The trailer has been playing 
non-stop for months, long enough for me to be able to recite Will 
Smith's soundbite of "I'm just a little anxious to get up there and 
kick E.T.'s ass, that's all," in my sleep. And the movie theater I 
went to was so crowded there were actually cops directing traffic 
out of the parking lot. It was playing on three screens with a line 
around the corner and the first showing sold out. With the only 
other opening-day competition being the John Travolta melodrama 
PHENOMENON (which looks pretty Tra-volting to me), I knew 
they were all there for INDEPENDENCE DAY, probably the movie 
event of the decade so far.
        But is it worthy to be hailed as an event? In two 
words -- yes. It may not have the artistic merit of a SCHINDLER'S 
LIST, but this is the common man's classic, mainstream 
entertainment that draws average audiences together and 
envelops them completely. INDEPENDENCE DAY is a huge-scale 
epic worthy of the hype, one which shamelessly exploits those last 
lingering shreds of patriotism we all still have. It's STAR WARS plus 
ALIEN plus TOP GUN with hints of 70's ensemble disaster movies 
like THE POSEIDON ADVENTURE and AIRPORT (but I'm not 
holding the last two against them).
        There are no huge stars in INDEPENDENCE DAY -- no 
Arnold protecting Vanessa Williams or Sean Connery breaking into 
Alcatraz, not even any names above the title. Instead we get 
second-string stars like Will Smith as an overly brave fighter pilot, 
Jeff Goldblum as the earth-friendly genius (pretty much the same 
character he played in POWDER), Bill Pullman as the President, 
Randy Quaid as the eccentric crop duster who claims a previous 
alien encounter and Judd Hirsch of "Taxi" as Goldblum's 
stereotypical Jewish father.
        Then there are the brief screen-time casualties like Harvey 
Fierstein, who vamps his way through the first reel, Harry Connick 
Jr. as a fellow fighter pilot and Brent "Data" Spiner, a government 
scientist who gets attacked by an alien who must have heard his 
"Old Yellow Eyes" loungeact album on K-Tel records. (Hell, _I'd_ 
travel the galaxy to kill Spiner after listening to that.) Countless 
others die, of course, when the giant hovering spacecrafts show 
up over New York, Washington, L.A. and the other key Earth 
cities.
        The first third of INDEPENDENCE DAY, the most 
chilling and compelling part of the movie, is devoted to the arrival 
of the spacecrafts over Earth. Scenes of mass panic and destruction 
on a huge scale abound, with strategic shots of skyscrapers 
crumbling, giant fireballs engrossing the masses and even the 
White House exploding ("Hillary! Chelsea!"). Goldblum, a cable 
technician, is the first to figure out that the aliens haven't come 
in peace, and intervenes accordingly. But that's just the 
beginning.
        The second day of our three day epic brings the first 
human retaliation attempts, centering around Bad Boy Will Smith's 
bloated-ego action hero techniques, which is when you remember 
you're still only watching a movie. As authentic as the INDEPENDENCE 
DAY visuals are, the biggest implausibilities are in the mostly 
one-note characters and how lightly they seem to take the news 
of impending global destruction, as if they'd already read the script 
and know things will be okay in the end.
        It's not a perfect movie by any stretch of the imagination 
but is such an incredible experience that you can easily overlook 
the rampant implausibility and dialogue which would in other 
circumstances seem laughable. In forty years, as the special effects 
become dated, the flaws will seem more obvious and INDEPENDENCE 
DAY may well join the Bad Movie Hall of Fame, but right now it's 
the best entertainment of the year. What it lacks in big-name draws 
or intelligence of plot it more than makes up for in visual effects and 
the collective anxiety it invokes over the fate of the characters, not to 
mention the planet.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Hannah and Her Sisters (1986)
        HANNAH AND HER SISTERS is an intricate, well thought-
out ensemble drama from Woody Allen, who began with this movie 
a string of adult dramas like CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS, 
SEPTEMBER and ANOTHER WOMAN. This one follows the loves 
and ambitions of one extended family, all of whom are connected 
by a woman named Hannah (Mia Farrow). Michael Caine, her 
current husband (and probably the only man who looks goofier 
than Woody Allen), is infatuated with Hannah's sister Lee (Barbara 
"Collagen Lips" Hershey), who is married to a moody artist (Max 
von Sydow).
        Then you've got the two other sisters, Holly (perennial 
Allen favorite Diane Wiest) and April (Carrie Fisher), in 
competition for the same man, along with Farrow's ex-husband 
(Allen), the hypochondriac producer of a sketch comedy show 
(In a rare moment that reveals a little too much of Woody, he 
complains about a sketch that the censors have ordered cut, 
wondering why they could be so narrow-minded, when his head 
writer Julie Kavner replies, "Child molestation is a very touchy 
subject.) who comes face to face with death and eternity when 
he finds out he may have a brain tumor.
        As if all these story lines weren't enough, Allen manages 
to work in a few of his customary flashbacks, one a scene in which 
he and Mia find out he's infertile and have to ask two of their best 
friends if they wouldn't mind donating some sperm for a worthy 
cause, and the other a comic sequence of a blind date from hell with 
Allen and Wiest. The latter is loaded with the usual Woody Wit and 
figures into the plot toward the end, the former is unnecessary and 
is never resolved. We see the friends react in disgust at the 
comment, "All you have to do is masturbate into a cup" (which 
Woody would no doubt videotape), but later we find out Woody 
and Mia had two kids together. Who's the father, out of curiosity?
        Although the whole sperm storyline is out of place, the 
others are delicately balanced so that we retain interest in all of 
them as they develop and eventually intertwine. Allen has an 
obvious talent for juggling multiple story lines even if the 
resolutions for some of them aren't ideal. In HANNAH AND 
HER SISTERS, he tackles his familiar topics of adultery and the 
philosophical mysteries of life as his character receives a reprieve 
and gets a new lease on life for only a little while before realizing 
death is still inevitable and life is still as meaningless as ever. 
He tries to convert to Catholicism and later Hari Krishna, but to 
no avail. Only Woody could make so many serious points about 
an issue like that while also keeping the comedy going. HANNAH 
AND HER SISTERS marked the beginning of a new era of large 
scale seriousness in comedy from Mr. Allen.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Oliver & Company (1988)
        A year before Disney began their streak of high-quality 
animated films like THE LITTLE MERMAID, BEAUTY AND THE 
BEAST and THE LION KING, out came OLIVER AND COMPANY, 
which lives in infamy as one of the most mediocre cartoon movies 
ever. As with the vast majority of Disney cartoons, this is based 
on a classic of literature, Charles Dickens' OLIVER TWIST. Also in 
the Disney tradition, this features talking animals in all the major 
parts.
        OLIVER AND COMPANY takes place in present day 
New York, Oliver being a cute orange kitten with the voice of Joey 
Lawrence. Abandoned and homeless, he meets up with the dog 
Dodger (voice of Billy Joel -- yes, you read me correctly) to steal 
some hot dogs. That's right, hot hot dogs. Dodger doublecrosses 
Oliver, saying something like "only the good die young," and runs 
off with the hot dogs. Cue the cute chase scene and a song from 
Dodger.
        The two end up in the headquarters of Dodger's two-bit 
thievery gang, which consists of a bunch of dogs, including a fiesty 
Chihuahua voiced by Cheech Marin. They live with one of the token 
humans in the film, Fagin, a low-life who has three days to pay off 
the evil Mr. Sykes. That means Oliver and the dogs have to work 
extra hard to rob the New York citizens blind, in that cute, musical 
Disney way, of course.
        One of their scams involves having the English bulldog in 
the gang pretend to get hit by a car while Chihuahua Cheech makes 
off with the car radio. This time, it's a limo with a cute little rich
girl 
in it, and Oliver gets left behind in the limo. The cute little girl falls
in love with the cute little kitty and takes it home to the mansion, 
where the egomaniacal French poodle is displaced from her position 
as favorite pet. So she conspires to get rid of Oliver at the same time 
the other dogs conspire to break in and rescue Oliver.
        The cartoon goes on after that, not too much longer after 
that, mind you. It's only 72 minutes long, but that's one of the more 
attractive selling points. The movie is short on plot and a little too 
long on the songs. "Under the Sea" and "Hakuna Matata" they ain't, 
even if the Piano Man is at the helm of most of them. There's no real 
reason to seek this one out unless you've already grown sick of every 
other Disney animated classic. It's no accident that OLIVER AND 
COMPANY took eight years to be released on video.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for Dolores Claiborne (1995)
     Yet another movie that proves beyond a shadow of a doubt that
Stephen King can tell a compelling story without falling back on the
traditional elements of horror and the supernatural.  DOLORES CLAIBORNE
is also the second three-star King film to star Kathy Bates (the first
was MISERY).  Bates plays Dolores Claiborne, a feisty old woman who's
been accused of treating her aging employer to a fatal fall down the
stairs.  What makes the small-town detective that much more obsessed
with putting Claiborne in jail is the fact that Claiborne was also the
defendant of a murder trial eighteen years ago, the only one of his 86
cases that hasn't been solved.  She was acquitted of a crime that may
or may not have been an accident.  Her abusive husband fell down a well
and died, even though Baby Jessica was down there to break his fall.
     Claiborne's daughter, Selena (could have sworn she was murdered
too?), played by Jennifer Jason-Leigh, hears of the most recent
accusations against her mother and comes home for the first time in
years.  We learn through flashbacks that Dolores worked as a maid for
the dead woman for over twenty-five years and toward the end all they
had were each other, even though there was a mutual dislike between the
two.  And Selena soon begins having flashbacks too (those things are
more contagious than yawns) and recovers a few repressed memories that
prove to her that her dad wasn't quite the guy she thought he was.  For
starters, on more than one occasion, he made her bruise his fruit.  Tag
his cattle.  Slap his salami.  Bridle his horse.  Crash his bumper
car.  You get the picture, although I'm sure you wish you didn't.
     DOLORES CLAIBORNE is a dark thriller with plenty of drama and
suspense.  Bates does the complicated world of eccentric King
characters justice once again in an excellent performance.  Sure, she's
not the usual emaciated, glamorous Hollywood model/actress.  Never
mind that 90% of men would choose Cindy Crawford over Kathy Bates (with
the other 10% choosing Fabio over both of them), Bates can act Crawford
into a mole in the ground... excuse me, a hole in the ground.  And is
it just me, or does this movie set a new record for use of the word
"bitch"?

Title
Review for Casino Royale (1967)
        This is a royale mess. Supposedly parodying the James Bond 
films of the 60's, this turns into a confusing, bland, rarely funny movie 
that's even more episodic and cliched than the movies it parodies. The 
only redeeming feature is the assemblage of talent. David Niven plays 
Bond, old and retired, who is drawn back as head of the British secret 
service after M's murder. Ursula Andress, who co-starred in the real 
Bond movie DR. NO, plays the traditional Bond girl, with PINK 
PANTHER star Peter Sellers as the traditional Bond. Also starring are 
villains Woody Allen (as the sex-obsessed, neurotic Dr. Noah) and 
card-shark Orson "Macbeth" Welles, who contribute the only truly 
memorable performances in the movie.
        CASINO ROYALE is for the most part indecipherable. 
Niven, at the beginning, is staying with M's widow and her eleven 
beautiful daughters, all between the ages of sixteen and nineteen 
(coincidentally, this has always been my idea of what heaven will be 
like). The ladies all put the moves on Bond, who has gained some 
morals since retiring, in an attempt to corrupt him. (Why this is 
relevant to the plot is beyond me.) Bond gets out of that jam after 
about thirty minutes and heads to headquarters, where he finds Miss 
Moneypenny's beautiful daughter has taken her place and seems to 
have the same intentions her mother did. Bond displaces her and gets 
down to business.
        The plan here is to confuse the enemy by making every agent 
007, James Bond, including the ladies. The main Bond is an author-
turned-spy who is recruited to play poker against Welles. There's also 
some harem girl who's the daughter of Bond and Mata Hari, and a few 
other identical beauties to confuse viewers. Sure, the James Bond 
series is ripe for parody, with the far-fetched action and sexist views, 
but CASINO ROYALE doesn't follow the formula at all. It goes in 
another direction without ever actually being a parody. It has some of 
the same Bond characters, but they're nothing like their actual 
counterparts. It's a slow-mover with a bland climax. You could say it 
has a license to suck.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Hong faan kui (1995)
        What do you give a movie with four-star action and zero-
star acting? If you're me, you round it up to three stars because 
you laughed under your breath most of the time at how bad the 
acting and dialogue dubbing was and sat in awe the rest of the 
time at the amazing action, "hellacious" in the words of a friend I 
went to see the movie with. He and I seemed to have very different 
viewing experiences with RUMBLE IN THE BRONX. He didn't 
seem to notice anything wrong with the acting and even asked 
me at one point what was so funny.
        This question coming right after a sequence where a giant 
hovercraft is racing down the streets of New York toward a punk 
band playing in the street. The drummer stands up, points at the 
immense thing and yells out, "Hovercraft!" Maybe I just have a 
weird sense of humor. Then again, I had to talk the guy out of two 
other movies -- HAPPY GILMORE with Adam Sandler and BLACK 
SHEEP with Chris Farley and David Spade  -- before we could settle 
on RUMBLE IN THE BRONX, so I'm probably not at fault.
        RUMBLE IN THE BRONX is just one of many Jackie 
Chan action movies, all imported from Hong Kong and having one 
overwhelming gimmick going for them -- Chan and everyone else 
do their own stunts. And what incredible stunts they are too. Chan 
has some amazingly-choreographed one-take fight scenes, jumps 
off buildings and various other potentially maiming or paralyzing 
activities. He pulls them off with such ease that I was actually 
surprised to see outtakes at the end of missed attempts at some 
of the stunts in the movie, one of which earned Chan a broken 
leg.
        As a movie-reviewer (in a loose, interpretive sense of 
the word), I'm obligated to point out that the plot of RUMBLE IN 
THE BRONX is unoriginal, cliched and sometimes unintelligable, 
but in a movie like this the plot only serves to tie the various action 
scenes together. Chan plays a Hong Kong tourist who visits his 
uncle in the Bronx. The uncle has just sold his grocery store and 
is leaving for a honeymoon, but Chan decides to stick around 
anyway and help out the store's new owner, an incredibly whiny 
Asian women who we're fortunate enough to see on the pot later 
on in the movie.
        The week isn't all daisies and roses for Chan, though, 
especially after walking in on the Asian woman using the 
restroom. There's a motorcycle gang terrorizing the neighborhood, 
a motocross gang actually, doing stunts in the street with BMX 
bikes. (What's next, the Go-kart Gangstas?) Chan spends the first 
half of the movie waging war with the street gang before falling in 
love with one member of the gang, who moonlights as a cage 
dancer in the local nightclub when she's not moonlighting as 
the gang leader's girlfriend.
        The second half of the movie shifts abruptly as Chan finds 
a bag of diamonds belonging to some mafiosos. He then has to trade 
off the diamonds for his girlfriend and a few members of the biker 
gang. Why would he want to save the gang members' lives after 
sparring with them for half of the movie? I think as long as there's 
ass for him to kick, he doesn't really care who's ass it is. If it had 
been Barney, Tammy Faye Baker and Tom Arnold held hostage, 
he'd rescue them too. He just likes to smash pinball machines into 
people's heads, a common psychosocial disorder that comes from 
eating nothing but plain rice for thirty years.
        RUMBLE IN THE BRONX is a mixed bag of entertainment 
from the movie critic's perspective. The acting and plot are 
atrocious, some of the character's voices are obviously dubbed, 
others aren't, but the action sequences are indeed "hellacious," 
even though I've never heard that word before or used it myself. 
If you go for that kind of stuff, you'll enjoy the movie. And if you 
like to watch really bad movies and laugh at them, you'll like it too. 
I mean, where else can you see a guy trounce an entire room full of 
gang members, then turn to them and announce, in a dubbed, 
monotone voice, "You people are the scum of the earth"? I mean 
_besides_ a Bob Dole campaign rally.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Private Parts (1997)
     Howard Stern is one of those phenomena no one can quite
figure out. Maybe people like him because culture has so rapidly
declined and he appeals to the most juvenile sex-obsessed
elements of people, or maybe because he so openly says
whatever's on his mind or possibly because he has all that money
and he still stands well outside the usual kiss-ass celebrity
structure. He's famous and a multi-millionaire but he still 
seems like a disgruntled working-class man. 
     I can't say I'm a big fan of Howard Stern but he does
fascinate me. I read his books Private Parts and Miss America
because of the three reasons listed above, but also because
psychologically, Stern's mind works like no one else's. He's hard
to figure out just because he's so full of contradictions. On one
hand he's the biggest egomaniac on the planet, but on the other
hand he's constantly insulting himself. He's intelligent but immature.
A psychological profile of Stern would fill books. 
     The PRIVATE PARTS movie could have gone in two
directions. It could have been an over-the-top satire of someone
who creates controversy everywhere he goes with juvenile
behavior but still takes himself completely seriously. Or it could be
a serious look through Stern's eyes at his climb from obscurity to
fame and the obstacles along the way. PRIVATE PARTS takes the
second approach, which I think is the more interesting one (and
the more risky one), and still manages to be funny a lot of the time.
     The film begins at its end, a 1991 appearance of Stern as
"Fartman" on the MTV Movie Awards, and soon flashes back to
the roots of it all -- Stern as a child constantly being told to shut up
by his father, Stern as a teenager going on the radio for the first
time, Stern meeting and falling in love with his wife, etc. From
about the age of 18, Stern plays himself, which isn't incredibly
convincing, but as he says, "It's a movie; you're supposed to
suspend disbelief." 
     That's one of the elements that should have been dropped
from the film -- the constant self-reflexive "We're in a movie"
references. Several times, Stern's real-life cohort Gary Dell'Abate
interrupts the film to persuade scantily-clad women to hold up title
cards telling us where Howard went next. This is intrusive,
although I am grateful all of the Stern crew (Robin Quivers, Fred
Norris, Jackie "The Joke Man" Martling) were cast as themselves
in this film. 
     We follow Howard from his early days as a wacky
drive-time jockey, as he meets people like Norris (who is
throughly weird) and Quivers (who is thoroughly likeable and
always seems to be above what Howard does) who help him shift
his show from lame and forced comedy to genuine conversation.
Stern is at his best when he's talking about what's on his mind,
which the executives at WNBC radio constantly try to restrict. 
     The only major player in the Stern story (beside the evil
radio executives who try to keep Stern down) who isn't played by
a real-life counterpart is Stern's wife Allison, played by Mary
McCormack. Casting someone we've never heard of who isn't
model-gorgeous was also a good idea -- it seems more geniune
this way. I overheard several people in the theater asking other
people if that was Stern's real-life wife, which is probably the
response director Betty Thomas and producer Ivan Reitman were
aiming for. 
     What seems less convincing is one of the film's plotlines --
Stern's loving relationship with his wife. His dilemma, which he
addresses in the Private Parts book, is that he married her before
he was famous. After he got famous, beautiful women came out of
the woodwork, all begging for sex. As someone who was
unsuccessful throughout his life with the opposite sex and basically
never grew up, it's a hard road trying to stay faithful to Allison.
"This is the hell that is my life," he says, completely straight-faced. 
     In the end, the message is that Stern is completely
misunderstood. He's not the Antichrist, he's just out to entertain
and make money. And he loves his wife. Just as in THE PEOPLE VS. 
LARRY FLYNT, we as the audience are in no position to determine
how much of this is the God's-honest-truth and how much is
romanticized by Hollywood, but the movie is entertaining enough
that if they want to make their protagonist out to be a martyr, we
can't complain. 
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Over 750 detailed reviews with a comedic flair.

Title
Review for Strangolatore di Vienna, Lo (1971)
        Odds are, you'll never find this one in any video store, 
but even if you do, don't let the hilarious cover fool you. Yes, it 
looks like high camp comedy, with Victor "King Tut" Buono 
wearing a blood-stained apron and wielding a menacing meat 
cleaver while an innocent woman holds her arms out defensively, 
but THE MAD BUTCHER doesn't live up to the legend of other 
cut-rate horror movies where inadvertent laughs abound.
        The back cover reads "Meat is meat but this sausage is 
special!" which sounds like third-rate porno copy. THE MAD 
BUTCHER is far below third-rate, and you know from the 
beginning where the movie is heading. As with SOYLENT GREEN 
and TEXAS CHAINSAW MASSACRE, the special sausage everyone 
is raving about is made out of people. That's all Mad Butcher 
Buono can do when they raise the price of pork to five dollars 
a pound wholesale, and his bitchy wife is the first to go.
        But that's not until about thirty minutes into the movie. 
First we have to hear the story of how Buono went crazy a few 
years ago and beat an old lady senseless with "two pounds of 
liver." (He also assaulted her with some fava beans and a nice 
chianti but that part was cleverly concealed from the press.)
        Now he's out of the sanitarium and back into the meat 
game, in more ways than one. You see, he also regularly ogles 
the beautiful woman across the street as she undresses. He gets 
caught after awhile, when a woman comes up behind him, sees 
him watching the woman, and yells out, "Pig!" but a confused 
Buono, thinking she's just a customer, asks her what cut of pig 
she wants.
        Buono eventually assaults the beautiful woman, but the 
next victim is a hooker who had sex with his assistant (one of those 
Victor Lorre look- and sound-alikes). As Buono leads her up to his 
room, she tells him, "This is gonna cost you fifty bucks," to which 
he cleverly replies, "And it'll cost my customers five bucks a pound," 
before choking her to death.
        No, of course he doesn't cleverly reply anything. If 
this movie had a sense of humor it wouldn't get a zero-star rating. 
Instead it just goes for a surreal kind of look while playing the same 
bizarre player piano theme over and over again. The music sounds 
so intrusive I was waiting for Buono to break into song ("I'm the 
ma-a-a-a-a-a-a-a-ad butcher!"). But there's no MAD BUTCHER: 
BROADWAY STYLE, although the movie is dubbed from German 
to English, with the exception of Buono.
        It's not scary, it's not funny (intentionally or 
unintentionally), it's probably not even a real movie. It's not 
listed in the Leonard Maltin movie guide, so I'm starting to think 
I might have dreamed it, except that my dreams are more 
entertaining and coherent than THE MAD BUTCHER, the 
movie that proves once and for all that the 60's "Batman" show 
was a career-killer for everyone involved. I don't think Burt 
"Robin" Ward's stint in ASSAULT OF THE PARTY NERDS 2 
was a step up the career ladder.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Now and Then (1995)
        I like a good chick movie every now and then, especially if 
the chicks are of the attractive variety. That factor doesn't quite 
apply to NOW AND THEN, where the stars are four twelve-year-old 
girls -- Gaby Hoffman, Thora Birch, Ashleigh Aston Moore and 
Internet favorite Christina Ricci. I don't know if being the teenage 
girl most-lusted after by pedophiles is worth putting on your resume, 
but if you are one of the pedophiles, you'll head for the video store 
the second I tell you NOW AND THEN features a lingering closeup 
of Ricci in a training bra. The rest of you will probably head for the 
bathroom after reading that.
        NOW AND THEN also features the adult counterparts of 
the four girls -- Demi Moore, Melanie Griffith, Rosie O'Donnell and 
Rita Wilson. (Another note for you Internet pedophiles, this film 
tells us Christina Ricci will look like Rosie O'Donnell in twenty 
years. I'm sure that's a real ego-booster for the girl...) The four 
women reconverge in their hometown after being called there 
by Wilson, who reminds them of the pact they made as children 
to be there for d a problem arise.
        The four women only appear in the first ten and last ten 
minutes of the movie, with the main plot revolving around four girls' 
coming-of-age story. So it's a cross between IT and STAND BY ME 
(and it even has a subplot about a dead body), but it could never 
have come from the mind of Stephen King... barring an overdose of 
estrogen pills, of course. It could also be a cross between the 
nostalgic childhood feel of 1993's THE SANDLOT and the 
women-sticking-together ethic of STEEL MAGNOLIAS.
        Whichever of the four films most inspired NOW AND 
THEN, it comes off as an entertaining movie most of the time. The 
film is at its best when focusing on the curiosities of youth -- sex 
and seances, mostly. Ricci is a tomboy who has to tape down her 
overly-developing chest and finally learns the reality behind her 
mother's death. Birch has dreams of Hollywood. Hoffman's parents 
are divorcing. Moore is fat. And so on.
        And we get the obligatory boys-with-cooties and truth-or-
dare scenes here, along with the girls' odyssey of trying to learn the 
mystery of a cemetary tombstone reading "Dear Johnny." (I won't 
give away the mystery, except to say Dear Abby goes to great 
lengths to get rid of her competition.) They also learn to trust each 
other and distrust their parents. Interestingly enough, it's adults like 
Vietnam vet Brendan Fraser and waitress/psychic Janeane Garafolo 
who tell them not to trust adults.
        Since at least 80% of NOW AND THEN is spent in the past, 
the scenes at the beginning and end of the grown-up friends reuniting 
are ultimately expendable. The real attraction of the movie (especially 
for those Internet pedophiles) is those pubescent girls. I suspect the 
only reason Demi, Melanie, Rosie and Rita make appearances at all is 
for the sake of name recognition. They're prominently displayed on 
the front along with their twelve-year-old counterparts, making it 
seem like an equal-time story between past and present, now and 
then. But the movie should have just been called THEN. Forget 
about now. Adults aren't to be trusted.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Living Daylights, The (1987)
THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS (1987) **1/2 (out of four)
        This movie, the fifteenth in the James Bond series, is one of 
two Bond movies from the 80's to star Timothy Dalton as 007. It's a 
radical departure from the carefree Roger Moore efforts. For starters, 
Dalton is young enough to be Moore's son. How old was Moore in A 
VIEW TO A KILL, about 63? The Bond regulars were all starting to 
show their age in that movie. They might as well have changed Miss 
Moneypenny's name to Miss Menopause. But here, in addition to the 
new Bond, we see a new Moneypenny, played by Caroline Bliss--a 
name worthy of a Bond girl.
        Dalton isn't my favorite Bond (or even my third-favorite), 
ranking just above George Lazenby from ON HER MAJESTY'S 
SECRET SERVICE, but we all know by this point that who played 
Bond wasn't nearly as important as the well-oiled formula itself--the 
chases, explosions, beautiful women, high-tech gadgets, etc. 
Unfortunately, the formula is more or less thrown out the window here 
in favor of the gritty 80's drug story. They might as well have called it 
M VICE.
        Bond in this movie has to find out what happened to KGB 
defector Koskov, who turns out to be a compulsive liar. His girlfriend 
(played by Maryam D'Abo, the sister of the sister from "The Wonder 
Years"), a cellist for the Russian orchestra, thinks she's helping him by 
posing as a sniper, but she ends up being shot at by Bond, who later 
reconciles with her in his usual manner.
        Throw in a naughty milkman/killer ("I'm taking you in for a 
deposit.") and an obsessive military general (played by my first 
semester college roommate) who has a giant war room in his exotic 
mansion showcasing miniature recreations of great battles through 
history and you've got the usual larger-than-life Bond villains without 
the usual Bond formula.
        THE LIVING DAYLIGHTS is more a cold war/drug runner 
80's movie than a genuine Bond movie. It almost works on that level 
except for the fact that it's the slowest-moving Bond picture ever, with 
two climactic battles that aren't that thrilling. Sure, there are a couple 
good chases in the Connery/Moore tradition, including one where 
Dalton and D'Abo are riding a bullet-proof cello sled down a snow-
covered hill, but take away the token appearances by M, Q and 
Moneypenny and it's just another sub-par 80's action movie.
        LICENCE TO KILL, the other Dalton Bond movie, didn't 
resemble the traditional Bond movie, but it at least had a compelling 
plot and some blockbuster action scenes. But when you've got an 
uneven generic movie like this, it might as well be TANGO & CASH.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Four Rooms (1995)
        Four stars for FOUR ROOMS? Not quite. This one was 
lucky to scrape up the paltry one-and-a-half star rating it got. An 
interesting concept was drug into the ground by an aimless script 
and annoying lead actor. Tim "Pumpkin" Roth plays an idiotic 
English bellboy trying to run a hotel by himself on New Year's 
Eve. Four hot young directors (Quentin Tarantino, Robert 
Rodriguez, Allison Anders and Alexandre Rockwell) each wrote 
and directed a segment of the movie, none of which ever rise 
above the level of mediocre and two of which are completely 
beyond redemption.
        The first, Anders' "The Missing Ingredient," is one of 
those. Madonna is a witch who wants sperm... I know you're all 
thinking, "Yeah, I know that, but what part does she play in the 
movie?" and to that I have to say shame on you. She and the rest 
of her coven meet in one of the hotel rooms to mix a witch's brew, 
with one pivotal ingredient missing -- the aforementioned life juice 
of a man. So one of the witches has sex with Roth. End of segment. 
The whole thing is pointless and unentertaining, with Madonna 
and the sexy Valeria Golino standing around, their talents 
unused.
        Then comes the equally-bad "The Wrong Man," directed 
by Rockwell. This time Roth is the wrong man entering the wrong 
room at the wrong time in the wrong movie. Some guy has his wife 
tied to a chair, and goes from thinking Roth slept with his wife to 
kissing Roth full on the mouth, which has to be the absolute low 
point of the movie. It doesn't elevate itself too much more when 
Roth tries to escape and ends up stuck in the bathroom window, 
pleading the drunk man on the next floor up for help. The man 
vomits on his face, physical comedy at its finest.
        The third segment, Rodriguez's "The Misbehavors," is 
the best of the movie, which definitely isn't a distinction to brag 
about. Roth is paid to look after the mischevious children of a 
Mexican gangster and his Asian-American wife. The second Roth 
leaves the room, they break open the champagne, watch adult 
movies, throw hypodermic needles at the painting on the wall and 
unearth a dead body hidden in the mattress springs. By the time 
the parents return, all hell has broken loose, although Rodriguez 
never shows how Roth escapes the gangster's wrath.
        He instead cuts to a phone conversation Roth has with 
a stoned Marisa Tomei, in which he threatens to walk off the job 
but finally agrees to take some food up to the visiting Hollywood 
star in the penthouse. Begin the final segment of FOUR ROOMS, 
"The Man From Hollywood." This is Tarantino's segment and he 
of course plays the man from Hollywood, who shows Roth around 
the room before offering him money to officiate a bet that he and 
his drunken friends (one of which is an uncredited Bruce Willis) 
have made. It's interesting but incredibly slow-moving except for 
the ending, which is resolved in the five seconds before the credits 
roll. Even Tarantino can't do much justice to a fallen movie that has 
goes nowhere in ninety minutes and is only slightly entertaining 
during its final half.

Title
Review for R.I.O.T.: The Movie (1996) (V)
        Outside the Christian community, people will just look 
back at you blankly when you ask if they've heard of Carman. 
Then, when you try to explain the man's succees in the 
contemporary Christian music industry, they find it even more 
unbelievable. Believe me, even those of us who have been buying 
his CD's since the mid-80's can't defend the man because, since 
about 1989, he's tried to bend over backwards to gain acceptance 
in youth circles despite being well over forty and catching onto 
every musical trend several years late.
        In 1989 he did a little ditty called "The Resurrection Rap" 
that sounded like the worst early 80's pop rap and had lyrics like 
"I got the deffest, freshest tale to tell / About how Christ saved 
my soul from hell" and "When Christ talks, you best be chill / He 
made the wind and the waves stand still." In 1993 he jumped on 
the Vanilla Ice / M.C. Hammer hip-hop bandwagon with a song 
called "Who's in the House?" ("JC!") And on the new R.I.O.T. 
album, the companion piece to this movie, he's adopting an 
early 90's Technotronic / 2 Unlimited / "Rhythm is a Dancer" 
sound.
        That's just one reason none of us who were raised on 
Carman can think the man has any degree of coolness, but he's 
also a beefy Italian who talks like Stallone and tries to be the 
Renaissance Man of Christian music. Besides the albums, there 
are books, music videos, even a video talk show that Carman 
does once a month called "Time 2."
        The R.I.O.T. movie starts out with a preview for the 
"Time 2" video series. At the end, Carman comes on and says 
to the camera, "Become a 'Time 2' Video Club member and we'll 
have a pretty good time together..." then he goes into an expression 
of deep, contemplative thought and shakes his head, amending his 
statement. "Aw, who am I kidding? We'll have a straight-up blast!" 
It's hilarious because the man obviously thinks his videos are the 
most entertaining things on the planet. I was waiting for him to add, 
after the "straight-up blast" line, "You'll laugh so hard you'll soil the 
couch! You're gonna sh*t your pants! Your death certificate will 
read 'Overdose of Laughter'!"
        Then comes the R.I.O.T. movie itself, which you can 
find for rent at any fine Christian bookstore. Carman plays tough-
as-nails cop Vic Rizzo (no, seriously), who decides to move from 
Chicago to Broken Arrow, Oklahoma after his kid, Little Vic (no, 
seriously), goes into the school bathroom and has a run-in with 
some gang members. Luckily, his beautiful teacher comes to the 
rescue just in time ("Gee, he's been in the bathroom for fifteen 
seconds already -- something must be wrong!") and the gang 
members split.
        Cut to the next scene, where Carman gives his son and 
the teacher a lecture about how some kids aren't actually in gangs 
but dress to emulate gang members. "We call them 'bustas' or 
'wannabes'," Carman says with a straight face, little realizing he, 
as an old man futilely trying to keep up with youth culture, is the 
biggest wannabe of them all.
        The head gang member is played by Christian rapper 
T-Bone (the name "Ribeye" was taken), whose only hit song so 
far features the lyrics, "I'm the lyrical assassin / My lyrics go bup-
bup-bup / And all the demons get struck." There's a scene toward 
the beginning where T-Bone is running from Carman Rizzo and he 
reaches a locked door and begins banging on it. If the screen writer 
had only thought to have T-Bone yell out, "Bup-bup-open up!" 
the movie as a whole would have been worth watching.
        But the attempts at humor aren't quite on the "bup-
bup-open-up" level. Take, for example, the scene in which Carman 
bursts in on a bunch of gang members terrorizing a diner and sees 
one standing atop the counter. He says, "Get your feet off the 
counter!" and breaks the guy's balance with his nightstick. Funny, 
yes, but for all the wrong reasons, as with all the violent scenes in 
R.I.O.T. Carman gets in two hilarious one-on-one fights with the 
gang members, not to mention the pathetic karate scenes where he 
takes a dozen or more of them out at once with his intermediate-to-
advanced manuevers that are unconvincing enough to make you 
realize Carman had too much creative control over the movie.
        As far as the plot goes, Carman soon finds that there are 
even gang problems in Broken Arrow and has to face down his 
own fears while inevitably romancing the beautiful elementary 
school teacher. Twice his children are unbelievably placed in 
jeopardy, once when Little Vic is inexplicably at school in the 
middle of the night and another where his prepubescent daughter 
is assaulted while working at the diner. The girl can't be more than 
eleven years old and we know child labor laws don't allow that kind 
of work, but her presence there is never explained, unless it's she's 
working in the Kathie Lee Sweatstaraunt.
        And every ten minutes or so, completely unrelated to the 
plot, a music video from the R.I.O.T. album pops up. The videos are 
on an equally pathetic level with the movie itself, ranging from the 
Janet Jackson / Paula Abdul ripoff title track ("We are a part of the 
Jesus nation") to the Billy Ray Carman line-dance song "Step of 
Faith" and THRILLER ripoff "No Monsters." There's even a nine-
minute epic called "There is a God," where Carman points out all 
the intricacies of the earth and universe in a song that steals the 
chords from "We Are the World." Interesting how God could 
create the world in seven days but Carman couldn't create a 
new chord progression.
        As a whole, R.I.O.T. The Movie is nothing you should 
hunt down unless you're already familiar with the man (the 
CARman, that is). And if you like movies that are bad enough 
to laugh at, this one defies all belief. It makes it all the more 
masochistically enjoyable knowing that Carman really thought 
he was making a good movie with entertaining doses of comedy, 
drama and action. But believe me, and believe I'm riot, this movie 
is none of the above. If there was a "Jesus Christ Theater 3000" 
showcase for bad Christian movies, R.I.O.T. would be the main 
attraction.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Scream (1996)
        SCREAM stands as the only successful meld between 
parody and terror in a horror movie. Unlike other slasher parodies 
like STUDENT BODIES, it has a sense of humor about itself but still 
manages to deliver genuine shocks. It also serves as homage to the 
great and not-so-great horror movies of the 80's, from the writer and 
director of a few great and not-so-great horror movies, Wes Craven. 
Such a set-up -- well-known horror movie director turns to self-
parody -- should be disastrous but somehow isn't.
        Craven, who is responsible for the original NIGHTMARE 
ON ELM STREET, has created the perfect inside movie for fans of 
good and bad horror movies. The settings, characters and score is 
reminiscent of many of the well-known slasher classics. The small 
town where the killings take place is even stock horror -- everyone 
knows everyone else and most of them are spoiled white kids with 
nice houses in the woods and cellular phones.
        SCREAM is one of those movies where all the characters 
can talk about is other horror movies like SILENCE OF THE 
LAMBS, FRIDAY THE 13TH and, yes, NIGHTMARE ON ELM 
STREET. One of the characters remarks that the original 
NIGHTMARE was good but all the sequels sucked, a high school 
janitor is seen wearing Freddy Kreuger's sweater and hat, and one 
of the male characters looks just like Johnny Depp, star of the first 
NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET. Just the tip of the inside joke 
iceberg.
        Unlike most horror movies, SCREAM was made on a decent 
budget and stars people you've heard of. Neve Campbell ("Party of 
Five") is the sexy young heroine, Courteney Cox is an aggressive 
tabloid TV reporter and Drew Barrymore serves as the killer's first 
victim. As the movie opens, Barrymore is home alone, making 
popcorn for the horror video she's about to watch.
        The phone rings and a mysterious voice starts asking 
questions. She hangs up on him a few times before he reveals he's 
watching her from outside, and that her jock boyfriend is tied up 
on the patio. The phone voice says he'll set them both free if she 
can answer some simple movie trivia questions, which she botches 
under the stress. So he has to kill them both.
        Cut to the next day, at the local high school. The school's 
abuzz with talk of the murders, and every student gets hauled into 
Principal Henry Winkler's office to be interrogated by the small 
town's sheriff and deputy. Later, Neve, her picture-perfect boyfriend 
(the Depp look-alike), her best friend, her weird boyfriend and his 
weird horror movie-obsessed friend discuss these murders in terms 
of other horror movies they've seen. That night, Neve is home alone 
and gets a phone call from a mysterious stranger.
        This is just the beginning. Before SCREAM is done, the 
casualties will number at least ten, but this movie is much more tame 
than the movies it offers up for parody. There are no nude scenes or 
graphic violence, probably because they're not needed as crutches 
here. SCREAM is a good horror movie on its own but it's probably 
the best anti-horror movie ever made.
        SCREAM goes so far as to establish the rules for surviving 
a horror movie, which I myself have commented on in the past. 
Here's my direct quote, which pretty much lines up with what the 
horror movie-obsessed characters in SCREAM say. "Smoking pot, 
drinking beer, sleeping with someone, insulting the main character... 
playing a practical joke on one of the other characters... taking a 
shower or spying on someone skinnydipping or taking a shower 
will get you a one-way ticket to the afterlife."
        SCREAM acknowledges these and the other main tenets 
of the modern horror movie, then goes on to break them. It's an ode 
to slasher movies, but doesn't allow its fondness for past horror 
movies to dictate the plot. You hardly ever see a horror movie this 
self-aware, funny and semi-intelligent. SCREAM shows a lot of clips 
from HALLOWEEN, the best slasher movie ever made, and actually 
comes out looking good next to them. That says a lot.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for Grosse Pointe Blank (1997)
        The movie hitman always exhibits several common traits. 
Like the Schwarzeneggerian action hero, he is a calm, collected killer 
who manages to crack one-liners about that most morbid of topics: 
death. And he seems to get away with -- if you'll excuse the expression 
-- murder, without anyone ever realizing that, when he says he's a 
professional killer, he's not kidding. The hitman this time is played by 
John Cusack and the main difference between this and other hitman 
films is that GROSSE POINT BLANK is a high-minded satire centered 
around Cusack's visit to his 10-year high school reunion.
        Cusack has disappeared from the town in which he grew up, 
leaving everyone to wonder what's become of him, especially his bitter 
ex-girlfriend (Minnie Driver). He stood her up for prom and she 
hasn't seen him since. Now all she has to her name is a low-rent radio 
show on 79.5, a frequency which doesn't even exist on radio receivers. 
When Cusack shows up after all that time away, Driver can't talk to 
him in private. She puts him on the air instead, more interested in 
entertaining the listeners than working out her personal problems with 
Cusack. It serves as a buffer between her public and private lives. See, 
I know the psychology of entertainment -- I _live_ the psychology of 
entertainment.
        Cusack, like Romy and Michelle, doesn't want to go to his 
high school reunion, but his secretary forces him to go. The secretary, 
played by Cusack's sister Joan (in her perpetual comic supporting 
roles), is one of the enjoyable characters that lend GROSSE POINT 
BLANK its comic charm. Another is Dan Aykroyd, who is in his first 
decent movie since MY GIRL, and even that one is debatable to most 
film buffs. He plays the villain of the film, a rival hitman who wants 
Cusack to join his union of professional killers. They've gone without 
benefits for too long. So has Aykroyd, actually.
        Cusack finally agrees to head for his reunion because he'll be 
in the area for a job anyway. So he stops in and has a few bizarre 
scenes with Driver before those two become hot and heavy again. He 
also meets a few old friends, including another of the great comic 
supporters, Jeremy Piven. All the while, a few mysterious men are 
following Cusack for reasons that become clear later. This subplot 
takes away from the comedic intelligence in favor of the traditional 
gunfight ending.
        The main trip-up of GROSSE POINT BLANK is that, despite 
its great cast and interesting premise, it has too much convention. The 
Cusack-Driver romance is predictable, and so is the Cusack-Aykroyd 
conflict. Whenever any of that plays out onscreen, the movie turns 
mediocre. GROSSE POINT BLANK works when it gives us the biting 
satire on the politics of murder show and how pathetic all the high 
school people are 10 years after graduation. And you thought your 
high school classmates couldn't get any more pathetic...
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for Play It Again, Sam (1972)
        I never thought I'd see Woody Allen imitating Humphrey 
Bogart, and doing such a bad job to boot. But that's the premise of 
PLAY IT AGAIN, SAM -- that Woody Allen can't pick up girls with 
the flowery CASABLANCA dialogue or even act tough when he 
wants to. This is the guy who says he's been beaten up by Quakers 
and this time two bikers who pick up one of his failed dates. Most of 
PLAY IT AGAIN, SAM focuses on Woody's quest for love, going out 
on one disastrous blind date after another, little realizing the woman 
he really wants is his best friend's wife (Diane Keaton).
        Woody is helped along in his journey by the ghost of 
Bogart, who pops up every once in awhile to give him advice on 
masculinity, which none of us would argue he needs. But obviously, 
the charm of Woody Allen has always been his "loser" alter ego who 
ponders endlessly the value of sex, death and God while trying to 
gain and hold onto a meaningful relationship with the opposite sex. 
PLAY IT AGAIN, SAM is hardly a deep comedy like CRIMES AND 
MISDEMEANORS, though, with much of it playing like a sitcom 
from heaven, especially the extended blind date scene in Woody's 
apartment that has him going painfully out of his way to impress 
his date while Keaton and her husband (Tony Roberts) look on in 
a mixture of sympathy and disgust.
        This film is a fun mix of comedy and romance while still 
not being overly optimistic like MIGHTY APHRODITE. The ending 
parallels the "If you don't get on that plane, you'll regret it; maybe 
not today, maybe not tomorrow but soon -- and for the rest of your 
life" finale of CASABLANCA but isn't just a ripoff of that movie. 
PLAY IT AGAIN, SAM offers beginning and ending bookends of 
homage to CASABLANCA as tribute (and of course the Bogart's 
ghost device) but is 100% Allen, even if it wasn't directed by him. 
Though Woody scripted (from his Broadway play) and starred in 
it, Herbert "Steel Magnolias" Ross did the directing honors.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for People vs. Larry Flynt, The (1996)
        With nearly all the critics in the world calling THE PEOPLE 
VS. LARRY FLYNT  the best movie of 1996 and most major religious 
figures decrying it from the pulpit, this movie was top on my list of 
movies to see this holiday season. TURBULENCE and THE RELIC 
can wait, because this movie's got everyone shaken up in one way or 
another. The movie theater people were actually checking IDs and for 
this one so you know it's controversial. And yes, it is damn good.
        THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT tells the fascinating true 
story of a low-class man's rise to fame through the exploitation of 
nude women. Larry Flynt, played by Woody Harrelson, is stereotypical 
white trash running a series of seedy strip joints when he gets the 
idea to publish a newsletter to promote it. The newsletter is, of course, 
a bunch of topless photos, and that leads to the establishment of 
Hustler magazine, which begins selling millions of copies an issue 
once it prints nude pictures of Jackie Onassis.
        Hustler, like Flynt himself, is undisguised perversion. It 
doesn't have the pretenses of the higher-class Playboy, which tries 
to mix articles and interviews with the photo spreads. Hustler focuses 
solely on sex, and so does Flynt. It's Playboy for the common 
pervert -- sure there's the Playboy Mansion, but wouldn't most 
people rather visit the Hustler Mobile Home?
        With the success of Hustler, Flynt becomes rich and 
influential but retains the same set of friends and associates as 
before. Making the journey with him is bisexual stripper Althea 
(Courtney Love, of Hole), who becomes his wife early in the film. 
Swingers that they are, though, they scoff at the notion of 
marriage and monogamy being interrelated. There are a couple 
sex scenes in THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT, and Love 
does appear in the buff many a time. Being subjected to her 
naked body so many times, I'm starting to get an idea of why 
Kurt Cobain shot himself.
        With the graphic pictures and cartoons in his magazine, 
outcries are inevitable. Flynt goes to court three times in the 
movie, twice because he's being sued by the Reverend Jerry 
Falwell for printing a parody ad that quotes Falwell as saying he 
had sex with his mother in an outhouse. The court scenes are 
the most memorable in THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT, 
particularly the scene in which Flynt decides to get back at the 
system by throwing an orange at the judge and wearing the 
American flag as a diaper.
        Life is a long, twisted trip for Mr. and Mrs. Flynt. He turns 
to God after much prodding from the President's sister, Ruth 
Carter Stapleton, but his outlook remains as sex-saturated and 
blasphemous as before. Once he is shot by an unknown sniper 
and ends up paralyzed from the waist down, he abandons his 
belief in God entirely and gets hooked on various forms of 
drugs, legal and illegal, to ease the pain. Althea too finds herself 
hooked on heroin and eventually dies of AIDS.
        THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLYNT has a compelling story 
that is most interesting for trying to paint Flynt as some kind of 
folk hero but only making him look more insane and perverse. 
Harrelson did a great job portraying a complicated man who 
has at least a small degree of mental illness, but the big acting 
trophy here should go to Love. I never would have pegged her 
as someone who would make the transition from music video 
to movies so successfully on the first try.
        The movie depicts a lot of depravity and is uncomfortable 
to watch at times, but still brings with it a very powerful and very 
true theme -- that the First Amendment of the United States 
should provide freedom of expression for everyone. Defining 
obscenity is difficult and undeniably subjective, but as this 
movie points out, outlawing one form of speech could lead to 
the outlawing of other forms. Flynt may not be the picture 
perfect messenger but the message is at the heart of 
American freedom.

Title
Review for What's New, Pussycat (1965)
        Officially, this is what started it all in the film career of 
Woody Allen. From this uneven, overlong mishmash of a movie, 
you'd never guess he'd go on to become one of the most talented 
filmmakers of the 20th century (as opposed to the amazing movie 
directors of the Renaissance). WHAT'S NEW PUSSYCAT goes 
from a semi-interesting sex farce to a stunningly long and inane 
conclusion that even includes a go-kart chase.
        Peter "Pink Panther" Sellers plays a Don Juan who 
has women falling all over him. He gets plenty of sex out of it but 
is hounded by women wanting commitment. (Kind of a sex and 
race reversal version of SHE'S GOTTA HAVE IT.) Sellers tells all 
his problems to his therapist (Peter O'Toole in a terrible black-
haired hippie fright wig... it frightened me, anyway), who is 
infinitely more screwed up than any of his patients because 
he's dying of horniness. O'Toole throughout the movie tries to 
force himself upon woman after woman, in that light-hearted 
brand of sexual harassment humor bred only in the 60's.
        Meanwhile, Allen himself has a minor role as Sellers' 
friend, who is in love with Romy Schneider, one of the women 
who wants Sellers to marry her. So Sellers, Allen and O'Toole all 
want Prentiss, although all three of them lust after scores of other 
beautiful women over the course of the movie. Allen ends up with 
Ursula Andress, "a close personal friend of James Bond," who 
sleeps with him after he buys a sports car.
        For 1965, WHAT'S NEW PUSSYCAT has a surprising 
amount of sexual content. There wouldn't be a plot without the 
sex, even down to the characters' occupations. Sellers is a fashion 
magazine editor who has a regular parade of models in and out of 
his bed and Allen is the guy who dresses and undresses strippers 
at a nightclub for twenty francs a week. ("It's all I could afford," 
Woody remarks.) In his later films, Allen would reduce sex to a 
supporting role with his other favorite topics of death, God and 
food (in that order), but in WHAT'S NEW PUSSYCAT sex is the 
front-and-center theme.
        Like the 1963 movie SEX AND THE SINGLE GIRL, the 
sexual tensions and desires from the first part of the movie 
manifest themselves in a wild, everything-but-the-kitchen-sink 
conclusion, but here the movie is severely hindered by the silly, 
convulted finale. In SEX, the conclusion was the best part of the 
movie, but with Woody Allen, a more laid-back verbal humor 
works best, not an overblown slapstick farce, particularly if he's 
only onscreen in a few scenes. When taking the starring role 
and directorial reigns in the early 70's classics BANANAS and 
SLEEPER, Woody would prove his talent for slapstick. But 
nothing is proven here, except that Sellers, Allen and Andress 
didn't learn their lesson the first time out. They would all three 
do much worse two years later with the 007 parody CASINO 
ROYALE.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Spy Who Loved Me, The (1977)
        One of the most entertaining James Bond films from the 
Roger Moore era, THE SPY WHO LOVED ME is probably the biggest 
budget Bond movie, with huge sets and props as well as some 
blockbuster action scenes. And how can you not like a movie that co-
stars Ringo's wife, Barbara Bach, and features a non-stop disco version 
of the traditional series score?
        It's a globe-trotting action movie that has Bond and Mrs. 
Starr, a beautiful Russian spy, teaming up to end SPECTRE's latest 
threat. This time, it's a madman who kidnaps two nuclear submarines, 
one Russian and one American. His plan is to destroy the civilized 
world as we know it and begin an underwater society. This is 
somebody who went a little too far after seeing THE LITTLE 
MERMAID. I know the shell bra is a real turn-on, but give me a 
break.
        The Bond formula works especially well here. Even though 
the omnipresent disco score becomes annoying and the ski slope chase 
scene at the beginning is blue screen technology at its worst, there are 
still more than enough gadgets, explosions, chases, etc. to make up. 
And as usual, Bond's three-woman quota is reached with a little help 
from Mrs. Starr, who also makes the movie a standout in the series. 
Most of the beautiful women from the 70's were hidden behind the 
ugly bell-bottoms and poofy hair, which makes Bach's straight-haired, 
smartly-dressed Agent XXX a welcome exception.
        I'd have to say Ringo Starr is the luckiest bastard on earth. 
First his talentless self got to be in the greatest rock and roll band ever, 
then he married one of the hottest ladies of the 70's, now he gets to eat 
his pizza _crust first_! We should all be so fortunate.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Sleeper (1973)
        It was easy for me to forget after watching films like 
Crimes and Misdemeanors and Mighty Aphrodite 
that Woody Allen began his career making light-hearted slapstick 
comedies. SLEEPER, the incredibly funny follow-up to BANANAS, 
continues the antics by taking a premise and going seemlessly from 
location to location, uniting all sorts of sitcom-like situations. One 
minute Woody is using a giant inflatable suit to escape from his 
enemies and the next he and Diane Keaton are posing as doctors 
who must perform an operation they know nothing about, a set-up 
that's been used countless times since, most notably in SPIES 
LIKE US and HOUSEGUEST. (I'm not implying there was anything 
notable about the movie HOUSEGUEST.)
        The premise that provides all this has Miles Monroe 
(Allen), owner of the Happy Carrot Health Food Store, being 
thawed out in the year 2173, two hundred years after he went 
into the hospital for a "routine operation." The country has since 
become a police state and the doctors who revive him ask all sorts 
of questions about the long-since forgotten era of history he came 
from.
        For instance, a video clip of Howard Cosell yammering in 
monotone about some sport -- a torture device used on the most 
brutal prisoners? "That's exactly what that was," Allen replies. 
Woody also finds comedy in the doctors' passing revelations that 
the health food he and other people so faithfully devoted themselves 
to was actually destructive to the body. One doctor offers nervous 
Woody a cigarette to calm him down. "Tobacco is one of the 
healthiest substances for the body."
        We soon find out the real reason he was thawed out -- to 
help lead the underground resistance. As the only person alive 
without massive amounts of government data compiled about him, 
he could be invaluable to them. All this comes into play toward the 
end, in a hilarious climax involving the leader's nose, but for most of 
the movie, he's Dr. Woody Kimball, fugitive from the law, running 
and hiding in multiple comedic scenes, many of which offer 
extended silent sequences hearkening back to the silent Chaplin 
and Keaton films.
        And why not? Woody's done his take on almost every 
other era of movie making, from the romances of the 30's (Purple 
Rose of Cairo) to the documentaries of the World War II era 
(ZELIG) and even ancient forms of entertainment like radio (RADIO 
DAYS) and Greek tragedy (MIGHTY APHRODITE). His talent for 
mixing silent slapstick with his hilarious-as-usual one-liners (after 
he is given a pet robot dog as a gift, he asks, "Is this dog 
housebroken or is he going to be leaving little batteries on the 
floor?") makes SLEEPER just one of the many classic films 
Woody Allen has brought us.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Conspiracy Theory (1997)
        In a summer of better movies, I'd probably give 
CONSPIRACY THEORY a lower star rating, but 1997's mid-year 
crop of blockbusters has been less than noteworthy, and that's 
made even this muddled Mel Gibson / Julia Roberts thriller seem 
entertaining overall. Yes, I know it's got a convoluted plot, recycled 
action scenes and a main character whose characterization shifts 
abruptly and without explanation, but there are enough moments 
of genuine suspense that I liked it most of the time. And, come on, 
it's the only Mel-Julia teamup this side of PRETTY WEAPON... or 
was it LETHAL WOMAN?
        Mel plays a cabdriver who, in his spare time, writes 
newsletters with his own personal conspiracy theories. We hear 
about 15 or 20 of them during the opening credits and they're all 
pretty laughable. It's easy to see why no one takes him seriously -- in 
fact, the first reel is almost satire. Mel is way over the top as a guy 
who keeps combination locks on his coffee and juice jars and 
actually believes "the Vietnam War was fought over a bet Howard 
Hughes lost to Aristotle Onassis."
        Mel's character is a complete kook who shows up regularly 
at Julia's Justice Department office to warn her of all the things he 
believes will come true. Yeah, she's just pretty enough to have her 
own personal stalker, as we find out when Mel sits in the street, 
watching her jog on her apartment treadmill and sing along to the 
appropriate "Can't Take My Eyes Off You." And, yes, the movie 
does come complete with its own hip-hop "Can't Take My Eyes Off 
You" remake by the Fugees, which should be killed softly.
        With all this workplace harrassment and stalking, it's pretty 
hard to feel much sympathy for Mel's character until his paranoia 
pays off and government baddie (sorry, I've been waiting for months 
to use the phrase "government baddie") Patrick Stewart kidnaps 
him. Stewart is so evil that one of the gossipy old biddies that sat 
behind me in the theater said to her friend, "Oh, he's depraved." 
Another pearl of wisdom from the biddies, this time about Julia: 
"She's got pretty eyes."
        Stewart ties Mel down to a wheelchair and gives him an 
injection ("truth serum," according to the biddies, who wouldn't shut 
up). He wants to know information about the Romulans or 
something, but Mel bites his nose off and makes a hasty action 
movie escape -- while still in the wheelchair, no less. He high-tails it 
back to Julia's office to tell her all about Stewart and his phasers. 
This begins a lengthy series of captures and escapes, while slowly 
Mel seems less and less crazy and certain open plot threads are 
brought together in predictable ways.
        Still, CONSPIRACY THEORY has enough sequences that 
work that I can almost forgive the use and abuse of action flick 
convention, some of which director Richard Donner pioneered in the 
LETHAL WEAPON trilogy. And the star power of Mel and Julia, a 
$32 million salary between them, lifts this above the level of the 
typical paranoia formula thriller. CONSPIRACY THEORY is 
entertaining and it even kills my conspiracy theory about Julia 
Roberts and Patrick Stewart being the same person.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Violent Years, The (1956)
        "This is a story of violence, of violence born in the 
uncontrolled passions of adolescent youth and fostered by this 
generation of parents, those who, in their own smug little world of 
selfish interests and confused ideas of parental supervision, refuse 
to believe today's glaring headlines. But it _has_ happened. Only 
the people and places have been given other names." That's the 
narration that opens THE VIOLENT YEARS, a movie so bad it's 
hilarious. What else could you expect from a film scripted by Ed 
Wood himself?
        As the narrator reads his Jack Webb-like intro, the four 
main characters of THE VIOLENT YEARS walk into frame one by 
one. They're four high school girls who have formed their own 
gang of violence and aren't too big on traditional authority. We 
can pretty much guess this as they walk in front of a blackboard 
reading "Good Citizenship, Self-Restraint, Politeness, Loyalty," 
and sneer defiantly. These girls have none of these things, especially 
their leader, Paula.
        The movie begins with Paula's parents being chewed out 
by a courtroom judge for being so lax in raising the girl that she 
turned to violence. Flash back to the beginning of it all, when Paula 
tells her mother she wants to have a "heart-to-heart" talk with her 
and the mother replies, "What could be so important in your young 
life as to warrant my attention so drastically?" So Paula instead goes 
out with her friends and robs a gas station, the logical next step after 
your mom tells you she's too busy to talk.
        Word of the robbery gets to Paula's dad, a newspaper 
editor. "These fool kids. When will they learn?" his star reporter 
asks him. "These aren't kids," he replies. "These are morons." But 
the joke's on you, dad. The reason Paula has turned to such crime 
is because you're busy with your newspaper, and the reason you're 
so busy with your newspaper these days is because of this femdom 
violence. Alanis Morissette has yet to dream of a situation that 
ironic.
        The next night, the girls take their tyranny one step further 
and assault a couple making out in a car. They force the girl to take 
off her sweater and skirt and steal her jewelry. As for the "pretty" 
boy, "Maybe he's got more to offer than money." Another girl adds, 
"Under conventional circumstances, he could be very interesting." 
So they take him into the woods and, one by one, have their way 
with him. To a teenage boy, a more horrendous form of torture 
could only be imagined.
        The next day is Paula's birthday, but neither of her parents 
can make it to the party. Better that they don't, though, because it 
turns out to be a four-on-four orgy of 50's proportions. However, 
even in its depiction of perversions, THE VIOLENT YEARS 
embodies each and every 50's cliche, from "You're a peach" to 
"Hi, gang." The girls are never believable as hoodlums and everyone 
else simply can't act. Mixed in with Wood's atrocious dialogue like 
"I'm not in it for the money. There's plenty of that at home... It's the 
thrill that gets me -- the thrill of the chase," it turns into one of the 
absolute worst movies of all time.
        Finally comes the climax, as Paula and the gang are 
offered a job that will pay more money than all the gas station 
jobs combined, although we all know it isn't the money Paula is 
after. No, there's plenty of that at home. But getting paid by a 
bunch of Commies to trash the school will provide the thrill of a 
lifetime, as the girls overturn desks, write rebellious phrases on 
the chalkboard and throw globes into the wall. As bad luck would 
have it, though, the cops show up and plug one of the girls where 
it counts. "It ain't supposed to be this way," she wails before falling 
over dead.
        Paula is finally captured after killing her fence and a cop, 
leading to the final court scene, in which the judge lets his mouth 
run wild. "You killed for the love of killing," he tells Paula. "A kill 
for a thrill." We get even more Poetry With Ed Wood when the 
parents finally realize the error of their ways and lament, "We've 
given Paula everything -- everything but real love. A new 
dress instead of a caress, a new car instead of a heart-to-heart 
talk."
        Wood throws in a plot twist at the end involving Paula's 
illegitamate child that makes the movie even worse. As Paula's 
mother says, "It all seems like a bad dream." I'd have to agree with 
her on that one, and even more so with the judge's final speech 
about the youths of today (who are now over fifty) when he says, 
"Their callous attitude is summed up in two words: 'So what'." So 
what indeed.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Evita (1996)
        I've always liked Madonna's music, although we all know 
her movie performances are, for the most part, lackluster. That's why 
it was good news to find out her performance in EVITA is 98% 
singing. Now that I've finally seen it, though, I realize that's also the 
bad news. Everything in EVITA is sung, which makes it hard for 
most viewers to retain interest after the first hour. Even the most 
musical musicals consist of at least 50% dialogue, which makes 
EVITA some kind of genetic strand of hyper-musical.
        EVITA tells the story of Eva Peron, one of Argentina's 
most beloved historical figures and one of the longest running 
contemporary Broadway musicals. A lot of the Andrew Lloyd Webber 
/ Tim Rice songs are catchy, yeah, but (as Roger Ebert pointed out) 
it's because you end up hearing most of them five or six times 
through the course of the movie. Around the fourth reprise of "Don't 
Cry For Me, Argentina," I was about ready to burst into tortured tears 
of repetition.
        Madonna, of course, plays Eva from the age of 15 or so, 
which is completely unconvincing. You'd have to be pretty stressed 
out to have crow's feet in high school. The teenage Evita convinces a 
visiting singer she's sleeping with (which in Madonna's case is 
completely convincing at any age) to take her back to Buenos Aires 
with him. He does, but their association ends there. Eva makes it in 
the big city because she has that certain Madonna-esque quality, her 
stylish antics accounting more for her success than her voice or 
acting abilities. Art imitates life, you know.
        Evita becomes semi-famous with her radio program, but 
much more famous when she joins forces with Juan Peron (Jonathan 
Pryce), an authoritarian army officer who becomes leader of the 
country thanks to Evita's endless campaigning. The peasants love her 
because they sense she came from among them to make something of 
herself, although she never actually accomplishes much on their 
behalf aside from tossing money out a train window while she sings a 
gleeful song. Antonio Banderas, as some kind of singing narrator / 
collective peasant conscience, is always around to question her 
motives through cynical song, which doesn't lend the film any 
dramatic credibility.
        What's good about EVITA is the occasional gleeful song. 
Three highlights are Madonna singing "I'd Be Surprisingly Good For 
You" to Pryce, the one toward the beginning where she's trying to 
persuade her singer / lover to bring her along, and "Rainbow High," a 
showtune version of "Material Girl." And of course there's "You Must 
Love Me," the painful ballad that comes during Eva's dying days. 
Evita died at age 33, but from the denouement of this movie, it would 
seem like she lived for decades and decades. Around the fifth she's-
going-to-die-and-aren't-we-sad song, I was ready to yank the plug 
myself.
        The film does have a huge, epic scope. Director Alan Parker 
put a lot of effort into making EVITA an eventa, but in the end it's the 
singing and the epic length that bring this movie down. When going 
for emotional drama, a song doesn't cut it cinematically, and on the 
larger scope action scenes, a disco rock score is used. It helps to note 
that EVITA producer Robert Stigwood also produced the 1978 
Frampton / Bee Gee abortion SGT. PEPPER'S LONELY HEARTS 
CLUB BAND.
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving The World For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Out of Sight (1998)
        Hollywood has a .750 batting average with Elmore Leonard adaptations.
Last year's TOUCH was ill-conceived and just plain odd but GET SHORTY, 
JACKIE BROWN and now OUT OF SIGHT all were highly entertaining movies.
Steven Soderburgh, master of sex, lies and videotape, now adds crime to
his repertoire in this tale of bank robbery, prison, double-crossing,
uncut diamonds and, oh yeah, true love. 
        George Clooney is the protagonist, a risky choice after such duds as
BATMAN AND ROBIN and THE PEACEMAKER, but for once I didn't want to slap
the taste out of his mouth. He plays his role in OUT OF SIGHT as the suave
Cary Grant-type perfected in Hitchcock movies, the kind of guy to whom
crime is just a profession like any other. Nowhere present is Clooney's
usual ain't-I-sexy sneer -- there's just enough leftover lightheartedness
to fit in with the Leonard style. Clooney is definitely a perfect
successor to John Travolta in GET SHORTY. 
        Clooney plays a man who's robbed about 200 banks without ever
using a gun. In the opening scene, he walks into one bank and robs it not
only with ease but with charm. Of course, he gets caught, so it's not all
good. It's while doing time in a Florida prison that Clooney learns of one
rich inmate's (Albert Brooks in a frightful bald wig) collection of
diamonds in Detroit. Clooney and cohort Ving Rhames plan the score, while
protection artist and fight promoter Don Cheadle begins rival plans. 
        Meanwhile, there's Jennifer Lopez. Unintentionally funny in SELENA
and intentionally funny in ANACONDA, she's finally graduated to a worthy
role as the U.S. marshal who happens to be driving up to the jail on the
night Clooney escapes. Rhames is waiting to give him a ride in a stolen
car, and Lopez makes it a threesome, her hostage ass locked in a trunk
with Clooney. He's covered in dirt and has a gun to her neck, and it's a
little cramped in there, but they manage to make a love connection
anyway, probably because it's a movie. 
        The relationship between Clooney and Lopez is at the heart of the
movie, and one of the details that elevates it beyond your normal noir-ish
crime story. The Leonard movies are more obsessed with dialogue than
crime, and this is no exception. Although they're not really germane to
the plot, Lopez's relationship with her father (Dennis Farina of GET
SHORTY), Rhames' relationship with his Christian sister (you could call
her Sister Christian) and a pop-in cameo by Michael Keaton all lend extra
class to a movie already full of it. 
        OUT OF SIGHT spans at least three years but has a non-linear
structure, focusing on the jailbreak / Brooks score and flashing back to
earlier times. This is a movie with a brain, as smooth and calculated as
the Clooney and Lopez characters themselves. The entire cast does the
material justice -- Clooney and Lopez coming into their own, and Rhames
and Cheadle cementing their positions as two of my favorites. Here's
hoping future Leonard adaptations continue to carry the torch. 
Address responses to c667778@showme.missouri.edu
Visit my homepage at http://students.missouri.edu/~ahicks/movies.html
More than 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair.
Serving America for almost 1/20th of a century!

Title
Review for Sabrina (1995)
        This remake of the 1953 Bogart/Hepburn classic starts off 
with humor and charm but crashes and burns toward the end, when 
too many conflicts and motivations are resolved too quickly, leaving a 
multitude of unanswered questions in the air. Harrison Ford plays rich 
businessman Linus, who is constantly terrorized by his bitchy sister 
Lucy... No, not really, but he does have an irresponsible younger 
brother named David (played by talk show host Greg Kinnear), who is 
currently engaged to equally wealthy Elizabeth (DUMB AND 
DUMBER's Lauren Holly), whose father is planning a billion-dollar 
merger with Linus' company, which manufactures security blankets... 
No, not really.
        Meanwhile, lovely Sabrina (Julia Ormond), daughter of the 
family chauffeur, returns from a few months in Paris looking more 
beautiful than ever. David finds himself mysteriously drawn to 
Sabrina, who has been obsessed with him all her life but never got the 
time of day from him (because he doesn't wear a watch). David lets 
everyone in on his newfound attraction right before a painful glass-in-
the-ass injury. Linus takes advantage of David's incapacitation to 
begin wooing Sabrina himself. Is he diverting her attention for 
personal or business reasons? The movie keeps us guessing on that one 
until the end.
        SABRINA, at two hours and ten minutes, is way too long. 
There's no such thing as an epic comedy, so why are they trying to 
pass this off as one? It's too top-heavy, with unnecessary scenes in the 
first hour involving Sabrina's Paris transformation from mousy to 
lovely and David's attraction to her upon her return. Still, I shouldn't 
complain. These scenes may be superfluous but they're the scenes in 
which the movie works best.
        It's toward the end, with all the rapid-fire plot twists and the 
Linus-Is-A-Prick...-Or-Is-He? scenes, that the movie tries to jerk 
around our emotions. Well, I don't know about you, but my emotions 
refuse to be jerked. I was looking for logic instead, and found none. I 
walked out of the theater asking all sorts of questions about why those 
characters waffled more in the last twenty minutes than President 
Clinton and a family-sized box of Eggo's combined.
        Granted, there are a lot of funny lines in the movie, mostly 
found in that first hour. That's the part where you think you know the 
characters and their motivations, before the movie pulls the rug out 
from under you. Harrison Ford, as always, delivers a good 
performance, as does Ormond, although I can't imagine why on earth 
any man would choose her over the devastatingly beautiful Holly. (I'd 
like to deck my halls with boughs of that... I don't know what that 
means, but it sounds chauvinist enough.)
        The big surprise of the movie is Kinnear, who claims to have 
had no prior acting experience (although pretending to tolerate 
Richard Simmons when he comes on your show is Emmy-quality as 
far as I'm concerned). I've had my eye on this guy since his hilarious 
between-clip commentary on E.'s "Talk Soup" show. He left that show, 
sadly--as his replacement is a cross between Jim Carrey and every 
pathetic small-town news anchor to ever live--and got a late-late night 
talk show on NBC which, also sadly, showcases no real talent on his 
part. It's in SABRINA where he truly shines for the first time, showing 
a great talent for both comedic and dramatic acting, even if he is 
unconscious for half the movie. Mark my words, that Kinnear kid has 
a future in Hollywood!
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
and check out the 40+ new reviews since Christmas.

Title
Review for Down Periscope (1996)
        Even the best comic actor is at the mercy of his or her 
material, as this subpar submarine comedy proves. DOWN 
PERISCOPE stars Kelsey "Frasier" Grammer as an inept Navy 
captain who is given command of his own ship as part of a corrupt 
officer's (James Coburn) plan to get him out of the Navy. Like any 
lame emsemble comedy, the officer assigns him to a group of misfits 
like the guy who wants to be kicked out, the fat guy who eats all the 
time, the beautiful woman who doesn't belong there (Lauren Holly), 
the second-in-command who does everything by the book (Rob 
Schneider), the crazy old guy who freaks everyone out (Harry Dean 
Stanton) and so on.
        Then comes the transparent plotline. First Grammer has to 
fix up the delapidated Korean War ship the Navy has given him, 
and that comes courtesy a sad sight gag montage that includes a 
guy with a mop knocking Schneider overboard. After the ship is 
fixed up come the early drills, where everyone seems completely 
inept, like the electrician who can't connect wires so instead lets 
the current run through himself every time Grammer gets on the 
phone.
        Finally, and this covers the final hour of the movie, 
Grammer has to lead his men (and Holly) to overcome the other 
ships in a wargames exercise. And he has to be a clever rebel to 
do it, in scenes that stretch all levels of believability. First they're 
singing "Louie Louie" like a bunch of drunk sailors to throw the 
radar of the other ship off, then thirty minutes later, they're making 
whale mating noises to throw the radar of the other ship off. The 
whole while, Evil Captain Coburn is overacting underwater, 
cursing Grammer (as most people watching the movie probably 
are too).
        It's all predictable without any original humor to redeem 
it. The jokes are right out of "McHale's Navy" and other cut-rate 
sitcoms of the past. There's one scene where Schneider looks 
through the ship's pantry in disgust, holds one food can up and 
announces, "This expired in 1966!" I yelled back at the screen, 
"So did these jokes." I watched this movie with the whole family 
and everyone hated it. My mom was so bored she brought out 
the coupon book midway through and, around the start of the 
second hour, I started writing my will.
        The blame can't really be placed on the stars, though. 
Kelsey Grammer is good in this, he just doesn't have anything 
to work with. His character is said to have gotten so drunk one 
night that he had "Welcome Aboard" tatooed on his penis. Grammer 
probably did something even worse -- got really drunk and agreed to 
appear in a movie he knew nothing about. Same for Holley (save the 
penis part), who is likeable in DOWN PERISCOPE just because 
she's so gorgeous. As for Schneider (whose character is downright 
annoying), there was nowhere to go but up after SURF NINJAS, 
although he's still in the depths of the comedy ocean after jumping 
the "SNL" ship.
        My theory is that DOWN PERISCOPE is one of those 
movies that got the green light before the script was even written 
as a formula comedy ("Okay, it's POLICE ACADEMY in the Navy 
with Frasier at the helm and the chick from DUMB AND 
DUMBER.") and after everyone was signed on turned into a 
disaster. Judging from the video box, most other movie critics 
agree with me. The only quote the DOWN PERISCOPE copy writers 
could dig up came from the Prevue channel's Jim Ferguson. I guess 
even Jeff Craig from "60 Second Preview" (who said TANK GIRL 
"kicks butt!" without ever seeing it) didn't like this.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Twister (1996)
        There's one predominant theme I've picked up on in the 
multiple other TWISTER reviews I've already read in magazines, 
newspapers and even this newsgroup -- that, although it has 
some of the most incredible special effects ever recorded on film, 
the melodramatic scenes that tie those sequences together are 
laughable and unoriginal. And, after seeing it for myself, I have 
to agree, which makes me unoriginal while hopefully still 
laughable.
        Bill Paxton plays a former storm chaser who now wants to 
start over with a new wife, new career, even a new car. But when he 
brings the final divorce papers over to his wife, Jo (Helen Hunt), the 
signing is interrupted by the sighting of a tornado. So Jo and her 
colleagues pack up and drive after the storm and Bill has to follow 
along because, hey, Jo still has the divorce papers. Chasing the one 
tornado, and eventually being trapped right under it, is enough to get 
Bill back into the game, leaving his fiancee, Melissa, to ride in the van 
with a slob named Dusty while he and Jo go chasing afto deploy Dorothy, an
invention of Bill's that looks like one of those Regina Steamer Carpet 
Cleaners with a bunch of metallic bingo balls inside. The bingo balls 
are actually sensors which, when scattered around the inside of a 
tornado, will send back measurements of wind velocity, speed... and 
who the hell cares? It's just a plot device to get Bill and Jo underneath 
five separate tornadoes over a period of twenty-four hours. Most of us 
go through life without ever being witness to one tornado, but I don't 
mind idiots like these lowering the odds by taking five blows in the 
same day, and I'm not talking about [insert any oversexed stud's name 
here].
        So Bill, Jo and their entourage track down tornadoes all over 
Oklahoma in an attempt to get close enough to dump Dorothy in the 
tornado's path, which obviously won't happen until the very end. The 
whole while, evil scientist Jonas (Cary Elwes) has stolen Bill's idea by 
creating the DOT3, which does much the same thing except with 
cubed sensors instead of the more conventional round ones. How do 
we know he and his boys are evil? They drive black vans... and they 
have corporate sponsorship. "Jonas loves money, not science," Bill 
sneers, as if other people don't look down on rednecks who get off 
chasing tornadoes.
        The Jonas situation is supposed to bring some level of 
man-vs.-man conflict into the movie to offset the man-vs.-nature 
conflict, but it's sure resolved fast, and in a definite man-vs.-nature 
way. Then there's the constant annoyance of Bill and Jo, who fight 
for the required amount of time until the tornadoes come along to 
relieve them of their plot obligations, and then make out at the right 
time to conveniently tie up the plot obligations. All the subplots in 
the movie are lame and ridiculous, but we don't care. It's like the 
FRIDAY THE 13TH movies ( http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/friday.htm ) 
we sit through all the mindless crap to get to the good stuff.
        Luckily, the good stuff is indeed good. The filmmakers 
knew that humans are fascinated by natural disasters, and that 
enough special effects sequences showing those natural disasters 
could carry the movie, so that was the rule they followed. All the 
effort went into the tornado scenes, which is painfully obvious but 
easily overlooked and forgotten every time we do get to the good 
stuff. TWISTER is no JURASSIC PARK but it does offer genuine 
scares aing effects sequences. Unlike JURASSIC PARK, 
though, there is nothing entertaining outside of the intense action 
scenes.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Great White Hype, The (1996)
        The word "hype" sums this one up pretty well, I'd say. The 
ad campaign for THE GREAT WHITE HYPE touts it as a downright 
hilarious satire on the world of boxing, but then you wouldn't expect 
the studioheads to come out and say their movie is just another 
mediocre comedy we'll all forget about in a few years. Boxing is 
probably the only sport so far that hasn't spawned some kind of 
comedic farce (although I can't recall any wacky shotput movies off 
the top of my head), but THE GREAT WHITE HYPE doesn't rank as 
one of the better sports comedies of our time even if it is better than 
MAJOR LEAGUE 2.
        It's obvious exactly which media-covered heavyweight 
and his flamboyant promoter are being made fun of here. Damon 
Wayans is James "Grim Reaper" Roper, the contending champ, with 
Samuel L. Jackson playing his weird-hairdoed promoter, Reverend 
Fred Sultan. It's obviously a Mike Tyson / Don King parody from 
the very beginning, when Roper is interviewed after a fight and lisps 
out the same incoherent nonsense we've seen Tyson do a hundrlife, though,
or Roper would 
have been named "Raper."
        The premise of this movie is that fights make the most 
money when a white challenger is brought in to fight the black guy, 
because even though white guys never have a chance of winning, 
the racial implications of each race backing their contenders ("Go 
out there and win one for the white race!") bring more pay-per-view 
millions than just two black guys beating each others' brains out. 
Hell, I can look out the window in my neighborhood and see the 
same thing most nights of the week.
        Sultan personally goes out to pick the white challenger -- 
Terry Conklin (Peter Berg), the only fighter to ever knock Roper 
out, albeit in an amateur competition. Conklin has since gone on 
to the grunge band club lifestyle, but is lured back into the ring 
by a $10 million promise from Sultan, which Conklin tells the 
media he will use to eliminate the homeless problem. Sultan also 
heads the media blitz hyping "Irish" Terry Conklin ("I'm not Irish," 
Conklin protests, to Sultan's reply that, "In the world of boxing, 
'Irish' means white.") and bribes the head of the boxing commission 
with "money, sex and drugs" (Cheech Marin, who you'd think 
would have enough drugs already) to rank Conklin as a 
professional contender.
        Sultan also has to duck a fighter who is actually interested 
in a serious fight for the heavyweight title (enough so that he pulls a 
gun on the Sultan at one point) and bribe an investigative journalist 
(Jeff Goldblum) who's trying to expose his corruption. Meanwhile, 
we see scenes of Conklin actually training for the fight while a 
lazy Roper gains twenty pounds eating junk food, secure in the 
knowledge that -- in the great scheme of things -- no "Irish" fighter 
has a chance against a black one. And there are no plot twists in the 
ending to dispel that law.
        The ending of THE GREAT WHITE HYPE is thoroughly 
disappointing, and I'm not saying that out of a deep-seated racial 
prejudice. The climax is just so abrupt and noneventful that there's 
no payoff whatsoever. It would be nice if the movie was actually 
building up to something or had some kind of clever, unexpected 
turns up its glove. There are a few laughs scattered throughout 
the film and the cast, (Jackson in particular) gives enjoyable 
comedic performances, but ultimately, the movie is weak, 
lightweight entertainment.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
htp://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Another Woman (1988)
        In the Woody Allen canon, there's a trilogy of straight drama 
films Woody doesn't appear in -- INTERIORS, SEPTEMBER and 
ANOTHER WOMAN. This is the only success of the three, an 
unpleasant, uncompromising movie that exposes a seemingly 
successful woman's life as a complete sham. It was during the '80s 
that Woody appeared to be questioning the value of life and the 
nature of happiness, and ANOTHER WOMAN is the culmination of 
those explorations of angst in rich white folks.
        The female Woody doppelganger this time is played by Gena 
Rowlands, a no-nonsense woman who just turned 50 and seems to 
have everything in life. She's the head of a university philosophy 
department, is married to a successful man (Ian Holm), has a friendly 
relationship with her teenage step-daughter (ex-GOONIE Martha 
Plimpton) and has a collection of well-to-do friends. Everything is 
nice and stable until she moves into a cross-town apartment to write 
her new book in complete isolation.
        There's a vent in the wall that allows her to hear every word 
that's said in the next apartment, which turns out to be the office of a 
psychiatrist. Rowlands covers the vent up at first but can't resist the 
beautiful opportunity for aural voyeurism, and listens in on Mia 
Farrow's session everyday. Mia is neurotic and suicidal and opens up 
new thoughts in Rowlands' mind. Over a progression of 
contemporary scenes and flashbacks, we find out Rowlands has been 
deceiving herself about all the relationships in her life.
        We see how Rowlands has imposed her own immense 
standards on her brother, Plimpton and her old best friend. We see 
her father (John Houseman), who's had a full life but now has 
nothing but regret. We see the relationship she passed up with the 
one man (Gene Hackman, in a smaller role than you'd expect with his 
star power) who really did passionately love her. We see that she and 
Holm don't have a close relationship and that she regards all of her 
supposed friends with contempt. She's a bitter, bitter woman.
        As you can tell, ANOTHER WOMAN isn't the feel-good 
movie of the summer. It's the kind of intense drama that sometimes 
turns even the staunchest Woody Allen fans against him. Here, 
though, it's also filled with the kind of believability and emotion that 
makes it more relevant than INTERIORS and SEPTEMBER, which 
mostly seemed like a bunch of people whining about nothing. You 
won't laugh during ANOTHER WOMAN, but you will think, you will 
feel and, at least once, you will probably identify.
        But will you be able to get your hands on a copy of this 
movie? It took me more than a year of casual searching in video 
stores to track down a copy of ANOTHER WOMAN. It is the most 
obscure Woody movie out there right now, more so than even 
WHAT'S UP, TIGER LILY? Now that I've finally rented one of the 
few copies, I can honestly say this movie is worth searching for, 
especially for anyone who's seen the "funny" Woody Allen movies 
and wonders what he's capable of in the way of drama.
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving The World For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Nutty Professor, The (1996)
        It's all been downhill for Eddie Murphy these past eight 
or nine years career-wise, and he's still trying to make a crowd-
pleasing blockbuster to relaunch his 80's stardom. If the crowd I 
was with is any indication, Murphy has succeeded. God only knows 
if the rest of the country's audiences will feel the same way, but the 
packed mall crowd I saw THE NUTTY PROFESSOR with laughed 
so hard at the surface-level gags that I missed half the dialogue.
        What do you say about a movie like this, where fart 
jokes abound and the word "ass" is used every couple minutes 
for laughter? That it's the kind of movie most of us could write in 
our sleep if given the premise, a lightweight and predictable comedy 
that the brainless masses laugh out loud at over and over. I'd almost 
have to lump myself in with the "brainless masses" demographic 
because I succumbed to a lot of the cheap laughs in THE NUTTY 
PROFESSOR, although not loud or long enough to drown out any 
dialogue.
        Murphy plays Sherman Klump, a four-hundred pound 
college professor who has stumbled onto a formula that will change 
his molecular structure and turn him into a slim love god. So after 
the customary fat person sight gags (Murphy's stomach erasing 
the chalkboard as he writes, Murphy trying to sit in a chair, etc.) 
and the introduction of the love interest, a beautiful grad student 
(Jada Pinkett, looking ten times better here than in A LOW DOWN 
DIRTY SHAME), Murphy drinks his potion and reaps the immediate 
benefits ("I can see my dick!").
        I'm sure you've heard the expression that inside every 
fat person there's a skinny person waiting to get out. THE NUTTY 
PROFESSOR assumes that skinny person is a completely different 
alter-ego from the person's usual personality. At his correct body 
weight, Murphy becomes Buddy Love, a brash, over-confident 
loudmouth with sex on his mind. High testosterone levels are an 
apparent side effect of taking the potion, causing Murphy to act 
on his feelings for Pinkett.
        This being a cut-rate sitcom, of course, he doesn't tell 
her that Love and Klump are one and the same, he pulls the old 
Clark Kent-Superman thing, having her know both personalities 
and having them talk about each other but never interact. And 
Pinkett doesn't have a clue as to what is going on because Murphy's 
voice is completely different as Love than Klump. His Love voice is 
much higher-pitched than Klump, making me wonder if we're 
supposed to think his voice lost weight too. Either way, the voice 
mystery is never explained, but you're probably not supposed to 
stop and think about any of this.
        As another sitcom gimmick, Murphy's potion wears off 
after a certain amount of time, and always in the exact wrong place 
at the wrong time. That way people can stare as his lip suddenly 
swells to several times its size or his foot becomes twice as big 
because, besides being Murphy's comeback vehicle, THE NUTTY 
PROFESSOR also showcases some admirable special effects from 
Tom Baker, the man who turned Michael Jackson into a freak in 
the Thriller video (which took a lot of effort, believe me). But while 
Murphy was sitting in that makeup chair for five hours everyday, 
someone else should have been working on creating a decent, 
cliche-free script.
        The movie continues with Pinkett trying to choose 
between Klump and Love, along with Klump having to pitch his 
idea to millionaire donor James Coburn (also in ERASER). We 
also get a couple of extended flatulence scenes with the Klump 
family, where Murphy plays five different overweight roles, and 
some TV inspiration from a Richard Simmons exercise clone 
(Murphy again).
        The ending is as absurd and unbelievable as the rest 
and contradicts the movie's entire premise (that fat people would 
do anything to achieve an effortless weight loss), but if you can 
overlook all of that and just let yourself enjoy the decent amount 
of genuine laughs mixed in with the cheap ones, you might have 
a positive (but probably not nutty) experience with THE NUTTY 
PROFESSOR.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Mr. Holland's Opus (1995)
        It almost seems like the title of a porno movie, doesn't it? 
But the friend I saw it with, who knows infinitely more about music 
than I do, assures me an opus has something to do with symphonies. 
He started to explain it, but after having just sat through a 145-minute 
epic melodrama, my attention span was too far gone to listen. MR. 
HOLLAND'S OPUS covers thirty years in the life of a high school 
music teacher and, believe me, you feel like you've aged along with 
him.
        Richard Dreyfuss plays Glenn Holland, a composer working 
on a symphony that he believes will earn him riches and fame. He 
spends thirty years on this symphony, which lasts only two and a 
half minutes when played at the end of the movie. The same musician 
friend I saw the movie with assures me that symphony would never 
make anyone rich or famous. "It sounds like something Yanni would 
play live at the Acropolis," he remarked. Even I didn't believe anyone 
would spend a third of a century working on something I'd swear I 
heard the last time I was in an elevator.
        Holland is sick of the wedding/bar mitzvah life of a man in 
a traveling band, and decides to take a job teaching, just for a few 
years, to have more time to spend with his wife (Glenn Headly) and 
his symphony (Elle Vator-Muzik). Principal Olympia Dukakis 
assures him it won't just be a job "to fall back on" and gym coach Jay 
Thomas scoffs at the notion of a teaching job giving anyone free time. 
Mr. Holland hates the job at first, but soon discovers that interactive 
Hollywood teaching style we've all seen. You know, where the 
actor/actress makes teaching fun and the whole class goes crazy 
about learning. Never mind that this has never once happened in real 
life, where school is a boring necessity that motivates few, including 
the smart kids. But nothing in MR. HOLLAND'S OPUS has any 
bearing on reality.
        This is a movie where you know every single character 
they introduce will fall victim to some melodramatic tragedy, whether 
it's the football player who has to join the band to keep his grade 
point up but has no rhythm (a black guy with no rhythm -- told you 
the movie wasn't believable) who is later killed in Vietnam, or the 
girl who took up clarinet playing because everyone else in her family 
was good at something and she felt like an utter failure, or the young 
singer who wants to follow her Broadway dreams but is held back 
by her father. Speaking of the believability factor, we're supposed to 
believe this girl wants Mr. Holland to run away to New York with 
her for a life of free-swinging sexual euphoria. What is it about 
Dreyfuss that attracts the teenage girls, the liver spots or the 
bifocal glasses?
        The biggest dramatic obstacle for Dreyfuss to overcome 
is his own son, who is born deaf, the ultimate irony for a father who 
wants his son to live and breathe music. But the most emotional the 
movie gets on this issue is having Dreyfuss sing John Lennon's 
"Beautiful Boy" (not one of his hundred best, let me tell you that) 
to him at a recital. It's more awkward and laughable than touching, 
and is just one of the many gratuitous musical numbers in the film 
that add to the eternally-long running time.
        MR. HOLLAND'S OPUS spends most of its time in two 
years -- 1965 and 1980, the first year showing Dreyfuss' first teaching 
days and the second year introducing the struggles with their son 
and the temptations offered by the young singer. Then we finally 
flash-foward to 1995 and the ending of the film, which is more than 
suiting for a movie that's been absurdly far-fetched and handled the 
dramatic issues in ineffective ways.
        Every student he's ever taught shows up for a surprise 
ceremony in the gym, where his symphony is finally played. So we 
get a bunch of testimonies about how his teaching style changed 
their lives (the clarinet girl, it turns out, is now the state governor), 
though for some reason the fate of the singer is never mentioned. 
This ending seemed ridiculous to me because I don't think there's 
ever been a teacher who's altered my goals or beliefs in any way. 
There have been plenty I've liked and now miss a little, but nothing 
life changing, especially from a music teacher. My old Sex Ed. 
teacher, on the other hand...
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Lost in America (1985)
        LOST IN AMERICA is commonly considered to be Albert 
Brooks' crowning triumph, but I place it third, behind DEFENDING 
YOUR LIFE and MOTHER. I've seen it twice and still don't consider 
it the four-star masterpiece Roger Ebert made it out to be. What it 
does have is the trademark Brooks meld of intellectual humor, 
cultural satire and mid-life angst. I have a feeling that, if this guy 
ever does figure out how to be happy in life, we'll be out some good 
movies.
        Brooks plays a lower-upper class yuppie who seems to have 
it all. He's got a successful job in advertising and is in line for a 
promotion, he's about to move into a million-dollar house, has put a 
down payment on a Mercedes and he's married to Julie Hagerty, the 
AIRPLANE! chick, and she's successful in her career. So, of course, 
neither of them are happy. Their lives are boring, predictable, 
mundane. They never found themselves as young adults.
        These doubts about their role in corporate America come to 
the surface when Brooks is passed over for the promotion he was 
counting on. The company is transferring Brooks instead, and he 
blows up at the boss in one of the movie's best scenes. He gets fired 
and finally adopts a screw-it attitude toward responsibility. His line 
of thought is forget the new house, forget the new car and forget 
work. He and Hagerty have a nest egg of a couple hundred thousand 
saved up, and decide to invest in a Winnebago.
        It's time to throw away convention and live from day to 
day, meandering across the country going wherever their hearts take 
them, "like in EASY RIDER." In a comedy, of course, things never 
turn out like they're supposed to, so the journey soon becomes a 
disaster when they stay at a Las Vegas hotel to renew their vows and 
Hagerty gambles away the nest egg while Brooks sleeps.
        LOST IN AMERICA, with its EASY RIDER Winnebago 
premise, would appear to be a wacky travelogue movie. But no, it's 
not ALBERT BROOKS' VACATION. After the loss of the nest egg, 
things get sidetracked pretty quick. It's refreshing to see a movie 
where the protagonists don't get their money back at the end and 
don't get what they want. If there's any complaint about LOST IN AMERICA, it's that Brooks allows us too little satisfaction. In 
MOTHER and DEFENDING YOUR LIFE, Brooks compromises his 
acid wit to please the audience, but not here. The happy ending just 
kind of got lost... yes, in America.
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving The World For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Con Air (1997)
        The titles change, but the rest is the same. Summer action 
movies have become a staple of modern cinema, and CON-AIR does 
little to distinguish itself from the rest. It's got a lot of low-brow 
entertainment in the form of violence, explosions and bad one-
liners. It makes the good and bad characters appealing with big-
name veterans of the genre, like Nicolas Cage (THE ROCK) and 
John Malkovich (IN THE LINE OF FIRE).
        Both of those movies were far classier in their presentation 
of the action essentials. IN THE LINE OF FIRE actually had a little 
in the way of character development and characters we cared about 
and THE ROCK featured high school level writing, with some good 
moments that reminded us the characters themselves knew they 
were stuck in an unbelievable action movie. CON-AIR is written on 
the junior high level, and these characters go through the routine in 
predictable fashion. The three most popular settings for action flicks 
are cruise ships, the middle of nowhere and airplanes. Since the 
current releases SPEED 2 and BREAKDOWN have taken the first 
two settings, CON-AIR appropriates the airplane motif, as you no 
doubt guessed from the title. Call it PASSENGER 58.
        First comes the obligatory prologue. Some action movies 
skip this and go straight into the action, but CON-AIRwants us to 
take it somewhat seriously, so we see returning soldier Cage meet up 
with his barmaid wife for a romantic slow dance. A bunch of drunks 
have their eyes on her and end up attacking Cage in the parking lot 
(yes, it's raining cats and dogs at the time). He accidentally kills one 
and is sent off to jail for a 10-year sentence.
        Flash forward about 8 years. Cage is being paroled and his 
cellmate, played by Mykelti Williamson (Bubba from FORREST 
GUMP), is coming with him. Yeah, they're going on the giant 
convict airplane that's being used to transport some of the worst 
criminals in the country. The Clintons always fly first class on it. 
So it's a planeful of crazies and Cage, with long messianic hair and 
a week's worth of George Michael stubble.
        Security is top-notch on con-air, as always, but three or four 
of the prisoners manage to take over the plane in less than five 
minutes, an amazing ode to the American attention span. Malkovich 
is the ringleader and his right-hand-man is Ving "Marsellus" 
Rhames, a black power type with his own hidden agenda. That angle 
is never developed, though, because that would be plot, and we can't 
handle plot in a movie like this. We just have to remember who's 
bad and who's good.
        Besides Cage, there aren't too many on the right side of the 
law. There's a chained guard (Rachel Ticotin) who spends most of 
her time being eyed by a big rapist, and a U.S. Marshall (John 
Cusack) who manages to figure everything out at the exact right 
time to further the action. Cusack himself becomes an action hero 
toward the end, more proof that even the most serious actors can be 
lured into the world of dumb action movies. Hell, Cage won an 
Oscar last year, Malkovich was nominated for one and here they 
both are trading comic book one-liners and shooting at each other. 
We even have indie film great Steve Buscemi as a child molester 
who spends most of his time commenting on the action instead of 
participating in it.
        CON-AIRcould have been better, if the dialogue was worthy 
of the actors who spoke it and perhaps the writers hadn't tried so 
hard to throw in every action cliche in the book. It also has a 
disturbing side to it, with all the talk from the rapists and child 
molesters, that keeps it from being completely fun to watch. 
Otherwise, it's all the usual auto-pilot stuff, even an obligatory Las 
Vegas chase climax aboard a fire truck. It's James Bond without the 
class.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Se7en (1995)
        I used to avoid Brad Pitt movies like the plague, like famine, 
like a Bob Dole presidency... but after watching INTERVIEW WITH 
THE VAMPIRE and 12 MONKEYS, I realized the guy actually can act. 
Imagine my surprise that his success isn't solely based on being a 
greasy-haired pretty boy. Part of that is also because, with the 
exception of the dreadful horror flick STUDENT BODIES, he manages 
to somehow pick compelling and original movies to star in, something 
you can't always say about the other what-a-cute-butt stars like Mel 
Gibson (BIRD ON A WIRE) and Tom Cruise (DAYS OF THUNDER).
        SEVEN is a stylish thriller you should be able to follow even 
if you haven't seen ONE through SIX. There's a serial killer on the 
loose committing brutal murders for each one of the seven deadly sins 
(kind of like that "Batman" story I wrote four years ago in which the 
Joker commits crimes based on holidays... I wonder if there's a 
possibility for a lawsuit.) and detectives Pitt and Morgan Freeman 
have to discover the freak's identity and stop him.
        Here comes the formula we've seen a hundred times before. 
Rookie cop Pitt has to earn the respect of about-to-retire cop Freeman, 
who keeps going on and on about how he's only got a week left until 
retirement. Uh-huh. We know what his final decision will be because 
no movie cop has ever been able to bring himself to leave the force. 
We're left to believe that, in the movie realm, police officers die and 
decompose at the station.
        There's also a plotline with Pitt's wife coming to Freeman for 
advice on how to cope with the coming lifetime of stress and heartache 
in a miserable, crime-ridden city for them and their unborn children. 
This is a movie with an incredibly grim view of humanity, potentially 
depressing for people who don't like to hear about naked, obese men 
being force-fed to death (because I know that hits a little too close to 
home for me). The murders in the movie are definitely creative to the 
point of disgust, I'll give them that. It's hard to work people up about 
sins like sloth and gluttony, but SEVEN manages to make it 
interesting.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Doctor Dolittle (1998)
        This is the second in a no-doubt long series of Eddie Murphy
remakes that remove the essence of the original in favor of fart and poop
jokes. Over the course of DR. DOLITTLE, you'll see Murphy give
mouth-to-mouth resuscitation to a rat, a thermometer get lost up a dog's
butt and two pigeons take a crap in Oliver Platt's mouth. If the thought
of any of this appeals to you, I'm sure there's an opening for an
overnight janitor to clean toilets at the local bus depot. 
        Murphy plays a good-natured physician who doesn't like animals. We
learn why in the movie's prologue, when little Eddie has a conversation
with the family dog (voice of Ellen DeGeneres), who tells him sniffing
butts is just another way of shaking hands. (If that's true, I'm glad I
never witnessed the first meeting of DeGeneres and Anne Heche.) Upon
seeing a demonstration of this, Eddie's dad (Ossie Davis) brings in an
exorcist to remove the foul spirit of animal communication from his young
son, or something like that. 
        Flashforward about thirty years. Murphy has his practice, a gorgeous
wife (GIRL 6's Kristen Wilson) and two daughters (one of which is Raven
Symone from "The Cosby Show"). At work, there's talk of selling out to an
HMO, and colleague Platt is all over the idea. One look and it's obvious
Platt will be the greedy bastard figure in DR. DOLITTLE. Considering how
pissed off people are at HMOs, the filmmakers probably expected audiences
to erupt in applause at the climactic mouth-crap scene, but not me.
        The fun starts one day as Murphy hits a dog (which is a lot of fun
in itself) and the dog calls him a bonehead in Norm Macdonald's voice.
Then the pet hamster starts talking to him with Chris Rock's voice and all
hell breaks loose. Murphy is one with the animals and the animals are
stand-up comics, so break out the comedy set-pieces. Things like the
thermometer scene, Murphy pulling a stick out of an owl's wing and playing
therapist to two dysfunctional pigeons, one voiced by Julie Kavner. 
        No one reacts all that well to Murphy's rapport with the animals. He
ends up in a mental hospital after trying to help a suicidal tiger (Albert
Brooks) who eventually supplies the movie's climax. It happens to be just
as childish and unbelievable as the rest of the movie. Don't get me wrong;
there are some funny moments in DR. DOLITTLE. The fact that the Macdonald
dog is onscreen for at least half of the movie is a definite plus. Since
Murphy is basically a straight man here, Macdonald and Brooks provide most
of the laughs, although both are in better movies right now (DIRTY WORK
and OUT OF SIGHT, respectively). 
        If you're trying to decide whether to see DR. DOLITTLE, let me put
it this way -- it's a step down from THE NUTTY PROFESSOR. 
Address responses to c667778@showme.missouri.edu
Visit my homepage at http://students.missouri.edu/~ahicks/movies.html
More than 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair.
Serving America for almost 1/20th of a century!

Title
Review for Poseidon Adventure, The (1972)
        The crown jewel of 1970's Irwin Allen disaster movies, 
THE POSEIDON ADVENTURE features an all-star cast including 
Gene Hackman and Ernest Borgnine spouting some of the most 
laughable dramatic dialogue in movie history while trapped on a 
cruise ship. The story begins on the U.S.S. Poseidon's big New 
Year's cruise, where we are introduced to the ensemble of people 
who will soon be the only passengers left alive.
        Let's see, there's the New Age preacher (Hackman) who 
advises people to "pray to that part of God within yourself." 
There's the ex-cop (Borgnine) who busted a hooker (Stella Stevens) 
six times -- then married her. There's the hippie singer ("There's got 
to be a morning after...") who turns to the company of a lonely man 
(Red Buttons) once her brother is killed. And to round out the 
group: the elderly couple (Jack Albertson and Shelley Winters) 
who live aboard the ship, the beautiful teenage girl and her brother 
who are sailing alone and adventurous Scotsman Roddy 
McDowall.
        We get to know these people a little too well in the first 
thirty minutes of THE POSEIDON ADVENTURE, before straight-
faced ship captain Leslie Nielson looks in horror at the giant tidal 
wave headed right for the ship. Everyone's in the giant ballroom at 
the time, shortly past midnight of the new year, when the ship 
turns first on its side, then completely upside down. The second-
in-command wants everyone to wait in the ballroom until help 
arrives, but rebel Hackman leads his small band of followers on 
a quest to the top of the ship.
        In this case, because the ship is overturned, the top is the 
bottom. Or is the bottom the top? Either way, we get to see a lot of 
bottoms because the two beautiful women in the crew are both 
conveniently wearing hot pants during the scenes where the camera 
shoots upwards while they climb up ladders and -- in the ballroom 
scene -- Christmas trees. Thus begins an hour or more of hushed 
trips down long corridors, through burning rooms, etc. while the 
ship slowly fills with water behind them.
        It's a race against the clock which is only mildly 
interesting. THE POSEIDON ADVENTURE works more as a Bad 
Movie To Laugh At, with all the melodrama that comes in-between 
the non-thrilling action scenes. The one note in Borgnine's one-note 
performance is to be a cranky old man that argues with Hackman 
every step of the way while Buttons and the hippie fall in love 
(although since there isn't a sex scene, we never find out if his 
buttons really are Red) and Albertson and Winters wonder if 
they'll live to see their grandson's birth.
        Shelley Winters provides the most hilarious scene in the 
movie in a scene toward the end, where water has flooded the next 
two rooms of the ship and Hackman is preparing to dive under with 
a rope for the rest of them to pull along. Winters, who has been the 
whiny fat woman throughout the movie (Stevens even not-so-
affectionately calls her "fatass" in one scene), finally finds her 
purpose. "I was the underwater swimming champ of New York 
three years running when I was seventeen," she brags, and before 
Hackman can even ask her how she could be seventeen for three 
years, she's swimming through the water, her skirt billowing up 
around her hips, showing off her cellulite (or do you call it 
Shellulite?) ridden thighs. It's not so much funny as innately 
disgusting, which pretty much sums up THE POSEIDON 
ADVENTURE as a whole.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Crimes and Misdemeanors (1989)
        In the vein of his earlier HANNAH AND HER SISTERS, 
Woody Allen's CRIMES AND MISDEMEANORS covers the familiar 
territories of adultery and integrity and the spectrum of compromise 
between the two. The film centers around a doctor (Martin Landau) 
who has been carrying on an affair with Anjelica Huston (and won't 
Gomez be pissed?) but now wants to break it off. She's suddenly 
been acting obsessive, threatening to blackmail him with not only 
the news of his unfaithfulness but also the knowledge of Landau's 
embezzlement.
        A guy like this would never consider something so serious 
as murder, but when his Mafioso brother Jack (Jerry Orbach) tells 
Landau he could have her bumped off with one phone call -- one 
very lethal phone call. The only voice of reason is a rabbi patient 
of his (Sam Waterston), but would you listen to a man with curly 
sideburns? Neither would he, and soon Huston has made her last 
threat... and yes, Gomez is pissed.
        On a lighter note, Woody plays a documentary director 
(probably the only media occupation he hasn't portrayed yet... 
Coming soon: Woody the Gaffer!) who is so hard up for work 
that he agrees to do a biopic of producer-of-TV-trash Alan Alda 
(translation: Aaron Spelling), a man Woody completely abhors. 
In a movie where everyone is guilty of some crime or misdemeanor, 
Woody's character's transgression is a more symbolic murder of 
his artistic integrity.
        On location for the documetary, Woody meets one of his 
co-producers, omnipresent Allen movie favorite Mia Farrow, and 
falls in love with her. But he's in competition with Alda, who's 
committing a crime or misdemeanor of the heart by trying to add a 
Farrow notch to his bedpost through deception and seduction. 
Never mind that Alda has been using and losing twentyish women 
through the entire movie and is now after menopausal Farrow, she 
falls for him even though a woman with her character and strength 
should obviously be with Woody.
        All these characters are tied together through some sort 
of blood or marriage lines and by the end Landau is getting advice 
from Woody, which is about the point I'd say bite the bullet and 
pay a therapist two hundred bucks an hour. In CRIMES AND 
MISDEMEANORS, Allen explores meaningful life questions about 
how some people can get away with murder and virtue isn't always 
rewarded. He also shows how guilt can trip up an otherwise perfect 
crime all the while adding in his usual perfectly hilarious one-liners. 
One more great film from Woody Hitchcock.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Truman Show, The (1998)
        I don't know how many other people have had the idea cross 
their mind that their life could be an ongoing television show watched 
by another world of people, but it's something I used to wonder about 
when I was younger. I can't decide if I first thought it because I 
watched a lot of TV or because my brother hit me in the head with a 
baseball bat, but I'm pretty sure Andrew Niccol, screenwriter for THE 
TRUMAN SHOW, has had the same curious thought.
        THE TRUMAN SHOW is about a man (Jim Carrey) whose 
entire life has been engineered by a corporation and marketed to the 
public. Since birth, he's been living in the fictional island town of 
Seahaven, Fla., which actually exists as a giant domed set just beyond 
the Hollywood sign. All the people in Truman Burbank's life are 
actors, and the anonymous townfolk paid extras. People watch 
Truman's life 24 hours a day, live, with no commercial interruptions. 
Revenue comes instead from product placement, a staple of 
contemporary Hollywood, with Truman's friends and relatives 
describing their consumer items in cheerful and optimistic tones. 
The sun rises and sets on cue and everyone likes everyone else.
        Even if you haven't seen THE TRUMAN SHOW, you've probably 
learned most of the crucial details from the commercials, the trailer 
and other promotion blitzes. If anything I've written so far is a surprise 
to you, then I pity you for making me a primary source for your 
entertainment news. Either way, you should probably know the 
premise of THE TRUMAN SHOW going into it, because otherwise you'll 
probably think it sucks. It begins with Jim Carrey looking into a 
mirror, reciting the crucial "eat me" scene from ALIVE, wishing his 
neighbors a good day, afternoon and evening, and living in domestic 
bliss with his wife (Laura Linney).
        But weird things start happening. A stage light comes falling 
out of the sky, Truman hears people tracking his movements on the 
radio and he swears he sees his dead father. We learn through a 
flashback that his father drowned when Truman was a child, sailing 
through a rainstorm. The death was staged by director Christof (Ed 
Harris), who wanted to put a fear of water into Truman to keep him 
from leaving the island.
        Similar cruel manipulations keep him from stumbling upon 
the truth, not the least of them Truman's best friend Marlon (Noah 
Emmerich), who assures him he's not in on any conspiracy because the 
last thing he'd ever do is hurt him. As Truman's trusting eyes tear 
over, Christof fades up emotional synthesizer music for a worldwide 
audience of people who apparently never watch anything else. There's 
even a daily behind-the-scenes update from Harry Shearer that 
captures the highlights of Truman's existence.
        The key to a movie like this is in finding the right balance 
between humor and drama, because a premise like this has its obvious 
implications in both directions. And it all hinges on Carrey, who has 
to balance comic naivet with a real sense of longing and drive to find 
out what the hell is going on. He's come a long way from talking butt 
cheeks in ACE VENTURA. Most fundamentally, it's just plain interesting 
to follow along as director Peter Weir shows us just how they can 
capture a person's life without the person realizing it -- how they 
coordinate extras, hide cameras and feed automatic lines to actors.
        The most interesting thing about THE TRUMAN SHOW is that 
most of us can probably imagine some ambitious director pitching a 
show like this. Sure, the most interesting TV genre of the '90s has 
been reality programming and Jerry Springer's popularity is through 
the roof, but those people deserve to be humiliated for turning their 
intimate details over to the airwaves. And when news shows use 
hidden cameras, it's done in the name of the greater good, not 
entertainment. But merge the two and you've got THE TRUMAN SHOW.
        Right now, it's implausible -- I mean, the FCC won't let you 
say the s-word on the air; do you think they'd let you broadcast every 
detail of a man's life to the entire world without his consent? One day, 
though, it could happen. And, even though it would mean the end of 
privacy, people would eat it up. You know they would.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for Breakfast Club, The (1985)
        A woman claiming to be my #1 fan has begged me for 
months to watch and review this 80's staple and, not wanting to get my 
ankles shattered with a sledgehammer, I decided to oblige her. She 
told me THE BREAKFAST CLUB was her favorite movie and she'd 
watched it scores of times and even reenacted the movie herself with 
action figures. I expected it to be good--after all, this woman has the 
good taste to be obsessed with my writing. Of course, it turns out I 
didn't like THE BREAKFAST CLUB as much as I thought I would and 
only gave it a two-and-a-half star rating, so I may get the 
sledgehammer treatment yet.
        The movie works in theory--an ambitious teen comedy from 
John Hughes (WEIRD SCIENCE, FERRIS BUELLER'S DAY OFF) 
taking place almost entirely in a high school library where five 
completely different students are spending their Saturday in detention 
for one transgression or another. The concept appealed to me, as did 
the movie's opening, which featured voice-overs from each of the 
characters as they arrived for their punishment (to the background 
strains of an extended version of Simple Minds' "Don't You Forget 
About Me"). I kept waiting for some brilliant comedy dialogue to come 
along, but except for a few small laughs, not too much entertainment 
transpired.
        The characters are cut out of the basic teen stereotypes. 
There's the rebellious Neanderthal (Judd Nelson, who might as well be 
called Judd Dredd), the stuck-up "princess" (Molly Ringwald, entering 
her eighth minute of fame here), the wrestling-letter jock (Emilio 
Estevez), the brainy nerd (Anthony Michael Hall) and the antisocial 
freak (Ally Sheedy). These five people would normally never associate 
with each other, but the circumstances force them to get to know each 
other and eventually, as the laws of predictability clearly state, become 
friends.
        Predictability reigns supreme in THE BREAKFAST CLUB 
without ever having any original insights to redeem it. When you have 
a movie that consists of 95% dialogue, the dialogue better be 
something good, alternatingly funny or poignant. The majority of the 
time, THE BREAKFAST CLUB is neither. And when the climactic 
moment you knew was coming finally arrives, it seems out of place. 
All of a sudden, the characters launch into speeches about how bad 
their lives are. Ringwald's got pressure from her friends, Estevez has a 
domineering father who's trying to regain his lost youth through his 
son, Nelson's home life sucks, Hall is flunking shop class and Sheedy 
is just plain nuts. These monologues should be dramatic or touching, 
but something's missing and I'm not quite sure what. The 
performances are all good, but something in the writing is lacking 
here and in the rest of the movie.
        THE BREAKFAST CLUB has always been touted as one of 
the quintessential teen movies of the 80's and, like I said, I was 
expecting it to be one, but it let me down by combining a predictable 
plot with bad writing. It's also unnecessarily depressing at parts, with 
an ending that's supposed to make up for all the angst-ridden 
arguments. [WARNING: Don't read this part if you don't want to 
know the ending.] Out of nowhere, Ringwald, who has stated 
repeatedly how much she hates Nelson and spent the movie arguing 
with him, suddenly starts making out with him for no reason at all. It's 
almost as contrived as having Ringwald give Sheedy a makeover. 
Suddenly she's a _beautiful_ freak and Estevez likes her. The end.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Forbidden Planet (1956)
        Among the ranks of 50's science-fiction movies, 
FORBIDDEN PLANET is considered to be one of the best, which 
makes me more determined than ever to stay away from the other 
ones. You can tell from the first minute what quality entertainment 
the movie holds, as a giant pie-plate flying saucer on a string flies 
by and the narrator tells us that, by the year 2200, space colonization 
will have spread out to other solar systems.
        That's where Captain Adams (Leslie Nielson) and his crew 
come in. They've been sent out to check on a mission that hasn't 
been heard from in twenty years. And when they get to the 
atmosphere of this coincidentally Earth-like planet, a voice on the 
radio warns them to stay away. They don't, of course, landing the 
pie plate to find a giant robot waddling toward them. It's Robbie the 
Robot ("As Himself," the opening credits inform us), who looks like 
a giant jukebox with human legs. "Do you speak English?" Robbie 
asks them. "If not, I speak over 187 languages and their various 
dialects and subtexts." A stone-faced Nielson replies, "Colloquial 
English will do just fine, thank you."
        Robbie leads them to his master, the morbid Dr. Morbius 
(Walter Pidgeon), the only inhabitant of the planet. Or is he? Out 
walks his beautiful daughter, Alta (Anne Francis), who was born 
during the one year timeframe before some mysterious, unseen force 
killed off all the colonists except for Pidgeon, who was "immune." 
Now he and his daughter are living with the robot, who does all the 
housework, can create any substance and has the strength to topple 
a house.
        No, he's not a dangerous monster that's going to terrorize 
the crew (that comes later), he has a "built-in safety device" that 
prevents him from killing people. Morbius demonstrates by asking 
Nielson if he can borrow "that formidable-looking sidearm of yours" 
and ordering Robbie to shoot Nielson with it, an order the robot 
cannot compute. Seems like an amazing piece of machinery, right? 
But, as Morbius tells Nielson and his space crew, "Don't attribute 
feeling to him, gentlemen. Robbie is simply a tool." With no men 
on the island for Alta to chase after, you have to wonder if that 
last phrase has more than one meaning. 
        Don't think me a pervert, because we're given more than 
ample evidence that Alta is sex-starved. When she sees Nielson's 
men, she announces seductively, "You're lovely." And the feeling 
is more than mutual, as the Lieutenant replies, "From over here, the 
view looks like heaven," right in front of her father. (Lucky for him 
Morbius can't order the robot to shoot him with the formidable-
looking sidearm.)
        The subplot involving Alta's naivete involving men and 
the men's innate horniness involving her continues for a while, as 
the bad Lieutenant gets her to kiss him under the pretense that it's 
a healthy Earth custom, after which she says, "There must be 
something seriously the matter with me because I haven't noticed 
the least bit of stimulation," quite an ego blow to the poor 
Lieutenant.
        It's Nielson she has the hots for, which she realizes after he 
chews her out for putting all his men in such a sorry state. "I am in 
command of eighteen competitively-selected, super-perfect physical 
specimens with an average age of 24.6 who have been locked up for 
376 days," he bellows, ordering her to put on something a little less 
revealing. And apparently, it's not just the humans who are drawn 
to Alta. She has the wild animals under her control and even Robbie 
the Robot looks a little flustered after she calls him several times 
before he finally waddles in, apologizing for his tardiness by 
admitting, "I was giving myself an oil job." What a dipstick.
        The movie continues with a predictable revelation -- the 
planet was once inhabited by an advanced race of people who 
perfected advanced technologies but were exterminated by that 
unseen force, which also attacks Nielson and his crew, who shoot 
back a few animated phasers at it. Throughout the movie, the music 
score buzzes with other-worldly music that makes even the cheapest 
Casio keyboards sound symphonic. The special effects are bad even 
for that time and you already know what the dialogue is like. Suffice 
it to say, the acting is just as laughable. Leslie Nielson is almost as 
funny in this serious role as SPY HARD and the NAKED GUN 
movies combined.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Melody Time (1948)
        The parade of Disney re-releases continues with the 50th 
anniversary edition of MELODY TIME, one of the mediocre cartoon / live 
action anthologies from the 1940s. After last year's video release of 
FUN AND FANCY FREE, I assumed the Disney vault had been cleansed of 
its bad post-war compilations, but this embarrassing piece of fluff 
proved me wrong. Whereas FUN AND FANCY FREE only had two real 
segments, MELODY TIME has seven and only three short ones I'd ever 
watch again.
        Most of the segments are in the FANTASIA vein of letting the 
music and visuals tell the story rather than relying on dialogue. 
They're also in the FUN AND FANCY vein of letting stars of the time 
narrate and sing. I don't know about you, but I don't feel incredibly 
privileged here in 1998 to hear "Pecos Bill" come from the mouth of 
Roy Rogers and the Sons of the Pioneers, or to see Carmen Miranda 
wannabe Ethel Smith spice up "Blame it on the Samba."
        MELODY TIME begins with "Once Upon a Wintertime" (*1/2), 
a story about two pairs of lovers, one human and one furry, who go ice 
skating, have fights and end up floating away on broken ice floes. Let's 
just say it doesn't rank up there with SNOW WHITE or DUMBO. That 
segues into "Bumble Boogie" (***), which looks like an outtake from 
FANTASIA. We've all seen in other Disney collections this trippy visual 
of a cartoon bumblebee trying to escape the sound and fury, and it's 
still cool to watch.
        Then comes the familiar Disney version of "Johnny 
Appleseed" (**), the story of a man who is visited by his guardian 
angel one day and is told his purpose in life is to plant apple trees. 
Quite a calling, I'd say. So Johnny wears a cooking pot on his head, 
grabs his Bible and bag of appleseed and heads off to introduce the 
world to the glory of apples. All around the country, you sense, other 
young men are being called to similar missions. Jimmy Orangeseed, 
Sammy Peachpit, Greg Cantaloupespore... when will Disney tell their 
brave stories?
        It pretty much sucks, but "Johnny Appleseed" holds a certain 
nostalgic value for me, if nothing else because we had to sing the 
theme song before every meal at summer camp when I was a kid. 
("Oh, the Lord is good to me, and so I thank the Lord for giving me 
the things I need -- the sun and the rain and the appleseed.") It's not 
the Lord's Prayer, but it'll do in a pinch. Then there's the short, 
beautiful "Trees" (***), based on a Joyce Kilmer poem. It even ends 
with an allusion to the cross. If Disney had kept this up, Pat Robertson 
wouldn't be wishing meteors on Orlando.
        My favorite part of MELODY TIME is "Little Toot" (***), even 
if it is sung by the Andrews Sisters. This is another frequent selection 
of Disney anthologies, about a rebellious tugboat that frustrates its 
father tugboat and eventually causes an oceanliner to crash into a 
seaport city, foreshadowing the end of SPEED 2 by a good 49 years. But 
since it's Disney, after the little tugboat is escorted to the city
limits, he manages to find a chance for redemption in an apocalyptic
seastorm, foreshadowing the end of THE TRUMAN SHOW by a good 50 years.
        Then comes "Blame it on the Samba" (**), where Smith plays 
her organ and shakes her maracas for a mute Donald Duck and his 
cartoon parrot cohort to boogie on down. This blend of live action and 
animation isn't so bad, but most people preferred it the first time, when 
it was called THE THREE CABELLEROS.
        Finally comes the tall tale "Pecos Bill" (*1/2). I'd call it a 
short tale, actually -- short on entertainment. The only part worthy of 
note is at the beginning, when Bill is being raised by wolves. He walks 
into a cave where a group of baby wolves are breastfeeding. Bill crawls 
into the fray and begins suckling as the camera pans up to show a 
surprised look of glee on the mama wolf's face. It's pretty funny, but I 
know if Disney had kept this up, Pat Robertson would _definitely_ still 
be calling for meteors to destroy Orlando.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for Slam Dunk Ernest (1995) (V)
        I used to love Ernest movies. When the vest-clad redneck 
got torn apart by an unseen badger in ERNEST GOES TO CAMP, I 
laughed my elementary school head off. When he got into the fight 
with the electric floor buffer in ERNEST GOES TO JAIL, I chuckled 
my junior high head off. When he triumphed against the troll in 
ERNEST SCARED STUPID, I at least smiled my high school head 
off. But my college head mostly shook back and forth in disgust 
during SLAM DUNK ERNEST, the direct-to-video feature in 
which Ernest becomes the token whitey on a city-league 
basketball team.
        Not that I expected SLAM DUNK ERNEST to be any good. 
My friends and I rented the video because we love to watch really 
bad movies and crack jokes during them, and as far as that goes, it 
more than served its purpose. That's why I have to stress that this 
isn't a bad review -- a movie like this can only provide a very mild 
and cheap form of entertainment, which SLAM DUNK ERNEST 
does. For you parents of small children out there, this will most 
likely entertain anyone who hasn't reached puberty. But if you 
don't fall into either of those two groups, I don't have to warn you 
to stay off the SLAM DUNK ERNEST court.
        Ernest P. Worrell (alter-ego of Jim "Jed" Varney) this time 
plays a janitor who works with a group of stereotypical jive-talking, 
basketball-playing black men. All his life he's wanted to gain 
acceptance in macho circles by playing basketball with the guys, 
and he finally talks his way into their locker room, which he refers 
to in awe as the "temple of testosterone." They don't let him play, 
but Ernest -- in all his incompetence -- manages to lose the game 
for them from the bench. So needless to say, the jive talkers are 
mad, and they hit him where it hurts. "You're not just white, you're 
a redneck!" one of them yells.
        But the redneck soon has the upper hand when his Angel 
of Basketball, Kareem Abdul-Jabbar, shows up in the temple of 
testosterone and gives him a pair of magic basketball shoes. "Don't 
misuse the shoes," he warns before heading off to cash his check 
and try to forget he ever signed up to appear in this movie. So Ernest 
is left alone with the shoes, which attach themselves to his feet and 
squeak-talk to him like the cockroaches in JOE'S APARTMENT, an 
even-worse movie than this.
        You can guess what happens after that. One of the jive 
talkers gets sick and Ernest gets put in the game, flying all over the 
court like his feet are made of flubber. He becomes the star of the 
game and gets an ego, actually trading in his vest and hat for a 
tuxedo. Egging him on the entire time are an evil NBA scout and 
the mousy lotto employee he's always had a crush on. Predictably, 
there's a scene in which she takes off her glasses, lets down her hair 
and suddenly becomes gorgeous.
        Meanwhile, the son of one of the jive talkers begins 
emulating Ernest (in a tragic case of race defection), going so far 
as to steal a pair of the same $250 shoes (ironically, the price of the 
shoes exceeds the entire budget of SLAM DUNK ERNEST). Luckily, 
Jabbar shows up in an ice cream truck -- the Ice Kareem Man -- to 
help talk him out of it. The movie is stupid, shallow and predictable, 
just how an Ernest movie should be. And if you can watch it with 
a group of joke-cracking teenage boys, I strongly recommend it.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Fast Times at Ridgemont High (1982)
        It's January 1997 and, believe it or not, I just saw Fast 
Times at Ridgemont High for the first time. Like many other 
80's favorites that people have been pleading for me to watch and 
review, it didn't live up to its overinflated hype, but it was still 
entertaining, and captured the essence of the early 80's, from the 
primitive video games to fashions and slang. One thing director 
Amy Heckerling always manages to do well in these aimless teen 
comedies (e.g. CLUELESS) is integrate what is current-at-the-
moment clothes and dialect. This may tend to date her movies, 
but it also serves as an accessible time capsule to that time.
        The movie, based on Cameron Crowe's supposedly factual 
book, centers around a group of high school kids, most of which 
work at the mall. Judge Reinhold takes pride in his burger-flipping 
job, a very young-looking Jennifer Jason Leigh and Phoebe Cates 
work at a dine-in pizza parlor, and dorky Brian Backer takes movie 
tickets while his slimeball friend Robert Romanus scalps concert 
tickets. The unemployed characters are also seen around the mall, 
with Sean Penn's pothead character Jeff Spicoli attempting to get 
service sans shirt in Reinhold's burger joint and beefy football player 
Forrest Whitaker shoving quarter after quarter into Space Invaders 
and Pac-Man.
        There are plenty of in-school scenes featuring two teachers 
on opposite sides of the spectrum. Vincent Schiavelli is the nervous, 
outgoing type who wants all the kids to like him and Ray Walston is 
the crusty old fart who runs his class like a military outfit. Walston's 
main problem is braindead Spicoli (undoubtedly the inspiration for 
the BILL & TED movies), who disrupts class on a regular basis and 
even has a pizza delivered to the classroom one day.
        In the Heckerling tradition, there's not much of a plot, just 
a series of loosely related scenes, most of which involve sex. Cates 
schools Leigh on a certain sexual technique, Backer tries to work up 
the courage to ask Leigh out, Reinhold is walked in on by Cates 
during an intimate personal moment, Penn trashes Whitaker's car, 
and so on. These anecdotal-type scenes work as a whole and manage 
to be almost poignant, especially in its telling of Leigh's disastrous 
history with men and boys.
        Cameron Crowe, who has recently hit it big with the 
wonderful JERRY MAGUIRE, knows how people act and interact, 
and scripts it well. The ensemble cast acts it well, particularly Penn 
and Leigh. FAST TIMES is a quintessentially 80's movie, which 
means it includes sex and nudity. Leigh and Cates disrobed because 
everyone had to in order to make it big in the 80's. Nudity is a rare 
commodity these days, and this movie is still cut to shreds when 
aired on TV, so splurge for the fifty-cent video rental, especially if 
you're interested in seeing Phoebe Cates' breasts.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for Dangerous Minds (1995)
        The Movie Critic at LARGE in me found a lot wrong with 
this movie, but the idiot moviegoer in me liked it anyway. It was 
predictable, shallow and uneven, but I like that Michelle Pfeiffer, even 
if she was horribly miscast in the role of a tough teacher who wins 
over a class of gangstas. DANGEROUS MINDS never goes into the 
deep, poignant drama you'd expect, but instead has a lot of humorous 
and manufactured "touching" moments, which the idiot moviegoer fell 
for hook, line and sinker.
        Michelle Pfeiffer arrives for her new job teaching an English 
class for "special" students to find out they're not the geniuses she 
hoped they'd be but rather the exact same class from SISTER ACT 2 
(Or didn't you notice?) of aspiring rappers, pregnant girls and sleepers, 
a real public high school cross-section.
        Still, she determines to make them learn by taking them all to 
the amusement park (What better place to learn about Shakespeare, 
right? "Forsooth! Methinks I see The Nauseator up ahead forwith. I 
will tame the savage beast or spew out chasms of chunder for a 
fortnight in the attempt! Zounds!") and giving out candy bars to 
students with correct answers. No teacher I've ever had has gone that 
far to encourage learning, although my third grade teacher used to buy 
those packages of stale wafer-thin butter cookies that come in boxes of 
300 and sit in the factory until all hint of freshness and taste is sucked 
out, then sit on the supermarket shelf another few months and years 
until some woman on a teacher's salary comes in and decides she's 
gonna get her kids to learn even if it means spending that 99 cents on 
the 300 cookies. And it worked because, hey, we were kids, what did 
we know?
        So slowly Pfeiffer's students warm up to the bribes and get 
high on learning (higher learning, right? Wrong! Different movie!), as 
we all knew they would. And then, about three-fourths of the way 
through, when it seems like all is going right for Michelle and her 
young charges, we get the age-old contrived conflict, just as we knew 
we would. Here, one of the students is needlessly axed just to further 
the plot and teach a valuable lesson--always remember to knock. If 
you've seen the movie, you know what I'm talking about. If you 
haven't, that leaves the other option.
        Surely from reading this review, you see the myriad flaws 
both with DANGEROUS MINDS and my writing (I'm asking you to 
ignore the flaws in the writing.), but perhaps you'll see the movie 
anyway and fall prey, as I did, to the false sentiment and manufactured 
poignancy. I saw right through many other recent bad dramas along 
these lines (WITH HONORS, THE PROFESSIONAL) but 
DANGEROUS MINDS somehow got to me. I guess it's dangerous to 
let a movie like that get into your mind, but oh well.

Title
Review for Angus (1995)
        This seemed like the movie for me. Socially-awkward fat kid 
goes through high school rejected by his peers and harboring crushes 
for beautiful girls who won't talk to him. Unfortunately, even though 
the theme was right out of my darkest high school memories, the 
movie itself wasn't quite executed properly. If ANGUS had been 
presented as a one-hour after school special, it would have worked, 
but as a feature-length film there's not enough substance. You have 
to get by the unsightly padding to find any value, which is actually a 
metaphor for what the movie's about.
        Angus (Charlie Talbert), doomed with the self-fulfilling 
prophecy of being named after a cow, is going through his freshman 
year as a tormented outsider, "a fat kid who's good at science and 
football." That's where the Angus character and I fundamentally differ. 
The movie could have been called ANDREW except that I hate sports 
and science, although I could identify with the scene in the beginning 
of the movie where Angus is responsible for the jock quarterback's 
winning touchdown but his contribution is ignored as the jock is 
surrounded by screaming fans. It reminded me of the days I would 
write plays for the popular kids to act out, after which they would 
conveniently forget to acknowledge my participation.
        The movie could have also been called ANGST, because it 
once again delves into the popular topic of people being ostracized 
for proudly being different. In Angus' case, a group of brainless jocks 
who are threatened by his nonconformity (and don't we all know the 
type?) arrange to have him elected Homecoming King so they can 
humiliate him at the dance. Angus, meanwhile, has to handle the 
decision of whether to skip the dance or take the opportunity of 
dancing with Melissa, the Homecoming Queen, on whom he's had 
a lifelong crush. The part of Melissa is played by Ariana Richards, 
the girl who had to escape dinosaurs in JURASSIC PARK. Here, 
she's chased after by someone slightly larger... Hey, I'm _allowed_ 
to make fat jokes. I'm in the club.
        There are several key people in Angus' life rooting him 
on -- his truck-driving mother (Kathy Bates), grandfather (George C. 
Scott) and best friend. They offer means of support in their own 
weird ways, including a mother-son Hagen Daaz binge (permanently 
answering the question of who taught the kid to pig out) and a 
videotaped dance with a blow-up doll... I identified with a lot of 
things in this movie, but just so you know, the blow-up doll thing 
held no personal meaning for me.
        Ultimately, the film is predictable and offers only a few 
laughs, some of which come at the expense of scenes which were 
supposed to be taken seriously, like the climactic scene at the dance, 
where Angus delivers an impromptu speech to the student body about 
how it's okay to be different and the oppressive jocks are actually 
afraid of us for not playing life by their rules or giving a damn about 
what they think of us. All this is true, of course, but it sounds 
unnecessarily absurd coming in the middle of a school dance. At 
least in REVENGE OF THE NERDS, they played this kind of thing 
for laughs, but in ANGUS we're supposed to seriously think a teenage 
crowd would applaud such a speech. Uh-uh. Take it from me, an 
asskicking would occur after a speech like that.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Powder (1995)
        I've never written a review for a movie I haven't watched all 
the way through, but I had to make an exception with POWDER. I 
was about forty-five minutes into this one at a friend's house when 
he and his brother got into a huge shouting match that would have 
ended in violence had we not left the house. So I never got to finish 
the movie and I'm sure as hell not going to pay three more bucks to 
watch half of a bad movie. But I can at least get a partial review out 
of it, because I saw enough to know this one wasn't worth finishing 
in the first place.
        The movie centers around a freaky teenager who's spent 
his entire life living in the cellar of his grandparents' house. When 
Grandpa dies (taking his department store down with him), social 
worker Mary Steenburgen has to take Powder (first and middle 
names? Gold Bond) to a state home, where we find out he's a 
different from the other kids. Actually, we find out he's different 
when we first see him, because he's the most pale individual 
we've ever seen and moreover he has no body hair whatsoever. 
When Powder is born in the opening minutes of the movie, the 
father takes one look at him and says "He's not my son." 
Obviously. All I want to know is where the Pillsbury Dough 
Boy was nine months ago.
        So the white-faced freak leaves his Neverland Ranch for 
the state home and faces the ridicule of other kids. That is, until 
they try to haze him during his first cafeteria lunch by making him 
"wear" his spoon ("You can either wear it on your nose or up your 
ass." Decisions, decisions...) and he uses telepathic powers to draw 
all the silverware in the room into a giant pile in the middle of the 
table. So if his father is the Pillsbury Dough Boy, his mother must 
be Sissy Spacek's Carrie character.
        And you have to factor in two more things from the 
subsequent scenes, as we find out Powder has some sort of 
super-intelligence ("Your I.Q. test went straight off the chart!") 
and attracts electrical power. This first shows up as Powder visits 
the world of high school (If he's such a genius already, why would 
he need a high school education?) and sits through a demonstration 
in Jeff Goldblum's science class. Goldblum plugs in a "Jacob's 
ladder" device that shows current running up two wires and 
immediately the current flows across the room and into Powder's 
chest. But Goldblum just stands there for about thirty seconds 
watching, instead of just unplugging the damn thing. I guess he 
was too busy contemplating why he was appearing in his third 
bad movie in a row (following HIDEAWAY and NINE MONTHS).
        That's about all I saw before the big fight began and, let 
me tell you, that was twice as interesting as the movie itself. But 
like I said, I saw enough to know this would be one of those terrible 
melodramas about the isolation of people who have superior abilities 
and how hard it is for those people to assimilate themselves into 
mainstream civilization. None of these movies ever handle the 
subject properly, instead introducing the feeble BEAUTY AND 
THE BEAST copout of having a beautiful woman fall in love with 
the guy's personality, overlooking his personal appearance. I already 
had the female character picked out (the girl who was sitting next to 
him in the back of the room during the electrocution scene), but I 
guess I'll never know for sure what happened.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
From noraruth@aol.com Mon Jun 10 15:04:03 EDT 1996
Article: 3654 of rec.arts.movies.reviews
Path: nntphub.cb.att.com!not-for-mail
From: noraruth@aol.com (Andrew Hicks)
Newsgroups: rec.arts.movies.reviews,rec.arts.sf.reviews
Subject: REVIEW: POWDER (1995)
Followup-To: rec.arts.movies.current-films,rec.arts.sf.movies
Date: 10 Jun 1996 18:16:03 GMT
Organization: University of Missouri - Columbia
Lines: 70
Sender: ecl@mtcts1.att.com (Evelyn C. Leeper)
Approved: ecl@mtcts1.att.com
Message-ID: 
Reply-To: noraruth@aol.com (Andrew Hicks)
NNTP-Posting-Host: mtcts2.mt.lucent.com
Summary: r.a.m.r. #05425
Keywords: author=Hicks
Originator: ecl@mtcts2
Xref: nntphub.cb.att.com rec.arts.movies.reviews:3654 rec.arts.sf.reviews:710
Status: RO
        I've never written a review for a movie I haven't watched all 
the way through, but I had to make an exception with POWDER. I 
was about forty-five minutes into this one at a friend's house when 
he and his brother got into a huge shouting match that would have 
ended in violence had we not left the house. So I never got to finish 
the movie and I'm sure as hell not going to pay three more bucks to 
watch half of a bad movie. But I can at least get a partial review out 
of it, because I saw enough to know this one wasn't worth finishing 
in the first place.
        The movie centers around a freaky teenager who's spent 
his entire life living in the cellar of his grandparents' house. When 
Grandpa dies (taking his department store down with him), social 
worker Mary Steenburgen has to take Powder (first and middle 
names? Gold Bond) to a state home, where we find out he's a 
different from the other kids. Actually, we find out he's different 
when we first see him, because he's the most pale individual 
we've ever seen and moreover he has no body hair whatsoever. 
When Powder is born in the opening minutes of the movie, the 
father takes one look at him and says "He's not my son." 
Obviously. All I want to know is where the Pillsbury Dough 
Boy was nine months ago.
        So the white-faced freak leaves his Neverland Ranch for 
the state home and faces the ridicule of other kids. That is, until 
they try to haze him during his first cafeteria lunch by making him 
"wear" his spoon ("You can either wear it on your nose or up your 
ass." Decisions, decisions...) and he uses telepathic powers to draw 
all the silverware in the room into a giant pile in the middle of the 
table. So if his father is the Pillsbury Dough Boy, his mother must 
be Sissy Spacek's Carrie character.
        And you have to factor in two more things from the 
subsequent scenes, as we find out Powder has some sort of 
super-intelligence ("Your I.Q. test went straight off the chart!") 
and attracts electrical power. This first shows up as Powder visits 
the world of high school (If he's such a genius already, why would 
he need a high school education?) and sits through a demonstration 
in Jeff Goldblum's science class. Goldblum plugs in a "Jacob's 
ladder" device that shows current running up two wires and 
immediately the current flows across the room and into Powder's 
chest. But Goldblum just stands there for about thirty seconds 
watching, instead of just unplugging the damn thing. I guess he 
was too busy contemplating why he was appearing in his third 
bad movie in a row (following HIDEAWAY and NINE MONTHS).
        That's about all I saw before the big fight began and, let 
me tell you, that was twice as interesting as the movie itself. But 
like I said, I saw enough to know this would be one of those terrible 
melodramas about the isolation of people who have superior abilities 
and how hard it is for those people to assimilate themselves into 
mainstream civilization. None of these movies ever handle the 
subject properly, instead introducing the feeble BEAUTY AND 
THE BEAST copout of having a beautiful woman fall in love with 
the guy's personality, overlooking his personal appearance. I already 
had the female character picked out (the girl who was sitting next to 
him in the back of the room during the electrocution scene), but I 
guess I'll never know for sure what happened.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Radio Days (1987)
        This Woody Allen film is like no other -- a nostalgic 
collection of vignettes about the now-ancient days of radio, when 
the imagination provided the visuals and physically unattractive 
people could succeed in the entertainment world on the basis of 
a strong voice alone. For instance, the voice of the Masked Avenger 
superhero in RADIO DAYS is the short, bald, "Inconceivable!" 
guy from THE PRINCESS BRIDE. And maybe Woody's trying 
to make a point about his fondness for radio by staying out of 
the camera's view for the entire movie, serving only as 
narrator.
        The main character is Woody Jr., a kid named Joe 
(played by Seth Green) whose grades are slipping because he's 
always listening to the radio. When his mom points this out, he 
replies that she's constantly listening to the radio too, she says 
it's different because she's already ruined her life and he's got the 
rest of his ahead of him. That means plenty of time to do 
mischevious little kid things like using collection money for Israel 
to buy a Masked Avenger decoder ring.
        Woody throws in a lot of stories about the radio stars 
themselves, mostly about the coat check girl (Mia Farrow) and 
her slow rise to stardom, from singing laxative jingles ("X marks 
the spot") to being interrupted during her radio debut by the 
bombing of Pearl Harbor ("Who's she?"). Farrow's role this time 
around is as more of a dumb blond than her usual sensitive, 
emotional type.
        Other favorite Allen actors appear in Radio Days, like 
Danny Aiello and Jeff Daniels (PURPLE ROSE OF CAIRO), 
Dianne Wiest (Hannah and Her Bullets Over 
Broadway), Tony Roberts (Annie Hall's Sex Comedy) 
and Diane Keaton (Manhattan Bananas). It's large scale vaudeville 
type entertainment, including reenactments of different radio shows 
and musical numbers. Eight years later, a movie called THE 
RADIOLAND MURDERS would try to do a very similar thing 
and instead fall flat on its face. If THE LAST ACTION HERO 
has proven anything, it's that you don't rip off Woody Allen.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Man with the Golden Gun, The (1974)
        This entry in the James Bond series is down in the cellar with 
A VIEW TO A KILL and ON HER MAJESTY'S SECRET SERVICE. 
The villain is boring, his only claim to fame being a third nipple 
(which Bond calls "an interesting anatomical titbit") and his golden 
gun (first owned by Oral Roberts), the climax is overly bland, 
consisting of a shootout in a fun house, and the murderous henchmen 
is played by Tattoo from "Fantasy Island," who gives Bond's knees a 
real pummeling, I'll tell you that.What can you say about a James 
Bond movie so uninspired that the writers had to bring back the 
annoying Sheriff Pepper character from LIVE AND LET DIE for 
comic relief?
        Roger Moore makes his second appearance as 007 here, 
heading off to Thailand to trace a golden bullet that arrived at Secret 
Service headquarters with his name on it. Bond traces the bullet to its 
manufacturer, then to its sender's lover (the same woman who played 
Octopussy nine years later in FOR YOUR EYES ONLY... I mean 
OCTOPUSSY) and finally to the sender himself, the man with the 
golden nipple, who is out to kill Bond.
        After that, there's the customary scene with Bond trapped in 
the villain's exotic hidden lair and the villain shares his plans to take 
over the world. In this case, the lair is an island off the coast of China 
and the plans are only to convert the world to solar power. But those 
environmentalists can get pretty violent for their cause. How many 
newspaper headlines have we all read about people who have been 
brutally murdered for not recycling aluminum cans? That of course 
leads to the climax and then about fifteen minutes of anticlimax.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for I'm Gonna Git You Sucka (1988)
     You might be wondering why I'm reviewing this movie. Well, I'm
1/16 black, you know... Would you believe 1/64? Either way, I've always
known every ghetto slang word before the general public and been able
to appreciate black humor. Maybe it's because I grew up in such a
dangerous neighborhood and graduated from a school populated by Lakeas,
Lakeishas, Laquidas, Larissas, Latonyas, La Toschas, Latieshas,
Latricheshas, La Wandas, and a guy named Boogie. I'm also one of the
only white guys I know who actually likes rap music. That probably
originates from years of low-riding cars with 1.21 jigowatt sound
systems blasting the music of various M.C.'s and Ice's, while driving
by my house at ten miles an hour while I was trying to sleep. Different
story.
     Nevertheless, this was a hilarious movie from my standpoint.
Keenan Ivory Wayans may have struck out with 1995's detective parody A
LOW DOWN DIRTY SHAME (which more than lived up to its name), but this
movie is right on target. It's a take-off of the SHAFT and BLACULA-type
movies of the 70's, but keeps one foot on the ground, unlike other
parody movies like HOT SHOTS and NAKED GUN, which retreat into their
own bizarre little worlds.
     I'M GONNA GIT YOU SUCKA has its own alternate world, where gang
members get addicted to wearing too many gold chains and medallions,
but seems more like an actual movie with an actual story to tell
besides making us laugh. There are still a lot of funny digressions
from the plot--the Pimp of the Year pageant, Keenan on "Soul Train" and
the scene where Keenan's date begins taking off clothes and body parts
(one of the funniest movie scenes ever, methinks).
     Keenan plays a wimpy soldier who returns home to find his brother
dead and his family terrorized by crime boss Mr. Big and his henchmen
(Damon Wayans and Kadeem Hardison). Keenan solicits help from some
retired revolutionaries (including Isaac Hayes, Bernie Casey and
ex-football star Jim Brown) to take back the neigborhood.
     I'M GONNA GIT YOU SUCKA is an all-around funny movie that spoofs
blaxploitation films indirectly, by speculating on what would happen
ten years after those movies were over. It works from beginning to end,
with more than a few memorable moments for black and white viewers
alike. My mom even liked this movie.  If that's not an endorsement, I
don't know what is.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Fun and Fancy Free (1947)
        Disney has nearly exhausted its library of classic films. 
There aren't too many more old cartoon movies they can mass-
market as Masterpieces You Have To Own Or Your Kids Will 
Never Forgive You. I think they may have finally reached the 
bottom of the barrel with FUN AND FANCY FREE, now being blitz 
advertised as a fiftieth anniversary fully-restored classic, the only 
feature length Disney movie featuring Mickey, Goofy, Donald Duck 
and Jiminy Cricket. Don't believe it -- this one sucks. Disney doesn't 
always have a Midas touch.
        FUN AND FANCY FREE is the weakest animated film 
they've released on video yet, a collection of four almost equally-
weak elements. We'll start with the prologue. Old Jiminy, brought 
in for no better purpose than to cash in on name recognition from 
PINOCCHIO, hops around an empty room, singing a song about 
how happy he is. The feeling isn't contagious as he talks straight to 
us and then pops out a record called "Bongo, a musical story by 
Dinah Shore." We yell to the screen, begging him not to put it on, 
but of course he does and we have to watch the first half-hour 
cartoon.
        It's "Bongo," the story of a circus bear who is oppressed by 
his master and has no friends until he finds out he can fly with the 
help of a magic feather... well, no, it's not a complete DUMBO 
ripoff, because Bongo's instrument of redemption is his imagination. 
He dreams of freedom, of the day when he'll star in an original 
cartoon, and suddenly his cage is open. He wanders out into the 
open, eager to be one with nature, but this domesticated circus bear 
is terrorized by thunder, wild animals and the like.
        Redemption is nigh for young Bongo, though, the same 
redemption dealt his rhyming-name counterpart Pongo from ONE 
HUNDRED AND ONE DALMATIONS -- he meets a woman. Bongo 
falls in love, as do all cartoon animals sooner or later, and in the 
predictable fashion, must fight off a bigger, jealous rival. But in the 
end happiness triumphs, and we get a failed song-and-dance number 
about how bears display their love by smacking their partners. Bears 
and Ike Turner.
        Dinah Shore is narrating the whole time, by the way, in the 
same fashion as Bing Crosby's "Legend of Sleepy Hollow." That was 
one of the cardinal sins Disney perpetrated in the late '40s and early 
'50s, hinging on certain pop stars as the lone vocal contributors in 
animated featurettes of 30 minutes or less. It takes away the timeless 
quality; I mean, if Disney commissioned the Spice Girls to narrate 
and perform in a cartoon retelling of some classic story, where 
would that leave viewers watching 50 years down the road?
        The same problem is inherent to "Mickey and the 
Beanstalk," which I remembered as being really entertaining. It 
wasn't, and we can thank Edgar Bergen for that. After Jiminy puts 
the "Bongo" record away, he heads across the way to Bergan's party, 
where Bergan entertains two ventriloquist's dummies and a little girl 
in pajamas who looks like she really, _really_ wants to go to sleep. 
Soon, so do we. Believe me, this is one party that could definitely 
use some booze.
        He begins telling them the story of "Mickey and the 
Beanstalk," where three poor farmers (Mickey, Donald and Goofy) 
are at the end of their rope, with no food but one slice of bread and a 
kidney bean. I remembered fondly the scene with Mickey slicing the 
bean into almost-transparent slices, with Donald finally snapping 
and making a sandwich out of two plates and a glass, with Mickey 
selling their cow for some magic beans and Donald getting even 
madder and throwing the beans into a hole in the floor.
        I remembered the beanstalk growing through the night, 
taking the sleeping farmers with them to the clouds, where the giant 
lives. I remembered all the rest of it, with the giant capturing them 
and locking them in a box with the singing harp (Dinah Shore 
again, damn the luck). What I didn't remember was that Bergan and 
his wise-cracking ventriloquists intruded into the story every few 
seconds with comments of their own. Maybe the version of "Mickey 
and the Beanstalk" I saw all those years ago had those exchanges 
wisely edited out.
        Without the constant intrusions by Bergan and his party 
goers, the last 30 minutes of FUN AND FANCY FREE would be 
very entertaining, even if the giant is so cartoonishly dumb that 
he's annoying. With all that narration, though, we're constantly 
reminded we're watching a cartoon. The appeal of the good Disney 
films is that we can enter this animated world and feel a part of it. 
Bergan distances us from the magical world by reducing it to a 
bedtime tale, and consequently destroys what would have been the 
only good thing about FUN AND FANCY FREE. "Bongo" would 
have sucked no matter what. This is no masterpiece.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Halloween H20: Twenty Years Later (1998)
        If I've learned something in twenty years as a moviegoer, it's 
that no matter how many times Hollywood has beaten a dead horse, 
there can always be another unwarranted sequel. In the late '80s, we 
hoped HALLOWEEN 5 would be the last. Then came the even more 
dreadful sixth installment in 1995; now, for the original movie's 
twentieth anniversary, out comes HALLOWEEN: H20, which SCREAM 
writer Kevin Williamson fought to bring to the big screen.
        Ignoring the last four sequels (probably the brightest flash of 
inspiration this movie had), H20 goes back to the roots of the series -- 
Michael Myers stalking Jamie Lee Curtis, who is now well into her 
40s and drinking vodka straight from the bottle. Laurie Strode, the 
archetypical babysitter victim, is now the head mistress at a private 
school, living under an assumed name as Halloween 1998 rolls 
around. It's the twentieth anniversary of the Haddonfield murders and 
Laurie/Keri is rightfully freaked out.
        Besides being an alcoholic, she's a frighteningly 
overprotective mother. Her son (Josh Harnett) attends the same 
boarding school, and she won't let him go with the other students and 
faculty on a Yosemite camping trip (the requisite plot devise to clear 
out the facilities). So he stays behind with three other delinquents 
(Michelle Williams, Jodi Lyn O'Keefe and Adam Hann-Byrd, at least 
one of whom is on "Dawson's Creek") who plan a night of booze, sex 
and food. Way to go, Mom.
        Rounding out the cast of those left behind are LL Cool J as an 
erotica-writing security guard and Jamie Lee's boyfriend, played by 
Adam Arkin of "Chicago Hope." He's a therapist, which proves 
opposites attract, and seals his own fate when she tells him about her 
past and he replies, "That's sucky." It's a fun game early on to guess 
who will get killed and by which instruments, although there are few 
surprises and the movie seems to have far fewer substance than even 
the bad sequels.
        Then there's Myers, also known as The Shape. He emerges on 
October 29 to kill the nurse from the first two HALLOWEEN films and 
Joseph Gordon-Levitt of "3rd Rock From the Sun" with an ice skate to 
the face (which will probably be worth full ticket price for people who 
find little Joseph annoying). Then he steals two cars and heads to 
California to catch up with Jamie Lee, making the rest of us wonder if 
he really wears that mask when he drives. It would tend to impair 
vision, I imagine.
        Bringing Jamie Lee back and bringing Williamson aboard 
made this the sequel with the most appeal since HALLOWEEN II, but 
there comes a point where it's really ridiculous to see the same woman 
run from the same masked killer for the umpteenth time. Not only is 
Curtis pre-menopausal (though her character is only supposed to be 
37) but Michael Myers himself is over the hill. Every time a nubile 
teen runs from him, I'm waiting for him to say, "Come back here, you 
damn kid. I'm too old for this shit."
        The idea here is to invoke the familiar, to the point where 
Jamie Lee ends up reciting some of the exact same dialogue from the 
first movie ("Do as I say!") and yelling the f-word when she realizes 
the only place to hide is in a closet. This movie is more a nostalgia 
kick than anything, up to its ears in in-jokes, down to having Jamie's 
real mother (Janet Leigh, the famous shower stabbing victim in 
PSYCHO) pop in a cameo to "be maternal."
        HALLOWEEN: H20 has a few shocks but no real scares. Then 
again, it comes from Steve Miner, who directed FRIDAY THE 13TH Parts 
2 and 3. There's no hope for a classy horror movie when the director is 
best known for a 3-D movie where Jason popped some kid's eyeball 
from its socket. At least the movie has a sense of humor, most of 
which from some uncredited Williamson script moments. And finally 
we get a HALLOWEEN movie that ends exactly like all the other ones 
should have. Maybe Laurie Strode has wised up a little in the past 
twenty years. Let's hope Hollywood has, and there's no HALLOWEEN: 
H21.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for Mulan (1998)
        There's good news and bad news about MULAN. The positive is 
that Disney has found a happy medium between the heavy-handedness 
of POCAHONTAS and THE HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME and the 
childishness of HERCULES. On the other hand, the studio is pulling 
out all the stops on plot cliches and cheap laughs, several steps down 
from the days of THE LITTLE MERMAID and BEAUTY AND THE BEAST. But 
MULAN is a step in the right direction and Disney's best animated 
feature since THE LION KING.
        After giving Native Americans a turn in POCAHONTAS, Disney 
has decided to turn a movie over to the Asians. MULAN is set in feudal 
China and features the ever-popular Heroine Who Marches To A 
Different Drum And Wants To Do More With Her Life Than Get 
Married. That's what we find out when young Mulan (voice of Ming-
Na Wen) screws up her appointment with the matchmaker by letting a 
rogue cricket splash coffee all over her. Cartoons...
        Meanwhile, word comes from the emporer that one man from 
every family must join the army and help fight the Huns. Since 
Mulan's a girl, that means her decrepit old father must go. She pleads 
with the soldiers to have mercy on dear old Dad, but that kind of 
groveling and desperation brings shame on her family. That's Chinese 
culture for you... So imagine how embarrassed the family is the next 
day when they find Mulan has stolen her father's uniform and sword 
and run off to join the army in his place. The movie in a nutshell is 
about the stuggles of being a woman in the army. It should have been 
called G.I. CHANG.
        Mulan calls on her ancestors for help. They decide to 
summon the large stone dragon in the backyard to protect her, but a 
mini dragon named Mushu screws it up. Voiced by Eddie Murphy, 
Mushu continues the tradition of cute talking animal sidekicks who do 
more slapstick harm than good for their human charges. Murphy's 
performance is a direct descendent of Robin Williams in ALADDIN -- 
lots of wisecracks and ad-libs and even an introductory song about 
how much fun they're going to have. You ain't never had a friend like 
Mushu.
        Speaking of songs, MULAN doesn't have too many of them, 
which is a plus with a story like this. Disney songs about war probably 
wouldn't go over too well ("Heigh ho, heigh ho, it's off to war I go..."), 
and the ones they do have aren't memorable. The best of the bunch, 
sad to say, is "Be a Man," the requisite Basic Training Montage song. 
Yes, even in medieval China, they had to run through that web of car 
tires before they were ready for battle. Sung by Donnie Osmond (a bad 
sign if ever there was one), "Be a Man" accompanies footage of 
Mulan's platoon going from screw-ups to heroes. It makes me wonder, 
has there ever been a musical montage in a movie that's ended badly? I 
only wish real-life problems could be solved in two minutes with a 
peppy montage.
        For the curious, Mulan does pass for a man in the army 
despite looking like a girl. All she does to transform herself is cut her 
hair to a sexy shoulder-length, talk macho and slap guys on the butt, 
as was male custom a thousand years ago in China. The deception 
fools everyone but the audience, who thinks she might be able to pass 
for a 12-year-old boy, at best. But she does manage to strike the 
biggest blows to the Hun army, led by a big, evil-eyed Attilla-looking 
monster. As a villain, the head of the Huns is menacing, evil and 
entirely forgettable. I saw the movie yesterday and I don't remember 
the man's name.
        Otherwise, MULAN is a good movie. The animation of the 
characters themselves isn't as rich as it could and should be, but there 
are some amazing battlefield shots. Eddie Murphy pulls off some good 
one-liners, as do other star voices like Harvey Fierstein and Pat 
Morita, the quintessential Asian movie star. Hell, George "Mr. Sulu" 
Takei does a voice in MULAN. You get the sense Disney said to 
themselves, "Alright, let's get out there and find us some Chinese 
Americans in Hollywood. Who can you think of?" "Well, there's Mr. 
Myagi..." "Good." "And Mr. Sulu." "Perfect. We've got ourselves a 
movie now." Soon Disney really _will_ be able to paint with all the 
colors of the wind.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for City of Angels (1998)
        I've said it before and I'll probably have to say it again -- I just 
don't buy the Hollywood theory that the biggest desire of angels is to 
be human. There's no bigger proponent of this idea than CITY OF 
ANGELS, which has a climactic, humanist speech from Nicolas Cage 
along the lines of, "I would rather have had one breath of her hair, one 
kiss from her mouth, than eternity without it. One." Meanwhile, I'm 
thinking, "Yeah, Meg Ryan is cute, but come on, no one would give up 
an eternity in heaven for her."
        Obviously, this Less is More philosophy carried over to the 
script, written by Dana Stevens. The idea seems to be that a moviegoer 
would rather see one rehashed plot, one oversentimentalized method of 
acting, than a fresh, unconventional movie. One, which is also the 
number of scenes in CITY OF ANGELS that really engaged me. Shame, 
because the early pieces of Brad Silberling's direction, which show 
lengthy aerial shots of black trenchcoated angels perched on Los 
Angeles architecture, suggested an artistic movie that would actually 
explore the life of the angel.
        Instead, we get a love story. The human protagonist is a 
doctor (Ryan) who loses one of her patients at the beginning of the 
film. We already know, from one overly melodramatic child death 
scene, that angel Cage just hangs around, waiting for people to die. 
Then he walks them to The Other Side, after they've told him what 
they enjoyed most about life. After that, he compares responses with 
his closest angel friend, played by Andre Braugher, in his most 
subdued role ever.
        So Cage catches a glimpse of Ryan at work, then stares her 
down as she cries over the dead patient. That's more or less what these 
movie angels do, just stare at humans, with a creepy demeanor that 
suggests some kind of stalker-pervert. That they all wear trenchcoats 
doesn't help their credibility. Anyway, Cage finds himself smitten with 
Meg and decides to let him get a look at her because, as Braugher 
says, "people can see you if you want them to."
        They flirt for awhile, Ryan thinking he's a friend of the heart 
patient (Dennis Franz) she's going to operate on tomorrow. Then Cage 
disappears mysteriously, reappears, disappears, and so on, until we 
find out Meg is in love with him. It's when she starts coming up with 
questions like, "Why does he wear the same clothes all the time?" that 
things get tedious. At the same time, Cage starts wanting to forsake 
his angelic existence to be with Meg.
        He gets the idea from Franz, whose character's name is 
Nathaniel Messinger. It's about the most obvious name for an ex-
angel, although I'd hate to think my guardian angel looks like Denniz 
Franz. Hell, it's hard enough to swallow the idea of Cage as an angel. 
Rest assured, though, that since this is a movie, Cage will let his lusts 
dictate a fall from heaven. I just didn't think the filmmakers would do 
something so laughable as having Cage dive off a high building. 
Here's a hint, you guys: it's supposed to be a figurative fall, not a literal 
one. But the good news is Cage's black trenchcoat DOES fall with him.
        I won't give away the ending, except to say it's the most 
cheesy, formulaic, pseudo-ironic ending possible in a movie like this, 
and one that would inspire Nicolas Cage to say, "I would rather have 
had one breath of her hair, one kiss from her mouth, than eternity 
without it." Personally, I would rather have had a good script, genuine 
acting and direction that didn't rely on lingering shots and sappy 
orchestration. A movie like this sure isn't going to make a real angel 
fall from heaven, unless he falls over laughing.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for Addicted to Love (1997)
        Might as well face it, ADDICTED TO LOVE is about as 
original as the decade-old Robert Palmer song it's named after. Like 
that song, it has so much bizarre appeal we end up liking it anyway. 
Griffin Dunne, never much of a star in his own right, has gone 
behind the camera this time to bring us an unconventional but 
thoroughly predictable tale of scorned lovers' revenge. As cliched as 
the plot developments are, there are enough laughs that the movie 
almost redeems itself.
        The love-hate thing extends to the cast as well. Matthew 
Broderick, who was such a comedic force to be reckoned with back 
in the '80s, is a shadow of his former self here. He sports more 
stubble than George Michael and is never believable in the role of a 
pathetic astronomer whose girlfriend / soulmate leaves him. He sees 
the character the way we see it -- as a sad, sorry man who blindly 
refuses to move on with his life -- and doesn't take him seriously. 
The key to this kind of farce comedy is playing the most bizarre 
roles straight. Just ask Leslie Nielson.
        Meg Ryan, on the other hand, is the saving grace of the 
film. She is cast way against type, as an overly made-up femme 
fatale who has a grudge against her ex-fiancee, who just happens to 
be the new beau of Broderick's ex-girlfriend, Kelly Preston. Old 
Mrs. Travolta doesn't have much to do in ADDICTED TO LOVE, 
so this will hardly be the comeback vehicle she's been waiting years 
for. No, the movie belongs to a hilarious Ryan and the French 
boyfriend, who turns out to be a lot funnier than he seems in his first 
few scenes.
        Actually, the first few scenes make this seem like it will 
turn out to be a horrible movie. There are no laughs in the first 20 
minutes and everything seems completely surreal. The opening 
scene has Broderick accurately predicting a meteor shower, then 
turning his giant telescope on Preston, across town. She waves at 
him, which makes it all seem like a misguided dream sequence. 
Nope, it's real, and so is the Dear John letter he gets in the next 
scene, after Preston has gone off to New York.
        Broderick catches the next plane to New York and tracks 
her down, never once making contact with her. He follows her 
instead to the new boyfriend's pad, where Preston apparently now 
resides as well, and sets up shop in an abandoned house across the 
street. No sooner has Broderick rigged an elaborate camera and 
projector to relay their every move than in drops Ryan, in a 
motorcycle helmet and leather jacket. She wants revenge, while he's 
sure Preston is going through a phase, after which she will realize 
her true love for Broderick. Not until he shaves, I hope.
        Both are equally pathetic in their stubborn desire to hold 
onto the past, but have a goal in common. So they try to split up 
Preston and the French man, who owns a restaurant in town. Before 
too long, we're seeing all sorts of episodic comedy cliches, even 
placing cockroaches in the restaurant on the night the New York 
Times restaurant critic is coming. And we know Broderick and 
Ryan will fall in love with each other. They have to; they're addicted 
to it.
        ADDICTED TO LOVE works best when it adheres to the 
more conventional comedy approach, even though we've all seen 
that approach hundreds of times. The laughs aren't forced, though, 
most of them coming from the strange chemistry Ryan and 
Broderick have. And the Frenchman gets a lot of great lines in. It's 
when the film leaves the realm of believability that we wonder just 
what the hell Griffin is thinking, because the stranger the film gets, 
the less laughs there are. In this case, cliche is preferred. Might as 
well face it...
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Children of the Corn (1984)
        Corn is the operative word here, in one of the many truly 
awful movie versions of Stephen King literature. This time, a thirty 
page story is turned into a full-blown movie that fits right in with 
the very worst slasher flicks of the 80's. Peter Horton and Linda 
Hamilton (I can only assume she did this movie right before THE 
TERMINATOR) play a married couple innocently driving through 
Nebraska when they hit a kid who stumbles onto the road.
        But this isn't just your average, ordinary, everyday 
roadkill accident. "Look at his throat. It's been slit. He was dead 
before we hit him." (So he was dead when he walked onto the road? 
Talk about your dead kid walking.) They take the kid to the nearest 
town, a charming but empty place called Gatling. Peter and Linda 
wander around the town and into an abandoned house ("There's 
something not quite right about this place.") before doing the 
logical thing -- logical only in a horror movie, that is -- splitting 
up. That way, when Linda hears a noise downstairs, she can walk 
slowly dowt a dozen 
times in the slasher tradition, "Bert, is that you? ...Bert? ...Ernie? 
...Big Bird?"
        At least in the King story, the mystery of the town wasn't 
given away in the opening scene. There was at least a little suspense 
in the written version, but in the CHILDREN OF THE CORN 
movie, we know all along just what Peter and Linda are getting into. 
Gatling is inhabited by a bunch of kids who killed all the adults on 
orders from their resident prophet, Isaac, the only supernatural thing 
about him, from what I can tell, being that he sounds like he's on 
helium.
        This movie, like many others in the 80's, carries a strong 
religious bias, with the crazy kids all named after Bible characters 
(Malachi, Amos, Job, etc.) and Linda's fate eventually being to 
hang on a crucifix made of corn husks. It's all so absurd it can't be 
taken seriously for a minute, especially Peter's climactic speech 
about how blind they all are for following Isaac the "holy roller." 
According to Peter, "any religion not based on love and 
compassion is false!"
        Interestingly enough, this speech comes after the corn 
monster (He Who Walks Behind the Rows) swallows a couple kids 
up. Even though it's obvious there is some supernatural basis for the 
kids' behavior, the screenwriter still decided to have the adult hero 
chew the kids out for their behavior. In reality, it's everyone 
involved with this movie and the two sequels that should be 
chewed out -- at the least. If it were up to me, I'd hang them 
all up on corn husk crucifixes.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Fifth Element, The (1997)
        THE FIFTH ELEMENT is an action / science-fiction hybrid 
that cost nearly $100 million to make but left out two of the most 
crucial elements of both genres. The best action flicks have a good 
sense of humor and the best science-fiction films have a brain. THE 
FIFTH ELEMENT has neither, and zero suspense. What it does 
have is a terrific visual style, outrageous art direction and a wide 
variety of people sporting a wild variety of costumes, proof movies 
are looking more and more like music videos. If only they'd fade out 
after four minutes...
        The first 15 minutes or so take place in Egypt, 1914, where 
an explorer has discovered some strange markings in a temple as 
Luke Perry looks on. A priest tries to stop the explorer from 
stumbling upon a cosmic secret, but too late. Down comes an alien 
spacecraft, out of which steps a strange bronze / chrome being that 
unlocks the entrance to a strange room. The brings out four small 
stone obelisks just as Luke shoots it. No, Luke, it's a friendly alien! 
Too late, the alien dies, after squeaking out a warning about the evil 
invading the earth 300 years from now.
        Flash forward, oh, 300 years or so. We meet Bruce Willis, 
a retired government agent who's now living out the mundane 
existence of a cab driver. In the first few scenes, we get the requisite 
world-of-the-future scenes. The bed makes itself, the microwave 
cooks food in a second, the cigarettes are four-fifths filter and the 
cars fly.
        Willis heads off in his cab as we cut to a secret government 
lab, where a group of scientists are examining the DNA of an 
armor-clad hand, the only remaining body part of an alien spacecraft 
that was shot down earlier in the day. They stick it in some futuristic 
chamber and reconstruct the entire being based on the DNA of the 
hand. After a few bright flashes we see a nude, orange-haired Milla 
Jovavich. One of the scientists makes the mistake of getting too 
close to the glass chamber, as Jovavich smashes the chamber and 
bashes his head in before jumping through the wall of the building.
        A chase ensues as she jumps from the building and right 
into -- as coincidence would have it -- Willis' cab. She's just 
beautiful enough that he risks his life outrunning the cops. Of 
course, she doesn't speak any English, so she can't tell him who she 
is or what she's running from. All she can say is the name of a 
priest, one in a long line of holymen who has been trained to protect 
the four stones. But we soon learn the stones were stolen by evil 
Zorg (Gary Oldman), who is working for the evil aliens that want to 
destroy the earth.
        Jovavich was sent by the good aliens to protect -- she is the 
fifth element. So the elements are earth, air, wind, fire and anorexic 
models? I can handle a universe like that. The weak writing shows 
through as the priest reminds Willis that she may have superhuman 
strength but she is also fragile. She needs his love to survive. 
Pathetic, as are the caricature portrayals by Oldman as the psycho 
villain and Chris Tucker as a flamboyant but frightened radio host 
who is thrust into the action two-thirds of the way into the movie.
        THE FIFTH ELEMENT has a few interesting elements. 
It's fun most of the time and always flashy, but it's also missing a lot. 
We don't care about the characters, there's no suspense and the plot 
is predictable and borrowed from hosts of other sci-fi flicks. If 
they're going to throw so much money at a movie, they should at 
least invest a few million in the creative end. The mise en scene is 
nice but it doesn't balance out the writing.
        The two-and-a-half star rating applies to the viewing 
experience I had -- huge screen, digital stereo sound. It was almost 
enough to make it seem good at times. Otherwise, the rating is 
knocked down by at least a half-star.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Die Hard: With a Vengeance (1995)
        This is no ordinary movie review. It's a movie review _with a
vengeance_. Well, no, actually it is just an average review. There's not
much vengeance in this good-natured all-American teenage boy. Who
am I kidding, I shot a convenience store clerk last week because they
were out of Lemonheads.
        This third installment in the guy-who-just-won't-die series
has the usual contrived explosions and death traps. Sure, I use the
word "contrived" in a negative context all the time, but when milked
for eye-popping effects and genuine suspense, contrivances can be a
great blessing to a movie, a substitute for logic, intelligence or
poignancy. DIE HARD, LETHAL WEAPON, TRUE LIES and other
such action movies realize their audiences love the far-fetched plots
and one-in-a-million odds of survival for the main character.
        This time around, Bruce Willis's McClane character (not the
New Age guru) is caught up in a cat-and-mouse game with villain
Jeremy Irons (the evil Scar from THE LION KING, though it could be
argued Elton John was the real villain of the movie), who leads Willis
on a series of missions to avoid detonation of bombs in public places.
On the first such mission, where Irons sends Bruce Willis to Harlem
wearing a huge racial slur on his shirt (the only more dangerous place
I can think of to wear such a shirt is the halls of a public high school).
That's where he meets up with Zeus (Samuel L. Jackson), who saves
him from destruction by a knife-wielding street gang (again,
reminiscent of a public high school), only to be drawn into the
cat-and-mouse game.
        DIE HARD WITH A VENGEANCE quickly becomes a buddy
picture, with Willis and Jackson against Irons, who soon loots all the
gold from the Federal Reserve Bank while all the city cops are called
to locate a bomb in--you guessed it--a public school (you knew I was
going somewhere with that "public school" stuff). Jackson is a
welcome addition to the DIE HARD series. He would have seemed like
a blatant Danny Glover LETHAL WEAPON clone if his character
hadn't been a racist, the black-man-with-a-grudge-against-whitey
stereotype you wouldn't be surprised to see wearing a black suit and
hood. Sad to say, that's all there is in the way of a character sketch for
this guy, but he's still not completely wasted here.
        Part 3 may not be as good as the other DIE HARD movies,
but it is good, non-stop action and explosions. Check your brain at the
door (if you have one--a brain, not a door, though it could reasonably
be argued that without a door, there would be no place to check you
brain, but it doesn't take a brain to figure that out... or a door) and
enjoy.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at http://www.missouri.edu/~c6677=
78/movies.html

Title
Review for Jerry Maguire (1996)
        Tom Cruise can act. Who knew? He's given passable 
performances in a lot of movies, but in JERRY MAGUIRE, for the 
first time, you don't consciously think of him as Tom Cruise during 
every scene. He actually becomes the character, a new concept for 
a Cruise film... Okay, so I'm exaggerating a bit. Cruise was great in 
RAINMAN back in '87, but in the almost ten years since, he hasn't 
shown us a whole lot in the way of talent, unless running down a 
street with briefcase in hand or yelling "DID YOU ORDER THAT 
CODE RED?!!!" at top volume is true talent.
        A lot of Cruise's performance comes courtesy of writer and 
director Cameron Crowe (SAY ANYTHING), who himself has said 
he tried to completely remold Cruise for the role of Jerry Maguire. 
It helped immensely that his script made Maguire and everyone else 
complex and likeable characters for the audience to care about. 
Under Crowe's direction, the rest of the cast holds their own with 
Cruise, especially relative-unknown Renee Zellweger as Maguire's 
assistant and eventual love interest.
        Cruise, as Jerry Maguire, is a hot-shot sports agent who 
lives a superficial life of money and inside connections until he 
reaches an epiphany one night and labors away at his laptop, 
churning out page after page of drivel for the masses, as I'm doing 
right now, only Maguire is drunk at the time and sticks a lot of hasty 
words in this "mission statement" that he later regrets writing. 
Among other things, he calls for the agency to which he belongs 
to spend more time with clients and make more personal sacrifices.
        He makes copies for every employee of the agency and, 
within a week, is fired by his former prot g  (Jay Mohr of "SNL" 
fame). Making a big speech upon his exit from the company, he 
calls for anyone with integrity to come with him and begin anew. 
The lone respondant to this request is Zellweger, a single parent 
risking everything because she believes in Cruise's integrity. That 
Cruise has the nicest ass in America probably has something to do 
with that decision.
        Mohr convinces every client Cruise has to drop Cruise and 
side with the organization that fired him -- every client but one, that 
is, a receiver with the Phoenix Cardinals. Played by Cuba Gooding 
Jr., this guy is obnoxious, flamboyant and greedy. I was wondering 
where the red hair, nose-rings, tattoos and appearances on "The 
RuPaul Show" were; that's how close Gooding's character is to 
Dennis Rodman. A big difference, though, is that Gooding is 
sensible, likeable and devoted to his wife (Regina "227" King) and 
children, as well as his longtime agent, Maguire. That Cruise has 
the nicest ass in America probably has something to do with that 
decision.
        Maguire's life is in the locker room crapper throughout 
most of JERRY MAGUIRE, as he loses his job, his clients and his 
fianc e (Kelly Preston, in her first movie this presidential 
administration), and has to decide whether or not he's really in love 
with Zellweger. Hell, after seeing this movie, everyone in Hollywood 
should be in love with Zellweger, whose down-to-earth appearance 
and acting ability will probably earn her several more big movie 
roles soon.
        JERRY MAGUIRE is definitely not short on talent. Cruise, 
Zellweger and Gooding are the movie's brightest stars, but the 
smaller roles from King, Mohr, Bonnie Hunt (as Zellweger's 
protective older sister) and, yes, even Preston contribute a lot to 
the film as well. It's Crowe's own genius that lend the most to 
JERRY MAGUIRE. It's rare these days to find a mainstream, big-
budget movie with a brain and a heart, but this one's got that and a 
warm sense of humor with which the laughs don't stem from bodily 
functions or vulgarities but sentimentality. I loved this movie and 
I'll probably see it again. That Cruise has the nicest ass in America 
probably has something to do with that decision... Sorry, I had to 
say that one last time.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for Kingpin (1996)
        Inane. Vulgar. Cheap. And sometimes very funny. Those 
are my main impressions on KINGPIN, the comedy that turns the 
pathetic, bloated world of bowling upside down. How do I know 
bowling is bloated and pathetic? Because it's the only sport I'm 
good at. And it's the only sport any of the loser characters in 
KINGPIN can claim talent in.
        First there's Woody Harrelson, the scatterbrained bowler 
who beats Bill Murray in the state championship. Murray lures 
naive Woody into participating in a bowling hustle with him, then 
ditches him there when the drunken bowlers want revenge. It's not 
clear exactly what they do to Harrelson, but he alternates between 
a hook and rubber hand on his right arm as a souvenir of that 
fateful night. He spends the next seventeen years drinking and 
pulling small-time hustles to earn money when he finds a new 
prospect.
        That's Randy Quaid, an Amish farmboy who sneaks off 
to the bowling alley and sports a 270 average (per fifteen frames, 
we later find out), whom Harrelson sees as his chance to win the 
million-dollar bowling tournament in Reno. But Quaid won't go 
until Harrelson wears him down by infiltrating the Amish 
community under the name Hezekiah. Quaid finally goes with him 
on the cross-country drive, which includes another bowling hustle 
to keep the cash flow up, after which they flee with the victim's 
girlfriend en tow.
        And that would be Vanessa Angel, USA's "Weird Science" 
babe, whose two requirements in the movie are to wear a lot of tight 
outfits and quarrel with Harrelson, the first of which she does very 
well. Angel is the only beauty in a very ugly movie, both visually 
and metaphorically. Besides having an overall grimy look, 
Harrelson and Murray both have some of the most absurdly-
dated wardrobes and disgusting hair in movie history.
        Metaphorically speaking, KINGPIN has a lot of repulsive 
moments. Cheap sexual innuendoes abound, along with some 
sickening visual gags, the most disgusting of which has Harrelson, 
during the Brother Hezekiah sequence, telling a farmer he milked 
their cow. He has a milk moustache and tells the farmer it took 
some priming the pump but he finally got it flowing, after which 
the farmer replies, "We don't have a cow, only a bull." Harrelson 
gets a disgusted look on his face and says he's going to brush his 
teeth. The movie is full of disgusting moments like that, split about 
half-and-half between funny and awful.
        KINGPIN is an uneven movie but has a lot of positives 
going for it. The cast shows a talent for comedy, and Bill Murray 
is especially funny here for the first time since GROUNDHOG DAY. 
Angel, besides being an indisputable beauty, can act. The Farrely 
brothers, who directed KINGPIN, have a talent for cheap humor that 
is actually funny, making this an appropriate follow-up to DUMB 
AND DUMBER. If the movie hadn't been so long and loaded with 
misfired gags, it would have been a good movie to seek out. Right 
now it's worth watching but not worth arranging your schedule 
around.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Fear (1996)
        This is every fatal attraction thriller you've ever seen, only 
a few years earlier. Created with non-discriminating teens in mind, 
FEAR is an inane, laughably bad movie with little originality, even 
in casting. 1993's THE CRUSH starred a then-unknown Alicia 
Silverstone, this one stars the beautiful and precocious Reese 
Witherspoon, who is a cross between Silverstone and Candace 
Cameron from "Full House." This time, the psycho villain role goes 
not to the leading lady but to "Marky" Mark Wahlberg. And you 
wondered if there was any redeeming value in FEAR...
        Reese's life is typical -- superficial shopping and school 
work. She spends a lot of her time arguing with her father. When 
she shouts in the opening scene that she has "to ask permission to 
breathe" and storms out of the room, Dad replies sarcastically, 
"Does this count as quality time?" No, and it definitely doesn't 
count as quality writing. This exchange establishes early on two 
vital components of the movie -- horrendous dialogue and bad 
acting.
        Who better to contribute to the bad acting than B-movie 
queen Alyssa Milano? She plays Reese's best friend, already skilled 
in the ways of sex with no-good older men. Alyssa's philosophy on 
relationships is, "It's power." Reese replies, "It's nuts," to Alyssa's 
response, "It doesn't feel good to be wanted?" None of us have any 
idea what she's talking about; after all, she hasn't been wanted since 
"Who's the Boss?" went off the air.
        Reese soon meets Marky Mark at the local teen nightclub, 
his opening line to her being, "Hey... you're not dancing." She could 
have sent him packing with the response, "You're not charting," but 
she instead revels in his advances because it's power, and it feels 
good to be wanted. She talks and kisses him until two in the 
morning, by which time her step-mom is yelling at her and she's 
shooting back sarcastic responses. Dad's out of town on a business 
trip, but Marky Mark's ready to charm him and the rest of the family 
(including the dog) when he gets back. It's such a good vibration, it's 
such a sweet sensation...
        Alyssa is also ready to charm Dad when he gets back, with 
some of the most ridiculous double entendres in movie history. She 
asks him to come to a carnival with her, saying, "You could ride the 
bumper cars... You could do that thing where you throw the ball at 
something and maybe win me a stuffed animal." Luckily, that 
subplot never goes anywhere, but what is immediately established 
is Dad's mistrust of Marky Mark. He can't put his finger on what he 
doesn't like about Mark (he's just so... marky) until he finds a used 
condom wrapper in his daughter's bedroom.
        Yes, Mark is hot for Reese's peanut butter cups, and takes 
her virginity during another of Dad's business trips. (That guy's got 
to find a new job!) The PG sex scenes in this R-rated movie are teen 
love at its finest, as a remake of the Rolling Stones' "Wild Horses" 
plays and this sexy dialogue exchange takes place.
        The honeymoon is soon over, though, as Marky Mark 
shows his violent streak and threatens various members of the 
family. FEAR seems at least twice as long as it is, the various plot 
twists and developments apparent to most audience members a 
mile away until. There's not much good about FEAR, especially 
since every other made-for-video movie nowadays features this 
plot with a lot more sex thrown in. This movie should have never 
even made it to theaters. Just ship it directly to Cinemax and save 
us some time.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for Pocahontas (1995)
        I guess I should point off first of all that I didn't actually pay 
to see this movie. I had nothing to do and it was on the dorm's cable 
network so I decided to give it a whirl, with the full knowledge that 
this would be the most mediocre Disney cartoon since about 1946. In 
the tradition of all the history-bending Disney tales, POCAHONTAS 
takes pains to present the most politically-correct portrayal of Native 
Americans (can't even call 'em Indians anymore!) despite having a 
heroine that looks like Cindy Crawford and ignoring nearly all 
historical facts. For starters, the real Pocahontas was around twelve 
when she met John Smith but I don't see any "Pedophelia" song and 
dance number.
        As the story opens, Pocahontas is out singing to the animals 
and talking to the old woman tree spirit when the drunken, corrupt 
Englishmen arrive in the new world, led by the round Governor 
Ratcliffe (as for the way his character looks and talks, remember the 
Sheriff of Nottingham from ROBIN HOOD?) and John Smith. Here 
we get more factual White-Out applied to history. Smith didn't come 
over until the third Jamestown excursion, after all the original 
colonists were dying of dysentery (again, a song-and-dance number 
they left out), and he sure didn't look like Mel Gibson. Imagine the 
pairing of John Goodman and Christina Ricci and there's your real-life 
romance.
        We instantly are forced to side with the Ind... er, Native 
Americans upon seeing the rudeness of the settlers, who immediately 
dig up all the earth in search of gold. The natives don't take well to 
this intrusion, attacking once or twice. Ratcliffe asks what possible 
motive the "savages" would have for attacking God's people, to his 
effeminate servant's response, "Let's see, we stole their land, cut down 
their trees and dug up their earth."
        Alright, dammit! All us white guys know it was wrong to 
steal the land away from the Indians and force them into an existence 
of selling Navajo blankets on the side of the road, but I refuse to feel 
guilty about it. And if the Disney people want to make us all feel guilt 
about it, I don't think the proper medium is a cheery movie where the 
trees talk and everyone breaks into song at the drop of a tribal 
headdress. Maybe another black-and-white three hour epic detailing 
every minute of the inhumanity and suffering, but not a G-rated movie 
where a raccoon and a dog playfully fight over food in every other 
scene.
        So Pocahontas investigates the new visitors and meets Smith, 
who turns out to be a Not-Bad White Guy (the only one in the movie). 
After the customary song about how narrow-minded and self-centered 
the whiteys are for not realizing the trees do actually talk, the two end 
up falling in love. It's a match made in the pit of hell. The Indians are 
mad at her for befriending the enemy, not to mention the fact that 
she's already engaged to one of her own people ("But he's so... 
serious," Pocahontas claims in her 17th century valley girl voice. 
Welcome to Jamestown, 90210.), and Smith's friends are also upset 
he's wasting his superior Anglo self on the savage girl, even if she 
does look like this month's centerfold.
        I really don't know what to say about this one. PC-HONTAS 
annoyed me most of the time with its constant sensitivity issues and 
screwing around with history. Nowhere is that more evident than the 
happy ending, where the colonists realize the Indians are human after 
all and befriend them. Um, when did that one happen? Was it 
somewhere along that whole Trail of Tears thing when the Americans 
massacred 30,000 of them? Besides that, it's probably the least 
entertaining Disney animated feature in a long time. The songs are 
substandard and there are way too many of them. If you can overlook 
that and can control the vomit reflex every time we get a speech about 
ethnic intolerance and the stealing of land, maybe you'll be entertained 
by it. I wasn't.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Sixteen Candles (1984)
        I know I've personally experienced landmark birthdays that 
were less than ideal. My eighteenth birthday I had to get up at 6:30 to 
work in a college dining hall for three hours, followed by two hours 
of classes, three more hours in the dining hall, a couple hours reading 
three mammoth chapters on Romanesque and Gothic Architecture 
and a three hour photo shoot for a newspaper. But at least everyone 
knew it was my birthday. In SIXTEEN CANDLES, Samantha Baker 
(Molly Ringwald) goes through her sixteenth birthday without any 
of her family members remembering the big day.
        SIXTEEN CANDLES was John Hughes' debut film, the first 
of three over the next three years to star Ringwald. In this film, as in 
PRETTY IN PINK, Ringwald exemplifies those of us who get the 
short end of the stratification stick that is high school, where certain 
people are popular because of physical attributes and the rest of us 
are left behind. Ringwald is in love with Jake, the athletic senior who 
is already involved with the prom queen, who is more beautiful and 
actually has breasts. (We know this for a fsee them 
at the beginning of the movie.)
        Meanwhile, Ringwald is being lusted after by a freshman 
dork (Anthony Michael Hall) who makes a bet with his friends that 
he can bag Ringwald. The two instead have a meaningful 
conversation that night during a dance, in one of those Driver's 
Ed. simulators (and if there's anything that turns a woman on, it's 
a grainy film from the 60's produced in "Drivavision"), finding out 
they have the unrequited love thing in common, and Ringwald 
takes pity on Hall, giving him her panties to show his friends as 
evidence.
        The news of this "conquest" gets back to Jake, who -- it 
turns out -- has an attraction to Ringwald, as one of those rare 
teenage guys who long for a woman of substance rather than 
beauty. It's all so reminiscent of Hughes' later film, PRETTY IN 
PINK, in which Ringwald is attracted to rich Andrew McCarthy 
but doesn't think she has a chance with him because she doesn't 
adhere to the superficial rules of the in-crowd. Here too, things 
work out in a life-affirming way that assures us love can break 
all boundaries. I mean, shoot, Hall gets laid by the prom 
queen.
        I may be the only person to venture this opinion, but 
SIXTEEN CANDLES is a more entertaining, if not accurate film 
than the other Ringwald-Hughes collaborations (THE BREAKFAST 
CLUB, PRETTY IN PINK). It doesn't try to force drama like the other 
two, going instead for a more comedic focus in the midst of the usual 
teen movie conventions, like torturous school dances and wild 
parties. Hughes especially finds humor in the Chinese exchange 
student character Long Duk Dong, who discovers the joys of 
American life at the same dance and party that proves most other 
characters' undoing. Like most other aspects of the film, it would be 
offensive and disastrously unfunny if not handled in the proper way, 
which Hughes has actually done here, unlike the PRETTY PINK 
BREAKFAST CLUB films.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Nine Months (1995)
        That's exactly how long the movie felt to me. There weren't 
even nine laughs in NINE MONTHS. It's a terrible mess of a movie 
starring a terrible mess of a man, Mr. Hugh Grant, a huge dork. It's 
not the whole oral-sex/prostitution thing (referring to Grant, not me) 
that bugs me, it's the fact that Grant is annoying. Not just Adam 
Sandler-annoying, we're talking Jim Carrey-annoying. 
        Since when do eye flutters and nervous smiles pass for 
acting? But, on the other hand, since when do really bad slapstick (a 
fistfight in the delivery room culminating in Grant's head in Joan 
Cusack's lap--a scene he paid $60 to have included in the movie) and 
obscene double entendres (Robin Williams, the obstetrician, tells 
Grant's pregnant girlfriend she has "a big pussy," referring of course to 
the size of the cat hairs on her coat, but nonetheless, Grant paid $60 to 
have the exchange included in the movie) pass for comedy?
        NINE MONTHS is a predictable cookie-cutter movie with no 
originality in humor or plot. Hugh Grant plays a successful child 
psychiatrist. Why a child psychologist? So the scriptwriters could 
inject the following unfunny exchange:
        GRANT (flutters eyelashes, offers a nervous smile, then 
responds in his annoying English accent and I-think-I-actually-have-
talent attitude): Could you possibly elaborate on that?
        More like a Hugh asshole, but that's beside the point, which 
is: NINE MONTHS includes too many needlessly stupid jokes that get 
laughs from the ten year olds in the audience while everyone else 
shakes his or her head in disbelief. 
        So, anyway, Grant finds out his girlfriend is pregnant and 
does his usual reaction (fluttered eyelashes, nervous smiles). This 
paves the way for every possible pregnancy/child birth gag in the book, 
especially since Grant's equally annoying friend's wife is also 
pregnant. The annoying friend is played by Tom Arnold, who provides 
most of the cacophonous slapstick, none of which is funny, such as a 
scene where Arnold beats up a costumed "Arnie the Dinosaur" (you 
draw your own parallels on that one) in a toy store.
        The only interesting character in the movie is played by Jeff 
Goldblum, who should have hid himself away somewhere after the 
dreadful HIDEAWAY, as an artist with a fear of (and simultaneous 
longing for) commitment. Not even Robin Williams, who plays a 
Russian doctor who has recently decided to switch from veterinary 
medicine to obstetrics, has much humor. His is a one-joke character--
the old foreign-guy-who-mispronounces-English stereotype (did 
someone say Yakov Smirnov? That's my favorite vodka, by the way), 
hence the line "Now it's time to take a look at your Volvo," another 
nasty but unamusing joke, except this one goes right over the ten year 
olds' heads, while the adults simultaneously groan.
        NINE MONTHS is a complete failure, low on laughs and 
intelligence and high on loud, unfunny slapstick, failed jokes and 
other uninspired lunacy. Hugh Grant's Sunset Boulevard arrest 
(please, no caught-with-his-pants-down jokes) may bring more people 
into the theaters, but they certainly won't leave with a smile on their 
faces, not after 90 minutes of Grant's nervous smiles. Everything in 
the movie is so forced, so unauthentic that anyone with an I.Q. over 80 
(sorry, Hugh) will know they wasted their money on an unfulfilled 
desire. But at least they didn't spend 60 bucks for it.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Crimson Tide (1995)
     Ever since moving in with a gun- and war-obsessed ROTC college
roommate I've found myself despising anything associated with the
military, so when I saw the opening of CRIMSON TIDE, with a bunch of
naval drills and military stereotypes, I wasn't prepared to like the
movie. I fully expected to give it a bad review, letting it join the
ranks of other movies I've sat through for the pleasure of ripping them
apart later in the form of a written review.
     But I got a different kind of pleasure out of CRIMSON TIDE--and
I'm not talking about what Pee Wee Herman does while watching movies
either.  No, I actually found myself liking this movie. Sure, it's got
a very slow start.  After watching it for half an hour, I was thinking
Review be damned, I'm not sitting through this boring movie.  That's
when it grabbed me (and, again I say, this has nothing to do with Pee
Wee Herman).
     CRIMSON TIDE is a well-crafted thriller (except for those first
thirty minutes) with plenty of drama and suspense. Gene Hackman plays a
submarine captain called into action when a Russian revolt attempt
poses a global nuclear threat. Denzel Washington plays the first mate
(forgive me if I don't know the technical term for his position--I'm
sure my roommate could tell you if he ever talked). The two come into
disagreement when an Emergency Action Message dealing with their
impending launch of missiles at Russia is cut off midway through the
message.
     Hackman, itchy macho trigger finger intact, wants to launch the
missiles without full confirmation. Washington, however, realizes such
an action would doom the earth to full-scale nuclear holocaust, so it
might be worth waiting a few minutes to find out for sure whether or
not they'll be ending history as we know it with the touch of a
button.  After that, the rivalry between the two takes off. You know,
mutiny, death, fist fights, the stuff tense action movies are made of.
And CRIMSON TIDE is a good one.

Title
Review for There's Something About Mary (1998)
        I thought DUMB AND DUMBER was tasteless. I thought KINGPIN 
was even more tasteless. Little did I know the Farrely Brothers' most 
conventional comedy, THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY, would have the 
least taste of all. This is a movie where a woman uses semen as hair 
gel, a dog receives electroshock therapy and mouth-to-mouth 
resuscitation (first DR. DOLITTLE, now this -- is 1998 the summer of 
performing mouth-to-mouth on animals for laughs?), and a man traps 
his genitals in his zipper.
        Cameron Diaz, previously one of the more distinguished 
young actresses, presides over the gutteral humor with grace, poise 
and a lot more comedic sense than I would have pegged her for. As the 
title character, she's the object of Ben Stiller's affection. Simian Stiller, 
who has disgraced such movies as THE CABLE GUY and IF LUCY FELL, 
finally picks a good comedy again. It's been two years since FLIRTING 
WITH DISASTER, but Stiller still remembers how to play the horny 
loser role.
        The movie begins in 1985, exploiting the '80s as so many of 
today's comedies manage to do. There's even a Rubik's Cube, for God's 
sake, and the ultimate reminder of the '80s -- Markie Post from "Night 
Court." She plays Diaz's mother, while Some Random Black Guy 
plays the stepfather. (Yes, an afro is mined for laughs.) Less politically 
correct is Diaz's brother, a retarded kid who asks everyone where his 
baseball is and gets picked on. When Stiller stands up for her brother, 
Diaz asks him to the prom and he shows up in a bad tuxedo, all ready 
to go until the Zipper Incident occurs in the bathroom.
        Flashforward to the present, Stiller's bleeding genitalia 
having ruined any chance of happiness with Mary. As a thirtyish loser 
(you know he's a loser because his best friend is Chris Elliot), he 
suddenly decides to look up his old would-be flame, and hires a sleazy 
detective friend of Elliot's to find her. Matt Dillon, looking nothing 
like himself, plays the detective, who gets one look at Diaz in a bra 
and decides he's in love with her.
        It's a fun sitcom plot, the loser guy who pretends to be 
someone else to win the hand of the beautiful woman. This version is 
pretty close to Woody Allen in EVERYONE SAYS I LOVE YOU -- Dillon has 
access to inside information about Mary and pretends to be everything 
she wants in a man. She falls for it about the same time Stiller decides 
he has to come to Florida. What ensues is a nonstop saga of disgusting 
humor, a lot of it incredibly funny.
        What THERE'S SOMETHING ABOUT MARY boils down to is the first 
romantic comedy about a stalker. Stiller is the least of the evils, in a 
movie where the suitors include the private detective who listens in on 
her conversations, the pizza boy pretending to be an English man in 
arm braces and a shoe fetishist. Surprisingly, for a movie this daring 
in plot and gags, the ending is about as conventional and predictable 
as one could expect. It's a good movie, but when will we see a movie 
this bold that actually functions as satire right to the end?
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for Face/Off (1997)
        In a summer populated with stinker action flicks like 
SPEED 2 and THE LOST WORLD, John Woo's FACE/OFF is a 
breath of Fresh/Air. This is just what I want from an action movie -- 
something that gives us artistic, well-choreographed scenes of 
violence and explosions contained in an intelligent plot about 
interesting characters we care about. That's the recipe right there, 
and the auto-pilot writing of those two sequel action flicks 
shortchanged us in at least half of those departments.
        FACE/OFF takes the time-worn body-switching premise 
and makes it fascinating again. John Travolta plays a cop who's 
spent most of his adult life tracking down psycho criminal Nicolas 
Cage, to the chagrin of his sick-and-tired-of-it-but-still-standing-by-
her-man wife Joan Allen. When Travolta finally captures Cage after 
an airplane hangar, he can't let it go at that. He lets himself get 
sucked back into the case when he finds out Cage planted a bomb 
somewhere in the city.
        If a doctor came to you with the idea of cutting your face 
off and putting it on the head of your mortal enemy and doing the 
same to your enemy, you'd give the doctor a swift kick to the groin 
followed by the meanest rectal exam ever, right? Not Travolta. He 
sits right down in the chair and lets them cut his distinguished 
features right off his head. A few laser-induced hairline changes and 
one microchip voice implant later, Travolta is Cage and a comatose 
Cage is left faceless in an abandoned hospital.
        The plan is to send Travolta/Cage into prison so he can 
pump Cage's accomplice brother for information about the bomb. 
It doesn't work too well -- oh, he gets the information within a few 
scenes, but prison life is hell for poor John/Nick. He has to wear 
these heavy metallic boots that track his whereabouts at all times, 
take abuse from the Commie guards and get his ass whooped by 
fellow inmates. And, to top it all off, his damn face itches!
        Cue the faceless Cage, who soon wakes up from his coma. 
There's no one guarding him, no one in the entire building in fact, 
and before long, his henchmen have the doctor at gunpoint, forcing 
him to put Travolta's face on his head. Now Cage/Travolta has the 
upper hand, killing the few people who know of Cage/Travolta's 
mission and even showing up at prison to visit Travolta/Cage. It's 
delicious torture watching Travolta/Cage's world fall apart before 
his eyes, playing off the universal fear of being completely alone in a 
situation.
        The movie never stops being fascinating, as T/C tries to 
break out of jail and stop C/T, and C/T assumes Travolta's former 
life as a star agent of the law and a family man. Woo keeps the pace 
moving and gives us plenty of action to boot, but the key to the film 
is in the performances of Travolta and Cage. Cage in the trapped 
Travolta role has to go from psycho to mellow within minutes, but 
it's Travolta's mellow-to-psycho transformation that is the most fun 
to watch. The premise is outrageous, but these actors almost make it 
believable.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Nick of Time (1995)
        As Perot would say, this is just sa-a-a-a-ad. NICK OF TIME 
openly rips off Hitchcock by exploiting the fact that it is filmed in 
"real time" (that is, one screen minute equals one real life minute -- no 
cutting to later that day or two weeks later), but it's all boring enough 
that it resembles life's real time. I've already written about movies that
are boring and padded and still only ninety minutes long and NICK 
OF TIME is definitely one of those. It could have been an hour-long 
episode of any one of the "Playhouse" shows of the 50's and 60's or 
maybe a half-hour tale from the crypt today.
        The film opens with a giant closeup of a clock. Get used to 
that image because you'll see at least fifty others before NICK OF 
TIME is over. The director constantly and needlessly shoves the 
real-time thing in our faces and -- you know what? -- it isn't even 
accurate. By the time the movie clock goes from 12:00 to 1:30pm, 
only seventy-six minutes have passed. So much for the integrity 
of "real time."
        Johnny Depp plays a CPA who is unwillingly drawn into a 
murder conspiracy as Christopher Walken approaches him and his 
young daughter in a bus station, flashing a badge and asking in his 
usual creepy tone if Depp will accompany him to his van. He does 
and, once he gets there, he discovers his daughter will be held 
hostage by Walken's accomplice until Depp assassinates the 
governor. Any attempt to tell the police or anyone else about 
his dilemma will bring instant death to his daughter.
        So, for the next hour or so, Depp wanders aimlessly around 
a hotel with gun in pocket, making repeated attempts to tell people 
his "big problem," after which Walken will pop up and remind him 
his daughter will die if he doesn't kill the governor by 1:30. Soon 
enough, we discover almost everyone in the governor's administration 
is in on the conspiracy, which raises an inevitable question. If people 
on the inside are involved in this, why wouldn't one of them 
orchestrate the murder himself instead of having Walken find 
a guy off the street to kill her? I mean, if it was just Walken and 
his accomplice acting out some terrorist fantasy, it would make 
sense, but if the governor's own husband wants her dead, he can 
find a way to do it and make it look like an accident. But then we 
wouldn't have a plot, would we?
        NICK OF TIME mixes a gimmick and premise that could 
have worked incredibly well together and instead drives it into the 
ground by showing us a lot of nothing. The whole movie is basically 
Depp wandering around aimlessly with Walken in the background, 
making sure he doesn't go to the police. And those closeups of the 
clock get old fast. As far as the whole time metaphor goes, I'd only 
suggest watching NICK OF TIME on the October night we turn our 
clocks back. That way, you'll only waste half-an-hour on this lifeless 
thriller instead of the full ninety minutes.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Muppet Christmas Carol, The (1992)
THE MUPPET MOVIE (1979) ***1/2
        This movie is everything THE MUPPET CHRISTMAS 
CAROL wasn't. This one's well-written, funny and Kermit and the 
others don't take a back seat to the human co-stars, even though there 
are over twenty Hollywood superstars of yesterdecade thrown in. The 
only reason I don't give THE MUPPET MOVIE four stars is because of 
the stupid songs they sing. But the rest of the movie is great. We 
actually get to find out where Kermit came from (Well, when two 
frogs _really_ love each other...).
        At the beginning of the movie, Kermit is sitting on a log with 
his banjo, completely surrounded by water (I guess Henson had to hold 
his breath for a while), singing a merry little song. He is discovered by 
a big Hollywood agent (Dom Deluise--now you know why I said "big") 
who just happens to be rowing by in a canoe at the time (He took a 
wrong turn in Toledo) and tells Kermit he's got talent.  Kermit agrees, 
and sets off on a journey to Hollywood.
        Before he gets very far, he finds Fozzie "Wocka Wocka" the 
Bear, a struggling nightclub comic, and the two resume travel in 
Fozzie's Winnebago which he inherited from his uncle, who isn't dead, 
just hibernating. They are intercepted by Colonel Sanders' evil twin, 
who owns a chain of fried frog leg restaurants and wants Kermit as his 
spokesfrog. Kermit will do nothing of the sort, however, and spends 
the rest of the movie being pursued by the frog leg guy.
        En route, he manages to pick up Miss Piggy, Rowlf the Dog, 
the Electric Mayhem Band, Dr. Bunsen Honeydew and Beaker as well 
as running into a mad scientist (Mel Brooks) who wants Kermit's 
brain, a very sarcastic waiter (Steve Martin), a used car salesman 
(Milton Berle) and countless other walk-on actors.
        The only thing I can't figure out was how Kermit was able to 
ride a bicycle. But they say once you learn how, you'll never forget for 
the rest of your life.
THE GREAT MUPPET CAPER (1981) **1/2
        The second muppet movie is also the second worst. It's not as 
fresh or funny as THE MUPPET MOVIE (see THE MUPPETS TAKE 
MANHATTAN), but it's sure a whole lot better than THE MUPPET 
CHRISTMAS CAROL (see THE MUPPET MOVIE). This time, the 
muppets play reporters out to get to the bottom of a jewel theft. In the 
middle of all this is more lame song-and-dance numbers and guest star 
cameos, most of which I didn't recognize.
        My advice, stick with the original MUPPET MOVIE and the 
MANHATTAN one (see THE MUPPET CHRISTMAS CAROL or THE 
GREAT MUPPET CAPER). Even the reviews for those movies are 
better than this one.
THE MUPPETS TAKE MANHATTAN (1984) ***
        Sue me, but I like those muppet movies (except for that stupid 
Christmas one). They have a certain level of adult sophistication and 
humor that goes right over the heads of the kids these movies are 
targeted toward. That's why I watch these movies, you know, to 
appreciate the sophisticated adult humor rather than the surface level 
gags and songs. Yeah right. And I read Playboy for the articles.
        Anyway, this time Kermit and the gang are off to new York 
to try to get their little musical on Broadway. They soon discover 
Times Square patrons aren't really that interested in fully-clothed 
singing animals. So while Kermit tries to find a play producer who 
will put them on Broadway, the Muppets all have to get jobs in New 
York. I tell you, the things those muppets will do for money. I found 
the Miss Piggy topless bar scene to be quite interesting.
THE MUPPET CHRISTMAS CAROL (1992) *1/2
        Oh boy, talk about your major disappointments. When I see 
the word "muppet" in the title, I expect something major, but it seems 
that since Jim Henson... uh... passed on, those muppets just aren't the 
same. In their fourth movie, they try to do a muppet version of that 
Dickensian tale of Ebeneazer and the three ghosts... or was it seven 
dwarfs?
        Anyway, Disney did it much better when Mickey was playing 
Bob Crachit and Uncle Scrooge was playing (guess who) Scrooge. In 
the muppet version, Michael Caine plays Scrooge and Kermit the frog 
plays Crachit. The main problem with this movie, besides the bad 
writing (No offense, Dickens), is that the story is about Scrooge and 
the muppets are just in the background. Kermit's only got a supporting 
role this time and he wasn't too happy about it. I hear he turned green.
        And, as in any movie rated G, the characters break into song 
at the drop of a puppet. Even Scrooge sings! I find it hard to believe 
the people in movies that sing just make up the words and elaborate 
staging on the spot and that the background music comes from 
nowhere yet is everywhere, like they'd like us to believe. And I suspect 
the muppets don't do their own stunts either.
        I think Jim Henson just turned over in his grave. I mean, the 
jokes inside Bazooka bubble gum wrappers are funnier than this! So, 
to sum up: Muppets--good, Michael Caine--okay, Songs--bad, 
Jokes--worse, Jim Henson--dead.
No snide comments, please. I wrote those when I was fifteen years old.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for On Her Majesty's Secret Service (1969)
ON HER MAJESTY'S SECRET SERVICE (1969) **
        In between YOU ONLY LIVE TWICE and DIAMONDS 
ARE FOREVER was this odd little James Bond film.. I shouldn't call 
it a little film; it's 140-minute running time is the longest of the Bond 
series. It's also the only one to star George Lazenby (Never heard of 
him? Neither have I.) as 007. Being sandwiched between two Sean 
Connery movies makes this one look that much more amateurish in 
comparison.
        The epic running time is absolutely unnecessary, as the real 
story doesn't begin for an hour and a half, by which time most other 
movies would be almost over. That first 90 minutes gives us a lot of 
expository information with little action, save the traditional opening 
teaser, and that's not even up to par with the other movies in the series.
        Bond is still after Blofeld (who first popped in YOLT and 
again in DAF and is now played by Telly "Kojak" Savales) here, but 
tired enough of chasing him to take a two-week leave of absence from 
the service. That's when he meets Tracy (Diana Rigg, a.k.a. Emma 
Peel of "The Avengers"), the first woman he truly falls in love with. (I 
guess 700 really is his lucky number.) And certainly his plans for 
marriage don't have anything to do with the fact that Tracy's father, a 
crime boss, offered valuable information about Blofeld's whereabouts if 
Bond would marry his daughter.
        So Bond rushes off to Blofeld's mountain hideout, populated 
by a bevy of beauties who think he's curing them of their allergies, 
when he's really grooming them to destroy Western civilization as we 
know it. (Talk about your unconventional therapy techniques!) Bond 
meets his three-woman quota there before Blofeld discovers that he's 
not really a genealogist on research. The usual death traps and chases 
ensue, including a ski run chase that would be redone and improved 
upon in THE SPY WHO LOVED ME.
        ON HER MAJESTY'S SECRET SERVICE has a little merit. 
The story is decent, albeit way too overblown and long-winded, but 
adding the romance aspect to the Bond series was a good idea, even if 
they did have to add the obligatory young-couple-in-love song 
montage. And there is a truly touching moment at the end of the 
movie. But on the whole, this movie is to be viewed only by the Bond 
fan who absolutely has to see every movie in the series. Otherwise, just 
skip right over it and you won't miss a thing.
        OHMSS has far less action than the others and George 
Lazenby doesn't quite cut the mustard as James Bond. (He does cut the 
cheese a few times, to the disgust of the other characters.) Rolling 
Stone called Lazenby "a one-shot joke" and I have to agree. The 
Rolling Stones called him "Jumpin' Jack Flash" and I have to say I 
have no idea what that means.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Alice (1990)
        Woody Allen goes into a weird wonderland in this 
fantasy romance starring Mia Farrow, in her eleventh consecutive 
Allen film. Here, she plays a disenchanted housewife who has lived 
off her husband's money without ever having lived a life of her own. 
Thoughts of independence begin to pop into her head under 
hypnosis at the office of Dr. Wang, a radical Chinese (although 
you'd never know it from the name) healer who prescribes herbs 
and diagnoses through the pulse.
        Wang gives her several batches of herbs that further 
along her contemplations of an affair with Joe Mantegna. The 
first make her lose all inhibitions and become overly flirtatious 
with Mantegna, going so far as to set up a rendezvous at the zoo 
(that rhymes) that she doesn't show up for when the drugs wear 
off and she becomes her mousy self again. The second make her 
invisible (Shortly after ALICE came out, invisibility drugs became 
available over the counter.), so she can listen in on Mantegna's 
comments about her. And the third bring on the apparition of a 
dead ex-boyfriend (Alec Baldwin), who advises her to pursue 
the affair.
        The herbs aren't without their negative effects. Mia finds 
herself lying to her husband (William Hurt, who is more than a little 
hurt by the news of the affair) and discovers her friends' (including 
backstabbing TV executive Cybil Shepherd) true feelings about her. 
As with every Woody Allen movie, the ending brings on a lot of 
learning for its main character through painful events (very much 
like the far-superior THE PURPLE ROSE OF CAIRO). Along the 
way, ALICE suffers from an overdose of charm, melodrama and 
forced substance. It's more than a little ironic that a man who is 
normally so laughable for the right reasons once in awhile makes 
movies that are laughable for the wrong reasons.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Wolf (1994)
        Jack Nicholson "marks his territory" here with a good 
(if not a little too subdued) thriller/horror film about a businessman 
who finds his life changing after being bitten by a wolf. Soon he 
has telescopic vision, super hearing, hightened smell and the sex 
drive of an 18-year-old (don't even think it--I'm only 17). There's 
another little side-effect of his newfound wolfdom: Every night he 
sneakes out of bed and rips someone's throat out with his teeth, 
only to forget about it by morning (ah yes, the old "sleep-killing" 
alibi -- OJ's latest defense). [Note: this review written in early 1995. 
I'm now 18 and O.J. walks free.]
        Nicholson's rival, in business and in bed, is a fellow 
employee who gets Nicholson's job as senior editor at a publishing 
company, and also gets the job done at home with Nicholson's wife, 
if you know what I mean. This doesn't make the ol' wolf too happy 
and, when his wife is discovered in Central Park, throat missing, 
you know who the Feds point the finger at--Charles Grodin's dog 
Beethoven. Ah yes, the old canine-framed-for-murder alibi (OJ's 
next defense), which leaves Nicholson free to cavort freely 
(because, you know, he's free) with the boss' daughter, the 
lovely Michelle Pfeiffer (with the not-so-lovely last name). 
Who would have thought, a wolf and a cat? Ain't that 
weird?
        Nicholson reveals his "hairy" problem to Pfeiffer who, as 
you'd expect, doesn't take him seriously for a second (a problem I 
know all too well. What, you think that's a joke? I'm serious, no one 
takes me seriously. Okay, that was a joke, but at least I'm trying to 
be serious about this no one taking me seriously issue. And yes, I 
do realize how seriously stupid this routine is, but I'm trying to show 
I'm not all fun and games... I'm also unfunny games. What does that 
mean? I seriously don't know). She soon changes her mind, though, 
when Nicholson brings her a dead rabbit in his mouth for 
Valentine's Day.
        Sure, WOLF is a little strange and is the victim of a stupid 
ending, but Nicholson and Pfeiffer make such a cute couple. Who 
would have thought, the Joker and Catwoman finally together? I 
was wondering when she'd dump that no-good Riddler.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Live and Let Die (1973)
        As far as the obligatory James Bond theme song goes, the one 
here, by Paul McCartney and Wings (not the dreaded four-times-a-
day-on-USA sitcom), is by far the best. (Don't tell me those Swedish 
meatballs a-ha even come close with "The Living Daylights.") Also, 
LIVE AND LET DIE brags the accomplishment of having more black 
people than the other seventeen Bond movies combined.
        It's kind of sad, actually, to have to hear James Bond being 
referred to as "honkey" and "cue ball" while in Harlem. (You wouldn't 
think a white guy would get that kind of treatment in Harlem, but oh 
how the times have changed.) This dramatic shift in focus is most 
likely the result of Louis Farrakhan replacing David Duke as executive 
producer of the Bond series.
        That's not the only replacement we see in LIVE AND LET 
DIE. Roger Moore replaces Sean Connery as 007, beginning a seven-
movie run extending through 1985's A VIEW TO A KILL. Moore, 
naturally, doesn't completely capture the smooth, debonair feel 
Connery put forth in his six outings as the secret agent, but he does 
assume the role surprisingly well. He'd almost be on the same level as 
Connery if not for the fact that he reminds me so much of Adam West, 
TV's Batman. Or is it just my imagination running away with me?
        The plot mixes the typical drug lord scenario with voodoo, 
shifting from Harlem to San Monique to New Orleans in pursuit of 
Mr. Big. Solitaire, Bond's third girl of the movie, is a Tarot card 
reader. Bond stacks a deck of cards with "The Lovers" in an attempt to 
poke her. (Get it? Cards. Poker.) He takes her virginity away, which in 
turn takes away her magical ability to read the future. (She should 
have seen it coming, I say.) So was it worth it, Mr. Bond? Huh? Just so 
she could be your 863rd conquest?
        LIVE AND LET DIE is entertaining in two ways. First, it 
works as a straight action movie almost the entire time. The only lapse 
is an overlong boat chase in which bumbling redneck Sheriff Pepper 
(whose brother is a Sergeant) is introduced as some kind of comic 
relief, trying to capture Bond and his pursuers. Second, LIVE AND 
LET DIE is more dated than most other Bond movies, especially with 
its introduction of jive talkin', bushy-sideburned blaxploitation 
villains, giving it an unintended camp hilarity.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Babe (1995)
        Somehow, from all the hype, I was expecting BABE to be one 
of the most entertaining movies ever made. Don't get me wrong, it's 
definitely ninety minutes of fun for the entire family with no sex, 
violence or anti-Semetic content (all of a sudden I feel like Michael 
Medved), but it won't go down in history as any kind of classic, at least 
not in my book (this book, of course). I'll leave all the jokes about pigs 
who are one day nominated for Oscars and the next day killed by 
Oscar Meyer to the talk show hosts who have said it all a thousand 
times, but I'll admit the concept of a pig as the cute hero of a movie 
never struck me before watching it, but I now realize it can be 
done -- and done well.
        Babe is born in the stockyard, where sooner or later all pigs 
are "chosen" to be marched onto the truck to heaven. (I wouldn't call 
Safeway "heaven," but it's only a movie after all.) Babe is the only pig 
who doesn't get picked for slaughtering because he's a runt and we all 
know little pigs like that are hardly worth the McDonald's circular 
bacon strips they eventually become. So he ends up being given to an 
old farmer (James Cromwell) as a prize for winning a state fair 
midway game. It beats one of those plastic whistles, I guess.
        The farmer's wife (who, oddly enough, looks like a pig 
herself) is looking forward to fattening up the pig so she can serve the 
family a nice Christmas ham, but Babe soon proves his worth in a 
different field -- sheep-herding. His tactic involves asking the sheep 
nicely to come into the corral, rather than barking and biting them on 
the legs (and I think if Clinton would do this he'd find Congress that 
much more cooperative). He soon becomes the prize sheep dog / pig in 
the farmer's eyes, taking the place of a bitter sheep dog named Rex. So 
the farmer decides to make Christmas dinner out of Rex instead and 
spare Babe's life... I'm lying, of course.
        The amazing thing about BABE is of course that they 
managed to make all the animals' lips move to appear as if they were 
talking, all without any form of electric shock. It's almost like "Mr. 
Ed" multiplied by a hundred, with talking dogs, pigs, horses (of 
course, of course), sheep and a duck who thinks he's a rooster. BABE 
has a wonderful surreality to it that makes it appeal to children and 
adults, with an intelligent sense of humor and saccharine sweetness to 
boot.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Little Mermaid, The (1989)
        Eight years after its release, Disney has decided to 
re-release THE LITTLE MERMAID theatrically for 17 days (and 17 
long nights) only. Coincidentally, it was reintroduced to theaters the 
same day Fox's animated film ANASTASIA was released. You know 
Disney, they can't deal with the threat of any other studio getting 
even a small piece of the crust of the kiddie entertainment pie, so 
when someone else wants to make a little money, they counter with 
an old "masterpiece" from their vault and, you know what, I went to 
see this 1989 cartoon rather than the brand new one from Fox. Let 
no one say Disney is losing its monopoly on the market. They still 
have hotels on Boardwalk _and_ Park Place.
        Believe it or not, today, November 25, 1997, at 5:05 p.m., I 
saw THE LITTLE MERMAID for the first time. It took me a few 
years to get over an aversion to this movie that was caused seven 
years ago, when I stayed with one of my mom's friends for a couple 
weeks. They had a young child who listened to the LITTLE 
MERMAID soundtrack constantly and, over that two week period, I 
heard every song from the movie probably a hundred times. By the 
time I got back home, I promised myself I'd never see the movie. But 
promises are made to be broken, especially when you're looking at a 
17-day, limited engagement. Damn those shrewd Disney marketers 
and their mind games.
        THE LITTLE MERMAID is based on a Hans Christian 
Anderson fairy tale, but it's Disney-ized, which means lots of talking 
animals and bursting into song. It also means the heroine is a total 
babe who shows off cleavage from a seashell bra at all times. I never 
wanted so much to be a pair of shells... The heroine, of course, is 
Ariel (voice of Jodi Benson), a 16-year-old mermaid who is going 
through that rebellious phase. She skips her concert to explore a 
wrecked ship and hang out with a seagull that talks like Buddy 
Hackett, who tries to orient her to the mysterious world of humans.
        She's also dealing with feelings she hasn't had before -- 
which comes when you get scales in places you didn't use to have 
them -- about a handsome prince (no Disney movie would be 
complete without one). Her father, King Triton of the merpeople, 
strictly forbids such lusting after the ways of the "savage" humans, 
in a condemnation that reads as a not-so-subtle analogy about old-
fashioned parents who forbid interracial dating. What's a king to do, 
though? The girl's in love and even total destruction of her little 
shrine to the human world doesn't deter her.
        Ariel saves the prince's life when a hurricane rises up, and 
just has to meet him. She makes a deal with Ursula, the sea witch 
(voice of Pat Carroll). You know she's evil because she has a huge 
potbelly and one of the worst asses in cartoon history. She also has 
octopus tentacles for feet (something those Dr. Scholl's corn pads 
will not fix) and offers to help Ariel out. She'll make her a human 
for three days if Ariel will give up her pretty voice; Ariel has three 
days to make that prince kiss her, or else she becomes a slave to the 
witch FOREVER. And if she pricks her finger on a sewing machine 
or eats an evil apple, she'll fall asleep FOREVER.
        It's a simplistic plot, yes, but THE LITTLE MERMAID was 
a revolution in the Disney world, coming after such lackluster efforts 
as THE BLACK CAULDRON and OLIVER AND COMPANY. It ranks as one of the 
best Disney cartoons, certainly since the '50s. All the elements are 
there -- memorable songs like "Under the Sea" and "Kiss the Girl," 
cartoon animals like Sebastian and Flounder, an evil villain who 
still has characterization and charm, and a fair amount of humor 
that caters to adults as well as children. THE LITTLE MERMAID is 
worth a big-screen ticket in 1997, so hurry up, you only have five 
days left.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America for more than 1/25th of a century!

Title
Review for From Russia with Love (1963)
        This second movie in the James Bond series is better than the 
first, DR. NO, but still not quite as good as GOLDFINGER, the third. 
FROM RUSSIA is notable, though, in that it's the only Sean Connery 
Bond film where Bond gets it on with four different women, including 
two gypsy women at the same time. Now that's a man with a license 
for more than just killing.
        This time, the race is on to see who will get ahold of a new 
decryption technology--the good guys (British intelligence) or the bad 
guys (SPECTRE). SPECTRE gets the jump on 007 by sending him 
one of their own, a beautiful Russian woman who claims to have 
defected from the KGB. She doesn't even know she's working for 
SPECTRE (that's how clever those guys are) and she's convinced she'll 
be doing Mother Russia a great service by giving Bond false 
information. She ends up giving Bond a lot more--and falling in love 
with him as a result.
        FROM RUSSIA WITH LOVE moves more slowly than most 
of the later Bond movies, but is still definitely entertaining, and meets 
the quota of chases, explosions, shootouts, belly dancers, cat fights and 
other degrading depictions of women. How James Bond manages to 
sleep with all those women and still not catch every sexually 
transmitted disease under the sun is beyond me. Maybe it helps to stay 
away from female characters named Colonel Klapp.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Grumpy Old Men (1993)
        Most people should be able to find better things to do than 
spend two hours hearing 80-year-old hemorrhoid sufferers yell "Eat 
my shorts!" at each other. That's pretty much the maturity level of 
this movie. After all, what could you expect Walter Matthau to 
follow DENNIS THE MENACE with? The sad part is, though, I 
actually found a lot of this amusing.
        GRUMPY OLD MEN consists of Walter and Jack Lemmon 
hurling childish insults at each other and pulling equally childish 
pranks. Over the course of your two lucky hours watching this 
movie (which hopefully you didn't pay $7.50 to see), you'll see 
Matthau sink Lemmon's icehouse, Lemmon put a fish in Matthau's 
car, Matthau arrange for a giant mound of snow to fall on Lemmon's 
head, Lemmon cancel Matthau's social security, etc. This movie 
may make the nation's opinion of the elderly fall even lower than 
the Medic Alert commercial ("I've fallen... and I can't get up!") 
did.
        Then, midway through the movie, the plot shifts as 
Lemmon and Matthau make a bet on which one can bed Ann 
Margret first. That's got to be more than any sane individual can 
take. But if you stick around for the closing credits, you'll hear a 
90-year-old Burgess Meredith's colorful euphimisms for sex. Oh, 
great. Nothing seems more funny to me than the "horny old man" 
stereotype saying things like, "Looks like he's about to take the 
skin boat to tuna town." Maybe euthanasia's not as cruel as we 
thought...
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Twelve Monkeys (1995)
        12 MONKEYS is the latest from bizarre science-fiction 
director Terry Gilliam (BRAZIL), a thoroughly interesting time-travel 
epic starring Bruce Willis and Brad Pitt... So where are the other ten 
monkeys? Just a joke, you guys. Pitt has finally earned my respect in 
12 MONKEYS as the psychotic millionaire's son whom Willis comes 
from the future to stop (an Oscar-nominated performance, by the way). 
Life in Willis' time is confined to the underground, a deadly virus 
lurking above the surface. He is sent back to 1990 to get a sample of 
the stuff so the doctors of the future can immunize themselves and see 
the light of day again.
        His mission backfires when he is committed to a mental 
hospital. No one believes his story about the imminent destruction of 
humanity by the terrorist group Army of the Twelve Monkeys, 
particularly not psychiatrist Madeline Stowe (go figure). After a couple 
days associating with the nuts (including Pitt) and trying to escape 
from the hospital, Willis disappears from his cell, to everyone's 
surprise and dismay. He winds up in the year 1955, where his mom 
falls in love with him and Christopher Lloyd can't fix the DeLorean... 
Sorry, I always use that joke when reviewing time travel movies.
        Willis actually ends up in his time, with the society leaders 
who sent him cursing him for a failed mission. He convinces them to 
give him one more chance and they send him to the year 1996, six 
years after he disappeared from the mental hospital. He kidnaps 
Stowe, who remembers his mysterious escape from the hospital six 
years ago, but she refuses to help him, still thinking he's nuts and of 
course you can't blame her for that. Predictably, she slowly comes to 
realize he actually has been sent from the future, about the same time 
Willis becomes convinced he's insane after all.
        This all escalates to the airport climax, with more twists than 
one of those donuts with all the twists (you know what I'm talking 
about here). The movie's ending leaves a lot of details open-ended, as 
the paradox of time travel dictates, while also leaving other details 
open to interpretation. The whole movie, though, is fast-paced and 
exciting, and possibly a little confusing for the less abstract thinkers in 
the audience. Gilliam adds his uniquely original directorial style to 
this uniquely original story to make a uniquely original movie for 
thriller and science-fiction movie lovers alike.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America for over 1/50th of a century!

Title
Review for Sgt. Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band (1978)
        Obvously, no one has ever put the Bee Gees in the same
league with the Beatles, but for some reason, Barry, Robin and
Maurice (the Brothers Gibb) seem to think they can take on the legend
of the Fab Four. Like the other zero-star features in this book, SGT.
PEPPER is an absolutely dreadful, horrendous movie, especially for
Beatle fans. As someone who owns and enjoys the Abbey Road and
Sgt. Pepper albums, the elevator music renditions of such classics as
"Here Comes the Sun" (a.k.a. "Here Goes Our Career") and "Lucy in
the Sky With Diamonds" (a.k.a. "Guys in Leisure Suits With No
Talent") are more than painful.
        It's not just the Bee Gees doing frightfully bleak covers of
Beatle songs in this movie. Co-star Peter Frampton (oh boy) gets into
the act, along with George Burns' serious take on the song "Fixing a
Hole" (you'll laugh yourself silly during this number), Alice Cooper,
who thinks he's the voice of Satan in a remake of the effeminately
psychadelic "Because," Aerosmith with "Come Together" (if you're
wondering why Aerosmith agreed to be in this movie, just remember it
was during their heavy drug use period), Earth, Wind & Fire with a
disco version of "Got to Get You Into My Life," and Billy Preston in a
banana-yellow leisure suit, singing "Get Back" (sample lyric: "Maurice
was a man who thought he was a woman").
        The absolute worst remake in the movie (besides the fifteen
Bee Gee-Frampton numbers) is Steve Martin's version of "Maxwell's
Silver Hammer," a song from the Abbey Road album about a young
man who kills people with a hammer. Martin's version, unlike the
"Dentist" song from Little Shop of Horrors, ruins the spirit of the song,
where he voices the lyrics of the song instead of singing them, a clear
sign of absence of talent (Just think of all the times Madonna has done
that).
        The "plot" here has Sgt. Pepper's Lonely Hearts Club Band
(consisting of Frampton and the Bee Gees) getting discovered, signing
a contract after an orgy (You haven't lived until you've been to a PG
Bee Gee orgy), and rocketing to stardom (in that alternate world where
Frampton and the Bee Gees are considered talented). Meanwhile, the
movie's villain Mean Mr. Mustard (just like the song) is out to steal
their instruments (just like they stole the Beatles' songs), so they won't
be able to make their musical magic. Like they can't find another
synthesizer and drum machine at the shop around the corner. Other
characters from Beatle songs include Mr. Kite (George Burns), Lucy
(in the sky with diamonds) and Strawberry Fields (I'm serious).
        In addition to the bad Beatle remakes, Frampton and The Bee
Gees try to come off as the world's most successful ladies' men (i.e.
Robin sitting on a pool diving board, singing "She's so Heavy!" while
stroking the legs of two beautiful women), but instead look like the
gayest foursome on the earth. At least the producers had the good
sense to change the line in the song "Here Comes the Sun" from,
"Little darling, it's been a long, cold, lonely winter," sung by
Strawberry Fields to Frampton after a literal roll in the hay, to "Little
Peter, you've really got a little peter." No, not really, but don't you wish
they did?
        Even worse are the costumes in the movie. During one
sequence, the Bee Gees are riding in a hot air balloon in aviator
costumes (which, in itself, is dreadful) when they are hit by a bolt of
lightning. Suddenly, they're all dressed in costumes strangely
reminiscent of the Power Rangers. Oh great, the Mighty Morphin Bee
Gee Rangers.
        Perhaps the most ironic sequence is a fight between Steven
Tyler of Aerosmith and Peter Frampton, where Frampton actually
wins. Well, Frampton never made it into the 80's, much less the 90's,
and we all know Alicia Silverstone never would have agreed to appear
in the music video for "Show Me the Way." Aerosmith is still going
strong, while Frampton is working the fry bin at Hardee's outside of
Pittsburgh.
        This movie is a huge embarrassment for everyone involved
(yes, even Frampton and the Bee Gees). Once you get over laughing at
the sheer idiocy of all these people thinking they're the Disco Beatles,
you'll still have to sit through almost two hours of falsetto Bee Gee
Beatles songs. Trust me, you won't make it through the movie. No one
makes it through the movie. I did, of course, but I'm the movie critic
and, believe me, it wasn't in one sitting.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Casablanca (1942)
        Unarguably one of the very best films in Hollywood 
history, CASABLANCA is set in French Morocco just before the 
start of World War II. Humphrey Bogart plays Rick, the nightclub 
owner who has refused thus far to take sides with the French 
resistance or the newly-appointed Nazi officials. He's his usual 
cool, collected self until a ghost from his past walks in on the arm 
of the most wanted man in the resistance. The woman is Ilsa (Ingrid 
Bergman), his lost love from Paris who never made it onto the train 
with him.
        Since then he's managed to suppress the emotional scars 
of jilted love, but finds himself drinking alone that night, pondering 
the reason why, "of all the gin joints in all the cities in all the world,
she had to walk into mine." No one tells him that if she hadn't there 
wouldn't have been a movie, but the Paris past of Rick and Ilsa and 
her reasons for staying behind are what drive the movie, along with 
the exit visas Rick has in his possession that are the only chance 
of Ilsa's man, the resistance leader, to get out of Casablanca 
safely.
        Repeated viewings add a lot of poignance to the early 
scenes, not just in putting the intricate, slowly-unfolding plot in 
big picture perspective, but in fully appreciating the reunion of 
Rick and Ilsa in his nightclub and understanding why Rick comes 
storming out to stop Sam the piano player (Dooley Wilson) from 
playing "As Time Goes By" after Ilsa requests it. The song, for 
anyone who's seen CASABLANCA, is symbolic of so much of 
the movie's meaning that it will be forever identified with 
CASABLANCA, even though it pops up in a great many other 
romances, including SLEEPLESS IN SEATTLE.
        In the end it comes down to the age-old love triangle 
scenario. Bergman is still in love with Bogart but feels obligated 
to support her husband, while Bogart is in the situation of being 
in control of the destiny of the man who is married to the woman 
he loves. The ending is one of the most famous and memorable 
in movie history, and just about any line of dialogue is quotable. 
CASABLANCA is a wonderful, must-watch film from the Golden 
Age of Hollywood, one of the few movies that has actually 
improved with age and demands repeat viewings.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Fresh (1994)
        This movie ain't stale for a second, it's completely... oh, 
what's the word... fresh. That also happens to be the nickname of the 
main character, a 12-year-old drug dealer who is the most intelligent 
and resourceful juvenile delinquent I've ever seen. He manages to keep 
his occupation a secret from his family, which consists of at least ten 
brothers and sisters, the aunt who looks after them all, the drunk 
father who uses chess as a metaphor for life and the older sister who is 
hooked on the very item Fresh sells and is also hooked up with Fresh's 
boss, Esteban.
        Tragedy strikes early on in the film, as a school girl Fresh has 
a crush on is caught in the line of fire (wasn't that a Clint Eastwood 
movie?) from a fellow drug runner's gun. Everyone else flees the 
scene, but Fresh stays until the police arrive, insisting of course that he 
saw nothing. The same thing happens later on in the film as Fresh's 
loudmouth friend-turned-drug runner is mowed down. The police 
realize it may not be a coincidence that this kid was found at the scene 
of two murders in two days. You or I may never make that connection, 
but then we never took months of courses in advanced detective 
techniques taught at the police academy (and watching those movies 
doesn't count either).
        FRESH isn't a fast-moving action film or a murder mystery. 
It's more of a case study into the life of an incredible young man who 
rises above the scum he associates with and the work he does. He also 
has the enviable ability to convincingly lie through his teeth to get 
what he wants. Enviable to me, of course, because lying has never 
been something I could even begin to try without bursting into 
maniacal laughter, even the most minor lies. That's why I was never 
called upon as a character witness for the Clarence Thomas 
confirmation hearings. I could never say "Even a fool knows pubic 
hair is part of the delicious Classic Coke formula" with a straight face. 
But this kid could. He lies to the cops twice, convincing them he's just 
a stupid kid. And those scenes don't even compare to the movie's end, 
in which Fresh commits several convincing doublecrosses on his boss 
and associates.
        As far as inner-city drug dramas go, this one ranks with the 
best of them, taking the high road to make its characters human, 
giving them a reason to commit the human atrocities they do (unlike, 
say, Clarence Thomas). It's also not as violent as the usual crop of 
drug dramas. The seemingly gratuitous violence toward the end is 
essential to the story. And FRESH contains some stunning 
performances from people you've never heard of, the only recognizable 
actor being Samuel L. Jackson (PULP FICTION), in the part of Fresh's 
chess-playing father, the man who gets medieval with the bishops, 
queens and pawns.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America for over 1/50th of a century!

Title
Review for D.I., The (1957)
        My inner flag was at half-mast last year when Nick at Nite 
pulled "Dragnet" reruns off the air. Sure, I'd seen them all at least 
once, but I could always count on at least a few inadvertent laughs 
from ultra-serious Jack Webb when there was nothing else on TV. 
Even though "Dragnet" is out of circulation at the moment, we 
Webb anti-fans still have THE D.I., a 50's propaganda piece for the 
military that is almost as hilarious as the famous "Blue Boy" episode 
of "Dragnet."
        For anyone like me who got laughs out of Webb's rapid-fire 
speeches and straight-faced seriousness, think of THE D.I. as what 
would happen if Sgt. Joe Friday ever enlisted, because he plays 
exactly the same character here, a no-nonsense old fart who looks 
with disdain at the younger generation and loves to give long-
winded, melodramatic speeches on any topic. In this election 
year, I'm more convinced than ever that Webb and Bob Dole 
were separated at birth.
        The movie opens in characteristic fashion as one recruit 
after another knocks on Webb's office door and enters. He gives 
each one a different series of cranky criticisms before the credits 
come up. The "Produced and Directed by Jack Webb" card pretty 
much goes without saying. This is his movie all the way, and after 
the first twenty minutes of him chewing out his recruits for no 
reason, I was wondering if there would even be a plot. I certainly 
would have been entertained by an hour and a half of trademark 
Webb rants, but THE D.I. gives us more -- much more.
        Webb's mission is to make a man out of Private Owens, 
the local screw-up. The Captain gives Webb three days to convert 
Owens into Marine material or, the captain will "personally cut the 
lace off his panties and ship him out myself." (Whether the "lace 
panties" part refers to Webb or Owens remains unanswered.) This, 
of course, gives Webb an excuse to focus all his crotchety energy 
on making Owens' life a living hell.
        For those of you who haven't been indoctrinated into the 
pleasures of Webb watching, here's a reprint of a typical monologue 
of his. I can't duplicate his hilarious delivery on paper, but the words 
should at least partially convey what I'm talking about... "Now you 
listen to me, youngster. Someday you'll wake up fighting on a beach 
and you'll pray to God somebody doesn't get killed because of your 
foolishness... I've got a headline for you: Every time you make one 
of those little mistakes of yours, you're gonna turn around and I'll 
be standing right there."
        I couldn't write down all the reprintable dialogue from 
THE D.I. (nearly all of it belongs in the Bad Movie Hall of Fame), 
but I tried to include some of the more noteworthy lines, like one 
from the scene where Webb unwinds from a hard day's work by 
going to the local bar (where he orders a tomato juice). He meets a 
woman who, coincidentally, also orders tomato juice but walks away 
from a typically-stimulating conversation with Webb to flirt with his 
arch-rival, another Marine D.I. Webb marches over to the table, gets 
up in her face and says, "Just what kind of a dame do you think you 
are?" Bogart he ain't.
        The other D.I. gets one of the few memorable non-Webb 
lines when he confesses to the girl, "He's a damn good D.I. ... I 
guess I'm just a little jealous." Join the club, we're all jealous of 
Jack Webb's way with women, which is showcased even more 
amusingly in a later scene, as Webb finds his way to the woman's 
place of employment, a lingerie store, and stands around looking 
incredibly flustered at the negligees on display. "You expect me to 
talk to you... in _here_?!" he exclaims, no doubt intimidated by the 
barrage of bras.
        The woman goes off to help a customer, leaving Webb 
to fend for himself once again in this palace of estrogen. A little 
girl spots him in the store and demands, "What are you doing in 
here... you're a man, aren't you?" He doesn't reply, but you know 
he's thinking in his head, "What an odd species of human -- so 
small. Must be one of those children everyone's been talking 
about." This poor girl, scarred for life by her early encounter with 
Jack Webb, would later swear off the male gender entirely, just one 
of the many lesbian conversions he's responsible for.
        The movie doesn't focus too closely on Webb's romance, it 
also continues the Owens subplot with probably the most memorable 
scene in the entire movie, where Webb forces his platoon to spend 
the entire night searching the ground for a flea Owens killed during 
one of their drills. After two privates hatch a scheme to present 
Webb with the wrong dead flea, Webb asks Owens, "Was that flea 
you killed a male or female?" Owens replies, "A male, sir." Webb 
yells to the platoon, "This ain't the one!" That such a scene (along 
with the rest of the movie) was intended to be taken seriously defies 
comment.
        But we know it was all presented with the utmost 
seriousness when a title card at the end thanks the Marines not 
only for their cooperation in the making of THE D.I., but for Iwo 
Jima, Guadalcanal and every other major battle of the first half of 
the 20th century. Webb held the military in such high esteem that 
all the soldiers in the movie (with the exception of Owens) were 
played by actual Marines. Someone wanting to parody this movie 
couldn't do a more comical job than Webb did.
        It makes it all the more ironic (like raeeyain on your 
wedding day) that the man had no sense of humor himself. There's 
a scene in the movie where the guys are on their break time 
discussing something and one of them breaks into laughter. 
Webb bursts in the room and shouts, "What did I tell you about 
laughing?!" to which the private replies, "Sir, only nine-year-old 
girls laugh, sir!" And let me tell you, I was as happy as a nine-year-
old girl while watching this movie.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Stuart Saves His Family (1995)
     Just when you think the practice of turning recurring "Saturday
Night Live" characters into feature films has gotten completely out of
hand (i.e., IT'S PAT: THE MOVIE), you stumble upon a warm-hearted
comedy that turns what was previously a one-note character into a
decent movie.  I'm sure we're all familiar with Stuart Smalley
(alter-ego of "SNL" writer/performer Al Franken), the effeminate
sweater-wearing host of the public-access show "Daily Affirmation."
This movie gives us access to Stuart away from the cameras of his TV
show, into his private life (and day job as a waiter).
     Stuart's show gets cancelled and, after six days of curling up in
bed eating Fig Newton's (I like the cranberry ones myself), he gets
more bad news--his favorite aunt is dead.  So he makes a trip home to
see his dysfunctional family: alcoholic dad, codependant mom, overeater
sister and pot-addict brother.  Coming home, he realizes it's going to
take more than saying the usual 12-step cliches like "Denial ain't just
a river in Egypt" to fix the mess his family is in.  But gosh darn it,
he'll try.
     STUART SAVES HIS FAMILY is probably the only "Saturday Night Live"
movie with any heart of human quality to offset the barrage of bad
jokes.  It has some genuinely dramatic moments and also some genuinely
funny ones, most of which involve Stuart's flashbacks to the days he
was tormented for being an obese child.  I'm not sure exactly why I can
identify with that but I can...

Title
Review for Dirty Work (1998)
        Some nights during the latest dark period of "Saturday Night 
Live," I turned on the show and was surprised to find myself actually 
laughing. Nine times out of ten, that surprise laughter came from 
something Norm Macdonald said. Like no one else, Macdonald can 
make me laugh by saying a single word, no matter how many times he 
says it. If any other comedian repeatedly milked words like "crack," 
"anal rape" and "whore" for laughs, I'd find it absolutely unfunny.
        There's something about his delivery that can give value to 
the most mediocre writing. I don't know exactly what that is, but 
DIRTY WORK would suck without it. Lines that would make me 
cringe in other summer comedies made me laugh this time, and almost 
make me recommend the movie. Had the movie occasionally included 
a half-intelligent joke in its parade of scatalogical and sexual innuendo 
humor, and had the movie not allowed Macdonald's character to be 
gang raped in jail, I would have given it a full thumbs-up.
        As it is, DIRTY WORK is the most politically incorrect movie 
of the year to date, the kind of movie that has multiple punchlines 
involving prostitutes, incest and dirty old men. It's one dirty old man 
(Jack Warden, still recovering from those PROBLEM CHILD movies) 
in particular that provides most of the plot for the movie. Warden 
plays the father of Macdonald's best friend and, in a span of a few 
minutes, Warden has a heart attack and tells Macdonald he's also his 
father.
        If that weren't enough plot contrivance, the doctor (Chevy 
Chase) tells Macdonald that Warden's only hope for survival is a heart 
transplant. Since Chase owes $50,000 to a bookie, he sets the price for 
a transplant at exactly that amount... and we all know Chase is in dire 
need of $50,000 right about now. Meanwhile, Macdonald and his best 
friend ponder what they could possibly do to earn that kind of money 
in two weeks' time.
        They get jobs at a theater run by Don Rickles, whose cameo 
isn't nearly as funny or politically incorrect as the rest of the movie. 
Rickles' drill sergeant approach to movie theater management prompts 
Macdonald and his friend to get back at him, which the other 
employees offer them money to do. A little bell goes off in their 
heads -- they can make money getting paid to perform revenge on 
other people. There are plenty of revenge scenes in the movie, some of 
them funny, a lot of them not, but with Macdonald at the helm, he 
managed to pull a laugh out of me every time I thought I was going to 
regret coming to see this.
        Not that DIRTY WORK is a classy or original movie by any 
stretch of the imagination. The plot is ridiculous and predictable, 
involving a local land baron (Christopher McDonald, still recovering 
from that LEAVE IT TO BEAVER movie) who hires them to destroy 
the same building that happens to be inhabited by the grandmother of 
a woman Norm has a crush on. Things begin looking bleak for our 
protagonists around the two-thirds mark, as they tend to do in generic 
comedies, but there's never any doubt things will end happily.
        A word for those of you who will no doubt complain that I 
gave DIRTY WORK the same rating as a classier **1/2 movie of your 
choice -- this is a tasteless movie without any socially redeeming 
qualities. It is, however, funny. Macdonald brings all his "Weekend 
Update" charm to the big screen, although I found myself constantly 
wishing he'd drop that "Note to self" gag. It never worked on "SNL" 
and, even worse, it turned out to be part of the plot here.
        Those of you who have seen other movies starring "SNL" cast 
members know that none of them can have just one "Saturday Night 
Live" person. The parade starts with Chevy Chase and continues with 
an Adam Sandler cameo and a running appearance from Chris Farley, 
in one of his final appearances. DIRTY WORK is more entertainment 
than you'll get most Saturday nights around 11:30/10:30 central.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for View to a Kill, A (1985)
        This is one of the weaker James Bond movies out there, but 
it's still not that bad, if you don't mind a movie with a running time of 
over 130 minutes. It would have been better with about thirty minutes 
of boredom cut out and if, perhaps, the director had coaxed a better 
performance out of Christopher Walken. I like the guy and think he's a 
decent actor and definitely one of the strangest individuals on the 
planet (good to know I'm not alone), but as villain Zorin he's way too 
bland.
        Roger Moore makes his seventh and final appearance as 
James Bond, and I think it was about time for the guy to step down. In 
this one, he just doesn't seem too enthusiastic about being the single 
most indestructible babe magnet on the planet. Of course, I wouldn't 
be able to manfacture much enthusiasm either if I had to sleep with 
Grace Jones. That's a nasty-looking woman right there.
        The plot this time has Walken as an ambitious microchip 
manufacturer who plans to create an earthquake that will destroy 
Silicon Valley, eliminating his competition. Maybe that's where Bill 
Gates got the idea to send the CEO's of Atari and Commodore 64 to 
sleep with the fishes. Grace Jones, the least feminine woman out there 
(Sandra Bernhard being the runner-up in that competition) is his 
musclebound assistant, May Day. Her name, of course, comes from the 
phrase shouted by every man who's ever seen her topless. And as 
usual, it's up to James Bond to stop everything.
        A VIEW TO A KILL moves slowly and is acted without 
much eagerness or excitement, yet has some merit as a Bond movie. 
It's got all the violence and chase scenes, some that are fun, some 
absurd. The sequence with Bond hanging from a fire truck ladder falls 
into the latter category (Latter. Ladder. Get it?), as does the entire last 
twenty minutes of the movie, which I'll just say involves a dirigible 
and the Golden Gate bridge. Still, nearly every James Bond movie is 
better than this one, which should be watched only by true fans of the 
series.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Love and Death (1975)
        It's hard to imagine a Mel Brooks movie inspiring a Woody 
Allen movie, but I'm convinced that's exactly what happened with 
LOVE AND DEATH. Now, hear me out. It's not just that they're both 
period piece comedies set in the 19th century with wacky battle 
scenes, it's that BLAZING SADDLES was released in 1974 and 
became a huge hit, pioneering the NAKED GUN / AIRPLANE! 
genre of Joke-a-Second parodies. Riding on the coattails of that 
film, Woody released LOVE AND DEATH the next year, his only 
foray into full-scale parody territory.
        Yes, Woody's done his take on just about every type of 
movie, but LOVE AND DEATH is a direct parody of Russian 
literature like BROTHERS KARAMOZOV and DR. ZHIVAGO with 
liberal rips on extentialist philosophy thrown in. This movie is 
loaded with the cheap sight gags the JAS parodies are known for, 
but it's also the only Allen film where serious dialogue is overdone 
to the point where it becomes funny (a la Leslie Nielson) and terrible 
jokes and puns abound (again, Nielson's films come to mind). He 
also must have been watching too many "Get Smart" reruns 
because his comedic delivery here is almost identical to that of 
Don Adams.
        Woody plays a Russian thinker who has pseudointellectual 
debates with his cousin Diane Keaton, who by this point had 
adopted Woody's mannerisms. (She probably should have realized 
she'd been living with him too long when she started picking up 
twelve-year-old girls.) Being Woody, he's also in love with her, 
but she doesn't return the feelings, opting instead to be more 
promiscuous than Papa Karamozov himself. At one point in the 
movie, Woody is about the only person in Russia she hasn't 
slept with -- and that's a huge country.
        This is all mostly a setup for Woody to work in his usual 
one-liners and sitcom-like situations. Some of the more comedically-
notable are the scene where Woody is challenged to a duel, the 
sequence where Woody flirts with a woman at the theatre, Diane 
seducing Napoleon while Woody tries to shoot him in the 
background, Woody's execution scene, his frequent brushes 
with Death and the big battle scene where nearly all the Russians 
are killed. There are a lot of memorable moments in LOVE AND 
DEATH but a lot of forgettable ones as well. No other Allen film 
has quite so many dreadfully bad jokes. It's a good thing Woody 
stopped imitating his comedic inferiors and instead aimed higher 
with his follow-up film, ANNIE HALL, which I think you might 
have heard of.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Grease (1978)
        Only in the 90's are we fully beginning to appreciate this 
70's movie about the 50's. GREASE is a cult favorite that appeals to 
everyone from teenagers to nostalgic baby boomers, even people 
like me who aren't too fond of musicals. So what's the appeal?
        Let's start with John Travolta. He's been enjoying the 
comeback of a lifetime these past two years and so have all his old 
movies. Saturday Night Fever, Grease, Urban Cowboy, 
they get rented out of the video store on a daily basis. People are so 
Travolta-hungry they watch the dread American Bandstand reruns 
on VH1 waiting for the one episode he performed (i.e. lip-synched) 
in.
        Then there's Olivia Newton-John. She's actually pretty in 
GREASE, you can't say that about her "Physical" and "Twist of Fate" 
days of the 80's. This is also her only good movie -- you can't say 
anything nice about XANADU, so don't say anything at all.
        People also love GREASE because it's the quintessential 
50's nostalgia movie. It has everything, from the slumber party and 
malt shop to the dance contest and drag race. Better yet, it has a 
sense of humor about those days, to the point of including ultimate 
icon Frankie Avalon in the "Beauty School Dropout" dream 
sequence.
        That brings up the main draw of GREASE -- the music. As 
I type this, at least one Top 40 station across the country is playing 
the "Grease Megamix," a medley of the three most popular songs 
from the movie ("You're the One That I Want," "Greased 
Lightning" and "Summer Nights"). Travolta and Newton-John's 
songs in the film have become karaoke favorites, and the movie 
soundtrack is actually back in the upper reaches of the charts.
        Travolta, the archetype of cool, plays Danny Zuko, car-
loving greaser who bosses around a bunch of tough-guy clones. 
Newton-John plays Sandy, the virginal good-girl from Australia he 
had a fling with over the summer. They parted ways, him headed for 
his senior year and her headed back for Australia, only to find 
themselves at the same school. Sandy finds out that the sensitive, 
caring boy she knew over the summer acts completely different at 
school, but she's hopelessly devoted to him anyway. There's a song 
about it, of course.
        The plot is thin and transparent but has to be that way so 
that all the production numbers and requisite scenes (dance contest, 
drag race, etc.) can be worked in. GREASE is a fun movie that 
features something you don't see anymore. No, not Olivia Newton-
John, I'm talking about John Travolta singing. As far as singing 
actors go, he's leagues ahead of Don "Heartbeat" Johnson, Bruce 
"Respect Yourself" Willis and Patrick "She's Like the Wind" 
Swayze. Travolta still dances in most of his movies, but when are 
we going to hear his velvety vocal prowess again? It will probably 
be years before the world is ready for Pulp Fiction: The 
Musical.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for Mallrats (1995)
        MALLRATS is the follow-up to Kevin Smith's acclaimed 
unrated extravaganza CLERKS and it left me with two prevailing 
impressions -- this guy's a genius but he's also a sellout. The beauty 
of his debut film was that it didn't adhere to all the conventions of 
popular cinema. MALLRATS, on the other hand, is driven by formulaic 
Hollywood romance rules, even down to the cheesy keyboard music 
featured in the background during serious dialogue. As far as that 
aspect of the plot goes, we've been there, done that plenty of times 
and know exactly what's going to happen ahead of time, but 
MALLRATS at least partially redeems itself by integrating the 
worn twentysomething romance theme with Smith's truly unique 
humor and Tarantinoesque dialogue.
        MALLRATS is centered around that pillar of modern 
American society, the shopping mall, where Generation X'ers with 
nothing better to do go to hang out. That's how you know it's a 
movie, because in real life, mall demographics are at least 75% junior 
high kids sneaking cigarettes and kicking off every sentence with the 
phrase "Oh... my... God!" Here we have slackers like T.S. (Jeremy 
London) and Brody (Jason Lee) wandering around the mall after 
being dumped by their girlfriends, who both conveniently turn up at 
the mall. T.S.' ex, Brandi, was in love with him but was pressured into 
the breakup by her game show host father. Brody's ex, Renee 
(Shannen Doherty), broke up with him because all he ever did 
was read comics and play Sega games.
        The plot revolves around the taping of Brandi's dad's game 
show at the mall (another interesting coincidence) and the sabotage 
thereof by CLERKS holdovers Jay and Silent Bob. Renee, meanwhile, 
is being wooed by a mall manager who finds women on the rebound 
and "screws them in an uncomfortable place." ("The backseat of a 
Volkswagon?") As with any wacky comedy, though, the plot is 
secondary to a series of wacky situations, including an assault on the 
Easter bunny, an appearance by Marvel Comics artist Stan Lee, and a 
topless fortune teller, along with those Tarantino-inspired dialogues 
about everything from how Superman could impregnate Lois Lane to 
Brody's "smelly palm" trick. These sequences are original and funny 
and make the movie worth watching, even if the reliance on a 
conventional formula to tie it all together ultimately brings the 
viewing experience down. MALLRATS is an unusual marriage 
between creativity and cliche.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Out to Sea (1997)
        The latest tired collaboration from Jack Lemmon and 
Walter Matthau is called OUT TO SEA, which is where screenwriter 
Robert Nelson Jacobs should be sent. It's one more 100-minute 
collection of lame jokes, one-note sitcom characters and chances for 
Lemmon and Matthau to call each other "putz" and "schmuck" in 
every scene. There aren't too many movies that are simultaneously 
geriatric and childish, but OUT TO SEA manages to embarrass itself 
on both counts.
        This movie is essentially GRUMPY OLD MEN on a cruise 
ship -- GRUMPY OLD MEN AND THE SEA. (I wonder how many 
other movie critics, Internet and print, will think they coined that 
one themselves.) Lemmon is a depressed widower who basically 
keeps to his antique house, while Matthau is a compulsive gambler 
who owes a few thousand to his bookie. The solution: why, isn't it 
transparent? They'll go on a cruise and net some babes.
        Small-time con man he is, Matthau signs himself and 
Lemmon up as dance instructors so they won't have to pay for the 
cruise. Lemmon can dance like Astaire livening up a bored night at 
the nursing home, but Matthau can't dance a lick. It opens the door 
for so many sitcom situations, like the inevitable montage in which 
Lemmon tries to teach Matthau to dance (in a comically-bad way, of 
course) and two men walk in on them during a tender slow-dance 
moment. Call it "83's Company." Soon, Matthau is trying to 
romance Dyan Cannon, plastic surgery casefile #459, and Lemmon 
is trying to get over his ex-wife with a silver-haired siren.
        For a bad movie, OUT TO SEA has a great supporting cast. 
Most of them are aging, out-of-work actors who will apparently say 
or do anything if a big enough carrot is dangled in front of them. 
Donald "Make 'em Laugh" O'Conner is one of the genuine dance 
instructors, and does a couple interesting tap numbers, but we all 
know he'd dislocate a hip if he tried to duplicate his SINGIN' IN 
THE RAIN wall flips. Hal "Barney Miller" Linden is another dance 
instructor who has maybe five lines tops. Rue "Blanche" 
McClenahan is the owner of the ship who is the victim of a 
painfully bad dance with Matthau.
        But the down-and-out prize goes to Brent "Data" Spiner, 
who plays the movie's villain, a militant cruise director who relishes 
his chance to perform cheesy song-and-dance numbers for captive 
passengers. Spiner does well bringing the best-written character in 
the movie to life, although like the others he still doesn't have a 
whole lot to work with. Still, it's fun to watch Spiner do the lounge 
act, knowing he released a real-life lounge failure album by the 
name of "Old Yellow Eyes is Back."
        OUT TO SEA was a lot of fun for the actors to make, I'm 
sure. It comes complete with the usual grumpy old blooper reel that 
has Lemmon and Matthau laughing and cussing it up, but each one 
of these old fart movies gets increasingly hard to bear. The first 
GRUMPY had a lot of funny moments, but the second was a seldom-
amusing rehash. OUT TO SEA, at its best, seems to contain the most 
mediocre moments of both. Lemmon and Matthau, you were great in 
the '60s but now you're a couple tired old men. The only way to 
succeed now is to pick a script that's not as tired as you schmucks. 
Geez, now I sound grumpy.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for One Magic Christmas (1985)
        The only thing magical about this disgustingly sappy 
Disney movie is the tremendous sense of relief one gets when the 
end credits finally roll! It's one of those stupid "Miracle-at-
Christmas" movies with angels disguised as drunken bums that sit 
in trees, granting wishes for little kids. The whole plot of this movie 
concerns a woman with a complete humbug attitude about 
Christmas, and after seeing this awful movie, I feel the same.
        One year around Christmastime, an angel appears to the 
cute little daughter of the humbug woman and saves her from the 
path of a speeding car. Gideon's the guy's name, and -- get this -- 
he's working for Santa Claus. I guess he was laid off by God or 
something. They try to give her the "Christmas Spirit," although 
personally, I think that inebriated angel has been drinking too many 
of the "Christmas Spirits," if you know what I mean.
        And some Christmas this woman has, too. She's fired from 
her supermarket checker job (Oh no! However will the family 
survive without mom's $4.15 an hour?!), her husband is shot and 
killed by a bank robber, and her kids are kidnapped by the same 
bank robber, who eventually drives off a bridge. Miraculously 
enough, Gideon is able to save the kids, but -- surprisingly enough -- 
he can't save the father from being shot. He recommends someone 
who might be able to help. That's right, the big guy upstairs -- Santa 
Claus himself.
        But they find out Santa may be omniscient and omnipresent 
(you know how fat he is!), but he's not omnipotent, meaning he can't 
bring people back from the dead. He tells her only the mother can do 
that, asking her if she believes in magic. Personally, I don't, but I do 
believe this movie stinks.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for Boogie Nights (1997)
        BOOGIE NIGHTS is a movie that mixes two of my favorite 
things -- Marky Mark and pornography. I'm being sarcastic, of course.
        Like PULP FICTION, this is an intelligent epic of the 
tasteless, a movie that makes sweeping points about our society and 
has likeable people doing reprehensible things. Written and directed 
by Paul Thomas Anderson, BOOGIE NIGHTS forgoes the gynecology 
and eroticism in painting sex as cold, emotionless and mainly just a 
commodity, and its success is finding the humor of '70s porn business 
as well as the sadness.
        In that sense, it's like THE PEOPLE VS. LARRY FLINT, 
alternating between being fascinating and funny in its realistic 
portrayal of the motivations of pornographers and focusing on the 
empty lives of those who make their living this way. Its main actors, 
Mark Wahlberg and Burt Reynolds, are two people I'd never thought 
I'd praise, but they do great work in BOOGIE NIGHTS, as do the 
people you'd expect to kick ass, like Julianne Moore, Don Cheadle 
(from ROSEWOOD) and William H. Macy.
        The story begins in 1977, as 17-year-old Wahlberg is washing 
dishes in a nightclub populated by an adult filmmaker (Burt Reynolds, 
in perhaps his most disgusting hairpiece yet). Reynolds likes what he 
sees in young Wahlberg -- youth, muscle tone, a 13-inch penis -- and 
entices him back to his den of sin, where Wahlberg gets it on with 
fellow high school student Rollergirl (Heather Graham), who never 
removes her roller skates. After a pool party, Wahlberg agrees to join 
the porn star family under the name Dirk Diggler.
        It's in these early scenes that we meet the other family 
members. There's Moore, a single mother who has been denied 
custody of her children because she's, well, a coke whore, acting as 
surrogate mother and sex partner to the other porn stars instead. 
Cheadle is a second-string actor hoping to make it big in the world of 
stereo sales, Macy is one of the crew and can't seem to keep his wife 
(real-life porno queen Nina Hartley) from humping everything in sight 
and John C. Reilly is Wahlberg's best friend and a damn good porn 
actor in his own right.
        In about 150 minutes, BOOGIE NIGHTS covers five years in 
the pornography industry, from the rise and fall of Dirk Diggler to the 
decline of porn as an art form. That's the funniest thing about this 
movie, the conviction held by all the characters that they're making 
something significant. The Reynolds character's main goal is to make 
a XXX-rated movie that is so good that its customers stay in the 
theater long after sticky-ing up the floor and Dirk helps him out by 
making some hilarious action hero porno flicks.
        BOOGIE NIGHTS, like LARRY FLINT, humanizes something 
most people don't think of as very worthy of epic treatment. A lot of its 
middle scenes, the ones involving Dirk's brief recording career and the 
imminent arrival of videotape as the medium for porno, are amusing, 
but the closing scenes pack a punch. This is the kind of movie that 
makes you laugh, (maybe) makes you cry and makes you sit in shock. 
It's frank without being graphic, emotional without being 
melodramatic and funny without being unbelievable.
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For More Than 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Saving Private Ryan (1998)
        Call me crazy, but I don't see SAVING PRIVATE RYAN as the film 
of the summer. A good movie, yes, with chillingly realistic battle 
scenes and emotion to spare. An utterly riviting movie on par with 
Steven Spielberg's best work, no. Personally, if I was Spielberg, I 
wouldn't go back to the World War II era one more time after 
SCHINDLER'S LIST and the Indiana Jones movies. I'm guessing Steve has 
a thing for Nazis; I really wouldn't be surprised if a velociraptor ate 
one of the swastika-wearing dudes in the next JURASSIC PARK movie.
        All lofty pretenses aside, SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is the goriest 
movie this side of a 1980s slasher flick. The difference is, it's easy 
during FRIDAY THE 13TH to laugh off a spear sticking out of Kevin 
Bacon's chest while blood spurts like crazy, but it's damn hard to sit 
and eat Reese's Pieces while soldiers suffer machine gun bullets to the 
head and have their intestines spilled out onto the battlefield.
        And believe me, there's plenty of it. A 30-minute sequence at 
the beginning of the movie has an Army captain (Tom Hanks) and his 
soldiers landing at Omaha Beach to join countless other Americans 
who are already under fire. Lives are lost in seconds as the 
purposefully confusing and jarring scene goes on and on, and all the 
young men in the audience find themselves never, ever wanting to be 
drafted.
        Cut to some bureaucratic defense office, where a hundred 
women pound out sympathy form letters to the families of the 
casualties. One woman happens upon an interesting detail -- three 
brothers in different platoons were killed in combat, and their mother 
is getting the telegram today. I guess it's an interesting conversation 
piece to everyone but the mother, so the Army chief (Harve Presnell) 
sends Hanks on what is essentially a public relations mission, to find 
the fourth Ryan brother and send him home. That way, the Army 
saves the postage on yet another telegram to Mrs. Ryan.
        One good thing about SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is that the soldiers 
who are headed to rescue Ryan know it's a mission designed to make 
the Army look good. They question the worth of risking eight soldiers' 
lives to save one, and Hanks' character admits he doesn't give a damn 
about Ryan; he's just following orders. If this was a John Wayne 
movie, things would be different. There'd be a phony, "Let's go get that 
boy, gosh darn it!" attitude that would sugarcoat the reality of war. By 
doing things this way, Spielberg admits the instincts of self-
preservation and complacency that every normal person has. It makes 
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN a lot more powerful than an testosterone-driven 
Stallone movie mission.
        The movie's pattern is to have long battle scenes followed by 
quiet scenes of semi-introspective conversation among the soldiers. 
Hanks is painted first as a nails-tough Army man careful to hide his 
true self from the other men. It's not that way for long. Edward Burns, 
the guy you get for your movie when Ben Affleck isn't available, is the 
impulsive one. Jeremy Davies plays the translator who is seeing 
combat for the first time, and so on. None of the characters are 
fascinating or natural born heroes, but was Spielberg's obvious 
intention.
        I wondered when I heard SAVING PRIVATE RYAN was three 
hours long, how were they going to fill three hours' time searching for 
one person and still make it interesting? There are a few false starts; 
Hanks finds one Private Ryan in Ted Danson's company (Apparently, 
Danson joined the Army after "Ink" was canceled.) and breaks the bad 
news before learning it's the wrong Ryan. And of course the movie's 
far from over when Hanks does locate Ryan (Matt Damon, the other 
guy you get when Affleck isn't available). That's when the movie turns 
into more of a conventional war flick, although body parts and limbs 
still fly like never before.
        SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is worth your time, but it's definitely no 
SCHINDLER'S LIST. The battle scenes are intense and realistic, but some 
of the attempts at sincere emotion aren't. The movie's bookends are 
particularly cheesy and out of place, when an old Private Ryan goes to 
the cemetary with his family and bawls his eyes out, whining, "Tell me 
I've led a good life. Tell me I'm a good man." Spielberg was apparently 
following the James Cameron line of thought that any three-hour 
movie about the past should be framed by a self-contained prologue 
and epilogue that takes place in the present.
        Much more effective are subtler scenes, like the one where 
several of Hanks' men are rifling thrugh a bag of dogtags from dead 
soldiers, and they make light of what they're doing by pretending 
they're playing poker. This while an airborne division marches by, 
their eyes full of that mound of dogtags. By not explicitly pointing out 
that it symbolizes the random poker game that life and death can be in 
war, the audience gets the message. And even if it's not a classic, 
SAVING PRIVATE RYAN is definitely one of the better war movies out 
there.
Visit the Movie Critic at Large homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Close to 1,000 reviews with a comedic flair...

Title
Review for Student Bodies (1981)
        Statistics have shown us most slasher movies outright 
suck. They're formula-ridden, low-budget flicks where the same 
stock characters commit the same stock sins before getting killed 
off one by one by some bulky, masked killer. The worst thing about 
it is that most slasher movies take themselves completely seriously, 
making the entire genre ripe for parody. And yet the few times any 
movie has tried to parody the genre (MOTEL HELL, RETURN TO 
HORROR HIGH), it turned out worse than the straight slasher 
movies. STUDENT BODIES is no exception.
        It takes its cue from HALLOWEEN in particular, making 
its killer "The Breather," a guy who makes obscene heavy-breathing 
noises before taking his victims. And every time a victim is taken, a 
big white number is superimposed on the screen to register the 
body count. Throughout the movie, more white words pop up on 
the screen, mostly intended to make us laugh or to needlessly 
point out that someone is "Unconscious, Not Dead (Important To 
Plot)."
        It's supposed to be funny, but none of it is. The horny 
high school characters satirized here were more outrageous in their 
original slasher movie incarnations. To make them funny would 
require more than just giving them lame jokes to tell and having 
them hump like bunnies every few minutes. One girl and guy sneak 
under the bleachers at the Homecoming game to have sex on the 
ground, but all sorts of trash slips through the bleachers and lands 
on them. When the girl complains, the guy replies, "The garbage 
gets me hot." Classic comedy? Comedy, period? No.
        STUDENT BODIES starts out on a ridiculous note, with 
subtitles reading, "Halloween... Friday the 13th... Jamie Lee Curtis' 
Birthday," and the movie just gets worse from there. Soon the 
phone is ringing so hard it jumps off the table and The Breather 
himself is interrupting the movie to announce we have technical 
difficulties (more like "creative difficulties"), "killing" time by 
asking us if we can guess who he is.
        Yes, on top of it all, STUDENT BODIES is supposed to 
be a murder mystery. But the big mystery is how this appalingly 
bad movie was ever made. Perhaps the best clue is in the very first 
set of superimposed white words, which inform us that "Last year, 
twenty-six horror movies were released... None of them lost 
money." I have a feeling this one did.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Fargo (1996)
        Joel and Ethan Coen, the Coen Brothers (a.k.a. the 
Brothers Coen), have brought the world a handful of bizarre yet 
funny movies, among them BLOOD SIMPLE and RAISING 
ARIZONA, but none so bizarre or funny as FARGO. Cleverly 
morbid and supposedly based on a true story, FARGO tells a 
PULP FICTION-like story of crime gone wrong, when a car 
salesman with monetary troubles (William H. Macy) hires two 
criminals (Steve Buscemi and Peter Stormare) to kidnap his wife 
and split the ransom money with him.
        But things soon go wrong and people end up dead. 
Macy has no idea how to cover his tracks, Buscemi and Stormare 
don't get along and to top things off, pregnant police chief 
Frances McDormand is doing a damn good job of investigating 
the homicides. McDormand, like all the other actors in the film, 
does great justice to her quirky character and the bizarre food 
binges her pregnancy craves. She and the other characters talk 
in a hilarious Canadian / Super Fans dialect that emphasizes 
usage of the words "there" and "ya" as punctuation.
        The dialect blends with the surroundings -- North Dakota 
and Minnesota in the dead of winter, where shades of white and 
gray are the only colors you see outside and everyone plods 
around in oversized parkas. The snow itself plays an important 
role in the movie, from the scene where Buscemi buries a briefcase 
along the side of the road to the scene where McDormand examines 
three dead bodies in the snow and nonchalantly recreates the crime 
exactly as it took place.
        Although FARGO has only enough plot in its 98 minutes 
to have comprised one of Tarantino's three PULP FICTION 
segments, it shares Quentin's love for dialogue. Aside from the 
unique dialect and usage of phrases like "So you married ol' son-
of-a-Gunderson," the Coens drop in a few great scenes that don't 
have anything to do with the plot, as when McDormand meets a 
friend from high school who tries to seduce her even though she's 
married and very pregnant or when Buscemi chews out a parking 
lot attendant for charging him money even though he only drove 
through the lot.
        It all adds up to an incredibly surreal but entertaining 
experience that is one of the few truly original movies of the year. 
Nothing inspires originality like the absurdities of real life, although 
I'm sure Joel and Ethan added some embellishments of their own to 
make it an even more compelling story of crime and punishment, 
for -- and this is the last comparison I'll be making to PULP 
FICTION -- in the end justice is served to all the wrong doers 
and McDormand, her work done, is able to crawl back into bed 
with her husband, the same bed she dragged herself out of in the 
middle of the night as the crimes began. FARGO is an intricate, 
full-circle movie for people who enjoy doses of intelligence to 
go with brutality.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Interiors (1978)
        Right after Woody Allen made the best movie of his career, 
ANNIE HALL, he made the worst movie of his career. INTERIORS 
is not only the first Allen movie Woody didn't star in, it's also the 
first to focus completely on drama. Woody himself said there were 
no "intentional" laughs in INTERIORS, even though there are a 
few unintentionally-funny moments in this heavy-handed Ingmar 
Bergman ripoff that has at least one-third lingering silent shots of 
either nature or its actors staring off into space, probably wondering 
what the hell they were doing in such a stupid movie.
        INTERIORS centers around a dysfunctional family, from 
the mentally-ill mother who falls apart (and eventually commits 
suicide by walking into the ocean) when her husband announces 
he's leaving her to the three neurotic sisters, none of whom 
(interestingly enough) is named Hannah. There's Joey (Marybeth 
Hurt, who looks like Velma from "Scooby Doo" with blond hair), 
the moody artist who just isn't talented, Renata (Diane Keaton), 
the poet who is talented but whose husband isn't, and Flynn 
(Kristen Griffith), the actress who is successful but shallow.
        Woody tries to balance everyone's problems by having 
the characters argue their existence away. Joey is mad at Dad for 
leaving and yells at Renata for not spending enough time with 
Mom, while Renata spouts the Woody speech about her work 
being meaningless because she can't buy immortality with art and 
her husband is ready to jump on top of Flynn, who resents the 
other sisters for having substance in their lives. By the time Dad 
brings his vibrant, shallow fiance home, the tensions are finally 
ready to explode.
        Then we get the long suicide scene and the final scene 
where the sisters stare out into the ocean in another Bergman ripoff. 
The ending of INTERIORS is just like the rest of the movie -- long, 
pointless, resolving nothing and silent. Forgoing the usual jazz 
soundtrack, Woody permeates INTERIORS with dead silence a lot 
of the time, when the other characters are arguing their heads off. 
It seems artistic, as do many of the labored camera shots from the 
movie, but underneath there's nothing of substance.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for SubUrbia (1997)
        If SUBURBIA leaves no other legacy to American cinema, it 
will be known as the movie where you can see Cory from "My Two 
Dads" fully naked. Yes, TV's "Cory," Giovanni Ribisi and six other 
young talents bring Eric Bogosian's play to life in this Richard 
Linklater film. In SUBURBIA, Linklater successfully combines 
elements of his earlier three films -- the aimlessness of SLACKER, the 
fun of DAZED AND CONFUSED and the thoughtful dialogue of 
BEFORE SUNRISE.
        Ribisi is Jeff, the leader of a group of losers whose days 
consist of unemployment or low-paying jobs and whose nights are 
dominated by drinking beer and loitering in convenience store parking 
lots. There's a whole roster of Generation X angst here, most of them 
with stupid names. Sooze (Amie Carey) is Jeff's girlfriend, a 
performance artist who delivers an anti-testosterone manifesto called 
"Burger, Part I" at the beginning.
        Her friend Bee-Bee (Dina Spybey) is a recovering alcoholic 
and Tim (Nicky Katt) is a discharged Air Force officer on his way to 
becoming one. Then there's Buff (Steve Zahn), whose intellect is 
anything but. He's the token clown of the group, the kind of guy who 
will say or do anything crazy for a laugh. The fact that he's either 
drunk, stoned or both most of the time feeds the lack of inhibition.
        As the group of friends stands outside the convenience store, 
we meet another of SUBURBIA's central characters, Naseer (Ajay 
Naidu). He's the Pakistani night clerk of the c-store, who in the 
beginning is made out to be the Mr. Roper or Gale Gordon-type foil to 
the kids, the guy who will come out and chase them away whenever 
they start to act immature. As the movie goes on, we realize Naseer is 
the voice of responsibility and far closer to the American ideal than 
these five white kids who were born here.
        The movie would be almost plotless without the arrival of 
Pony (Jayce Bartok), the one friend in the bunch who has done 
anything with his life. He's on his way to becoming a rock star (with 
more than 90,000 units sold already!) and incites various responses 
from the friends. Tim is jealous and pissed at the MTV 
commercialization of life, Sooze begins to lust after him and Jeff 
suddenly realizes he's accomplished nothing in life. Pony's sexy 
publicist (Parker Posey, who is now by act of Congress required to be 
in every low-budget indie opus) also incites various unprintable 
responses from Buff.
        SUBURBIA seems like the setup for a typical, party-all-night 
comedy about a bunch of teenagers. Linklater did it well once with 
DAZED AND CONFUSED, but digs deeper here. The Bogosian 
screenplay is dark and ultimately rather depressing, a lot like his 
cynical script for TALK RADIO. Anyone between the ages of 16 and 
30 will realize the characters depicted in SUBURBIA aren't far from 
the truth and neither are the problems they either address or try to 
ignore. I liked it.
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving The World For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Hercules (1997)
        HERCULES is the first animated Disney film in a long 
time that doesn't seem like it came from Disney. It's entertaining, 
yes, and has the usual Disney trappings -- a story, adapted from 
classic literature, about stumbling hero who strikes it big, has a cute 
animal sidekick and a beautiful cartoon woman, but has to fight a 
very-evil villain with a cute animal sidekick of his own -- but it's got 
the cheap laughs of a Warner Bros. effort. It's more SPACE JAM 
than HUNCHBACK OF NOTRE DAME.
        Visually, HERCULES is on the Warner Bros. level, or 
maybe half a notch above the Disney afternoon cartoon shows. 
Its characters all look like caricatures and the backgrounds are 
generally unimpressive, but there are a few beautifully-animated 
scenes, all of which seem to take place in the evil underworld. The 
other scenes are pretty autopilot, which makes me wonder where 
Disney's priorities lie. Maybe these people _are_ as aligned with the 
devil as folks at the American Family Association say.
        I've pretty much forgotten all the Greek mythology stuff I 
learned in freshman English, so forgive me if I don't rattle off the 
names of the gods with the greatest of ease. I remember Hades, 
Hermes, Herpes, Sneezy and Doc, and at the head of it all -- the 
gods of the gods -- are Zeus and Hera. They have a baby at the 
beginning and name him (what else?) Hercules. Zeus gives him a 
playpen companion, a winged horse baby named Pegasus. I'm all for 
pets but a baby and a horse sleeping together is a little odd, even for 
mythology.
        Things are peaceful on Mount Olympus, but as we all 
know, when a baby is born in the Disney world, there's a villain 
there to sabotage. This time it's Hades, lord of the underworld, who 
is so evil he has blue fire for hair. Voiced by James Woods, Hades is 
one of the best things about this movie, an enemy worthy of Disney. 
His two cute animal sidekicks, Pain and Panic (voices of Bobcat 
Goldthwait and Matt Frewer, both of whom needed the paycheck), 
can change themselves into whatever form they wish.
        Old Hades kidnaps Hercules and strips him of his god 
status, but since he didn't drink all the evil potion, he still has the 
strength of a god. So he's trapped on earth, raised by an elderly 
couple who think he fell from heaven, just like Superman. There are 
a couple unintentionally amusing scenes that follow, where we see 
a 12-year-old Hercules called Jercules by his insensitive peers, who 
just can't accept that he's different. Ever wonder what it's like to 
wander the world, knowing you're a god, and not having anyone 
believe you? By the way, Shirley MacLaine, that's a rhetorical 
question...
        Hercules grows up and finds out he can't return to the table 
of the gods until he proves himself a true hero, which is cartoon 
code for "the end of the movie." That means he has to save the world 
from centaurs, giants, Limbaughs and all sorts of mythological 
beasts with the aid of his half-goat personal trainer (voice of Danny 
DeVito). There's also the femme fatale, Meg, who tries not to fall in 
love with Herc but can't resist.
        HERCULES is good fun, but it's definitely one of the lesser 
movies of the Disney revolution that began with THE LITTLE 
MERMAID. It's the only one besides POCAHONTAS in which the 
attempts at drama fall completely flat, leaving only the surface-level 
jokes and songs to entertain. You get the feeling the Disney people 
are reaching with a lot of that present-past humor too -- once 
Hercules becomes a hero, all the cool Athens kids are wearing 
Air-Herc shoes. Flintstones, meet the Flintstones...
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Midsummer Night's Sex Comedy, A (1982)
        After the critically-trashed STARDUST MEMORIES, 
Woody Allen made a movie that's not too much better. A 
MIDSUMMER NIGHT'S SEX COMEDY is a departure from 
the usual nihilistic, depressing comedy Woody produces, a 
whimsical period-piece comedy that has Woody's character 
an optimistic believer in the spirit world and, even more unlikely, 
married. Woody and his wife, Mary Steenburgen (who would 
move on to a man with an even bigger bald spot), are greeting 
two pairs of guests to their country home for a weekend of 
various forms of lust and fornication.
        Aging college professor Jose Ferrer is engaged to Mia 
Farrow (in her first of fourteen consecutive Allen films), while 
promiscuous dentist Tony Roberts has brought horny nurse 
Julie Hagerty (who worked this movie into her schedule between 
AIRPLANE! and AIRPLANE II: THE SEQUEL). Three couples in 
all, but naturally none of the men are particularly interested in their 
respective lovers. Woody wants Mia, Jose wants Julie and Tony 
has already bagged Mary.
        All three of the men are after Mia -- Jose because he's 
marrying her, Woody because he regrets not sleeping with her years 
ago when he had the chance and Tony because he falls in love with 
her at first sight. Meanwhile, Jose tries to talk Julie into being his 
last fling before his marriage to Mia and Mary tries to reignite the 
passion into her marriage with Woody. Although sex-obsessed, 
the movie never leaves the realm of the PG-rated, which makes 
sense because it's rated PG.
        A MIDSUMMER NIGHT'S SEX COMEDY moves a lot 
more slowly than the average Allen feature and is a lot less funny 
than usual because the Woody character is toned down from a 
cynical bastard to a spiritist inventor. Scenes where he's on the 
flying bicycle and especially the ending make the movie more 
absurd than funny, and aside from the basic premise of the movie, 
there's not much plot, just people trying to flirt and set up secret 
meetings that invariably backfire, and backfire is pretty much 
what this movie does after the first hour or so.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Preacher's Wife, The (1996)
        THE PREACHER'S WIFE is a two-hour Hallmark card -- 
sappy and unoriginal yet uplifting and touching. Yes, I'm a sarcastic 
cynic, but even I can put that aside when a decent feel-good movie 
comes along, especially these morally-sound musical comedies with 
a black female lead (SISTER ACT, anybody?). THE PREACHER'S 
WIFE is a positive movie about the comraderie of a black community 
like only a white woman could tell it... I didn't say I was going to set 
the sarcasm _completely_ aside.
        Denzel Washington plays an angel sent to lend assistance 
to a preacher (Courtney B. Vance) and his family. Whitney Houston, 
of course, plays the preacher's wife, a gospel-singing woman who 
finds her husband has less and less time for her as troubles mount 
in the church and community. Their son's best friend is being sent 
away to a foster family, a local kid is charged with armed robbery, 
the church boiler is shot and a greedy local businessman (Gregory 
Hines) is buying up all the property in sight. Predictably, these 
problems only exist to be solved by Denzel the Anzel... excuse 
me, the Angel...
        Courtney is hard to convince at first, even after Denzel 
pops up three consecutive times when Courtney prays for divine 
help. And all Denzel's talk of an angel handbook and the three rules 
he has to abide by (don't expose him to sunlight, don't get him wet, 
don't feed him after midnight) seems more than a little odd, but the 
preacher's family easily accepts him as Courtney's new assistant.
        Two of THE PREACHER'S WIFE's best comic 
performances are from Whitney's WAITING TO EXHALE 
compatriot Loretta Devine, as Courtney's secretary, and Jenifer 
Lewis in the role of Whitney's mother. In a movie that asks us to 
believe angels are among us, the fact that Whitney's mom looks 
young enough to be her sister is infinitely less believable.
        Denzel almost assumes Courtney's roles for awhile, serving 
as father-figure for their son, doing church paperwork and even 
taking Whitney dancing at Jazzie's, a club frequented by Lionel 
Richie. (Actually, I think Lionel works there as part-time bartender 
to supplement his paltry "All Night Long" and "We Are the World" 
royalties.) This causes a little heavenly strife and even prompts 
Courtney to say the h-word, but rest assured all will end happily.
        As always, the soundtrack comes courtesy of Whitney 
Houston herself and, just like the last two times, is billed as "the 
soundtrack event of the year." She doesn't even make albums 
anymore, just soundtracks. Unlike THE BODYGUARD or WAITING 
TO EXHALE, though, her musical contributions to THE 
PREACHER'S WIFE give the movie its identity. Songs like "I Love 
the Lord" and "The Lord Is My Shepherd," most of which feature 
the Georgia Mass Choir, could singlehandedly make gospel music 
radio-friendly. Lyrics saying God is "bigger than a Shaq attack," 
though, probably won't go over big with the kids. Trust me.
        Penny Marshall, who directed this remake of Cary Grant's 
THE BISHOP'S WIFE, did an admirable job making this movie 
attractive holiday fluff that elevates itself above the mediocre mush 
you'd expect. She followed the recipe for a feel-good Christmas 
movie and came up with something tasty, not just the usual 
PRANCER fruitcake. Remaking it with a black cast was her best 
idea -- it's the appeal of Denzel, Whitney and the supporting cast 
that make the movie fun to watch. THE PREACHER'S WIFE is a 
safe movie for all ages, and I imagine more than a few church youth 
groups will be taking trips to the movie theater this Christmas 
season.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/33rd of a Century!

Title
Review for To Die for (1995)
        I'm sure there was some media case these past few years 
where some beautiful woman seduced a teenage boy and convinced 
him to kill her husband. It sounds like based-on-a-true-story TV 
movie fodder to me and even if I'm mistaken about that, it was still 
a minor subplot in WAYNE'S WORLD 2. But no matter what veteran 
comedy writer and performer Buck Henry's inspiration was in 
scripting this movie (besides, of course, the novel it was based 
on), TO DIE FOR is definitely an entertaining black comedy that 
hovers somewhere between scathing satire and sex-killer thriller 
material.
        Nicole Kidman plays Suzanne Stone, a beautiful woman 
who is prepared to pour all her effort into becoming "the second 
Diane Sawyer" in the TV journalism world. Shortly after meeting 
and marrying a man (Matt Dillon) whose parents are "pillars of the 
Italian-American community" (translation: Mafia), she gets her foot 
in the door at a small public access cable channel, doing midnight 
weather reports before the national anthem comes on, signifying 
the end of the broadcast day.
        By this point we know she really isn't any good at her 
craft, but that's not important. She has an amazing tenacity and 
dedication, from sleeping with TV executives on her honeymoon 
to presenting Wayne "Newman" Knight (the cable station head) 
with a list of impeccable references for a part-time secretarial 
position. She eventually wears down his resistance to where he 
lets her do the weather forecasts and work on a documentary 
chronicling the life and views of three teenage losers.
        Of the losers, one is an insecure, overweight girl who 
idolizes Kidman, another is a juvenile delinquent who was forced 
into participation in the documentary as punishment, and the third 
lusts after her hopelessly (as do we all). Kidman knows exactly 
how to play all three like a fiddle, offering one sex, one money, 
one companionship and all three a future life of luxury with her 
in Hollywood.
        All they have to do in exchange is remove the one obstacle 
standing between her and stardom. That obstacle, naturally, is her 
husband. Kidman's character doesn't have much of a reason to kill 
her husband, who is painted as faithful and dedicated to her success, 
but the ultimate motivation for the murder -- and everything else 
Kidman does -- is her unwavering commitment to success in the 
broadcast field. And the fact that she's nuts.
        The story is told in flashback, mixing in the dramatic 
scenes with footage of Dillon's family on a daytime talk show, 
documentary footage of Kidman telling her own side of the story 
and interviews with the three kids and Dillon's ice skater sister. 
Henry's choice to tell the story of a documentary gone wrong in 
documentary format was a shrewd one. TO DIE FOR, on the whole, 
is an incredibly clever movie. It succeeds as a subtle satire of media 
influence instead of beating us over the head with its message as 
Oliver Stone did in the painful-to-watch NATURAL BORN 
KILLERS.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Deliverance (1972)
        Lately, I've been reviewing an assortment of old movies 
dating back to 1937, and have sparked quite a backlash of comments 
from fans of old movies I've ripped up (FORBIDDEN PLANET OF 
THE APES in particular). A few people have told me I don't like 
these movies because I'm watching them now, as opposed to forty 
years ago, when they didn't seem so stilted and cheesy. They say 
now that I've seen hundreds of newer films that have drastically 
improved on special effects and turned certain plot lines into 
cliches, I can't watch the old ones without thinking of what's 
come later to top it. And of course they're right.
        One person's e-mail comment summed it up best -- I 
have a 90's bias. I naturally prefer the look of a movie from my 
lifetime (1978 on) as opposed to the ridiculous costumes of the 
70's, the out-there decor of the 60's, the terrible sci-fi effects of the 
50's (FORBIDDEN PIE-PLATE PLANET fans take note) and so on, 
even if there is something undeniably dream-like and artistic about 
black-and-white films that Technicolor can't achieve. There are 
movies from those decades I love, but I'm sure they don't seem as 
good in 1996 as they did when they were originally released. And 
I didn't see them when they were originally released because I hadn't 
even been conceived then.
        Unfortunately, I didn't see all these movies in chronological 
order, which means when you go from the special effects of 
JURASSIC PARK or TWISTER to something like FORBIDDEN 
PLANET, you're not impressed. Even the "four-star" movies like 
DELIVERANCE don't seem incredibly great to me. Here's a movie 
that takes almost forty-five minutes to get to one exciting scene and 
then spends the rest of the movie coming down from that. I've seen 
enough of the newer, short-attention-span action and thriller movies 
that when a movie coasts on the strength of one sequence, it doesn't 
earn a four-star rating in my book.
        DELIVERANCE is still a highly-watchable film, if just to 
see an underwear-clad Ned Beatty being violated by two backwoods 
rednecks. Burt Reynolds, in one of his very few worthy cinematic 
appearances (before he'd be relegated to "Evening Shade" reruns 
on The Family Channel and those SMOKEY AND THE BANDIT 
sequels), plays a macho man who gets a few of his buddies (Jon 
Voight, Beatty and Ronny Cox) together for a weekend canoe trip 
down a river wild.
        But this is no Meryl Streep-reclaiming-her-lost-youth flick; 
the river set-up is just an excuse to get them into an unpopulated 
area of the Deep South. We already know from the five-minute 
"Dueling Banjoes" scene at the beginning that the people 'round 
these parts are just plain odd and, when Voight and Beatty get out 
of their canoe to wander through the woods for a while and the 
"Dueling Banjoes" song starts up again on the soundtrack for 
the eighth time, we know something's about to happen.
        That's when the one nail-biting scene in the entire movie 
comes up and Voight and Beatty are under the mercy of the two 
rednecks, in a scene that undoubtedly inspired the creation of 
Quentin Tarantino's Maynard and Zed characters in PULP 
FICTION. (There I go again, making comparisons between old 
and new movies.) After that, it's an hour of anti-climax as Voight 
and Beatty must transport a wounded Reynolds down the river 
and dodge an angry redneck.
        Don't get me wrong, this is a good movie; I was just 
expecting more from it than just the one scene. That's the only 
time it becomes a four-star movie. The rest of the time it hovers 
somewhere between two-and-a-half and three-star status. Reynolds 
contributes an interesting performance toward the beginning, as the 
man obsessed with violence and nature. That's when you get to 
thinking maybe the rest of the movie will have the other three trying 
to escape a psycho Reynolds and his even nuttier hairpiece, but after 
the big rape scene and Reynolds' getting shot, he drops out of the 
movie.
        DELIVERANCE becomes Voight's movie for the last third, 
and he plays a notably less macho character than usual. On paper, 
you'd think Voight would be cast in the Reynolds role and vice 
versa, but by the end you realize his range extends far beyond the 
shoot-em-up action hero. It's good stuff... for the 70's.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50 of a Century!

Title
Review for Waiting to Exhale (1995)
        WAITING TO EXHALE follows the relationship struggles of 
four black women, showing a bleak world where men are pigs. No, I 
don't take offense at the depiction. I know I'm not a pig, even though I 
do eat like one. And for those of you who are wondering if a white boy 
like me could ever begin to appreciate a movie about black women, I 
must remind you I was a black woman in a past life. And I spent my 
entire senior year in high school immersed in their culture and queen, 
Aretha the #551 bus driver.
        The characters in this movie were waiting to exhale. I was 
waiting for the movie get good. They got their wish, but I never did. 
WAITING TO EXHALE is an uneven movie with some good scenes 
and some bad scenes, some that work well and others that don't. The 
cast is likeable,though, and the performances are exemplary, especially 
from Angela "Tina Turner" Basset. Pop star Whitney Houston has 
even matured acting-wise from THE BODYGUARD, though her theme 
song this time, "Exhale (Shoop, Shoop)" is no "I Will Always Love 
You."
        Savannah (Houston) enjoys casual sex with various people, 
but is in love with a married man who promises time after time that 
he's going to leave his wife, but never quite gets around to it. 
Meanwhile, Angela Basset's husband has already left her for a white 
woman, so she does what any woman would do in that situation--she 
gathers all her husband's belongings up, takes them out to his car and 
lights it on fire, in what is undoubtedly the most powerful scene in the 
movie.
        Meanwhile, Robin is in Savannah's predicament and also has 
a crackhead boyfriend, while Gloria, the heavyset woman, is 
contemplating a renewed relationship with the on-again/off-again 
father of her teenage son. All of them are looking for love in all the 
wrong places with all the wrong people, but rest assured the movie 
does end for the most part happily, with uncredited performances from 
Wesley Snipes and Gregory Hines livening things up.
        I couldn't say how much of this movie accurately portrays the 
contemporary dating scene, because I've never been part of the 
contemporary dating scene, but there is a lot of sex involved (in the 
movie, not with me), not the nude kind, but the fully-clothed bump-
and-grind stuff. WAITING TO EXHALE has a lot of good elements, 
but a lot of mediocre or bad ones bringing it down. The four leads are 
all good and the depictions of their strong friendship are touching, but 
the story could have been told with some tigher editing and a few less 
voiceovers from the characters in corny prose lifted directly from the 
novel this movie was based on... There, I'm done. I can exhale now.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
and check out the 40+ new reviews since Christmas.

Title
Review for Late Shift, The (1996) (TV)
        Sure, the late night talk show wars of the past few years 
were silly, but that was no reason to make such a half-hearted 
caricature movie about them. Based on a book which took its topic 
seriously and was actually interesting, THE LATE SHIFT is a 
made-for-HBO feature that tells the story of the Jay Leno vs. David 
Letterman dealings that took place when Johnny Carson announced 
he was stepping aside and NBC had to decide who was to fill the 
slot.
        Treated properly, this would have made a great movie, but 
the makers of THE LATE SHIFT movie put precedence on finding 
actors who resembled their real-life counterparts rather than finding 
actors with talent. Still, the Leno and Letterman look-alikes are 
some really bad imposters who look like a cross between living 
caricatures and those rubber creeps from the Duracell battery 
commercials. Anyone with a bad wig and cigar looks a little like 
Dave, and anyone with dark hair and a prosthetic chin looks a 
little like Leno. Anyone period could match the actors here for 
sheer talent.
        "Saturday Night Live" stars Joe Piscopo and Kevin Nealon 
did far better Letterman and Leno impersonations, and both could 
have definitely been booked for this movie, so if they were going 
for people who could do good impressions, why not go for those 
two? They're obviously not below booking down-and-out comedians 
because they've got Rich Little playing Johnny Carson, which lends 
no credibility to the role, because most of the time Carson is 
supposed to deliver serious lines in such a badly impersonated 
voice, which renders them nothing but laughable. Same for Jay and 
Dave, whom we're supposed to take seriously but can't because the 
imposters are doing such a bad job.
        There's no excuse for them not getting real talent to play 
the network executives, whom most of us have never seen or heard. 
The only decent acting talent in the movie is Kathy Bates, playing 
Leno manager Helen Kushnick, and she seems out of place in such 
a second-rate movie. Still, her bitch-from-hell performance is a 
welcome diversion from the cavalcade of crap the rest of the movie 
is. I couldn't tell if it was meant to be laughable or was just so awful 
it took on a camp value. Either way, it made a travesty out of a 
compelling book.
        But even with amateur direction (including camera angles 
straight out of the 60's "Batman" show during Letterman's tirades), 
bad acting and a cheap synthesizer score probably stolen from a 
porno movie, an interesting story still manages to break through 
sometimes like the tiny sun rays that shine through dark storm 
clouds in little fingers of warmth. The inside dealings of the NBC 
executives, Letterman's GODFATHER-like meeting with superagent 
Michael Ovitz, Leno eavesdropping on an NBC board meeting, it's 
all made innately interesting by the knowledge that it all actually 
happened even though it is rendered badly.
        Certain portions of THE LATE SHIFT are watchable, 
particularly those portions featuring Kathy Bates, and most people 
who haven't read the book find the movie version fascinating just 
because they haven't devoured the inside information in the far-
superior written version, but the poor choice of actors directed 
badly and accompanied by bad music makes it a sour adaptation 
for those of us who have read Bill Carter's book. In the words of 
Judy, the perky Time-Life operator, "Read the book."
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for Some Like It Hot (1959)
     The Billy Wilder romantic comedy factory reached a climax
with SOME LIKE IT HOT, a delightful transvestite farce that features
a gorgeous and charming Marilyn Monroe. The beauty of these
Wilder films is that they push the envelope so much from the usual
"Leave it to Beaver" fluff of the '50s. Every one of these comedies
involves premarital or extramarital sex, or the desire thereof, as
part of its plot. While most other films ignored this very human
distinction, Wilder turns it into great entertainment that still seems
more or less wholesome.
     Who else in the '50s exemplifies the dichotomy between sex
and wholesomeness than Monroe? The woman posed for Playboy
and slept with the president but still seems like such an innocent
child, especially here. As the victim of countless deceptions and
advances from men, she comes out naive and making the same
mistakes over and over again. We sympathize with her from the
beginning, although we completely understand Tony Curtis and
Jack Lemmon's desire to score with her. I mean, she's Marilyn
Monroe!
     Like the other Wilder comedies, SOME LIKE IT HOT has an
elaborate, almost-epic set-up. This almost seems like two movies
in one. We first see a car chase between the cops and a bunch of
mobsters with bootlegged liquor, then a wild party thrown by gang
leader Spats (Edward G. Robinson) that is broken up by the
police. Curtis and Lemmon are two members of the band playing
the shindig, and barely escape arrest. 
     The next day, Curtis and Lemmon are at the music agency
looking for work and find the only opening available is a
three-week gig in Florida for two musicians that play the same
instruments they do. But it's an all-female band, so they instead
decide to head upstate for a low-paying gig. In the parking garage,
there are Raft and his boys deciding one of their own has ratted
them out to the police. Raft kills one of them just as Curtis and
Lemmon walk in. Again, they barely escape capture. 
     This added element -- the mob wanting them dead -- is
enough to make the two musicians put on dresses and high heels
and join the girls band. As with any movie cross-dressers, they
look nothing like the opposite sex, but we have to suspend our
disbelief enough to accept that no one else can see through this
disguise, least of all Monroe who, as the band's singer Sugar, is a
dim-bulb and an alcoholic. In these surroundings, Lemmon says he
feels "like a kid in a candy store." 
     Curtis and Lemmon both begin pursuit of Monroe, in and
out of drag. Curtis, after a girl-to-girl talk with Monroe about what
she's looking for in a man, masquerades as a visiting millionaire.
Meanwhile, Lemmon has a lusty old man to contend with. This
being the '50s, the only goal of any of these women is to get
married. After the old guy proposes to Lemmon, Lemmon
considers going through with it because he probably won't ever get
another chance to marry someone that rich. 
     Lines like that show that the film has intelligence and social
insight to go with the laughs. SOME LIKE IT HOT is the best Wilder
film, with wonderful performances by the three leads and other
minor characters and great writing. Not only is there a treasure
trove of classic lines, the plot is also brilliantly constructed. 
I can't name a single bad thing about this film, except for the 
fact that it seems sexist now. I can only wonder what Monroe 
could have accomplished in a liberated world. 

Title
Review for Chinatown (1974)
     Roman Polanski didn't impress me too much with ROSEMARY'S
BABY, the boring tale of Satan impregnating Mia Farrow, but he won
back my admiration with the film noirish CHINATOWN. This detective
flick takes its cues from the great noir films of the '30s and '40s
(comparisons to THE MALTESE FALCON spring instantly to mind), but has
its own cynical view that doesn't let good automatically win out all the
time. It also has Faye Dunaway's breasts. 
     Jack Nicholson, in one of his best all-time roles, plays J.J. Gittes,
a private eye who makes money off husbands who suspect their wife is
cheating on them, and vice versa. He insists it's an honest living and
enjoys all the publicity he receives, until a woman pretending to be the
wife of the head of the water company uses him to frame the poor guy. 
     Dunaway, as the real wife, is mad as hell and threatens to sue
Gittes. But he's just as mad as she is that his reputation as photographer
of infedity could be tarnished like this, and offers to help get to the
bottom of it. The plot turns out to be one of those kooky real estate
schemes, involving L.A.'s perpetual water shortage and a bunch of
orange groves the water is secretely being rerouted to. All in all, it's
going to gross the bad guys about $30 million. 
     Complicating matters somewhat, Dunaway's husband turns up
dead after about the first 30 minutes (drowned, of course) and no one
knows who perpetrated his death. Could it be Dunaway herself, the
femme fatale? Or Dunaway's shady father (John Huston), who was once
partners with the dead man? Or the crooked policeman Gittes once
worked with in Chinatown? Or did Mrs. Peacock kill Colonel Mustard
in the study? You'll have to watch to find out. 
     Nicholson is perfect in the role of Gittes -- innately cool and tough
yet completely human and flawed. He has his own strange code of ethics
(it's okay to profit from adultery, etc.) but finds himself violating this
as he lets down his guard with Dunaway. He even spends almost one-third of
the film wearing a giant bandage on his nose, after Polanski himself
slices it up, to exemplify the fact that he isn't an untouachable movie
hero. If there's any detective movie successor to Humphrey Bogart it's
Nicholson in CHINATOWN. 
     CHINATOWN is one of those rare crime movies that doesn't
overexplain each one of its plot elements so that it won't confuse even
the most idiotic moviegoers. I'm so used to having every plot twist fed to
me that CHINATOWN almost lost me at the end with its subtlety. God
forbid that I should actually have to think about what's happening on the
screen and piece together some of the clues onscreen, but that's part of
Polanski's genius in this film. Now I'm starting to think maybe I missed
something in ROSEMARY'S BABY... 
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Over 750 detailed reviews with a comedic flair.

Title
Review for Get Shorty (1995)
     Up until about a year ago, John Travolta's career consisted of
those "Look Who's Talking" movies (notice how they never called them
LOOK WHO'S TALENTED) and the 1991 bomb SHOUT (which was bad enough to
make most people scream).  But somewhere along the line, Travolta got
the starring role in the Tarantino masterpiece PULP FICTION and his
career soared once again.  Weird how someone whose career was on par
with the Bee Gees back in 1978 would experience fame and fortune once
again, while Barry, Robin and Maurice Gibb could do no better than a
1993 straight-to-the-cutout-bin album aptly named "Size Isn't
Everything" (and of course, they learned that sales are everything).
     But now Travolta's back on the Hollywood scene once again, and I
think we all know why.  Four words: contract with the devil.  And this
has nothing to do with Newt Gingrich's "Contract With America."  No,
Satan is much more humane.  Anyway, yes, Travolta has sold his soul to
the hairy host of the netherworld.  How do I know? I own the document
in question.  Amazing what you can buy at those collector's shops for a
few hundred dollars, isn't it?
     GET SHORTY continues in the vein of PULP FICTION, with Travolta as
crime minion Chili Palmer.  He goes to collect some of the mafia's
money from a B-grade director (Gene Hackman) and suddenly finds out he
wants out of the mob game and into the movie game.  Sure, a ruthless
criminal like him is far too honest to make it in Hollywood, but I
guess that's beside the point.
     Palmer is determined to get Hackman's next project made, so he
sets out to convince big star Martin Weir (Danny DeVito) to star in the
movie, bringing along down-and-out horror actress Karen Flores (Rene
Russo), who has already had affairs with Hackman and DeVito.  It
doesn't take a Las Vegas odds-maker to predict that she and Travolta
will soon be hitting the sheets as well, after the customary sexual
tension and denial, which has been used in every comedy from "Who's the
Boss?" to Speechless.  It works in this case, unlike "Who's the Boss?"
although it's interesting to note that Tony Danza has signed a contract
with the devil also.
     Complicating matters somewhat are the mobsters who have backed
Hackman's other films and want in on this one too, along with
Travolta's mob boss trying to track him down for defecting.  GET SHORTY
is by no means on the same level as PULP FICTION, despite the obvious
similarities.  This movie doesn't have near the amount of originality
or depth as PULP FICTION but it is definitely one of the most
entertaining movies I've seen this year (yes, even better than
HALLOWEEN VI).  GET SHORTY is my kind of movie, one that mixes
intelligent humor with action and violence.  I'm definitely going to
have to check out the novel it was based on.  Are you getting this,
shorty?

Title
Review for Forget Paris (1995)
        A man takes on a certain amount of stress and responsibility 
when he decides to direct, produce, co-write and star in a movie. Steve 
Martin struck out with A SIMPLE TWIST OF FATE. Mel Brooks had 
several successes and flops. Billy Crystal, though, has managed to 
work in front of and behind the scenes of several movies. He took the 
gamble again here and won, with this movie that's a blatant WHEN 
HARRY MET SALLY clone yet takes on an identity and some hilarous 
humor of its own.
        Crystal goes to Paris to bury his dead dad and is put through 
two days of hell after the airline loses the body (but at least they didn't 
send it down the luggage carousel). On the plus side, his situation 
allows him to meet Debra Winger, an airline employee in charge of 
recovering missing corpses. It turns out the two were meant to be 
together, as they're the only two people in the world who can trade 
rapid-fire sarcasm back and forth without even cracking a smile.
        The week they spend together in Paris is sheer bliss (It can't 
just be "bliss," it has to be "sheer bliss," or maybe "pure bliss," but 
"bliss" can't stand alone.), and when it comes to an end, Crystal asks 
her to marry him. She eventually agrees and the two end up married, 
with Winger giving up her profession to move in with him, but the 
marriage is seemingly doomed from the start. Crystal is on the road 
most of the time as an NBA referee, not to mention various trying 
episodes of the movie, one where Winger gets a pigeon glued to her 
face (in a hysterically funny yet indescribable scene), another where 
Winger's senile father moves in with them, and yet another where the 
two try every known method to have a baby. As if the NAKED GUN 
33 1/3 sperm bank scene wasn't bad enough, now we've got Billy 
Crystal asking a nurse for the BARBARELLA video so he can be 
stimulated enough to fill a plastic cup.
        The whole story is told to Crystal's friend Joe Mantegna's 
fiance (played by Hope or Gloria--I'm not sure which) in a restaurant. 
Different stages of the relationship are told to the woman as the other 
dinner guests arrive (including Cathy Moriarty and Julie "Marge 
Simpson" Kavner), culminating in the arrival of Crystal himself at the 
end to complete the story. It's an incredibly clever plot device, I'll give 
Crystal that. And FORGET PARIS is overall a clever and funny movie. 
You basketball fans will be glad to know dozens of NBA stars appear 
as themselves in this movie. I can now die fulfilled, knowing I've seen 
Billy Crystal and Charles Barkley together onscreen.

Title
Review for Kingdom of the Spiders (1977)
        From "Arachnid Productions" comes this classic of horrible 
horror, starring everyone's favorite bad actor, William Shatner. He 
plays Dr. Robert Hanson, nicknamed Rack because... well, look at his 
chest. He's ripped! Actually, the name Rack has something to do with 
pool games he used to play with his brother, who was "killed in 
Nam."
        Old Rack still takes care of his brother's widow and her 
small daughter, as we find out at the beginning, when a horse-bound 
Shatner ropes the widow. "Stop it. Damn you, John!"
        We cut away from that to witness the first spider attack, 
perpetrated on a 200-pound calf owned by farmer Woody Strode and 
his wife ("introducing" Lieux Dressler). Shatner takes a look at the 
calf the next day and says, sadly, "The calf's dead."
        "There's only so much I can do," Shatner replies, and you 
almost want him to say, "Dammit, Woody, I'm a doctor, not a 
veterinarian!"
        Down the road, a redneck gas station attendant is in a 
similar bind. He goes into his shed to look for a tire and finds a 
tarantula instead. "Damn spiders are having a field day in here!" he 
exclaims, as another jumps out at him. "God almighty!" he yells as he 
bats it to the ground, spits some tobacco juice on it and declares, 
"Take that, you ugly sh*t!"
        Shatner asks for a reinforcement doctor and gets one in 
Tiffany Bolling, a sexy entomologist from "the university." 
Immediately, Shatner turns on the old Captain Kirk charm, asking 
her, "How would you like to have some dinner tonight?"
        She replies coldly, "I probably will. See you tomorrow." 
Punked! Bolling heads back to her rented cabin, where she does what 
all hot horror chicks do sooner or later -- strip and take a shower. 
While she's soaping up, a tarantula roams her cabin and hides itself 
in her dresser drawer, setting up the nail-biting sequence where the 
PSYCHO score goes crazy while a towel-clad Bolling gets closer and 
closer to danger, finally reaching into the drawer and pulling out a 
spider. "You're not supposed to live in people's houses," she tells it, in 
an almost baby-talk tone of voice. "You're supposed to live in the 
ground." She sets it free, to go kill someone else.
        First thing in the morning, Shatner and Bolling pay another 
visit to Woody's farm, where Bolling finds their dog dead, 
announcing, "It would appear this dog died from a massive dose of 
spider venom."
        "That would explain the spider hill," Woody replies, leading 
them to a giant mass of dirt out back that swarms with tarantulas. 
Shatner muses over it for awhile before heading back to his sister-in-
law's house to flirt with her for awhile. Then he gets the idea that 
maybe he should burn the spider hill, and heads back to the Strode 
farm for the third time. As Woody lights it up, yelling out, "Burn! 
Burn in hell, you bastards!" Spider hell.
        What no one counts on is the fact that there are 30 or 40 
other identical-sized spider hills nearby, all of them swarming with 
killer spiders. Their natural prey has been cut back by prevalent use 
of DDT insecticide, so now they're coming after humans. Not just any 
humans -- humans who can't act. So in one hilariously bad sequence 
after another, townfolk die off, from the crop duster to Woody to the 
sheriff. There are even the requisite scenes of people wrapped in 
giant spiderwebs and screaming masses running out of the city while 
spiders run rampant. There's only one question on my mind; why the 
hell doessn't anyone just stomp on those things?
        KINGDOM OF THE SPIDERS is awful, but laughably so. 
Shatner, complete with cowboy hat and oversize belt buckle, has 
never overacted more badly and the effects are so far less than special 
that this KINGDOM hearkens directly back to the unintentionally 
funny sci-fi flicks of the '50s. It's played out more as a slasher flick, 
though, and if you can track down a video copy of this rarity, you'll 
see previews for five or six horror films that seem even worse, with 
titles like THE TOOLBOX MURDERS, SCREAM BLOODY MURDER 
and THE DEMON.
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving The World For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Everything You Always Wanted to Know About Sex (1972)
        Besides being the longest title of a movie I've reviewed 
so far (only because I was indisposed both days Don't Be a 
Menace to South Central While Drinking Your 
Juice in the Hood was in theaters), EVERYTHING YOU 
ALWAYS... is also the only movie in this book based on a sex 
manual. I should know -- from the ages of twelve to fourteen, 
every time I was in the library, I'd sneak up to the 612.6 (by the 
Dewey Decimal System) section of the stacks and grab up Dr. 
David Reuben's sex book, only after I was sure no one was 
looking. It was from that book I turned my warped, misinformed 
view of sex into something even more mangled and twisted.
        So naturally I was interested to see how Woody Allen, 
the world's most talented sex pervert, had adapted hundreds of pages 
of dry, clinical sex talk into a comedy. The answer lies in the fact 
that this is an incredibly loose adaptation of the book. All Woody 
did was take a few of the chapter title questions and turn them into 
separate vignettes. For a sex movie, though, EVERYTHING YOU... 
reaches its climax awfully early, is impotent for about half an hour, 
gives us a tease of foreplay, then goes into two more satisfying 
climaxes before we all have a smoke during the end credits and 
bask in the afterglow of what we've seen.
        Since EVERYTHING... is such an uneven movie, I'm 
rating each segment individually. For those of you who don't 
have calculators, the average rating for each segment was 2.43 
stars, rounded up to two-and-a-half for an overall rating of the 
film.
        "Do Aphrodisiacs Work?" (***1/2) The movie's funniest 
segment, with Woody playing the jester in a Dark Ages court. 
Woody finds himself hot for the queen, who returns his feelings 
after he sneaks past two soldiers and slips her a mickey. (That's 
m-i-c-k-e-y. Why? Because he likes her.) Comedy abounds from 
multiple situations, from Woody trying to unlock the queen's 
chastity belt as fast as he can ("Before you know it, the Renaissance 
will be here and we'll all be painting.") to the scene where he tries to 
entertain the court with some awful jokes. ("TB or not TB? That is 
the congestion.")
        "What is Sodomy?" (*) A video of actual sodomy wouldn't 
be too much less entertaining than what Woody gives us here, a 
sketch about a doctor (Gene Wilder) who falls in love with a sheep 
(yes, a sheep). It's more tasteless than funny, and is actually played 
straight most of the time, with the only mild laughs coming when a 
depressed Wilder drinks Woolite from the bottle and caresses his 
lamb's wool sweater.
        "Why Do Some Women Have Trouble Reaching Orgasm?" 
(**) Woody ignores the obvious answer (Because they're having 
sex with _him_!) and instead plays a harrowed Italian husband 
whose frigid wife (Louise Lasser) can only become aroused by 
having intercourse in public places. The entire segment is in 
subtitles and is mostly unfunny, a frigid piece of comedy.
        "Are Transvestites Homosexuals?" (*1/2) Even more 
one-joke than the last segment, Lou Jacobi gets caught wearing a 
dress outside. That's about it.
        "What Are Sex Perverts?" (**1/2) Instead of just flashing 
his picture onscreen and moving on, Woody recreates a "What's 
My Line?" takeoff entitled "What's My Perversion?" where panelists 
(including Regis Philbin, who himself fantasizes about spanking 
Kathie Lee) must ask questions to discover the contestant's 
perversion. This segment is interesting rather than funny, due to 
Woody's convincing recreation of badly-preserved kinescope 
reels and use of game show host Jack Barry as himself.
        "Are the Findings of Doctors and Clinics Who Do Sexual 
Research and Experiments Accurate?" (***) Woody plays an 
apprentice sex doctor (and author of the book "Advanced Sexual 
Positions: How to Achieve Them Without Laughing") who must stop 
a giant breast ("about 4,000 in an X cup") from destroying life as we 
know it. This one is funny until he crosses the taste line by having 
the breast squirt milk at its victims.
        "What Happens During Ejaculation?" (***1/2) This one 
takes us inside the male body, which is depicted as a giant control 
center where little men in white suits (including Burt Reynolds and 
Tony Randall) control every activity of the body. Here, as the 
erection is cranked up by sweaty manual laborers, nervous sperm 
Woody prepares to be shot out of the body. Creative and funny, a 
good climax to a movie that starts out with a bang, lays limp for 
awhile and regains its momentum toward the end.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America For Over 1/50th of a Century!

Title
Review for First Wives Club, The (1996)
        I was a minority for the opening night rush hour showing 
of THE FIRST WIVES CLUB. Affirmative action on the part of most 
middle aged mothers couldn't get most teenage guys into the theater, 
but I allowed myself to be dragged along to see this one because the 
only other movie opening was the Bruce Willis western LAST MAN 
STANDING and I didn't want to be the first or last man standing in 
line for that.
        THE FIRST WIVES CLUB, as expected, abounds in 
feminine mid-life crisis humor. If movies were paired off, THE 
FIRST WIVES CLUB would be married to CITY SLICKERS, its 
masculine counterpart. Both have an abundance of laugh-out-loud 
lines and physical comedy, although the female version isn't quite 
on par with the 1991 Billy Crystal classic. Beneath the comedy, 
CITY SLICKERS had a poignant seriousness about friendship 
and aging that THE FIRST WIVES CLUB tries harder to achieve 
but never quite does.
        Still, the teamup of Bette Midler, Goldie Hawn and Diane 
Keaton makes for an amazing comic partnership. Even though the 
combined age on those three has to be over 150, they're still in top 
form. Midler is the spurned Jewish woman whose rich husband 
(Dan Hedaya) has left her for Sarah Jessica Parker. Hawn is the 
washed-out actress who relies on cosmetic surgery -- particularly 
collagen injections that leave her looking like Lips Manlis from 
DICK TRACY -- to stay young. Keaton's character is the neurotic 
type who spends most of her time on her therapist's couch, trying 
to stay optimistic about her failing marriage. Her contribution to 
the movie seems like ANNIE HALL: TWENTY YEARS LATER, an 
inevitable comparison since her character's name actually is 
Annie.
        The three were inseparable friends in college, but have 
proven separable in the almost thirty years since. They reunite at 
the funeral of a fourth friend who committed suicide after being 
dumped by her husband for a younger woman and, after a drunken 
lunch of several hours, realize they're all three in the same boat. 
Midler's got Sarah Jessica to contend with, Hawn's movie producer 
husband is currently with Elizabeth "Jessie Spano" Berkeley and 
Keaton soon finds out her husband is getting it on with the 
therapist.
        Having this much in common, they decide to form an 
informal organization to help each other out. Remembering the 
title of the movie, they name it THE FIRST WIVES CLUB. What 
follows is a series of juvenile pranks and blackmail scams on the 
bastard husbands, including the most memorable scene of the 
movie, in which the three of them break into Hedaya's penthouse 
and must make a hasty exit in the window washer's cart when he 
and Parker return.
        The movie itself is predictable, juvenile and all that, but 
I liked it anyway and so did the predominantly fortysomething 
audience I saw it with, including my mom, who was lobbying for 
a four-star rating. I recognized enough flaws to not be completely 
enthralled in the movie, and I certainly couldn't identify with being 
dumped for a younger woman (give me a few years on that), but 
when something is as funny as THE FIRST WIVES CLUB is, I can 
overlook the brief but forced drama and contrived sitcom 
recycling.

Title
Review for Reservoir Dogs (1992)
        On the basis of this film alone, I never would have 
predicted that, in two years, Quentin Tarantino would become the 
country's biggest hotshot director. RESERVOIR DOGS has hints 
of the Tarantino brilliance that emerged in PULP FICTION, but is a 
much less substantive, more conventional crime story than the big 
PF. Here's what the two movies do have in common...
        --Scenes of intelligent, amusing dialogue with no relevance 
to the plot
        --A story that jumps back and forth in time rather than 
going in a logical, chronological sequence
        --Graphic yet necessary violence
        --An engaging crime story
        --Dialogue liberally spiced with swear words and 
racial/gender slurs
        --Three of the same actors (Harvey Keitel, Tim Roth and 
Steve Buscemi)
        --A Mexican standoff ending, although this one is 
considerably less optimistic than PF
        RESERVOIR DOGS is an entire hour shorter than PULP 
FICTION because it's only got one story to tell rather than three. 
Crime lord Joe Cabot (veteran actor Lawrence Tierney) has 
assembled five criminals who have never even met each other to pull 
a diamond store heist. The five are instructed not to reveal their real 
names or personal details or anything the cops could use if one of 
them was captured and interrogated. Instead, they are all given code 
names off the color chart -- Mr. White (Keitel), Mr. Pink (Buscemi), 
Mr. Orange (Roth), Mr. Blonde (Michael Madsen), Mr. Brown 
(Tarantino) and Mr. Peach (Tarantino's chin).
        Most of the movie's running time is spent with Mr. 
White and Pink waiting at a warehouse for the others to arrive. 
Mr. Orange, meanwhile, is on the floor, dying from a gunshot 
wound. The police had arrived at the scene of the crime way too 
soon, leading White to believe one of the five was an informant. 
The story's background unfolds through a series of flashbacks, of 
the crime itself and the meetings between Joe and the criminals 
prior to the crime. Eventually, Blonde arrives with a police officer 
hostage, and what follows is a truly brutal, uncomfortable torture 
scene. Let's just say Picasso would be inspired by what Blonde 
does to the cop's ear.
        A lot of the time, RESERVOIR DOGS seems like your 
typical gangster heist-gone-wrong movie, but there are a few 
sequences that are uniquely Tarantino. The opening scene in the 
coffee shop starts the movie off on a high note the rest of it doesn't 
live up to, as the criminals plus Joe have a conversation on, among 
other things, tipping philosophies and their interpretations of 
Madonna's "Like a Virgin." Another scene involves Roth's lengthy 
manufactured story about running into a group of cops and a police 
dog in a bus station bathroom while carrying a giant bag of 
marijuana. Neither of these have much plot relevance but are given 
ample time to develop, like the Captain Koons gold watch speech in 
PULP FICTION, only here these sequences are more enjoyable than 
the rest of the movie. RESERVOIR DOGS is good but it's no PULP 
FICTION.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Snapper, The (1993) (TV)
        This is one of those artsy foreign Irish comedies (THE 
BROTHERS MCMULLEN, anyone?) with plenty of wry observations 
on life and biting humour (It's not spelled "humor" unless it comes 
from America). Still, even though I enjoyed THE BROTHERS 
MCMULLEN (a separate review I haven't written yet), I couldn't fully 
get into this one. The characters here were the loud, obnoxious kind 
who gather in pubs and gossip about their neighbors. That pretty much 
sums up the movie, pubs and gossip, not to mention gossip in pubs.
        There is a slight plot, though. Young adult Sharon (Tina 
Kellegher) is pregnant. Her parents aren't happy but they still support 
her even though she won't tell them who the father is. She won't tell 
anyone who the father is, not even her friends, whom she regularly 
meets at the pub to have gossip sessions with. Her father also meets his 
friends at the pub for some gossip, where he overhears from one friend 
that another friend said his daughter was "a great ride." That just goes 
to show you how distorted certain statements can become after being 
run through the rumour mill. It turns out the friend, when he used the 
phrase "great ride," was actually talking about the new roller coaster at 
Six Flags Over Ireland.
        Nevertheless, this bloke, older than Sharon's dad, is indeed 
the father of her unborn child. Sharon is pissed at him for letting the 
secret get out because now her entire family is ostracized from the 
community, no one believing her story that the baby's father is a 
Spanish sailor she met while drunk in a hotel room for one night of 
torrid animal sex. (That should make the parents feel better about the 
situation, don't you think?)
        There's not much to the movie. Like I said, pubs and gossip 
about cover it, but it does offer a few memorable lines and biting 
humour. (Sorry, I don't get enough chances to spell the word that 
way.) This Irish comedy may not have been my mug of beer, but it did 
get three-and-a-half stars out of Roger Ebert, comments like 
"Exceptionally funny!" and "Hilarious!" out of The New York Times 
and Newsday, not to mention awards at various film festivals. So 
someone out there likes these European films. THE SNAPPER also 
pretty much answers the question of why Irish people have drinking 
problems when it shows Sharon partaking in alcohol several times 
while pregnant. I'm no Surgeon General, but even I know that's bad 
for a child's health. Now back to my Hostess fried cherry pie...
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at 
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving America for over 1/50th of a century!

Title
Review for Interview with the Vampire: The Vampire Chronicles (1994)
        I never thought I could endorse the movie that aligned 
pretty-boy stars Tom Cruise, Brad Pitt, Antonio Banderas and 
Christian Slater and also inspired teenage losers with no identity to 
dye their hair red or black and wear those damn Army boots and Jim 
Morrison t-shirts everywhere. The ideal situation here would have 
involved me a) watching the movie, b) hating it, and c) writing a 
scathing review at the expense of Cruise, Pitt and weirdo novelist 
Anne Rice.
        Unfortunately for me, I enjoyed INTERVIEW WITH THE 
VAMPIRE from the beginning. It was fresh, original and--most 
importantly--violent. There were throat-slittings, beheadings and 
raging fires to appeal to the basest of animal instincts while 
counterbalancing that with intellectual prose obviously drawn straight 
from Rice's text. It does sound a little strange coming from the mouths 
of Cruise and Pitt, much like frat boys putting on a production of 
"Macbeth" ("Et tu, dude?"), but if you've ever had a fantasy about Brad 
Pitt eating a poodle (and please keep it to yourself if you have), 
INTERVIEW WITH THE VAMPIRE is the movie you've been waiting 
for.
        The story begins with vampire Pitt recounting his life story to 
reporter Slater. We learn of how Cruise sucked and sucked on his neck 
(I said NECK!) and how they both seemed to enjoy it a little too much. 
Soon, Pitt was an immortal with a thirst for blood, but since he was the 
humane kind, he had to suck the life out of rats and poodles instead. 
You know, with all the Morrison-worshipping vampire clones out 
there emulating this movie, that's the one thing I'd like to see one of 
those freaks do. Of course most of them _are_ vegetarians...
        Cruise attempts to placate Pitt by "vampirizing" a 12-year-old 
girl (Kristen Dunst, in a remarkable performance) for his pleasure. Ah 
yes, the old placate-the-pedophile trick. It doesn't work in this case, 
unless the result Cruise wanted was to have his throat cut. So with 
Cruise out of the picture, Pitt and Dunst are free to enjoy the 
Renaissance together. Sure, the whole Pitt-Dunst relationship is a little 
sick, but there's no suggestion of a sexual relationship between the 
two, although they _do_ share a coffin.
        Yes, INTERVIEW WITH THE VAMPIRE is plenty perverse, a 
dark movie with violence and suction for the whole family, 17 and up 
that is.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE website at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html

Title
Review for Action Jackson (1988)
        Toward the bottom of the '80s action movie barrel lies 
ACTION JACKSON, the only movie in Hollywood history to show 
Sharon Stone and Vanity topless within a span of ten minutes. This 
Carl "Apollo Creed" Weathers vehicle features the traditional cop vs. 
evil establishment crook, and relies on all the '80s trappings, from the 
token heroin addict who needs a fix to the shouting superior officer. 
Somewhere in between come the explosions and boobs, although there 
is a curious lack of exploding boobs.
        Weathers is Action Jackson, a Detroit cop known for all 
sorts of crazy vigilante techniques. Speaking of one past criminal 
apprehension, Jackson's superior yells, "You tore his arm off!" Jackson 
replies, "He had a spare." Jackson has been busted down to a desk job 
because of past problems with auto manufacturer Dellaplane (Craig T. 
Nelson) and now has to act as department liaison to a dinner honoring 
Nelson. After hearing what Jackson thinks of him, Stone says, "I take 
it you're not one of Dellaplane's friends." "Not unless they changed the 
definition," Jackson glowers. And of course it turns out Stone is Mrs. 
Dellaplane. Faux pas, Jackson...
        Not everything is happy in Motown; people are being killed 
and Dellaplane has evil plans for the AWA. It's all up to Jackson to 
stop it, and his only lead lies in Vanity (not his own). Wherever she 
left off with Prince in terms of exchanging sexual favors for career 
advancement she picks up in ACTION JACKSON. She plays the 
heroin addict and chanteuse in Dellaplane's nightclub. After singing 
one particularly sultry number for him, she saunters over and 
complains, "I expected a standing ovation." He responds, "You're 
getting one," and it's damn clever because he's sitting down at the 
time. Prince wouldn't even let out an innuendo that lame and he's the king of the horndogs... or at least the prince.
        It's a testament to the '80s that Sharon Stone is killed off 
within the first 30 minutes but Vanity survives the whole movie. 
ACTION JACKSON is another variation on the "unlikely partners" 
buddy action flick, with Jackson lugging junkie Vanity around. This 
leads to some of the worst paired acting of the me decade, and with the 
dialogue they're given, there's not much room for improvement. My 
favorite is when Vanity, feeling the effects of drug withdrawal, says, 
"I feel like my teeth are hollow, my gums are made of dry rubber and 
someone's trying to start a bonfire in the back of my bloody head." 
Jackson's response is, "I think I felt that way once. They called it 
love."
Visit the Andrew Hicks: Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
Serving The World For Nearly 1/25th of a Century!

Title
Review for Higher Learning (1995)
        If DO THE RIGHT THING had taken place on a college 
campus, it might have gone something like this. Director John 
Singleton (of BOYZ IN THE HOOD fame) brings us this compelling 
story whose theme is that people tend to congregate within their 
own demographic, whether it be age, sex, race or all of the above. 
Singleton mainly focuses on racism which, narrow-minded and 
primitive as it is, will never completely vanish in this country. Had 
America's background been different, racial harmony may have been 
achieved, but with things and people the way they are, it's not going 
to happen.
        On one hand you've got the skinheads like Michael 
Rappaport, who goes through his first two months at college scared 
and alone before being recruited by a bunch of neo-Nazis, who offer 
companionship while filling his head with that Aryan Nation crap. 
On the other you've got the black people like Omar Epps, who sees 
the injustice inflicted on the African race and adopts the notion that 
all white people are to be distrusted and hated. Epps blames every 
wrong thing in his life on his skin color and soon withdraws to the 
comfort of "Super Duper Senior" Ice Cube's bachelor pad (also 
inhabited by charismatic rapper Busta Rhymes), where giant "Black 
Power" posters abound.
        Singleton doesn't just focus on the race problems, he shows 
feminine problems as well, when Kristy "Buffy" Swanson is date 
raped her second night on campus and is taken under the wing of 
Jennifer Connelly, one of those penis-boycotting feminists. I could 
guess right off that Connelly's character was a lesbian, albeit one of 
those beautiful Hollywood lesbians. Connelly makes it clear that she 
doesn't want to pressure Swanson into swearing off the male gender 
entirely, but there's always a breast to cry on if she wants it.
        Not every character is an extremist. There are some people 
in the movie with sense, like the Political Science professor 
(Lawrence Fishburne) who can actually look beyond sex and skin 
color and tries to explain to Epps that his defeatist attitude won't get 
him anywhere in the world; Epps' girlfriend, the lovely supermodel 
Tyra Banks, who also hasn't given up on success just because she 
was born black; Swanson's roommate, Regina King of "Family 
Matters," who's fought off Urkel's advances for six seasons and now 
has to worry about getting hit on by a lesbian roommate; and Epps' 
roommate, a white boy with no racial prejudice who tries to befriend 
Epps but can't break down the race barrier.
        Eventually, as in DO THE RIGHT THING, the racial 
tension builds to the point at which it manifests itself in violence, 
but not in just one scene and not just in one way. In the end, little 
ground is gained by either side. Thankfully, Singleton's realistic 
outlook prevented him from making a sugar-coated, harmonious 
ending. As one of the characters points out, that kind of "We Are 
the World" outlook is a crock. Certain individuals will always think 
society has screwed them over for the wrong reasons. And other 
individuals will think themselves superior to everyone else. The rest 
of this know none of this is right but some people's minds just aren't 
going to be changed. The race problem can't be eliminated entirely, 
but intelligent films like this can change individuals' thoughts and 
actions for the better.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
From noraruth@aol.com Mon Jun 10 15:04:47 EDT 1996
Article: 3656 of rec.arts.movies.reviews
Path: nntphub.cb.att.com!not-for-mail
From: noraruth@aol.com (Andrew Hicks)
Newsgroups: rec.arts.movies.reviews
Subject: REVIEW: HIGHER LEARNING (1995)
Followup-To: rec.arts.movies.current-films
Date: 10 Jun 1996 18:26:25 GMT
Organization: University of Missouri - Columbia
Lines: 69
Sender: ecl@mtcts1.att.com (Evelyn C. Leeper)
Approved: ecl@mtcts1.att.com
Message-ID: 
Reply-To: noraruth@aol.com (Andrew Hicks)
NNTP-Posting-Host: mtcts2.mt.lucent.com
Summary: r.a.m.r. #05427
Keywords: author=Hicks
Originator: ecl@mtcts2
Status: RO
        If DO THE RIGHT THING had taken place on a college 
campus, it might have gone something like this. Director John 
Singleton (of BOYZ IN THE HOOD fame) brings us this compelling 
story whose theme is that people tend to congregate within their 
own demographic, whether it be age, sex, race or all of the above. 
Singleton mainly focuses on racism which, narrow-minded and 
primitive as it is, will never completely vanish in this country. Had 
America's background been different, racial harmony may have been 
achieved, but with things and people the way they are, it's not going 
to happen.
        On one hand you've got the skinheads like Michael 
Rappaport, who goes through his first two months at college scared 
and alone before being recruited by a bunch of neo-Nazis, who offer 
companionship while filling his head with that Aryan Nation crap. 
On the other you've got the black people like Omar Epps, who sees 
the injustice inflicted on the African race and adopts the notion that 
all white people are to be distrusted and hated. Epps blames every 
wrong thing in his life on his skin color and soon withdraws to the 
comfort of "Super Duper Senior" Ice Cube's bachelor pad (also 
inhabited by charismatic rapper Busta Rhymes), where giant "Black 
Power" posters abound.
        Singleton doesn't just focus on the race problems, he shows 
feminine problems as well, when Kristy "Buffy" Swanson is date 
raped her second night on campus and is taken under the wing of 
Jennifer Connelly, one of those penis-boycotting feminists. I could 
guess right off that Connelly's character was a lesbian, albeit one of 
those beautiful Hollywood lesbians. Connelly makes it clear that she 
doesn't want to pressure Swanson into swearing off the male gender 
entirely, but there's always a breast to cry on if she wants it.
        Not every character is an extremist. There are some people 
in the movie with sense, like the Political Science professor 
(Lawrence Fishburne) who can actually look beyond sex and skin 
color and tries to explain to Epps that his defeatist attitude won't get 
him anywhere in the world; Epps' girlfriend, the lovely supermodel 
Tyra Banks, who also hasn't given up on success just because she 
was born black; Swanson's roommate, Regina King of "Family 
Matters," who's fought off Urkel's advances for six seasons and now 
has to worry about getting hit on by a lesbian roommate; and Epps' 
roommate, a white boy with no racial prejudice who tries to befriend 
Epps but can't break down the race barrier.
        Eventually, as in DO THE RIGHT THING, the racial 
tension builds to the point at which it manifests itself in violence, 
but not in just one scene and not just in one way. In the end, little 
ground is gained by either side. Thankfully, Singleton's realistic 
outlook prevented him from making a sugar-coated, harmonious 
ending. As one of the characters points out, that kind of "We Are 
the World" outlook is a crock. Certain individuals will always think 
society has screwed them over for the wrong reasons. And other 
individuals will think themselves superior to everyone else. The rest 
of this know none of this is right but some people's minds just aren't 
going to be changed. The race problem can't be eliminated entirely, 
but intelligent films like this can change individuals' thoughts and 
actions for the better.
Visit the Movie Critic at LARGE homepage at
http://www.missouri.edu/~c667778/movies.html
